THE LIBRARY 
OF 

THE UNIVERSITY 
OF CALIFORNIA 
LOS ANGELES 



PHENOMENOLOGY OF PERCEPTION 



International Library of Philosophy 
and Scientific Method 



EDITOR: TED HONDERICH 
ADVISORY EDITOR: BERNARD WILLIAMS 

A Catalogue of books already published in the 
International Library of Philosophy and Scientific Method 
will be found at the end of this volume. 



PHENOMENOLOGY 
OF PERCEPTION 



by 

M. Merleau-Ponty 

translated from the French by 
Colin Smith 



LONDON AND HENLEY 

ROUTLEDGE & KEGAN PAUL 

NEW JERSEY: THE HUMANITIES PRESS 



Translated from the French 
phenom£nologie de la perception 
First published in England in 1962 
by Routledge & Kegan Paul Ltd 
39 Store Street 
London WCIE 7DD and 
Broadway House, Newtown Road 
Henley-on-Thames, Oxon RG9 1EN 
Reprinted 1965, 1966, 1967, 1970, 1974, 1976 and 1978 
Printed in Great Britain by 
Redwood Burn Limited 
Trowbridge & Esher 

English translation 
© Routledge & Kegan Paul Ltd 1962 , 

Translation revisions incorporated in this 
edition supplied by Forrest Williams, 
Professor of Philosophy, University of Colorado 

No part of this book may be reproduced 
in any form without permission from 
the publisher, except for the quotation 
of brief passages in criticism 

ISBN 0 7100 3613 2 



uerary 

M-V|7 r E 

CONTENTS 



Preface 


page vii 


INTRODUCTION: TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES 


AMn THF RFTIIRN TO PHFNOMFNA 




1 The 'Sensation' as a Unit of Experience 


3 


2 'Association' and the 'Projection of Memories' 




3 'Attention' and 'Judgement* 


26 


4 The Phenomenal Field 


52 


PART ONb: THb BODY 




Experience and objective thought. The problem of the body 


67 


1 The Body as Object and Mechanistic Physiology 


73 


l i nc cApcricncc ui inc .Douy anu v-jabbica i x sycnuiogy 


on 


3 The Spatiality of One's own Body and Motility 


98 


4 The Synthesis of One's own Body 


148 


5 The Body in its Sexual Being 


154 


6 The Body as Expression, and Speech 


174 


PART TWO* THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

A *V & V I A Tf V/ • 1 11 Aw » T V IV Iw Aw* <J A AX w Aw A » Aw A/ 




The theory of the body is already a theory of perception 


203 


1 Sense Experience 


207 


2 Space 


243 


3 The Thing and the Natural World 


299 


4 Other Selves and the Human World 


346 


PART THREE: BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND 




BEING-IN-THE-WORLD 




1 The Cogito 


369 


2 Temporality 


410 


3 Freedom 


434 



Bibliographv 
Index 



457 
463 



PREFACE 



WHAT is phenomenology? It may seem strange that this question 
has still to be asked half a century after the first works of Husserl. The 
fact remains that it has by no means been answered .[Phenomenology 
is the study of essences; and according to it, all problems amount to 
finding definitions of essences : the essence of perception, or the essence 
of consciousness, for example^jBut phenomenology is also a philo- 
sophy which puts essences back into existence, and does not expect to 
arrive at an understanding of man and the world from any starting 
point other than that of their(^cticity!^It is a transcendental philo- 
sophy which places in abeyance the assertions arising out of the 
natural attitude, the better to understand them; but it is also a philo- 
sophy for which the world is always 'already there* before reflection 
begins — as'an inalienable presence ; and all its efforts are concentrated 
upon re-achieving a direct and primitive contact with the world, and — 
endowing that contact with a philosophical status. It is the search for 
a philosophy which shall be a 'rigorous science', but it also offers an 
account of space, time and the world as we 'live' them. IjUriesjQ^ve 
a direct description of our experiencea s it is, without taking account 
of its ^ psycholoji^j^rigin^ and the causal explan ati ons which t he 
scientist^th e historian or the sociologist _ma y be able to provide. Yet 
Husserl in his last works mentions a 'genetic phenomenology', 1 and 
even a 'constructive phenomenology'. 2 One may try to do away with 
these contradictions by making a distinction between Husserl's and 
Heidegger's phenomenologies; yet the whole of Sein und Zeit springs 
from an indication given by Husserl and amounts to no more than an 
explicit account of the 'naturlicher Weltbegriff ' or the ' Lebenswelt 1 
which Husserl, towards the end of his life, identified as the ce ntral 
theme ( rf phei^menolo gy^ withjh^esultjhat thejcpntradiction re- 
appears in Husserrs own philosophy. The reader pressed for time will 
BeTncfinedto give up the idea of covering a doctrine which says 
everything, and will wonder whether a philosophy which cannot 
define its scope deserves all the discussion which has gone on around 
it, and whether he is not faced rather by a myth or a fashion. 

1 Meditations cartisiennes, pp. 120 ff. 

9 See the unpublished 6th Meditation cart&ienne, edited by Eugen Fink, to 
which G. Berger has kindly referred us. 

vii 



PREFACE 



Even if this were the case, there would still be a need to understand 
the prestige of the myth and the origin of the fashion, and the opinion 
of the responsible philosopher must be that phenomenology can be 
prnrthpj l and identified as a mann er or style of thinking, that it exist ed 
a s a movement before arriving at oomplete awar e ness of itself as a 
philosophy.l t has been long on the way, and its adherents have dis- 
covered it in every quarter, certainly in Hegel and Kierkegaard, but 
equally in Marx, Nietzsche and Freud. A purely linguistic examina- 
tion of the texts in question would yield no proof; we find in texts 
only what we put into them, and if ever any kind of history has sug- 
gested the interpretations which should be put on it, it is the history of 
philosophy. WejhaJLfindjn_ ourselves, and nowhere else, the unity 
and true me aning of phenom enology. It is less a question of counting 
up^quotaTions than of determining and expressing in concrete form 
this phenomenology for ourselves which has given a number of present- 
day readers the impression, on reading Husserl or Heidegger, not so 
much of encountering a new philosophy as of recognizing what they 
had been waiting for. Phenomenology is accessi bl^oiily_lhr.Qugrx a 
phenomenological method,. Let us, therefore, try systematically to 



Bring together the celebrated phenomenological themes as they have 
grown spontaneously together in life. Perhaps we shall then under- 
stand why phenomenology has for so long remained at an initial stage, 
as a problem to be solved and a hope to be realized. 

It is a matter of describing, not of explaining or analysing. 
Husserl's first directive to phenomenology, in its early stages, to be a 
'descriptive psychology', or to return to the 'things themselves', is 
from the start a rejection of science. I am not the outcome or the 
meeting-point of numerous causal agencies which determine my 
bodily or psychological make-up. I canno t conceive mys elfas nothing 
but 3 bit of the wprld, a jnere object of biological, pk ychologigaT or 
sociolo^icaUnveOigalion. I can not shut myjelfupw^n the realm of 
science^ All mv knowledge of the world, even my scientific knowledg e, 
is gained fro m my own particular point of view, or from so me 
e xperience of th e worl d without which the symbols of science wo uld 
be meaningless? lhe whole universe of science is built upon the 
world as directly experienced, and if we want to subject science itself 
to rigorous scrutiny and arrive at a precise assessment of its meaning 
and scope, we must^ b egin by reawak^ ninglli^asi_<i£XP_erience^f the[ 
worldW jwhich science is the^se. cond-ord er expression. Science has 
noFahd never will have, by its nature, the same significance qua form 
of being as the world which we perceive, for the simple reason that it 
is a rationale or explanation of that world. I am, not a 'living creature* 
nor even a 'man 1 , nor again even 4 a consciousness* endowed with all 

viii 




PREFACE 



the characteristics which zoology, social anatomy or inductive psycho- 
logy recognize in these various products of the natural or historical 
process — I am the.absolute source, my existence docs not stem f rom 
jny^ajite^edents, from my physical and social environ mejijUjnstead it 
moves outj o wards them and sustains them, for I a lone bring into 
^n g'tor myself (and therefore into being in the only sense thaTtHe~ 
word can have for me) the tradit i on which I elect to carry on, oMjie 
horizon wh ^se_di^rLC^J!rjom. me^would be abolishe d — since that 
distance is not one of its properties— if I were not there to scan it with 
my gaze. Scientific points of yj^w j ac.cordingJx^hid^ is 
a m oment of the world's, are always both naive an d at the samejtTme 
^IisKonest, because t hev take for granted , withou t expl icitly me jition- 
mg jt r the other point of view , na mely that of cpnftcioiisnes^ through 
wEchJVorn the outset_a^cu:ldJbjjn sJtself rou nd me and begins~to" 
exisLfor me. Tq return t o-t hings themselves is to return to thatj world 
which precedes knowled ge, of which knowledge always speaks^ndTin 
relation to which every scientific schematization is an abstract and 
derivative sign-language, as is geography in relation to the country- 
side in which we have learnt beforehand what a forest, a prairie or a 
river is. 

This move is absolutely distinct from the idealist return to con- 
sciousness, and the demand for a pure description excludes equally 
the procedure of analytical reflection on the one hand, and that of 
scientific explanation on the other. Deggartes_and particularly Kant 
detached the subject, or consciousness, by showing that I could not 
possibly apprehend anything as existing unless I first of all experienced 
myself as existing in the act of apprehending it. They presented co n- 
sciousnesyihe absol ute cert ainty of my exis tence for m yself, as t he 
condition of there bein gany thing at all; and the act ofrelating as the 
basis o f relatedness. It is true thaftHe~act of relating is nothing if 
divorced from the spectacle of the world in which relations are 
found ; t^hejmiiy-oLcQnsciousnessjn Ka nt is achieved^ multaneously 
wi th that of t he world. And inDescartes methodicaTdoubt does not 
deprive us of anything, since the whole world, at least in so far as we 
experience it, is reinstated in the Cogito, enjoying equal certainty, and 
simply labelled 'thought of . . .'. B ut the relations between subject 
_ajid-^or4d^areL_nQL strictly bilaleralLii they were, the certainty of 
the world would, in Descartes, be immediately given with that of the 
Cogito, and Kant would not have talked about his 'Copernican 
revolution*. AnalyticaLr eflection starts from our experience of the 
wor ld and goes bac k to the subjecta s to a con dition o f possibili ty 
gjstjnct jrom that experience , reve aling the all-embracing synthesis a s 
_t hat without which there wo uld b e no world. To this extent it ceases 
to remain part of our experience and offers, in place of an account, a 

ix 



PREFACE 



reconstruction. It is understandable, in view of this, that Husserl, 
having accused Kant of adopting a 'faculty psychologismV j jiould 
have u rged, irr place o f a noet ic analysis which basesjhe wor!dj)n the 
— synlhesizingjictivity of the subject, hisT own 'noema tic reflection * 
which remains withirTthc objectand, instead of begettingj t, brings 
to light its fundangentaTunity; 

The world is there before any possible analysis of mine, and it 
would be artificial to make it the outcome of a series of syntheses 
which link, in the first place sensations, then aspects of the object 
corresponding to different perspectives, when both are nothing but 
products of analysis, with no sort of prior reality. A nalytical reflectio n 
believes thajjtc an trace b ackthe course followed by a prior co nstitut- 
Tng_a^t_aii4jirnye, ip tjie__!inner man 7 :=::: to_^e_Saint A ugusti ne's 
expression— ata constitutmg^ower which h as al ways been identical 
wTtlTthat inner self. Thus reflection is carried away by itself and in- 
stalls itselt in an lmpre^a^Ie^subjectivity, as yet untouched by being 
and time. But this is very ingenuous, or at least it is an incomplete 
form of reflection which loses sight of its own beginning. When I 
begin to reflect my reflection bears upon an unreflective experience; 
moreover my reflection cannot be unaware of itself as an event, and 
so it appears to itself in the light of a truly creative act, of a changed 
structure of consciousness, and yet it has to recognize, as having 
priority over its own operations, the world which is given to the 
subject because the subject is given to himself. The real has to be de- 
scribed, not constructed or formed. Which means that I cannot put 
perception into the same category as the syntheses represented by 
judgements, acts or predications. My field of perception is constantly 
filled with a play of colours, noises and fleeting tactile sensations which 
I cannot relate precisely to the context of my clearly perceived world, 
yet which I ne\ertheless immediately 'place' in the world, without 
ever confusing them with my daydreams. Equally constantly I weave 
dreams round things. I imagine people and things whose presence is 
not incompatible with the context, yet who are not in fact involved in 
it: they are ahead of reality, in the realm of the imaginary. If the 
reality of my perception were based solely on the intrinsic coherence 
of 'representations', it ought to be for ever hesitant and, being 
wrapped up in my conjectures on probabilities, I ought to be cease- 
lessly taking apart misleading syntheses, and reinstating in reality 
stray phenomena which I had excluded in the first place. But this does 
not happen. The real is a closely woven fabric. It does not await our 
judgement before incorporating the most surprising phenomena, or 
before rejecting the most plausible figments of our imagination. 
Perception is not a science of the world, it is not even an act, a deli- 
1 Logische Untcrsuchimgen, Prolegomena zur reinen Logik, p. 93. 

X 



PREFACE 



berate taking up of a position; it is the background from which all 
acts stand out, and is presupposed by them. The world is not an 
object such that I have in my possession the law of its making; it is 
the natural setting of an d field for, all my thoughts and all my 
explicit perceptions: Truth does not Inhabit' only 'the inner man', 1 
or more accurately, there is no inner man, man is in the world, and 
only in the world does he know himself. When I return to myself from 
an excursion into the realm of dogmatic common sense or of science, 
1 find, not a source of intrinsic truth, but a subject destined to the 
world. 

All of which reveals the true meaning of the famous phenomeno- 
logical reduction. There is probably no question over which Husserl 
spent more time — or to which he more often returned, since the 
'problematic of reduction' occupies an important place in his un- 
published work. For a long time, and even in recent texts, the re- 
duction is presented as the return to a transcendental consciousness 
before which the world is spread out and completely transparent, 
quickened through and through by a series of apperceptions which it 
is the philosopher's task to reconstitute on the basis of their outcome. 
Thus my sensation of redness is perceived as the manifestation of a 
certain redness experienced, this in turn as the manifestation of a red 
surface, which is the manifestation of a piece of red cardboard, and 
this finally is the manifestation or outline of a red thing, namely this 
book. We are to understand, then, that it is the apprehension of a 
certain hyle, as indicating a phenomenon of a higher degree, the Sinn- 
_gebmg> or active m eani ng-giving operation _w iiicri-mayJa£ saidrto 
cLefin&jcjmscj ousness, sc ^that_th£^ world is not hing_hut 'world-as- 
nieaning', and the phenomenological reduction is idealistic, in the 
sense that there is here a transcendental idealism which treats the 
world as an indivisible unity of value shared by Peter and Paul, in 
which their perspectives blend. 'Peter's consciousness' and 'Paul's 
consciousness' are in communication, the perception of the world 'by 
Peter' is not Peter's doing any more than its perception 'by Paul' is 
Paul's doing; in each case it is the doing of pre-personal forms of 
consciousness, whose communication raises no problem, since it is 
demanded by the very definition of consciousness, meaning or truth. <1 
In so far as I am a consciousness, that is, in so far as something has ( 
meaning for me, I am neither here nor there, neither Peter nor Paul; \ 
I am in no way distinguishable from an 'other' consciousness, since — 
we are immediately in touch with the world and since the world is, by 
definition, unique, being the system in which all truths cohere. A 
l ogically consistent trans cendental i dealism rids the world of its ' 
1 In te redi; in interiore homine habitat veriias (Saint Augustine). 

xi 



PREFACE 



0£adt^BdJtsJransc^ The world is precisely that thing of 

which we form a representation, not as men or as empirical subjects, 
but in so far as we are all one light and participate in the One without 
destroying its unity. Analytical reflection knows nothing of the pro- 
blem of other minds, or of that of the world, because it insists that 
with the first glimmer of consciousness there appears in me theoreti- 
cally the power of reaching some universal truth, and that the other 
person, being equally without thisness, location or body, the Alter 
and the Ego are one and the same in the true world which is the 
unifier of minds^Jhere is no difficulty in understanding how / can 
conceive the Otherpbecause the I and consequently the Other are not 
conceived as part of the woven stuff of phenomena; they have 
validity rather than existence.jThere is nothing hidden behind these 
faces and gestures, no domain to which I have no access, merely a 
little shadow which owes its very existence to the light. For Husserl, 
on the contrary, it is well known that there is a problem of other 
people, and the alter ego is a paradox. If the other is truly for himself 
alone, beyond his being for me, and if we are for each other and not 
both for God, we must necessarily have some appearance for each 
f - other. He must and I must have an outer appearance, and there must 
be, besides the perspective of the For Oneself— my view of myself and 
the other's of himself— a perspective of For Others — my view of 
others and theirs of me. Of course, these two perspectives, in each 
one of us, cannot be simply juxtaposed, for in that case it is not I 
that the other would see, nor he that I should see. I must be the 
exterior that I present to others, and the body of the other must be the 
other himself. This paradox and the dialectic of the Ego and the 
Alter are possible only provided that the Ego and the Alter Ego are 
defined by their situation and are not freed from all inherence; that is, 
provided that philosophy does not culminate in a return to the self, 
and that I discover by reflection not only my presence to myself, but 
also the possibility of an 'outside spectator'; that is, again, provided 
that at the very moment when I experience my existence — at the ulti- 
mate extremity of reflection— I fall short of the ultimate density 
which would place me outside time, and that I discover within myself 
a kind of internal weakness standing in the way of my being totally 
individualized: a weakness which exposes me to the gaze of others as 
a man among men or at least as a consciousness among conscious- 
nesses. Hitherto the Cogito depreciated the perception of others, 
teaching me as it did that the I is accessible only to itself, since it 
defined me as the thought which I have of myself, and which clearly 
I am alone in having, at least in this ultimate sensc^For the 'other' 
to be more than an empty word, it is necessary that my existence 
should never be reduced to my bare awareness of existing, but that it 



XII 



PREFACE 



should take in also the awareness that one may have of it, and thus 
include my incarnation in some nature and the possibility, at least, of 
a historical situation^The Cogito must reveal me in a situation, and 
it is on this condition alone that transcendental subjectivity can, as 
Husserl puts it, 1 be an intersubjectivity. As a meditating Ego, I can 
clearly distinguish from myself the world and things, since I cer- 
tainly do not exist in the way in which things exist. I must even set 
aside from myself my body understood as a thing among things, as a 
collection of physico-chemical processes. But even if the cogitatio, 
which I thus discover, is without location in objective time^nd space, 
it is not without place in the phenomenologickl world. {The world, r 
which I distinguished from myself as the totality of things or of pro- 
cesses linked by causal relationships, I rediscover 'in me' as the per- 
manent horizon of all my cogitationes and as a dimension in relation 
to which I am constantly situating myselfjTheJrue Cogito does n ot 
definethe^iil^^ 

andfu rthermore do^ sngt^ony^tthe jndubitability_o£lhe worldjnto 
the indubitabnity-ofUhougtrt-abemt the world, nor finallydoes it re- 
l)j ^e the~"wo i ^te it 
recognizes my thought itself as an inalienable fact, and does away 
with any kind of idealism in revealing me as *being-in-the-world' J 

It is because we are through and through compounded of relation- 
ships with the world that for us the only way to become aware of the 
fact is to suspend the resultant activity, to refuse it our complicity (to 
look at it ohne mitzumachen, as Husserl often says), or yet again, to 
put it 'out of play'. Not because we reject the certainties of common 
sense and a natural attitude to things — they are, on the contrary, the 
constant theme of philosophy — but because, being the presupposed 
basis of any thought, they are taken for granted, and go unnoticed, and 
because in order to arouse them and bring them to view, we have to 
suspend for a moment our recognition of them. The best formulation 
of the reduction is probably that given by Eugen Fink, Husserl's 
assistant, when he spoke of 'wonder' in the face of the world. 2 
Reflection does not withdraw from the world towards the unity of 
consciousness as the world's basis; it steps back to watch the forms of 
transcendence fly up like sparks from a fire ; it slackens the intentional 
threads which attach us to the world and thus brings them to our 
notice; it alone is consciousness of the world because it reveals that 
world as strange and paradoxical. [Husserl's transcendental is not 
Kant's and Husserl accuses Kant's philosophy of being 'worldly', 

1 Die Krisis der europaischen Wissenschaften und die transzendentale Phano~ 
menologie, III (unpublished). 

a Die phanomenologische Philosophie Edmund Husserls in der gegenwartigen 
Kritik, pp. 331 and ff. 

xiii 



PREFACE 



because it makes use of our relation to the world, which is the motive 
force of the transcendental deduction, and makes the world im- 
manent in the subject, instead of being filled with wonder at it and 
conceiving the subject as a process of transcendence towards the 
worlds/All the misunderstandings with his interpreters, with the 
existentialist 'dissidents' and finally with himself, have arisen from 
the fact that in order to see the world and grasp it as paradoxical, we 
must break with our familiar acceptance of it and, also, from the fact 
that from this break we can learn nothing but the unmotivated up- 
surge of the world. The Jj^osthnjDOj^a m lesson which the r eduction 
teaches us is the impossjbjT^ This is why 



Rul^eTn^am^ the possibility of the reduction. If 



we were absolute mind, the reduction would present no problem. 
But since, on the contrary, we are in the world, since indeed our 
reflections are carried out in the temporal flux on to which we are 
trying to seize (since they sich einstrdmen, as Husserl says), there is no 
thought which embraces all our thought. The philosopher, as the 
unpublished works declare, is a perpetual beginner, which means 
that he takes for granted nothing that men, learned or otherwise, 
believe they know. It means also that philosophy itself must not take 
itself for granted, in so far as it may have managed to say something 
true; that it is an ever-renewed experiment in making its own begin- 
ning; that it consists wholly in the description of this beginning, and 
finally, that radical reflection amounts to a consciousness of its own 
dependence on an unreflective life which is its initial situation, un- 
changing, given once and for all. Far from being, as has been thought, 
a procedure of idealistic philosophy, phenomenological reduction 
- belongs to existential philosophy: Heidegger's 'being-in-the-world' 
appears only against the background of the phenomenological 
reduction. 

A misunderstanding of a similar kind confuses the notion of the 
'essences' in Husserl. EwtvjJ^<\\\c\\CiX\ , says Humeri, as well^s^being 
transcendental is necessarily eidetic. ^That means that we cannot sub- 
ject our perception ot the world to philosophical scrutiny without 
ceasing to be identified with that act of positing the world, with that 
interest in it which delimits us, without drawing back from our com- 
mitment which is itself thus made to^appear as a spectacle, without 
passing from the fad of our existence to its nature, from the Dasein to 
the Wesen.lBut it is clear that the essence is here not the end, but a 



- means, that our effective involvement in the world is precisely what 
has to be understood and made amenable to conceptualization, for it 
is what polarizes all our conceptual particularizations. The need to 
proceed by way of essences does not mean that philosophy takes them 





xiv 



4 



PREFACE 

as its object, but, on the contrary, that our existence is too tightly 
held in the world to be able to know itself as such at the moment of its 
involvement, and that it requires the field* of ideality in order to 
become acquainted with and to prevail over its facticity. The Vienna 
Circle, as is well known, lays it down categorically that we can enter 
into relations only with meanings. For example, 'consciousness* is 
not for the Vienna Circle identifiable with what we are. It is a complex 
meaning which has developed late in time, which should be handled 
with care, and only after the many meanings which have contributed, 
throughout the word's semantic development, to the formation of its 
present one have been made explicit. Logical positivism of this kind 
is the antithesis of Husserl's thought. Whatever the subtle changes of 
meaning which have ultimately brought us, as a linguistic acquisition, 
the word and concept of consciousness, we enjoy direct access to what 
it designates. For we have the experience of ourselves, of that con- 
sciousness which we are, and it is on the basis of this experience that 
all linguistic connotations are assessed, and precisely through it that 
language comes to have any meaning at all for us. 'It is that as yet 
dumb experience . . . which we are concerned to lead to the pure 
expression of its own meaning.' 1 Husserl's essences are d estined to 
bring back all the living relationship sjyf experience , as the fisherman's 
jiet draw s up t r om THgjdepths_of the ocean qujyeringjish and sea- 
weed. Jean Wahl is therefore wrong in saying that 'Husserl separaTe? 
essences from existence'. 2 The separated essences are those of lan- - 
guage. It is thepffice of language to cause essences to exist in a state 
of separation which is in fact mere ly apparent, since through language 
they stil lrest upon the ante-pre^ative' llfc l)f consciousness . In the 
silence ot primary consciousness can be seen appearing not only 
what words mean, but also what things mean: the core of primary 
meaning round which the acts of naming and expression take shape. 

Seeking the essence of consciousness will therefore not consist in 
developing the Wortbedeutung of consciousness and escaping from 
existence into the universe of things said; it will consist in rediscover- 
ing my actual presence to myself, the fact of my consciousness which 
is in the last resort what the word and the concept of consciousness 
mean.(Looking foiUh& wprld' s essence is not looking for what i t is as _ 
an idea once ithaxbeenxe duced to athem e of discourse; it i s looking 
lor what it is as aJk ct for us. before any thematiz atio n . (Sensa'tionalisrrT) 
' reduces* the world by notic ing that after all we n e ver experie nce any- 
tlmigj3ut_states oLmirs elves. Tr anscendental idealism too 'redljccs* 
the world mice, in so far as it guaHnteesJhe_world, it does so by 
reg arding it as thoug ht or^on sciousness of tli ej^orld^and as the mere 

1 Meditations carte'siennes, p. 33. 

* Realisme, dialectique et mystere, TArbalete, Autumn, 1942, unpaginated. 

XV 



^ 0* ^ PREFACE 

correlative of our knowledge\with the result that it becomes imma- 
nent in consciousness and the^^t^) of things is thereby done away 
with. The eidetic reduction is, on the other hand, the determination 
to bring the world to light as it is before any falling back on ourselves 
has occurred, it is the ambition to make reflection emulate the un* 
reflective life of consciousness. I aim at and perceive a world. If I said, 
as do the sensationalists, that we have here only 'states of conscious- 
ness', and if I tried to distinguish my perceptions from my dreams 
with the aid of 'criteria', I should overlook the phenomenon of the 
world. For if I am able to talk about 'dreams' and 'reality', to bother 
my head about the distinction between imaginary and real, and cast 
doubt upon the 'real', it is because this distinction is already made by 
me before any analysis ; it is because I have an experience of the real 
as of the imaginary, and the problem then becomes one not of asking 
how critical thought can provide for itself secondary equivalents of 
this distinction, but of making explicit our primordial knowledge of 
the 'real', of describing our perception of the world as that upon 
which our idea of truth is forever based. We must n ot, therefore, 

- wojiderj Yhether we really ^ ejrejv^rwo rid, we must instead say: the 
j&arld_js_3!iiat^e^^ In more cen e ral^ terms weZm HsTnot 

woi^er jyjielhex^ur self-e^Wdent truths are red truths, _ or_whether, 
frTr^u^hsome per^ersity^Tnlierent ir TouFSSH^ that_which^ is self- 

^vid^rrLfor^jiiight jTotJ)e illusory in relat ion to so me tr uTh^n it self. 
JorjjLsai ar as we talk a bout ilhisioajnTbecajiy wejia ye identifie d 
illusions, and done so solely i n the light of some perceptio n wh ich at 
the same tim e^ga^assu rance"ot its o w^Tr mhTn ToIIowslhat doubt, 
or the fear of being mistaken, testifies as soon as it arises to our 
power of unmasking error, and that it could never finally tear us 
away from truth. We are in the realm of truth and it is 'the experience 
of truth' which is self-evident. 1 To seek the essence of perception is to 
declare that perception is, not presumed true, but defined as access to 
truth. So, if I now wanted, according to idealistic principles, to base 
this de facto self-evident truth, this irresistible belief, on some absolute 
self-evident truth, that is, on the absolute clarity which my thoughts 
have for me ; if I tried to find in myself a creative thought which bodied 
forth the framework of the world or illumined it through and through, 
I should once more prove unfaithful to my experience of the world, 
and should be looking for what makes that experience possible 
instead of looking for what it is. The self-evidence of perception is not 
adequate thought or apodeictic self-evidence. 2 The_wo_lld is not what 

1 Das Erlebnis der Wahrhcit (Logische Untersuchungen, Prolegomena zur re inert 
Logik) p. 190. 

1 There is no apodeictic self-evidence, the Formale und transzendentale Logik 
(p. 142) says in effect. 

xvi 



PREFACE 



Mhink r but what I live through . I am open to the world, I have no 
doubt that I am in communication with it, but I do not possess it; 
it is inexhaustible. There is a world', or rather: There is the world'; 
I can never completely account for this ever-reiterated assertion 
in my life. This facticity of the world is what constitutes the 
Weltlichkeit der Welt, what causes the world to be the world; just as 
the facticity of the cogito is not an imperfection in itself, but rather 
what assures me of my existence. The eidetic method is the method 
of a phenomenological positivism which bases the possible on the 
real. 

We can now consider the notion of intentionality, too often cited 
as the main discovery of phenomenology, whereas it is understand- 
able only through the reduction. "All consciousness is consciousness 
of something'; there is nothing new in that. K ant sh owed, in the 
JtejutalwiuijLl^^ TTTmpos sible witKbu t 

~outer perception that the world, as a collection of connected 
"~pEenomena, is anticipated in the consciousness of my unity, and is 
the means whereby I come into being as a consciousness. What 
distinguishes intentionality from the Kantian relation to a possible 
object is that the unity of the world, before being posited by know- 
ledge in a specific act of identification, is 'lived' as ready-made or 
already there. Kant himself shows in the Critique of Judgement that 
there exists a unity of the imagination and the understanding and a 
unity of subjects before the object, and that, in experiencing the 
beautiful, for example, I am aware of a harmony between sensation 
and concept, between myself and others, which is itself without any 
concept. Here the subject is no longer the universal thinker of a 
system of objects rigorously interrelated, the positing power who sub- 
jects the manifold to the law of the understanding, in so far as he is 
to be able to put together a world — he discovers and enjoys his own 
nature as spontaneously in harmony with the law of the understand- 
ing. But if the subject has a nature, then the hidden art of the imagina- 
tion must condition the categorial activity. It is no longer merely the 
aesthetic judgement, but knowledge too which rests upon this art, an 
art which forms the basis of the unity of consciousness and of con- 
sciousnesses. 

Husserl takes up again the Critique of Judgement when he talks 
about a teleology of consciousness. It is not a matter of duplicating 
human consciousness with some absolute thought which, from out- 
side, is imagined as assigning to it its aims. It is a question of recogniz- 
ing consciousness itself as a project of the world, meant for a world 
which it neither embraces nor possesses, but towards which it is per- 
petually directed — and the world as this pre-objective individual 

xvii 



PREFACE 



whose imperious unity decrees what knowledge shall take as its goal. 
This is why Husserl distinguishes between intentionaiity of act, which 
is that of our judgements and of those occasions when we voluntarily 
take up a position— the only intentionaiity discussed in the Critique 
of Pure Reason — and operative ijitentionality (fungierende Inten- 
tionalitat), or that which produces the natural and antepredicative 
unity of the world and of our life, being apparent in our desires, our 
evaluations and in the landscape we see, more clearly than in objec- 
tive knowledge, and furnishing the text which our knowledge tries to 
translate into precise language. Our, relati o nship to t h e. world, as it is 
untirjngly^eiUHKiated-^ jthin us, is not a thing which can be a ny, 
furthe r clarij c^by^naj^sis; philoso phy can only pla cejt once more 
beiore^our^eyes an d^u^sent \\ for pur ratification. 

Through this broadened notion of intentionaiity, phenomeno- 
logical 'comprehension' is distinguished from traditional 'intellection', 
which is confined to 'true and immutable natures', and so pheno- 
menology can become a phenomenology of origins. Whether we are 
concerned with a thing perceived, a historical event or a doctrine, to 
'understand' is to take in the total intention— not only what these 
things arc for representation (the 'properties' of the thing perceived, 
the mass of 'historical facts', the 'ideas' introduced by the doctrine) — 
but the unique mode of existing expressed in the properties of the 
pebble, the glass or the piece of wax, in all the events of a revolution, 
in all the thoughts of a philosopher. It is a matter, in the case of each 
civilization, of finding the Idea in the Hegelian sense, that is, not a 
law of the physico-mathematical type, discoverable by objective 
thought, but that formula which sums up some unique manner of 
behaviour towards others, towards Nature, time and death: a certain 
way of patterning the world which the historian should be capable of 
seizing upon and making his own. These are the dimensions of history. 
In this context there is not a human word, not a gesture, even one 
which is the outcome of habit or absent-mindedness, which has not 
some meaning. For example, I may have been under the impression 
that I lapsed into silence through weariness, or some minister may 
have thought he had uttered merely an appropriate platitude, yet my 
silence or his words immediately take on a significance, because my 
fatigue or his falling back upon a ready-made formula are not acci- 
dental, for they express a certain lack of interest, and hence some 
degree of adoption of a definite position in relation to the situation. 

When an event is considered at close quarters, at the moment 
when it is lived through, everything seems subject to chance: one 
man's ambition, some lucky encounter, some local circumstance or 
other appears to have been decisive. But chance happenings offset 
each other, and facts in their multiplicity coalesce and show up a 

xviii 



PREFACE 



certain way of taking a stand in relation to the human situation, 
reveal in fact an event which has its definite outline and about which ' 
we can talk. Should the starting-point for the understanding of 
history be ideology, or politics, or religion, or economics? Should we 
try to understand a doctrine from its overt content, or from the 
psychological make-up and the biography of its author? We must 
seek an understanding from all these angles simultaneously, every- 
thing has meaning, and we shall find this same structure of being 
underlying all relationships. All these views are true provided that 
they are not isolated, that we delve deeply into history and reach the 
unique core of existential meaning which emerges in each perspective. 
It is true, as Marx says, that history does not walk on its head, but it 
is also true that it does not think with its feet. Or one should say 
rather that it is neither its 'head' not its 4 feet' that we have to worry 
about, but its body. All economic and psychological explanations of a 
doctrine are true, since the thinker never thinks from any starting- 
point but the one constituted by what he is. Reflection even on a 
doctrine will be complete only if it succeeds in linking up with the 
doctrine's history and the extraneous explanations of it, and in putting 
back the causes and meaning of the doctrine in an existential struc- 
ture. There is, as Husserl says, a 'genesis of meaning' (Sinngenesis), 1 
which alone, in the last resort, teaches us what the doctrine 'means.' 
Like understanding, criticism must be pursued at all levels, and 
naturally, it will be insufficient, for the refutation of a doctrine, to 
relate it to some accidental event in the author's life : its significance 
goes beyond, and there is no pure accident in existence or in co- 
existence, since both absorb random events and transmute them in- 
to the rational. 

Finally, as it is indivisible in the present, history is equally so in its 
sequences. Considered in the light of its fundamental dimensions, all 
periods of history appear as manifestations of a single existence, or as 
episodes in a single drama — without our knowing whether it has an 
ending. Because we are in the world, we are condemned to meaning, - 
and we cannot do or say anything without its acquiring a name in 
history. 

Probably the chief gain from phenomenology is to have united 
extreme subjectivism and extreme objectivism in its notion of the 
world or of rationality. Rationality is precisely measured by the 
experiences in which it is disclosed. To say that there exists rationality 
is to say that perspectives blend, perceptions confirm each other, a 
meaning emerges. But it should not be set in a realm apart, transposed 

1 The usual term in the unpublished writings. The idea is already to be found 
in the Formate und transzcndentale Logik, pp. 184 and fif. 

xix 



PREFACE 

into absolute Spirit, or into a world in the realist sense. The pheno- 
menological world is not pure being, but the sense which is revealed 
where the paths of my various experiences intersect, and also where 
my own and other people's intersect and engage each other like gears. 
It is thus inseparable from subjectivity and intersubjectivity, which 
find their unity when I either take up my past experiences in those of 
the present, or other people's in my own. For the first time the 
philosopher's thinking is sufficiently conscious not to anticipate itself 
and endow its own results with reified form in the world. The 
philosopher tries to conceive the world, others and himself and their 
interrelations. But the meditating Ego, the 'impartial spectator' 
{uninteressierter Zuschauer) 1 do not rediscover an already given 
rationality, they 'establish themselves', 2 and establish it, by an act of 
initiative which has no guarantee in being, its justification resting 
entirely on the effective power which it confers on us of taking our 
own history upon ourselves. 

phenomenological world is not the bringing to explicit ex- 
pression of a pre-existing being, but the laying down of beingj 
Philosophy is not the reflection of a pre-existing truth, but, like art, 
the act of bringing, truth into being. One may well ask how this 
creation is possible, and if it does not recapture in things a pre-existing 
Reason. The answer is that the only pre-existent Logos is the world 
itself, and that the philosophy which brings it into visible existence 
does not begin by being possible; it is actual or real like the world of 
which it is a part, and no explanatory hypothesis is clearer than the 
act whereby we take up this unfinished world in an effort to complete 
and conceive it. Rationality is not a problem. There is behind it no 
unknown quantity which has to be determined by deduction, or, 
beginning with it, demonstrated inductively. We witness every minute 
the miracle of related experiences, and yet nobody knows better than 
we do how this miracle is worked, for we are ourselves this network 
of relationships. The world and reason are not problematical. We 
may say, if we wish, that they are mysterious, but their mystery de- 
fines them : there can be no question of dispelling it by some 'solution*, 
it is on the hither side of all solutions. True philosophy consists in re- 
learning to look at the world, and in this sense a historical account 
can give meaning to the world quite as 'deeply' as a philosophical 
treatise. We take our fate in our hands, we become responsible for 
our history through reflection, but equally by a decision on which we 
stake our life, and in both cases what is involved is a violent act which 
is validated by being performed. 
Phenomenology, as a disclosure of the world, rests on itself, or 

1 6 th Meditation carttsienne (unpublished). 
» Ibid. 

XX 



PREFACE 



rather provides its own foundation. 1 All knowledge »s sustained by a 
'ground' of postulates and finally by our communication with the 
world as primary embodiment of rationality. Philosophy, as radical 
reflection, dispenses in principle with this resource. As, however, it 
too is in history, it too exploits the world and constituted reason. It 
must therefore put to itself the question which it puts to all branches 
of knowledge, and so duplicate itself infinitely, being, as Husserl says, 
a dialogue or infinite meditation, and, in so far as it remains faithful 
to its intention, never knowing where it is going. The unfinished 
nature of phenomenology and the inchoative atmosphere which has 
surrounded it are not to be taken as a sign of failure, they were 
inevitable because phenomenology's task was to reveal the mystery of 
the world and of reason. 2 If phenomenology was a movement before 
becoming a doctrine or a philosophical system, this was attributable 
neither to accident, nor to fraudulent intent. It is as painstaking as the 
works of Balzac, Proust, Valery or Cezanne — by reason of the same 
kind of attentiveness and wonder, the same demand for awareness, 
the same will to seize the meaning of the world or of history as that 
meaning comes into being. In this way it merges into the general 
effort of modern thought. 

1 'RUckbeziehung der Phanomenologie auf sich selbst/ say the unpublished 
writings. 

a We are indebted for this last expression to G. Gusdorf, who may well have 
used it in another sense. 



xxi 



INTRODUCTION 



Traditional Prejudices and the Return 
to Phenomena 



I 



THE 'SENSATION' AS A UNIT 
OF EXPERIENCE 



AT the outset of the study of perception, we find in language the 
notion of sensation, which seems immediate and obvious: I have a 
sensation of redness, of blueness, of hot or cold. It will, however, 
be seen that nothing could in fact be more confused, and that because 
they accepted it readily, traditional analyses missed the phenomenon 
of perception. 

I might in the first place understand by sensation the way in which 
I am affected and the experiencing of a state of myself. The greyness 
which, when I close my eyes, surrounds me, leaving no distance 
between me and it, the sounds that encroach on my drowsiness and 
hum 'in my head' perhaps give some indication of what pure sensa- 
tion might be. I might be said to have sense-experience (sentir) pre- 
cisely to the extent that I coincide with the sensed, that the latter 
ceases to have any place in the objective world, and that it signifies 
nothing for me. This entails recognizing that sensation should be 
sought on the hither side of any qualified content, since red and blue, 
in order to be distinguishable as two colours, must already form 
some picture before me, even though no precise place be assigned to 
them, and thus cease to be part of myself. Pute sensation will be 
the experience of an undifferentiated, instantaneous, dotlike impact. 
It is unnecessary to show, since authors are agreed on it, that this 
notion corresponds to nothing in our experience, and that the most 
rudimentary factual perceptions that we are acquainted with, in 
creatures such as the ape or the hen, have a bearing on relationships 
and not on any absolute terms. 1 But this does not dispose of the 
question as to why we feel justified in theory in distinguishing within 
experience a layer of 'impressions'. Let us imagine a white patch on 
a homogeneous background. All the points in the patch have a 
1 See La Structure du Comportement, pp. 142 and flf. 



3 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 



certain function' in common, that of forming themselves into a 
'shape'. The colour of the shape is more intense, and as it were more 
resistent than that of the background; the edges of the white patch 
'belong' to it, and are not part of the background although they 
adjoin it : the patch appears to be placed on the background and does 
not break it up. Each part arouses the expectation of more than it 
contains, and this elementary perception is therefore already charged 
with a meaning. But if the shape and the background, as a whole, are 
not sensed, they must be sensed, one may object, in each of their 
points. To say this is to forget that each point in its turn can be 
perceived only as a figure on a background. When Gestalt theory 
informs us that a figure on a background is the simplest sense-given 
available to us, we reply that this is not a contingent characteristic of 
factual perception, which leaves us free, in an ideal analysis, to bring 
in the notion of impressions. It is the very definition of the pheno- 
menon of perception, that without which a phenomenon cannot be 
said to be perception at all. The perceptual 'something' is always in the 
middle of something else, it always forms part of a 'field'. A really 
homogeneous area offering nothing to be cannot be given to any per- 
cept ion. The structure of actual perception alone can teach us what per- 
ception is. The pure impression is, therefore, not only undiscoverable. 
but also imperceptible and so inconceivable as an instant of per- 
ception. If it is introduced, it is because instead of attending to the 
experience of perception, we overlook it in favour of the object per- 
ceived. A visual field is not made up of limited views. But an object 
seen is made up of bits of matter, and spatial poi nts are external to each 
other. An isolated datum of perception is inconceivable, at least if 
we do the mental experiment of attempting to perceive such a thing. 
But in the world there are either isolated objects or a physical void. 

I shall therefore give up any attempt to define sensation as pure 
impression. Rather, to see is to have colours or lights, to hear is to 
have sounds, to sense (sentir) is to have qualities. To know what 
sense-experience is, then, is it not enough to have seen a red or to 
have heard an A? But red and green are not sensations, they are the 
sensed (sensibles), and quality is not an element of consciousness, 
but a property of the object. Instead of providing a simple means of 
delimiting sensations, if we consider it in the experience itself which 
evinces it, the quality is as rich and mysterious as the object, or 
indeed the whole spectacle, perceived. This red patch which I see on 
the carpet is red only in virtue of a shadow which lies across it, its 
quality is apparent only in relation to the play of light upon it, and 
hence as an element in a spatial configuration. Moreover the colour 
can be said to be there only if it occupies an area of a certain size, 
too small an area not being describable in these terms. Finally this 

4 



THE 'SENSATION* AS A UNIT OF EXPERIENCE 

red would literally not be the same if it were not the 'woolly red* of 
a carpet. 1 Analysis, then, discovers in each quality meanings which 
reside in it. It may be objected that this is true only of the qualities 
which form part of our actual experience, which are overlaid with a 
body of knowledge, and that we are still justified in conceiving a 
'pure quality' which would set limits to a pure sensation. But as we 
have just seen, this pure sensation would amount to no sensation, and 
thus to not feeling at all. The alleged self-evidence of sensation is not 
based on any testimony of consciousness, but on widely held pre- 
judice. We think we know perfectly well what 'seeing', 'hearing*, " 
'feeling' are, because perception has long provided us with objects 
which are coloured or which emit sounds. When we try to analyse it, 
we transpose these objects into consciousness. We commit what 
psychologists call 'the experience error', which means that what we 
know to be in things themselves we immediately take as being in our J 
consciousness of them. We make perception out of things per- 
ceived. And since perceived things themselves are obviously acces- 
sible only through perception, we end by understanding neither. 
We are caught up in the world and we do not succeed in extricating 
ourselves from it in order to achieve consciousness of the world. 
If we did we should see that the quality is never experienced im- 
mediately, and that all consciousness is consciousness of some- 
thing. Nor is this 'something' necessarily an identifiable object. 
There are two ways of being mistaken about quality: one is to make 
it into an element of consciousness, when in fact it is an object for 
consciousness, to treat it as an incommunicable impression, whereas 
it always has a meaning; the other is to think that this meaning and 
this object, at the level of quality, are fully developed and determin- 
ate. The second error, like the first, springs from our prejudice about 
the world. Suppose we construct, by the use of optics and geometry, 
that bit of the world which can at any moment throw its image on our 
retina. Everything outside its perimeter, since it does not reflect upon 
any sensitive area, no more affects our vision than does light falling 
on our closed eyes. We ought, then, to perceive a segment of the 
world precisely delimited, surrounded by a zone of blackness, 
packed full of qualities with no interval between them, held together 
by definite relationships of size similar to those lying on the retina. 
The fact is that experience offers nothing like this, and we shall 
never, using the world as our starting-point, understand what a 
field of vision is. Even if it is possible to trace out a perimeter of 
vision by gradually approaching the centre of the lateral stimuli, 
the results of such measurement vary from one moment to another, 
and one never manages to determine the instant when a stimulus 
1 J. P. Sartre, V Imaginaire, p. 241. 
5 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 



once seen is seen no longer. The region surrounding the visual field 
is not easy to describe, but what is certain is that it is neither black 
nor grey. There occurs here an indeterminate vision, a vision of some- 
thing or other, and, to take the extreme case, what is behind my back 
is not without some element of visual presence. The two straight 
lines in Muller-Lycr's optical illusion (Fig. 1) are neither of equal 
nor unequal length; it is only in the objective world that this question 
arises. 1 The visual field is that strange zone in which contradictory 
notions jostle each other because the objects — the straight lines of 
Muller-Lyer — are not, in that field, assigned to the realm of being, in 
which a comparison would be possible, but each is taken in its private 



context as if it did not belong to the same universe as the other. 
Psychologists have for a long time taken great care to overlook these 
phenomena. In the world taken in itself everything is determined. 
There are many unclear sights, as for example a landscape on a 
misty day, but then we always say that no real landscape is in itself 
unclear. It is so onl yjfor us. The object, psychologists would assert, 
is never ambiguous, but becomes so only through our inattention. 
The bounds of the visual field are not themselves variable, and there 
is a moment when the approaching object begins absolutely to be 
seen, but we do not 'notice' it. But the notion of attention, as we shall 
show more fully, is supported by no evidence provided by conscious- 
ness. It is no more than an auxiliary hypothesis, evolved to save the 
^prejudice in favour of an objective world. We must reco gnize the 
i ndeter minat e as a pos itive phenomenon. It is in this atmosphere 
that quality arises. Its meaning is an equivocal meaning; we are 
concerned with an expressive value rather than with logical significa- 
tion. The determinate quality by which empiricism tried to define 
sensation is an object, not an element, of consciousness, indeed it is 
the very lately developed object of scientific consciousness. For these 
two reasons, it conceals rather than reveals subjectivity. 

The two definitions of sensation which we have just tried out were 
only apparently direct. We have seen that they were based on the 
object perceived. In this they were in agreement with common sense, 
which also identifies the sensible by the objective conditions which 
govern it. The visible is what is seized upon with the eyes, the sensible 




Fig. 1. 



1 KofTka, Psychologies p. 530. 
6 



THE 'SENSATION* AS A UNIT OF EXPERIENCE 

is what is seized on by the senses. Let us follow up the idea of sensa- 
tion on this basis, 1 and see what becomes of this *by* and this 'with*, 
and the notion of sense-organ, in the first-order thinking constituted 
by science. Having shown that there is no experience of sensation, 
do we at least find, in its causes and objective origins, any reasons for 
retaining it as an explanatory concept? Physiology, to which the 
psychologist turns as to a higher court of appeal, is in the same 
predicament as psychology. It too first situates its object in the world 
and treats it as a bit of extension. Behaviour is thus hidden by the 
reflex, the elaboration and patterning of stimuli, by a longitudinal 
theory of nervous functioning, which establishes a theoretical corre- 
spondence between each element of the situation and an element of 
the reaction. 2 As in the case of the reflex arc theory, physiology of 
perception begins by recognizing an anatomical path leading from 
a receiver through a definite transmitter to a recording station, 3 
equally specialized. The objective world being given, it is assumed 
that it passes on to the sense-organs messages which must be regi- 
stered, then deciphered in such a way as to reproduce in us the 
original text. Hence we have in principle a point-by-point corre- 
spondence and constant connection between the stimulus and the 
elementary perception. But this 'constancy hypothesis* 4 conflicts 
with the data of consciousness, and the very psychologists who accept 
it recognize its purely theoretical character. 5 For example, the in- 
tensity of a sound under certain circumstances lowers its pitch; the 

1 There is no justification for dodging the issue, as does Jaspers, for example 
(Zur Analyse der Trugwahrnehmungen) by setting up in opposition, on the one 
hand a descriptive psychology which 'understands' phenomena, and on the other 
an explanatory psychology, which concerns itself with their origin. The psycho- 
logist always sees consciousness as placed in the body in the midst of the world, 
and for him the series stimulus-impression-perception is a sequence of events at 
the end of which perception begins. Each consciousness is born in the world and 
each perception is a new birth of consciousness. In this perspective the 'immediate* 
data of perception can always be challenged as mere appearances and as complex 
products of an origin. The descriptive method can acquire a genuine claim only 
from the transcendental point of view. But, even from this point of view, the pro- 
blem remains as to how consciousness perceives itself or appears to itself as in- 
serted in a nature. For the philosopher, as for the psychologist, there is therefore 
always a problem of origins, and the only method possible is to follow, in its 
scientific development, the causal explanation in order to make its meaning quite 
clear, and assign to it its proper place in the body of truth. That is why there will 
be found no refutation, but only an effort to understand the difficulties peculiar 
to causal thinking. 

1 See La Structure du Comportement, Chap. I. 

1 We are translating roughly the series 'Empfanger-Obermittler-Empfinder 
spoken of by J. Stein, Vber die Veranderung der Sinnesleistungen und die Ent- 
stehung von Trugwahrnehmungen, p. 351. 

4 Koehler, Vber unbemerkte Empfindungen und Urteilstauschungen. 

5 Stumpf does so explicitly. Cf. Koehler, ibid., p. 54. 

7 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

addition of auxiliary lines makes two figures unequal which are 
objectively equal; 1 a coloured area appears to be the same colour 
over the whole of its surface, whereas the chromatic thresholds of 
the different parts of the retina ought to make it red in one place, 
orange somewhere else, and in certain cases colourless. 2 Should 
these cases in which the phenomenon does not correspond to the 
stimulus be retained within the framework of the law of con- 
stancy, and explained by additional factors — attention and judge- 
ment — or must the law itself be jettisoned? When red and green, 
presented together, give the result grey, it is conceded that the central 
combination of stimuli can immediately give rise to a different 
sensation from what the objective stimuli would lead us to expect. 
When the apparent size of an object varies with its apparent distance, 
or its apparent colour with our recollections of the object, it is 
recognized that 'the sensory processes are not immune to central 
influences'. 3 In this case, therefore, the 'sensible' cannot be defined 
as the immediate effect of an external stimulus. Cannot the same 
conclusion be drawn from the first three examples we have men- 
tioned? If attention, more precise instructions, rest or prolonged 
practice finally bring perception into line with the law of constancy, 
this does not prove the law's universal validity, for, in the examples 
quoted, the first appearance possessed a sensory character just as in- 
contestable as the final results obtained. So the question is whether 
attentive perception, the subject's concentration on one point of the 
visual field — for example, the 'analytic perception' of the two main 
lines in Muller-Lyer's optical illusion^ndo not, instead of revealing 
the 'normal sensation*, substitute a special set-up for the original 
phenomenon. 4 The law of constancy cannot avail itself, against the 
testimony of consciousness, of any crucial experience in which it is 
not already implied, and wherever we oelieve that we are establish- 
ing it, it is already presupposed. 5 If we turn back to the phenomena, 
they show us that the apprehension of a quality, just as that of size, 
is bound up with a whole perceptual context, and that the stimuli 
no longer furnish us with the indirect means we were seeking of 
isolating a layer of immediate impressions. But when we look for an 
'objective' definition of sensation, it is not only the physical stimulus 

1 Koehler, ibid., pp. 57-8, cf. pp. 58-66. 

1 R. Dejcan, Les Conditions objectives cie la Perception visuelle, pp. 60 and 83. 

3 Stumpf, quoted by Koehler, ibid., p. 58. 

4 Koehler, ibid., pp. 58-63. 

& It is only fair to add that this is true of all theories, and that nowhere is there 
a crucial experience. For the same reason the constancy hypothesis cannot be 
completely refuted on the basis of induction. It is discredited because it overlooks 
phenomena and docs not permit any understanding of them. To discern them 
and to pass judgement on the hypothesis, indeed, one must 'suspend' it. 

8 



THE 'SENSATION* AS A UNIT OF EXPERIENCE 



which slips through our fingers. The sensory apparatus, as conceived 
by modern physiology, is no longer fitted for the role of 'transmitter' 
cast for it by traditional science. Non-cortical lesions of the apparatus 
of touch no doubt lessen the concentration of points sensitive to heat 
and cold, or pressure, and diminish the sensitivity of those that remain. 
But if, to the injured system, a sufficiently extensive stimulus be 
applied, the specific sensations reappear. The raising of the thresholds 
is compensated by a more vigorous movement of the hand. 1 

One can discern, at the rudimentary stage of sensibility, a working 
together on the part of partial stimuli and ^collaboration of the 
sensory^ with the motor system which, in a variable physiological 
constellation, keeps sensation constant, and rules out any definition 
pf the nervous process as the simple transmission of a given message. 
The destruction of sight, wherever the injuries be sustained, follows 
the same law: all colours are affected in the first place, 2 and lose 
their saturation. Then the spectrum is simplified, being reduced to 
four and soon to two colours; finally a grey monochrome stage is 
reached, although the pathological colour is never identifiable with 
any normal one. Thus in central as in peripheral lesions 'the loss of 
nervous substance results not only in a deficiency of certain qualities* 
but in the change to a less differentiated and more primitive struc- 
ture'. 3 Conversely, normal functioning must be understood as a 
process of integration in which the text of the external world is not 
so much copied, jib com posed. And if we try to seize 'sensation' 
within the perspective of the bodily phenomena which pave the way 
to it, we find not a psychic individual, a function of certain known 
variables, but a formation already bound up with a larger whole, 
already endowed with a meaning, distinguishable only in degree 
from the more complex perceptions, and which therefore gets us no 
further in our attempt to delimit pure sensation. There is no physio- 
logical definition of sensation, and more generally there is no physio- 
logical psychology which is autonomous, because the physiological 
event itself obeys biological and psychological laws. For a long time 
it was thought that peripheral conditioning was the surest method of 
identifying 'elementary' psychic functions, and of distinguishing 
them from 'superior' functions less strictly bound up with the bodily 
substructure. A closer analysis, however, reveals that the two kinds 
of function overlap. The elementary is no longer that whicTTby 
addition will cumulatively constitute the whole, nor is it a mere 

1 Stein, op. cit., pp. 357-9. 

2 Even daltonism does not prove that certain systems are, and are alone in 
being, entrusted with 'seeing' red and green, since a colour-blind person manages 
to distinguish red if a large area in that colour is put before him, or if the presenta- 
tion of the colour is made to last a long time. Id. ibid., p. 365. 

s Weizsacker, quoted by Stein, ibid., p. 364. 

9 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

occasion for the whole to constitute itself. The elementary event is 
already invested with meaning, and the higher function will bring 
into being only a more integrated mode of existence or a more valid 
adaptation, by using and sublimating the subordinate operations. 
Conversely, 'the experience of feeling is a vital process, no less than 
procreation, breathing or growth'. 1 Psychology and physiology are 
no longer, then, two parallel sciences, but two accounts of behaviour, 
the first concrete, the second abstract. 2 We said that when the 
psychologist asks the physiologist for a definition of sensation 'in 
causal terms', he encounters once more on this new ground his 
familiar difficulties, and now we can see why. The physiologist for 
his part has to rid himself of the realistic prejudice which all the 
sciences borrow from common sense, and which hampers them in 
their development. The changed meaning of the terms 'elementary' 
and 'more advanced' in modern physiology proclaims a changed 
philosophy. 3 The scientist too must learn to criticize the idea of an 
external world in itself, since the facts themselves prompt him to 
abandon that of the body as a transmitter of messages. The sensible 
is what is apprehended with the senses, but now we know that this 
'with' is not merely instrumental, that the sensory apparatus is not a 
conductor, that even on the periphery the physiological impression 
is involved in relations formerly considered central. 

Once more, reflection — even the second-order reflection of science — 
obscures what we thought was clear. We believed we knew what 
feeling, seeing and hearing were, and now these words raise problems. 
We are invited to go back to the experiences to which they refer in 
order to redefine them. The traditional notion of sensation was not a 
concept born of reflection, but a late product of thought directed 
towards objects, the last element in the representation of the world, 
the furthest removed from its original source, and therefore the most 
unclear. Inevitably science, in its general effort towards objectifica- 
tion, evolved a picture of the human organism as a physical system 
undergoing stimuli which were themselves identified by their 
physico-chemical properties, and tried to reconstitute actual per- 
ception 4 on this basis, and to close the circle of scientific knowledge 

1 Weizsacker, quoted by Stein, ibid., p. 354. 

1 On all these points see La Structure du Comportement, in particular pp. 52 
and AT., 65 and flf. 

* Gelb, Die Farbenkonstanz der Sehdinge, p. 595. 

4 'The sensations are certainly artificial products, but not arbitrary ones, they 
are the last component wholes into which the natural structures can be decom- 
posed by the "analytical attitude". Seen from this point of view, they contribute 
to the knowledge of structures, and consequently the results of the study of sensa- 
tions, correctly interpreted, are an important element in the psychology of per- 
ception.' Koffka, Psychologie, p. 548. 

10 



THE 'SENSATION' AS A UNIT OF EXPERIENCE 

by discovering the laws governing the production of knowledge 
itself, by establishing an objective science of subjectivity. 1 But it is 
also inevitable that this attempt should fail. If we return to the 
objective investigations themselves, we first of all discover that the 
conditions external to the sensory field do not govern it part for 
part, and that they exert an effect only to the extent of making 
possible a basic pattern — which is what Gestalt theory makes clear. 
Then we see that within the organism the structure depends on 
variables such as the biological meaning of the situation, which are 
no longer physical variables, with the result that the whole eludes 
the welt-known instruments of physico-inathematical analysis, and 
opens the way to another type of intelligibility. 2 If we now turn back, 
as is done here, towards perceptual experience, we notice that 
science succeeds in constructing only a semblance of subjectivity : it 
introduces sensations which are things, just where experience shows 
that there are meaningful patterns; it forces the phenomenal universe 
into categories which make sense only in the universe of science. It 
requires that two perceived lines, like two real lines, should be 
equal or unequal, that a perceived crystal should have a definite 
number of sides, 3 without realizing that the perceived, by its nature, p., 
admits of the ambiguous, the^hifting, and is shaped by its context. 
In Muller-Lyer's illusion, one of the lines ceases to be equal to the 
other without becoming 'unequal': it becomes 'different'. That is to 
say, an isolated, objective line, and the same line taken in a figure, 
cease to be, for perception, 'the same'. It is identifiable in these two 
functions only by analytic perception, which is not natural. In the 
same way Trie perceived contains gaps which are not mere 'failures to 
perceive'. I may, through sight or touch, recognize a crystal as 
having a 'regular' shape without having, even tacitly, counted its 
sides. I may be familiar with a face without ever having perceived the 
colour of the eyes in themselves. The theory of sensation, which - 
builds up all knowledge out of determinate qualities, offers us 
objects purged of all ambiguity, pure and absolute, the ideal rather 
than the real themes of knowledge: in short, it is compatible only 
with the lately developed superstructure of consciousness. That is 
where 'the idea of sensation is approximately realized'. 4 

The images which instinct projects before it, those which tradition 
recreates in each generation, or simply dreams, are in the first place 
presented on an equal footing with genuine perceptions, and gradu- 
ally, by critical labour, the true, present and explicit perception is 

1 Cf. Guillaume, VObjectmte en Psychologie. 

2 Cf. La Structure du Comportement, Chap. III. 

3 Koflfka, Psychologie, pp. 530 and 549. 

4 M. Sender, Die Wissenformen unci die Gesellschaft, p. 412. 

II 



TRADITIONAL PRFJUDICTS AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

distinguished from phantasms. The word perception indicates a 
direction rather than a primitive function. 1 It is known that the 
uniformity of apparent size of objects at different distances, or of 
their colour in different lights, is more perfect in children than in 
adults. 2 It follows that perception is more strictly bound up with the 
local stimulus in its developed than in its undeveloped state, and more 
in conformity with the theory of sensation in the adult than in the 
child. It is like a net with its knots showing up more and more 
clearly.* 'Primitive thought' has been pictured in a way which can be 
understood only if the responses of primitive people, their pro- 
nouncements and the sociologists* interpretations are related to the 
fund of perceptual experience which they are all trying to translate. 4 
It is sometimes the adherence of the perceived object to its context, 
and, as it were, its viscosity, sometimes the presence in it of a 
positive indeterminate which prevents the spatial, temporal and 
numerical wholes from becoming articulated into manageable, dis- 
tinct and identifiable terms. And it is this pre-objective realm that 
we have to explore in ourselves if we wish to understand sense 
experience. 

1 M. Scheler, Die Wissenformen und die Gesellschaft, p. 397. 'Man approaches 
ideal and exact images better than the animal, the adult better than the child, 
men better than women, the individual better lhan the member of a group, the 
man who thinks historically and systematically belter than the man impelled by 
tradition, "imprisoned" in it and incapable of object ivizing, by building up re- 
collection, the environment in which he is involved, of localizing it in lime and 
possessing it by setting it away from himself in a past context.' 

2 Hering, Jaensch. 

3 Scheler, Die Wissenformen und die Gesellsehaft, p. 412. 

4 Cf. Wertheimcr, Vber das Denken der Naturvvlker, in Drei Abhandhmgen zur 
Q*>**nUtheorie. 



12 



'ASSOCIATION' AND THE 
'PROJECTION OF MEMORIES' 



ONCE introduced, the notion of sensation distorts any analysis of 
perception. Already a 'figure' on a 'background' contains, as we 
have seen, much more than the qualities presented at a given time. 
It has an 'outline', which does not 'belong' to the background and 
which 'stands out' from it; it is 'stable' and offers a 'compact' area 
of colour, the background on the other hand having no bounds, 
being of indefinite colouring and 'running on' under the figure. The 
different parts of the whole — for example, the portions of the figure 
nearest to the background — possess, then, besides a colour and 
qualities, a particular significance. The question is, what makes up 
this significance, what do the words 'edge' and 'outline' mean, what 
happens when a collection of qualities is apprehended as a figure on a 
background? But once sensation is introduced as an element of 
knowledge, we are left no leeway in our reply. A being capable of 
sense-experience (sentir) — in the sense of coinciding absolutely with 
an impression or a quality — could have no other mode of knowing. 
That a quality, an area of red should signify something, that it should 
be, for example, seen as a patch on a background, means that the 
red is not this warm colour which I feel and live in and lose myself 
in, but that it announces something else which it does not include, 
that it exercises .a cognitive function, and lhat its parts together 
makejiii^a^hole to which each is related without leaving its place. 
Henceforth the red is no longer merely there, it represents something 
for me, and what it represents is not possessed as a 'real part' of my 
perception, but only aimed at as an 'intentional part'. 1 My gaze does 
not merge with the outline or the patch as it does with the redness 
considered concretely: it ranges over and dominates them. In order 

1 The expression is HusserPs. The idea is taken up with insight by M. Pradines, 
Philosophic de la Sensation y I, particularly on pp. 152 and ff. 

13 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 




to receive in itself a meaning which really transfuses it, in order to 
become integrated into an 'outline' which is bound up with the 
'figure' and independent of 'background', the atomic sensation ought 
to cease to be an absolute coincidence, which means ceasing to exist 
as a sensation. If we admit 'sensation' in the classical sense, the 
meaning of that which is sensed can be found only in further sensa- 
tions, actual or virtual. Seeing a figure can be only simultaneously 
experiencing all the atomic sensations which go to form it. Each one 
remains for ever what it is, a blind contact, an impression, while the 
whole collection of these becomes 'vision', and forms a picture before 
us because we learn to pass quickly from one im- 
pression to another V A shape is nothing but a 
sum of limited views, and the consciousness of a 
shape is a coUective^ntity. The sensible elements 
of which it Ts made up cannot lose the opacity 
which defines them as sensory given, and open 
themselves to some intrinsic connection, to some 
law of conformation governing them all. 
Let three points A, B and C be taken on the 
outline of a figure: their spatial order is both their way of co- 
existing before our eyes and that co-existence itself, however near 
together be the points chosen: the sum of their separate exist- 
ences, the position of A, plus the position of B, plus the position 
of C. It may well happen that empiricism abandons this atom- 
istic manner of expression, and begins to talk about pieces of 
space or pieces of duration, thus adding an experience of 
relationships to that of qualities. But that does not affect the 
empiricist position in the slightest degree. Either the piece of 
space is traversed and inspected by a mind, in which case empiri- 
cism is abandoned, since consciousness is no longer defined in 
terms of the impression; or else it is itself given in the manner of 
an impression, when it becomes just as exclusive of any more 
extensive co-ordination as the atomic impression first discussed. 

The fact is that a shape is not only the sum of present data, for 
these latter call up other complementary ones. When I say that I 
have before me a red patch, the meaning of the word patch is pro- 
vided by previous experiences which have taught me the use of the 
word. The distribution in space of the three points A, B and C recalls 
other comparable distributions, and I say that I see a circle. Nor does 
the appeal to experience gained affect the empiricist thesis. The 
'association of ideas' which brings past experience into play can 
restore only extrinsic connections, and can be no more than one 
itself, because the original experience involved no others. Once con- 
sciousness has been defined as sensation, every mode of conscious- 

14 



'association' and the 'projection of memories' 

nees will have to derive its clarity from sensation. The word circle, 
or the word order, could only signify, in the earlier experiences to 
which I refer, the concrete manner in which our sensations dis- 
tributed themselves before us, a certain de facto arrangement, a way 
of sensing (sentir). If the three points, A, B and C are on a circle, 
the path AB 'resembles' the path BC, but this resemblance means 
no more than that one path makes one think of the other. The 
path ABC resembles other circular paths over which my eye has 
travelled, but that merely means that it recalls them and brings the 
image of them to mind. It is never possible for two terms to be ^ 
identified \ perceived or understood as the same, for that would pre- 
suppose that their this-ness is overcome. They can only be indis- 
solubly associated and everywhere substituted for each other. 
Knowledge thus appears as a system of substitutions in which one 
impression announces others without ever justifying the announce- 
ment, in which words lead one to expect sensations as evening leads 
one to expect night. The significance of the percept is nothing but a 
cluster of images which begin to reappear without reason. The 
simplest images or sensations are, in the last analysis, all that there 
is to understand in words, concepts being a complicated way of 
designating them, and as they are themselves inexpressible im- 
pressions, understanding is a fraud or an illusion. Knowledge never 
has any hold on objects, which bring each other about, while the 
mind acts as a calculating machine, 1 which has no idea why its 
results are true. Sensation admits of no philosophy other than that of 
nominalism, that is, the reduction of meaning to the misinterpreta- 
tion of vague rese mblance or tothe meaninglessness of association by 
contiguity. 

Now the sensations and images which should be the beginning and 
end of all knowledge never make their appearance anywhere other 
than within a horizon of meaning, and the significance of the per- 
cept, far from resulting from an association, is in fact presupposed in 
all association, whether it concerns the conspectus of a figure before 
one, or the recollection of former experiences. Our perceptual field 
is made up of jthings^ andjspaces between things'. 2 The parts of a 
thing are not bound together by a mereI>nexfeiFnal association arising 
from their interrelatedness observed while the object is in movement. 
For in the first place I see, as things, groupings which I have never 
seen in movement : houses, the sun, mountains, for example. Whether 
or not it is insisted that I extend to static objects a notion acquired 
through the experience of objects in motion, the fact remains that 

1 Husserl, Logische Untersuchungen, Chap. I, Prolegomena zur reinen Logik, 
p. 68. 

2 See, for example, Koehler, Gestalt Psychology, pp. 164-5. 

15 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

the mountain must present in its actual appearance some character- 
istic which gives ground for recognizing it as a thing, and justifies 
this transference. In which case the characteristic is sufficient, 
without any such transference, to explain the segregation of the 
perceptual field. Even the unity of ordinary things, which a child 
may handle and move about, does not amount to establishing 
their substantiality. If we set ourselves to see as things the intervals 
between them, the appearance of the world would be just as strikingly 
altered as is that of the puzzle at the moment when I pick out 'the 
rabbit' or 'the hunter'. There would not be simply the same elements 
differently related, the same sensations differently associated, the 
same text charged with a different sense, the same matter in another 
form, but in truth another world. 

There are not arbitrary data which set about combining into a 
thing because de facto proximities or likenesses cause them to 
associate; it is, on the contrary, because we perceive a grouping as a 
.thing that the analytical attitude can then discern likenesses or 
proximities. This does not mean simply that without any perception 
of the whole we would not think of noticing the resemblance or the 
contiguity of its elements, but literally that they would not be part 
of the same world and would not exist at all. The psychologist, who 
always conceives consciousness as in the world, includes resemblance 
and contiguity of stimuli among the objective conditions which 
bring about the grouping together of a whole. The stimuli nearest to 
each other or most similar, he says, 1 or those which together endow 
the spectacle with the best balance, tend, for perception, to unite 
into the same configuration. But this way of talking is misleading, 
because it confronts objective stimuli which belong to the perceived 
world — and even to the second-order world elaborated by scien- 
tific consciousness — with perceptual consciousness, which it is 
the duty of psychology to describe according to direct experience. 
The psychologist's hybrid thinking always runs the risk of reintro- 
ducing into the description relationships belonging to the objective 
world. Thus it was possible to think of Wertheimer's law of con- 
tiguity and law of resemblance as bringing back the associationist's 
objective contiguity and resemblance in the role of constitutive prin- 
ciples of perception. In reality, for pure description — and Gestalt 
theory claims to be a description — the contiguity and resemblance 
of stimuli do not precede the constitution of the whole. 'Good form' 
is not brought about because it would be good in itself in some meta- 
physical heaven; it is good form because it comes into being in our 
experience. The alleged conditions of perception precede perception 

1 Wertheimer, for example (the laws of proximity, of resemblance and the law 
of 'good form*). 

16 



'association' and the 'projection of memories' 

itself only when, instead of describing the perceptual phenomenon as 
the first way of access to the object, we suppose round about it a 
setting in which all disclosure of the implicit and all cross-checking 
performed by analytic perception are included, and all the norms of 
actual perception vindicated — in short, a realm of truth, a world. In 
doing so we relieve perception of its essential function, which is to 
lay the foundations of, or inaugurate, knowledge, and we see it 
through its results. If we confine ourselves to phenomena, the unity 
of the thing in perception is not arrived at by association, but is a 
condition of association, and as such precedes the delimitations 
which establish and verify it, and indeed precedes itself. 

If I walk along a shore towards a ship which has run aground, and 
the funnel or masts merge into the forest bordering on the sand dune, 
there will be a moment when these details suddenly become part of 
the ship, and indissolubly fused with it. As I approached, I did not 
perceive resemblances or proximities which finally came together to 
form a continuous picture of the upper part of the ship. I merely 
felt that the look of the object was on the point of altering, that some- 
thing was imminent in this tension, as a storm is imminent in storm 
clouds. Suddenly the sight before me was recast in a manner satis- 
fying to my vague expectation. Only afterwards did I recognizees 
justifications for the change, the resemblance and contiguity of what 
I call 'stimuli' — namely the most determinate phenomena, seen at 
close quarters and with which I compose the 'true' world. 'How could 
I have failed to see that these pieces of wood were an integral part 
of the ship? For they were of the same colour as the ship, and fitted 
well enough into its superstructure.' But these reasons for correct 
perception were not given as.reasons^beforehandrTHe unity of the 
object is based on the foreshadowing of an imminent order which is 
about to spring upon us a reply to questions merely latent in the 
landscape. It solves a problem set only in the form of a vague feel ing 
6f uneasiness, it organizes elements which up to that moment did 
not belong to the same universe and which, for that reason, as Kant 
said with profound insight, could not be associated. By placing them 
on the same footing, that of the unique object, synopsis makes con- 
tinuity and resemblance between them possible. An impression can 
never by jtself be associated with another impression. 

Nor has it the power to arouse others. It does so only provided that 
it is already understood in the light of the past experience in which it 
co-existed with those which we are concerned to arouse. Imagine a 
set of double syllables 1 in which the second is a 'softened' rhyme of 
the first (tak-dak), and another set in which the second syllable has 

1 K. Lewin, Vorbemerkungen iiber die psychischen Krafte und Energien und iiber 
die Struktur der Seele. 

17 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 



the letters of the first in reverse order (ged-deg); if the two sets have 
been learnt by heart and if, in a critical experiment, the subject is 
given the uniform task of 'finding a softened rhyme', it is noticeable 
that he has more difficulty in finding such a rhyme for ged than for a 
neutral syllable. But if the task is to change the vowel in the syllables 
given, no delay occurs. It could not, then, be powers of association 
which operated in the first experiment, for if they existed they ought 
to operate equally in the second. The truth is that, faced with 
syllables often associated with softened rhymes, the subject, instead 
\ of rhyming in reality, takes advantage of what he knows, and sets in 
motion a 'reproduction intention', 1 so that when he arrives at the 
second set of syllables, in which the task is no longer related to the 
patterns with which he has been trained to deal, the reproduction 
intention can lead only to mistakes. When, in the second critical 
experiment, the subject is told to change the vowel in the prompting 
syllable, as the task has never figured in the preparatory drill, he 
cannot use the by-pass of reproduction, and under these circum- 
stances the preparatory drill has no effect. Association therefore 
never comes into play as an autonomous force; it is never the word 
suggested which 'induces' the reply in the manner of an efficient 
cause; it acts only by making probable or attractive a reproduction 
intention; it operates only in virtue of the meaning it has acquired 
in the context of the former experience and in suggesting recourse to 
that experience; it is efficacious to the extent to which the subject 
recognizes it, and grasps it in the light or appearance of the past. If 
finally it were desired to bring into operation, instead of simple 
continuity, association by resemblance, it would still be seen that in 
order to recall a former image which present perception resembles, 
the latter must be patterned in such a way that it can sustain this re- 
semblance. Whether a subject 2 has seen Figure 1 five or five hundred 
times he will recognize it almost equally easily in Figure 2 where it 
appears 'camouflaged'; moreover he will never see it there con- 
stantly. On the other hand a subject who is looking, in Figure 2, 
for another disguised figure (without knowing which one), redis- 
covers it there more quickly and more frequently than a passive 
subject who is equally familiar with the figures. Resemblance is, 
therefore, like co-existence in not being a force so to speak in the 
third person, which directs a traffic of images or 'states of conscious- 
ness'. Figure 1 is not recalled by Figure 2, or rather it is so recalled 
only if one has first seen in Figure 2 'a possible Figure 1', which 
amounts to saying that the actual resemblance docs not relieve us of 

1 'Set to reproduce", KofTka, Principles of Gestalt Psychology, p. 581. 
* Gottschaldt, (Jber den Einfluss der Erfahrung auf die Wahrnehmungen von 
Figuren. 

18 



'association' and the 'projection of memories' 



the necessity of asking how it is first made possible by the present 
organization of Figure 2. The 'prompting' figure must take on the 
same meaning as the induced figure before it can recall it, and finally 
the de facto past is not imported into present perception by a mechan- 
ism of association, but arrayed in present consciousness itself. 



o 

Fig. 1. 



Fig. 2. 

From this can be judged the worth of accepted formulas about 
4 the role of memories in perception'. Even outside empiricism there is 
talk of 'the contributions of memory'. 1 People go on saying that 'to 
perceive is to remember'. It is shown that in the reading of a book the 
speed of the eye leaves gaps in the retinal impressions, therefore the 
sense-data must be filled out by a projection of memories. 2 A land- 
scape or newspaper seen upside down are said to represent our 
original view of them, our normal vie - / of them being now natural 
by reason of what is added to it by memory. 'Because of the un- 
accustomed arrangement of impressions the influence of psychic 
causes can no longer be felt. 3 It is not asked why differently arranged 
impressions make the newspaper unreadable or the landscape un- 
recognizable. The answer is: because in order to fill out perception, 
memories need to have been made possible by the physiognomic 
character of the data. Before any contribution by memory, what is 
seen must at the present moment so organize itself as to present a 
picture to me in which I can recognize my former experiences. Thus 
the appeal to memory presupposes what it is supposed to explain : the 
patterning of data, the imposition of meaning on a chaos of sense- 
data. No sooner is the recollection of memories made possible than 
it becomes superfluous, since the work it is being asked to do is 
already done. The same may be said of this 'colouring of memory' 
(Gedachtnisfarbe) which, in the opinion of other psychologists, 
eventually takes the place of the present colour of objects, so that we 

1 Brunschvicg, V Experience humaine et la Causalite physique, p. 466. 

2 Bergson, CEnevgie spirituelle, 'L'efTort intellectuei\ e.g., p. 184. 

3 Cf. for example Ebbinghaus, Abriss der Psychologie, pp. 104-5. 

19 




TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 



see them 'through the spectacles' of memory. 1 The question is, what 
at this moment awakens the Colouring of memory\ It is recalled, 
says Hering, every time we see an object we already know, 'or believe 
we see it\ But on what basis have we this belief? What is it, in present 
perception, which teaches us that we are dealing with an already 
familiar object, since ex hypothesi its properties are altered? If it is 
argued that recognition of shape or size is bound up with that of 
colour, the argument is circular, since apparent size and shape are 
also altered, and since recognition here too cannot result from the 
recollection of memories, but must precede it. Nowhere then does it 
work from past to present, and the 'projection of memories' is 
nothing but a bad metaphor hiding a deeper, ready-made recognition. 

In the same way, the illusion of correction cannot be understood 
as the fusion of a few elements truthfully read off with memories 
merging indistinguishably with them. How could the evocation of 
memories come about unless guided by the look of the strictly visible 
data, and if'it is thus guided, what use is it then, since the word 
already has its structure or its features before taking anything from 
the storehouse of memory? Obviously it is the analysis of illusions 
which has lent credence to the 'projection of memories', and which 
follows roughly this sketchy reasoning: illusory perception cannot 
rest upon 'present data', since I read 'deduction' when the word 
printed is 'destruction'. The letter </, whicK has taken the place of the 
group str, not being presented to the eye, must come from somewhere 
else. It is then said to come from memory. In the same way in a flat 
picture a few patches of light and shade are enough to provide relief, 
a few branches of a tree in a puzzle suggest a cat, several blurred lines 
in the clouds a horse. But past experience can appear only after- 
wards as the cause of the illusion, and the present experience has, in 
the first place, to assume form and meaning in order to recall pre- 
cisely this memory and not others. It is, then, before my eyes and 
at this moment that the horse, the cat, the wrong word and the relief 
come into being. The light and shade of the picture convey relief by 
imitating 'the original phenomenon of relief', 2 where they were in- 
vested with a basic spatial meaning. To enable mc to find a cat in 
the puzzle, it is necessary that 'the meaning-unit "cat'' should in 
some way prescribe those elements of the picture which the co- 
ordinating activity is to retain and those which it is to overlook'. 3 
Illusion deceives us, and passes itself off as genuine perception pre- 
cisely in those cases where the meaning originates in the source of 
sensation and nowhere else. It imitates that privileged experience in 

1 Hcring, Grundziige der Lehve vom Lichlsinn, p. 8. 

2 Schelcr, Idole der Selbsterkenntnis, p. 72. 
a Jd. ibid. 

20 



'association' and the 'projection of memories* 

which the meaning exactly fits the sensation, clearly cohering, or 
being evinced, in it. It implies this norm of perception, and therefore 
cannot spring from any contact between sensation and memory, and 
this is even more true of perception. The 'projection of memories' 
makes nonsense of both. For if a thing perceived were made up of 
sensations and memories, it would depend for its precise identifica- 
tion on the contribution of memories, and would have in itself 
nothing capable of stemming the flood of the latter, with the result 
that, being deprived even of that outer fringe of vagueness which it 
always in fact has, it would be, as we have said, intangible, elusive, 
and always bordering on illusion. Illusion would, a fortiori, never 
present the firm and well-defined appearance which a thing eventu- 
ally assumes, since perception itself would not have it, and so illusion 
would not mislead us. If finally it is conceded that memories do not 
by themselves project themselves upon sensations, but that con- 
sciousness compares them with the present data, retaining only those 
which accord with them, then one is admitting an original text which 
carries its meaning within itself, and setting it over against that of 
memories: this original text is perception itself. In snort, it is a mis- 
take to think that with the 'projection of memories' we are bringing 
into perception some mental activity, and that we have taken up a 
position opposed to that of empiricism. The theory is no more than 
a consequence, a tardy and ineffective correction of empiricism, 
accepting its postulates, sharing the same difficulties and, like 
empiricism, concealing phenomena instead of elucidating them. 

The postulate, as always, consists in deducing the given from what 
happens to be furnished by the sense organs. For example, in the 
illusion of correction, the elements actually seen are reconstituted 
according to the eye movements, the speed of reading and the time 
needed for the retinal impression. Then, by subtracting these 
theoretical data from total perception, the 'recollected elements' are 
obtained which, in turn, are treated as mental entities. Perception is 
built up with states of consciousness as a house is built with bricks, 
and a mental chemistry is invoked which fuses these materials into a 
compact whole. Like all empiricist theories, this one describes only 
blind processes which could never be the equivalent of knowledge, 
because there is, in this mass of sensations and memories, nobody who 
sees, nobody who can appreciate the falling into line of datum and 
recollection, and, on the other hand, no solid object protected by a 
meaning against the teeming horde of memories. We must then dis- 
card this postulate which obscures the whole question. The cleavage 
between given and remembered, arrived at by way of objective causes, 
is arbitrary. When we come back to phenomena we find, as a basic 
layer of experience, a whole already pregnant with an irreducible 

21 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 



meaning: not sensations with gaps between them, into which 
memories may be supposed to slip, but the features, the layout of a 
landscape or a word, in spontaneous accord with the intentions of the 
moment, as with earlier experience. 

It is at this stage tfiat the real pjoblem of memory in perception 
arises, in association with the general problem of perceptual con- 
sciousness. We want to know how, by its own vitality, and without 
carrying complementary material into a mythical unconscious, con- 
sciousness can, in course of time, modify the structure of its sur- 
roundings; how, at every moment, its former experience is present to 
it in the form of a horizon which it can reopen — 'if it chooses to 
take that horizon as a theme of knowledge' — in an act of recollec- 
tion, but which it can equally leave on the fringe of experience, and 
which then immediately provides the perceived with a present atmo- 
sphere and significance. A field which is always at the disposal of 
consciousness and one which, for that very reason, surrounds and 
envelops its perceptions, an atmosphere, a horizon or, if you will, 
given 'sets' which provide it with a temporal situation, such is the 
way in which the past is present, making distinct acts of perception 
and recollection possible. To perceive is not to experience a host of 
impressions accompanied by memories capable of clinching them; it 
is to see, standing forth from a cluster of data, an immanent signifi- 
a cance without which no appeal to memory is possible. To remember 
is not to bring into the focus of consciousness a self-subsistent picture 
of the past; it is to thrust deeply into the horizon of the past and take 
apart step by step the interlocked perspectives until the experiences 
which it epitomizes are as if relived in their temporal setting. To per- 
ceive is not to remember. 

The relationships 'figure' and 'background', 'thing' and 'not- 
thing', and the horizon of the past appear, then, to be structures of 
consciousness irreducible to the qualities which appear in them. 
Empiricism will always retain the expedient of treating this a priori 
as if it were the product of some mental chemistry. The empiricist 
will concede that every object is presented against a background 
which is not an object, the present lying between two horizons of 
absence, past and future. But, he will go on, these significations are 
derivative. The 'figure' and the 'background', the 'thing' and its 
'surrounding', the 'present' and the 'past', are words which sum- 
marize the experience of a spatio-temporal perspective, which in the 
end comes down to the elimination cither of memory or of the 
marginal impressions. Even though, once formed in actual percep- 
tion, structures have more meaning than can be supplied by a quality, 
I am not entitled to regard this evidence of consciousness as ade- 
quate; I must reconstruct theoretically these structures with the aid 

22 



'association' and the Projection of memories' 

of the impressions whose actual relationships they express. On this 
footing empiricism cannot be refuted. Since it rejects the evidence of 
reflection and produces, by associating external impressions, the 
structures "which we are conscious of understanding by proceeding 
from the whole to its parts, there is no phenomenon which can be 
adduced as a crucial proof against it. Generally speaking, the 
description of phenomena does not enable one to refute thought 
which is not alive to its own existence, and which resides in things. 
The physicist's atoms will always appear more real than the historical 
and qualitative face of the world, the physico-chemical processes 
more real than the organic forms, the psychological atoms of 
empiricism more real than perceived phenomena, the intellectual 
atoms represented by the 'significations' of the Vienna Circle more 
real than consciousness, as long as the attempt is made to build up 
the shape of the world (life, perception, mind) instead of recognizing, 
as the source which stares us in the face and as the ultimate court of 
appeal in our knowledge of these things, our experience of them. The 
adoption of this new way of looking at things, which reverses the 
relative positions of the clear and the obscure, must be undertaken by 
each one for himself, whereupon it will be seen to be justified by the 
abundance of phenomena which it elucidates. Before its discovery, 
these phenomena were inaccessible, yet to the description given of 
them empiricism can always retort that it does not understand. In this 
sense, reflection is a system of thought no less closed than insanity, 
with this difference that it understands itself and the madman too, 
whereas the madman does not understand it. But though the pheno- 
menal field may indeed be a new world, it is never totally overlooked 
by natural thought, being present as its horizon, and the empiricist 
doctrine itself is an attempt to analyse consciousness. By way of 
guarding against myths it is, then, desirable to point out everything 
that is made incomprehensible by empiricist constructions and all the 
basic phenomena which they conceal. They hide from us in the first 
place 'the cultural world' or 'human world' in which nevertheless 
almost our whole life is led. For most of us, Nature is no more than a 
vague and remote entity, overlaid by cities, roads, houses and above 
all by the presence of other people. Now, for empiricism, 'cultural' 
objects and faces owe their distinctive form, their magic power, to 
transference and projection of memory, so that only by accident has 
the human world any meaning. There is nothing in the appearance of 
a landscape, an object or a body whereby it is predestined to look 'gay* 
or 'sad', 'lively' or 'dreary', 'elegant' or 'coarse'. Once more seeking 
a definition of what we perceive through the physical and chemical 
properties of the stimuli which may act upon our sensory apparatus, 
empiricism excludes from perception the anger or the pain which I 

23 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

nevertheless read in a face, the religion whose essence I seize in 
some hesitation or reticence, the city whose temper I recognize in the 
attitude of a policeman or the style of a public building. There can 
no longer be any objective spirit: mental life withdraws into isolated 
consciousnesses devoted solely to introspection, instead of extend- 
ing, as it apparently does in fact, over human space which is made 
up by those with whom I argue or live, filling my place of work or 
the abode of my happiness. Joy and sadness, vivacity and obtuseness 
are data of introspection, and when we invest landscapes or other 
people with these states, it is because we have observed in ourselves 
the coincidence between these internal perceptions and the external 
signs associated with them by the accidents of our constitution. 
Perception thus impoverished becomes purely a matter of knowledge, 
a progressive noting down of qualities and of their most habitual 
distribution, and the perceiving subject approaches the world as the 
scientist approaches his experiments. If on the other hand we admit 
that all these 'projections*, all these 'associations*, all these 'trans- 
ferences' are based on some intrinsic characteristic of the object, the 
'human world' ceases to be a metaphor and becomes once more what 
it really is, the seat and as it were the homeland of our thoughts. The 
perceiving subject ceases to be an 'acosmic' thinking subject, and 
action, feeling and will remain to be explored as original ways of 
positing an object, since 'an object looks attractive or repulsive 
before it looks black or blue, circular or square'. 1 

But not only does empiricism distort experience by making the 
cultural world an illusion, when in fact it is in it that our existence 
finds its sustenance. The natural world is also falsified, and for the 
same reasons. What we object to in empiricism is not its having 
taken this as its primary theme of analysis. For it is quite true that 
every cultural object refers back to a natural background against 
which it appears and which may, moreover, be confused and remote. 
Our perception senses how near is the canvas underneath the picture, 
or the crumbling cement under the building, or the tiring actor 
under the character. But the nature about which empiricism talks 
is a collection of stimuli and qualities, and it is ridiculous to pre- 
tend that nature thus conceived is, even in intention merely, the 
primary object of our perception: it does in fact follow the experience 
of cultural objects, or rather it is one of them. We shall, therefore, 
have to rediscover the natural world too, and its mode of existence, 
which is not to be confused with that of the scientific object. The 
phenomenon of the background's continuing under the figure, and 
being seen under the figure — when in fact it is covered by the figure — 
a phenomenon which embraces the whole problem of the presence of 
1 KofTka, The Growth of the Mind, p. 320. 
24 



'ASSOCIATION' AND THE 'PROJECTION OF MEMORIES' 

the object, is equally obscured by empiricist philosophy, which 
treats this covered part of the background as invisible (in virtue erf a 
physiological definition of vision) and brings it down to the statuSof a 
mere sensible quality by supposing that it is provided by an image, 
that is, by a watered-down sensation. In more general terms, the 
real objects which are not part of our visual field can be present to 
us only as images, and that is why they are no more than 'permanent 
possibilities of sensations'. If we abandon the empiricist postulate of 
the priority of contents, we arc free to recognize the strange mode of 
existence enjoyed by the object behind our back. The hysterical child 
who turns round 'to see if the world behind him is still there', 1 
suffers from no deficiency of images, but the perceived world has lost 
for him that original structure which ensures that for the normal 
person its hidden aspects are as indubitable as are its visible ones. 
Once again the empiricist can always build up, with psychic atoms, 
near equivalents of all these structures. But the inventory of the 
perceived world given in the following chapters will increasingly show 
it up as a kind of mental blindness, and as the system least able to 
give an inclusive account of experience as it is revealed to us, while 
on the other hand reflection embraces empiricism's subordinate 
truth and assigns to it its proper place. 

1 Scheler, Idole der Selbsterkenntnis, p. 85. 



25 



3 

'ATTENTION* 
AND 'JUDGEMENT' 



THE discussion of traditional prejudices has so far been directed 
against empiricism, but in fact it was not empiricism alone that we 
were attacking. We must now show that its intellectualist antithesis 
is on the same level as empiricism itself. Both take the objective 
world as the object of their analysis, when this comes first neither in 
time nor in virtue of its meaning; and both are incapable of ex- 
pressing the peculiar way in which perceptual consciousness con- 
stitutes its object. Both keep their distance in relation to perception, 
instead of sticking closely to it. 

This may be shown by studying the history of the concept of 
attention. It is deduced, in empiricist thinking, from the 'constancy 
hypothesis', or, as we have explained, from the priority of the 
objective world. Even if what we perceive does not correspond to 
the objective properties of the source of the stimulus, the constancy 
hypothesis forces us to admit that the 'normal sensations' are 
already there. They must then be unperceived, and the function 
which reveals them, as a searchlight shows up objects pre-existing in 
the darkness, is called attention. Attention, then, creates nothing, 
and it is a natural miracle, as Malebranche to all intents and pur- 
poses said, which strikes up like sparks just those perceptions or 
ideas capable of providing an answer to the questions which I was 
asking. Since 'bemerken' or taking notice is not an efficient cause of 
the ideas which this act arouses, it is the same in all acts of attention, 
just as the searchlight's beam is the same whatever landscape be 
illuminated. Attention is therefore a general and unconditioned 
power in the sense that at any moment it can be applied indifferently 
to any content of consciousness. Being everywhere barren, nowhere 
can it have its own purposes to fulfil. In order to relate it to the life of 
consciousness, one would have to show how a perception awakens 

26 



'attention' and 'judgement 1 

attention, then how attention develops and enriches it. Some internal 
connection would have to be described, and empiricism has at its dis- 
posal only external ones, and can do no more than juxtapose states 
of consciousness. The empiricist's subject, once he has been allowed 
some initiative — which is the justification for a theory of attention — 
can receive only absolute freedom. Intellectualism, on the other 
hand, starts with the fruitfulness of attention: since I am conscious 
that through attention I shall come by the truth of the object, the 
succession of pictures called up by attention is not a haphazard one. 
The new appearance of the object assigns to the previous one a sub- 
ordinate place, and expresses all that its predecessor was trying to 
communicate. The wax is from the start a fragment of extension 
both pliable and alterable; I simply realize this clearly or confusedly 
'according as my attention is applied more or less to the things which 
are in it and of which it is composed'. 1 Since in attention I experience 
an elucidation of the object, the perceived object must already con- 
tain the intelligible structure which it reveals. If consciousness finds a 
geometrical circle in the circular form of a plate, it is because it had 
already put the circle there. For it to gain possession of the know- 
ledge brought by attention, it is enough for it to come to itself again, 
in the sense in which a man is said to come to himself again after 
fainting. On the other hand, inattentive or delirious perception is a 
semi-torpor, describable only in terms of negations, its object has no 
consistency, the only objects about which one can speak being those 
of waking consciousness. It is true that we carry with us, in the shape 
of our body, an ever-present principle of absent-mindedness and 
bewilderment. But our body has not the power to make us see what 
is not there; it can only make us believe that we see it. The moon on 
the horizon is not, and is not seen to be, bigger than at its zenith: if 
we look at it attentively, for example through a cardboard tube or a 
telescope, we see that its apparent diameter remains constant. 2 In- 
attentive perception contains nothing more and indeed nothing other 
than the attentive kind. So philosophy need attach no importance to 
any credit which appearance may be thought to enjoy. Clear con- 
sciousness, freed from the obstacles which it was prepared to create, 
the real world purged of any admixture of daydreams, are there for 
everyone. We are not called upon to analyse the act of attention as a 
passage from indistinctness to clarity, because the indistinctness is 
not there. Consciousness does not begin to exist until it sets limits 
to an object, and even the phantoms of 'internal experience' are 
possible only as things borrowed from external experience. There- 
fore consciousness has no private life, and the only obstacle it 

1 2nd Meditation, AT, IX, p. 25. 

2 Alain, Systdme des Beaux- Arts, p. 343. 

27 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

encounters is chaos, which is nothing. But, in a consciousness which 
constitutes everything, or rather which eternally possesses the in- 
telligible structure of all its objects, just as in empiricist conscious- 
ness which constitutes nothing at all, attention remains an abstract 
and ineffective power, because it has no work to perform. Conscious- 
ness is no less intimately linked with objects of which it is unheeding 
than with those which interest it, and the additional clearness 
brought by the act of attention does not herald any new relation- 
ship. It therefore becomes once more a light which does not change 
its character with the various objects which it shines upon, and once 
more empty acts of attention are brought in, in place of 'the modes 
and specific directions of intention'. 1 Finally, the act of attention is 
unconditioned, for it has all objects at its disposal, as was the 
'bemerken' of the empiricists, because in relation to that all objects 
were transcendent. How could an object, distinguished by its 
presence, call forth an act of attention, since consciousness in- 
cludes all objects? Where empiricism was deficient was in any 
internal connection between the object and the act which it triggers 
off. What intellectualism lacks is contingency in the occasions of 
thought. In the first case consciousness is too poor, in the second too 
rich for any phenomenon to appeal compellingly to it. Empiricism 
cannot see that we need to know what we are looking for, otherwise 
we would not be looking for it, and intellectualism fails to see that 
we need to be ignorant of what we are looking for, or equally again 
we should not be searching. They are in agreement in that neither 
can grasp consciousness in the act 0/ learning, and that neither 
attaches due importance to that circumscribed ignorance, that still 
'empty' but already determinate intention which is attention itself. 
Whether attention gets what it wants by ever-renewed miracles or 
whether it possesses it in advance, in both cases silence is maintained 
over the production of the object. Whether it be a collection of 
qualities or a system of relationships, no sooner does it exist than it 
must be pure, transparent, impersonal — not imperfect — a truth for 
one moment of my life, and of my knowledge as it emerges into con- 
sciousness. Perceptual consciousness is confused with the exact 
forms of scientific consciousness and the indeterminate does not 
enter into the definition of the mind. In spite of the intentions of 
intellectualism, the two doctrines, then, have this idea in common 
that attention creates nothing, since a world of impressions in itself 
or a universe of determining thought are equally independent of the 
action of mind. 

Against this conception of an inactive subject, the analysis of 

1 Caviircr, Philosophic da symbolischen Forr'en, t. Ill, Phatwmcnologie o'er 
f.iks!Mtnis % p. 200. 

28 



'attention* and 'judgement' 

attention by the psychologists acquires the value of self-discovery, 
and the criticism of the 'constancy hypothesis' develops into a 
criticism of the dogmatic belief in the 'world' seen as a reality in 
itself by empiricists, and as the immanent end of knowledge by 
intellectualists. Attention first of all presupposes a transformation 
of the mental field, a new way for consciousness to be present to 
its objects. Take the act of attention whereby I locate a point on my 
body which is being touched. The analysis of certain disorders 
having their origin in the central nervous system, and which make 
such an identification impossible, reveals the profound workings of 
consciousness. Head has spoken summarily of 'a local weakening of 
attention'. It is in reality neither a question of one or more 'local 
signals', nor of the collapse of a secondary power of apprehension. 
The primary condition of the disorder is a disintegration of the 
sensory field which no longer remains stable while the subject per- 
ceives, but moves in response to the exploratory movements and 
shrinks while it is being probed. 1 A vaguely located spot, contra- 
dictory phenomenon that reveals a pre-objective space where there is 
indeed extension, since several points on the body touched together 
are not confused by the subject, but as yet no univocal position, be- 
cause no spatial framework persists from one perception to another. 
The first operation of attention is, then, to create for itself a field, 
either perceptual or mental, which can be 'surveyed' (uberschauen), 
in which movements of the exploratory organ or elaborations of 
thought are possible, but in which consciousness does not corre- 
spondingly lose what it has gained and, moreover, lose itself in the 
changes it brings about. The precise position of the point touched 
will be the invariable factor among the various feelings that I ex- 
perience according to the dispositions of my limbs and body. The 
act of attention can localize or objectify this invariable factor be- 
cause it has stepped back from the changes of appearance. Attention, 
therefore, as a general and formal activity, does not exist. 2 There is in 
each case a certain liberty to be acquired, and a certain mental space 
to make the most of. It remains to bring to light the object of atten- 
tion itself. There it is literally a question of creation. For example, 
it has long been known that during the first nine months of life, 
infants distinguish only globally the coloured from the colourless; 
thereafter coloured areas form into 'warm' and 'cold' shades, and 
finally the detailed colours are arrived at. But psychologists 3 would 
concede here no more than that ignorance or the confusion of names 

1 J. Stein, Vber die Veranderungen der Sinnesleistungen und die Entstehung von 
Trugwahrnehmungen, pp. 362 and 383. 
* E. Rubin, Die Nichtexistenz der Aufmerksamkeit '. 
3 Cf. Peters, Zur Entwickehmg der Farbemvahrnehmimg, pp. 152-3. 

29 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

prevents the child from distinguishing colours. The child must, it 
was alleged, see green where it is; all he was failing to do was to pay 
attention and apprehend his own phenomena. The reason for these 
assertions was that psychologists were not yet able to conceive a 
world in which colours were indeterminate, or a colour which was 
not a precise quality. The criticism of these prejudices, on the other 
hand, allows the world of colours to be perceived as a secondary 
formation, based on a series of 'physiognomic' distinctions: that 
between the 'warm' and 'cold' shades, that between the 'coloured' 
and the 'non-coloured'. We cannot compare these phenomena, 
which take the place of colour in children, to any determinate quality, 
and in the same way the 'strange' colours seen by a diseased person 
cannot be identified with any colour of the spectrum. 1 The first 
perception of colours properly speaking, then, is a change of the 
structure of consciousness, 2 the establishment of a new dimension of 
experience, the setting forth of an a priori. 

Now attention has to be conceived on the model of these origi- 
nating acts, since secondary attention, which would be limited to 
recalling knowledge already gained, would once more identify it 
with acquisition. To pay attention is not merely further to elucidate 
pre-existing data, it is to bring about a new articulation of them by 
taking them as figures. 3 They are preformed only as horizons, they 
constitute in reality new regions in the total world. It is precisely the 
original structure which they introduce that brings out the identity 
of the object before and after the act of attention. Once the colour- 
quality is acquired, and only by means of it, do the previous data 
appear as preparations of this quality. Once the idea of an equation 
has been acquired, equal arithmetical quantities appear as varieties 
of the same equation. It is precisely by overthrowing data that the 
act of attention is related to previous acts, and the unity of conscious- 
ness is thus built up step by step through a 'synthesis of transition'. 
The miracle of consciousness consists in its bringing to light, through 
attention, phenomena which re-establish the unity of the object in a 
new dimension at the very moment when they destroy it. Thus atten- 
tion is neither an association of images, nor the return to itself of 
thought already in control of its objects, but the active constitution 
of a new object which makes explicit and articulate what was until 
then presented as no more than an indeterminate horizon. At the 
same time as it sets attention in motion, the object is at every 
moment recaptured and placed once more in a state of dependence 
on it. It gives rise to the 'knowledge-bringing event', which is to 

1 Cf. supra, p. 9. 

a Koehlcr, (Jber unbemerkle Empfindungen . . ., p. 52. 
3 KofTka, Perception, pp. 561 and (T. 

30 



Attention' and 'judgement' 

transform it, only by means of the still ambiguous meaning which it 
requires that event to clarify; it is therefore the motive 1 and not the 
cause of the event. But at least the act of attention is rooted in the 
life of consciousness, and one can finally understand how it emerges 
from its liberty of indifference and gives itself a present object. This 
passage from the indeterminate to the determinate, this recasting at 
every moment of its own history in the unity of a new meaning, is 
thought itself. The work of the mind exists only in act.' 2 The result 
of the act of attention is not to be found in its beginning. If the moon 
on the horizon appears to me no bigger than at the zenith, when I 
look at it through a telescope or a cardboard tube, the conclusion 3 
cannot be drawn that in free vision equally its appearance is in- 
variable. This is what empiricism believes, because it is not con- 
cerned with what we see, but with what we ought to see, according 
to the retinal image. It is also what intellectualism believes because it 
describes de facto perception according to the data of 'analytic' and 
attentive perception, in which the moon in fact resumes its true 
apparent diameter. The precise and entirely determinate world is 
still posited in the first place, no longer perhaps as the cause of our 
perceptions, but as their immanent end. If the world is to be possible, 
it must be implied in the first adumbration of consciousness, as the 
transcendental deduction so forcibly brings out. 4 And that is why 
the moon on the horizon should never appear bigger than it is. 
Psychological reflection, on the contrary, makes us put the world 
of the exact back into its cradle of consciousness, and ask how 
the very idea of the world or of exact truth is possible, and look for 
its first appearance in consciousness. When I look quite freely 
and naturally, the various parts of the field interact and motivate 
this enormous moon on the horizon, this measureless size which 
nevertheless is a size. Consciousness must be faced with its 
own unreflective life in things and awakened to its own history 
which it was forgetting: such is the true part that philosophical 
reflection has to play, and thus do we arrive at a true theory of 
attention. 

Intellectualism set out, it is true, to discover by reflection the 
structure of perception, instead of explaining it in terms of a 
combination of associative forces and attention, but its gaze upon 

1 E. Stein, Beitrage zur philosophischen Begriindung der Psychologie und der 
Geisteswissenschafien, pp. 35 and ff. 

a Valery, Introduction a la poetique, p. 40. 

3 As Alain does, Systeme des Beaux-Arts, p. 343. 

4 The following pages will make clearer in what respects Kantian philosophy 
is, in Husserl's language, a 'worldly* and dogmatic philosophy. Cf. Fink, 
Die phanomenologische Philosophic Husserls in der gegenwartigen Kritik, pp. 531 
andff. 

31 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

perception is not yet direct. This will be seen better by examining the 
role played in its analysis by the notion of judgement. Judgement is 
often introduced as what sensation lacks to make perception possible. 
Sensation is no longer presupposed as a real element of consciousness. 
But when it is desired to delineate the structure of perception, it is 
done by joining up the points of sensation. Analysis is then domi- 
nated by this empiricist notion which, however, is accepted only as 
the boundary of consciousness and serves merely to throw into relief 
a power of co-ordination of which it is itself the antithesis. Intel- 
lectualism thrives on the refutation of empiricism, and here judge- 
ment often has the job of offsetting the possible dispersal of sensa- 
tions. 1 Analytical reflection makes its position firm by carrying to 
their logical conclusions the realist and empiricist theses, and vali- 
dating their opposite by showing their absurdity. But in the reductio 
ad absurdum no contact is necessarily made with the actual workings 
of consciousness. It remains possible that the theory of perception, 
ideally starting from a blind intuition, may end compensatorily with 
some empty concept, and that judgement, the counterpart of pure 
sensation, may degenerate into a general function of indiscriminate 
union with its objects, or even become once more a psychic force 
detectable in its effects. The famous analysis of the piece of wax 
jumps from qualities such a smell, colour and taste, to the power of 
assuming an infinity of forms and positions, a power which lies 
beyond the perceived object and defines only the wax of the physicist. 
For perception there is no wax left when all its sensible properties 
have vanished, and only science supposes that there is some matter 
which is preserved. The 'perceived* wax itself, with its original 
manner of existing, its permanence which is not yet the exact identity 
of science, its 'interior horizon' 2 of possible variation of shape and 
size, its dull colour suggestive of softness, which in turn suggests the 
dull sound I shall get when I pat it, in short, the perceptual structure 
of the object, are lost sight of, because specifications of a predicative 
kind are needed to link up objective and hermetically sealed qualities. 
The men I see from a window are hidden by their hats and coats, and 
their image cannot be imprinted on my retina. I therefore do not see 
them, I judge them to be there. 3 Once vision is defined in the empiric- 
ist way as the possession of a quality impressed upon the body by the 

1 'Hume's nature needed Kantian reason and Hobbes* man needed Kant's 
praciical reason if bolh were to approximate to the actual, natural experience we 
have of them.' Schcler, Der Formalismus in der Ethik, p. 62. 

2 Cf. Husscrl, Erfahrung und Urteil, e.g., p. 172. 

3 Descartes, 2nd Meditation, 'I do not fail to say that I sec men, just as I say 
1 see wax; yet what do I sec from the window, except hats and coals which may 
cover ghosts or dummies worked by springs? Yet I judge them to be real men . . 
A!. IX. p. 25. 

32 



Attention' and Judgement' 



stimulus, 1 the least illusion, endowing the object as it does with 
properties which it does not possess on my retina, is sufficient to 
establish that perception is a judgement. 2 As I have two eyes, I 
ought to see the object double, and if I see only one of it, that is 
because I construct by means of two images the idea of one object a 
distance away. 3 Perception becomes an interpretation' of the signs 
that our senses provide in accordance with the bodily stimuli? a 
'hypothesis' that the mind evolves to 'explain its impressions to 
itself. 5 But judgement also, brought in to explain the excess of per- 
ception over the retinal impressions, instead of being the act of 
perception itself grasped from within by authentic reflection, 
becomes once more a mere 'factor' of perception, responsible for 
providing what the body does not provide — instead of being a 
transcendental activity, it becomes simply a logical activity of 
drawing a conclusion. 6 In this way we are drawn away from reflection, 

1 'Here too relief seems obvious; yet it is concluded from an appearance 
which bears no resemblance to a relief, namely from a difference between the 
appearances presented to our two eyes by the same things/ Alain, Quatrc- 
vingt-un chapitres surV esprit et les passions, p. 19. Moreover Alain (ibid., p. 17) 
refers to the Physiological Optics of Helmholz in which the constancy hypothesis 
is always assumed, and where judgement intervenes only to fill the gaps in 
physiological explanation. Cf. again ibid., p. 23, 'It is fairly obvious that in the 
case of this forest horizon, sight presents it to us not as remote but as bluish, by 
reason of the intervening layers of air.' This is logically entailed if we define sight 
by its bodily stimulus or by the possession of a quality, for then it can give us 
blueness but not distance, which is a relationship. But it is not strictly speaking 
obvious, that is, attested by consciousness. Consciousness is in fact astonished to 
discover in the perception of distance relations which precede all assessment, 
calculation or conclusion. 

2 'What proves here that I judge is that painters know perfectly how to provide 
me with the perception of a distant mountain by imitating its appearance on a 
canvas.' Alain, ibid., p. 14. 

3 'We see objects double because we have two eyes, but we pay no attention to 
these double images except in order to gain from them knowledge about the 
distance or relief of the unique object which they afford our perception.' Lagneau, 
Celebres Lecons, p. 105. And generally 'we must first of all look for the elementary 
sensations which belong to the nature of the human mind ; the human body repre- 
sents this nature'. Ibid., p. 75. 'I have met a person', says Alain, 'who was not pre- 
pared to admit that our eyes present us with two images of each thing; it is, how- 
ever, sufficient to fix our eyes on a fairly close object such as a pencil to see that 
the images of distant objects are immediately doubled.' {Quatre-vingt-un ch\mitres, 
pp. 23-4.) That does not prove that they were double beforehand. Here San be 
seen the prejudice in favour of the law of constancy which demands that pheno- 
mena corresponding to bodily impressions be given in places where they are^not 
observed. \ 

4 'Perception is an interpretation of the primitive intuition, an interpretation 
apparently immediate, but in reality gained from habit corrected by reason- 
ing . . .', Lagneau, Celebres Lecons, p. 158. 6 Id. ibid., p. 160. 

• Cf. for example Alain, Quatre-vingt-un chapitres, p. 15: Relief is 'thought, 
concluded, judged, or however you like to put it'. 

33 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

and we construct perception instead of revealing its distinctive 
working; we miss once more the basic operation which infuses 
significance into the sensible, and which is taken for granted by any 
logical mediation or any psychological causality. The result is that 
intellectualist analysis eventually makes nonsense of the perceptual 
phenomena which it is designed to elucidate. While judgement loses 
its constitutive function and becomes an explanatory principle, the 
words 'see', 'hear', 'feel' lose all their meaning, since the least 
significant vision outruns the pure impression and thus comes under 
the general heading of 'judgement'. Ordinary experience draws a 
clear distinction between sense experience and judgement. It sees 
judgement as the taking of a stand, as an effort to know something 
which shall be valid for myself every moment of my life, and equally 
for other actual or potential minds; sense experience, on the con- 
trary, is taking appearance .at its face value, without trying to 
possess it and learn its truth. This distinction disappears in intel- 
lectualism, because judgement is everywhere where pure sensation 
is not — that is, absolutely everywhere. The evidence of phenomena 
will therefore everywhere be challenged. 

A large cardboard box seems heavier to me than a small one 
made of the same cardboard, and if I confined myself to phenomena 
I should say that in advance. I Jeel it heavier in my hand. But 
intellectualism limits sense experience to the action of a real 
stimulus on my body. Since here there is none, we have to say that 
the box is not felt but judged to be heavier, and this example which 
seemed ready-made to show the sensory aspect of illusion serves on 
the contrary to prove that there is no sensory knowledge, and that 
we feel as we judge. 1 A cube drawn on paper changes its appearance 
according as it is seen from one side and from above or from the 
other and from below. Even if I know that it can be seen in two ways, 
the figure in fact refuses to change its structure and my knowledge 
must await its intuitive realization. Here again one ought to con- 
clude that judging is not perceiving. But the alternatives of sensation 
and judgement force us to say that the change in the figure, since it 
does not depend on the 'sensible elements' which, like the stimuli, 
remain constant, can only depend on a change of interpretation, and 
that 'the mind's conception modifies perception itself', 2 'appearance 
assumes form and meaning to order'. 3 Now if we see what we judge, 
how can we distinguish between true and false perception? How will 
it then be possible to say that the sufTerer from hallucinations or the 
madman 'think they see what they do not see'? 4 Where will be the 

1 Alain, Quatre-vinghun chapitres, p. 18. 

2 Lagncau, Celebres Leeons, pp. 132 and 128. 2 Alain, ibid., p. 32. 
4 Monlaigne, quoted by Alain, Systeme des Beaux-Arts, p. 15. 

34 



'attention' and 'judgement' 

difference between 'seeing' and 'thinking one sees'? If the reply is 
made that the sane man judges only by adequate signs and completely 
coherent material, it is, then, because there is a difference between 
the motivated judgement of veridical perception and the empty 
judgement of false perception. And as the difference is not in the 
form of the judgement but in the sensible text to which it gives form, 
to perceive in the full sense of the word (as the antithesis of imagin- 
ing) is not to judge, it is to apprehend an immanent sense in the 
sensible before judgement begins. The phenomenon of true percep- 
tion offers, therefore, a meaning inherent in the signs, and of which 
judgement is merely the optional expression. Intellectualism can 
make comprehensible neither this phenomenon nor the imitation 
which illusion gives of it. More generally it is blind to the mode of 
existence and co-existence of perceived objects, to the life which 
steals across the visual field and secretly binds its parts together. In 
Zollner's optical illusion, I 'see' the main lines converging. Intel- 
lectualism simply reduces the phenomenon to a mistake, saying that 
it all comes of my bringing in the auxiliary lines and their relation to 
the main ones, instead of comparing their main lines themselves. 
Basically I mistake the task given to me, and I compare the two 
wholes instead of comparing the principal elements. 1 My mistake 
apparently remains unexplained. The question ought to arise: How 
does it come about that it is so difficult in Zollner's illusion to com- 
pare in isolation the very lines that have to be compared according 
to the task set? Why do they thus refuse to be separated from the 
auxiliary lines? 2 It should be recognized that acquiring auxiliary 
lines, the main lines have ceased to be parallel, that they have 
lost that meaning and acquired another, that the auxiliary lines 
introduce into the figure a new meaning which henceforth clings to it 
and cannot be shifted. 3 It is this meaning inseparable from the figure, 
this transformation of the phenomenon, which motivates the false 
judgement and which is so to speak behind it. It is at the same time 
this meaning which gives a sense to the word 'see' on the hither side 
of judgement and on the far side of the quality or impression, and 
causes the problem of perception to reappear. If we agree to call 
any perception of a relationship a judgement and to keep the term 
visual impression for the atomic impression, then certainly illusion 
is a judgement. But this analysis presupposes at least in theory a 

1 Cf. for example Lagneau, Celebres Legons, p. 134. 

1 Koehler, Vber unbemerkte Empfindungen und Urteilstauschungen, p. 69. 

3 Koffka, Psychologies p. 533: 'One is tempted to say: the side of a rectangle is 
after all just a line. But an isolated line, both as a phenomenon and as a func- 
tional element, is something other than the side of a rectangle. To limit ourselves 
to one property, the side of a rectangle has an inner and an outer face, the 
isolated line on the other hand has two faces absolutely equivalent.* 

35 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

layer of impressions in which the main lines are parallel, as they arc 
in the world, that is, in the physical environment which we measure 
— and a second-order operation which changes the impressions by 
bringing in auxiliary lines, thus distorting the relationships of the 
principal lines. Now the first of these phases is purely conjectural, 
and with it the judgement which produces the second. We construct 
the illusion, but we do not understand it. Judgement in this very 
general and quite formal sense explains perception, true or false, 
only when it is guided by the spontaneous organization and the 
special mode of arrangement of the phenomena. It is true that the 
illusion consists in involving the principal elements in the figure in 
auxiliary relationships which break up the parallelism. But why do 
they break it up? Why is it that two straight lines so far parallel 
cease to make a pair and begin to converge by reason of the immedi- 
ate surroundings provided? It is as if they no longer belonged to the 
same world. Two genuinely oblique lines are situated in the same 
space which -is objective space. But these do not actually converge 
upon each other, and it is impossible to see them in this way if our 
eyes are fixed on them. It is when we look away from them that they 
move insidiously towards this new relationship. There is here, pre- 
ceding objective relationships, a perceptual syntax constructed 
according to its own rules: the breaking of old relationships and the 
establishment of new ones— judgement — express merely the result of 
this complex operation and place it on record. True or false, in this 
way must perception first be constituted for predication to be 
possible. It is quite true that the distance from us of an object, or its 
relief, are not properties of the object as are its colour or its weight. 
It is true that they are relations introduced into a total grouping 
which, moreover, includes weight and colour. But it is untrue that 
this grouping is effected through an 'inspection of the mind*. It 
would follow from this that the mind runs over isolated impressions 
and gradually discovers the meaning of the whole as the scientist dis- 
covers the unknown factors in virtue of the data of the problem. 
Now here the data of the problem are not prior to its solution, 
and perception is just that act which creates at a stroke, along with 
the cluster of data, the meaning which unites them — indeed which 
not only discovers the meaning which they have, but moreover sees to 
it that they have a meaning. 

It is true that these criticisms are valid only against the first 
stages of analytical reflection, and intellectualism might reply that 
one is forced at the beginning to talk the language of common sense. 
The conception of judgement as a psychic force or a logical mediator, 
and the theory of perception as 'interpretation' — the intellectualism 
of the psychologists — is indeed simply a counterpart of empiricism, 

36 



'attention' and 'judgement' 

but it paves the way to true self-discovery. One can begin only with 
a natural attitude, complete with its postulates, until the internal 
dialectic of these postulates destroys them. Once perception is 
understood as interpretation, sensation, which has provided a 
starting-point, is finally superseded, for all perceptual consciousness 
is already beyond it. The sensation is not experienced, 1 and con- 
sciousness is always consciousness of an object. We arrive at sensa- 
tion when we think about perceptions and try to make it clear that 
they are not completely our work. Pure sensation, defined as the 
action of stimuli on our body, is the 'last effect 1 of knowledge, par- 
ticularly of scientific knowledge, and it is an illusion (a not unnatural 
one, moreover) that causes us to put it at the beginning and to 
believe that it precedes knowledge. It is the necessary, and necessarily 
misleading way in which a mind sees its own history. 2 It belongs to 
the domain of the constituted and not to the constituting mind. 
To the world or opinion, perception can appear as an interpretation. 
For consciousness itself, how could it be a process of reasoning 
since there are no sensations to provide it with premises, or an 
interpretation, because there is nothing prior to it to interpret? At 
the same time as we thus discard, along with the idea of sensation, 
that of a purely logical activity, our foregoing objections disappear. 
We asked what seeing or feeling are, what makes this knowledge 
still enmeshed in its object, and inherent in one point of time and 
space, distinct from the concept. But reflection shows that there 
is nothing here to understand. It is a fact that I believe myself 
to be first of all surrounded by my body, involved in the world, 
situated here and now. But each of these words, wlien I come to 
think about them, is devoid of meaning, and therefore raises no 
problem: would I perceive myself as 'surrounded by my body' if I 
were not in it as well as being in myself, if I did not myself conceive 
this spatial relationship and thus escape inherence at the very instant 
at which I conceive it? Would I know that I am caught up and situ- 
ated in the world, if 1 were truly caught up and situated in it? I 
should then merely be where 1 was, as a thing, and since 1 know where 
I am and see myself among things, it is because I am a consciousness, 
a strange creature which resides nowhere and can be everywhere 
present in intention. Everything that exists exists as a thing or as a 
consciousness, and there is no half-way house. The thing is in a 

1 *In fact the pure impression is conceived and not felt.* Lagncau, Celcbres 
Le?ons, p. 119. 

2 'When we have evolved this notion by scientific knowledge and reflection, wc 
think that what is in fact the last effect of the process of knowing, namely the 
expression of the relationship between one being and others, is the beginning; 
but this is an illusion. The idea of time which leads us to think of sensation as 
anterior to knowledge, is a construction of the mind.' Id. ibid. 

37 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

place, but perception is nowhere, for if it were situated in a place it 
could not make other things exist for itself, since it would repose in 
itself as things do. Perception is thus thought about perceiving. 
Its incarnation furnishes no positive characteristic which has to 
be accounted for, and its thisness (ecceity) is simply its own ignor- 
ance of itself. Analytical reflection becomes a purely regressive 
doctrine, according to which every perception is a muddled form of 
intellection, and every setting of bounds a negation. It thus does 
away with all problems except one: that of its own beginning. The 
finitude of a perception which gives me, as Spinoza expressed it, 
'consequences without premises', the inherence of consciousness in 
a point of view, these things amount to my ignorance of myself, to 
my negative power of not reflecting. But how is this ignorance 
possible? we want to ask. To reply that it never is, would be to 
abolish me as an inquiring philosopher. No philosophy can afford 
to be ignorant of the problem of finitude under pain of failing to 
understand itself as philosophy; no analysis of perception can afford 
not to conceive perception as a totally original phenomenon under 
pain of misconceiving itself as analysis, and the infinite thought dis- 
covered as immanent in perception would not be the culminating 
point of consciousness, but on the contrary a form of unconscious- 
ness. The impetus of reflection would overshoot its goal: it would 
transport us from a fixed and determinate world to a consciousness 
without a rift in it, whereas the perceived object is infused with 
secret life, and perception as a unity disintegrates and reforms cease- 
lessly. We shall have only an abstract essence of consciousness as 
long as we refrain from following the actual movement by which it 
resumes its own operations at every instant, focusing and con- 
centrating them on an identifiable object, gradually passing from 
'seeing' to 'knowing' and achieving the unity of its own life. We shall 
not reach this constitutive dimension if we replace the plenary unity 
of consciousness by a completely transparent subject, and the 
'hidden art' which calls up meaning from 'the depths of nature', by 
some eternal thought. The intellectualist process of self-discovery 
does not penetrate as far as this living nucleus of perception because 
it is looking for the conditions which make it possible or without 
which it would not exist, instead of uncovering the operation which 
brings it into reality, or whereby it is constituted. In actual perception 
taken at its origin, before any word is uttered, the sign offered to 
sense and the signification are not even theoretically separable. An 
object is an organism of colours, smells, sounds and tactile appear- 
ances which symbolize, modify and accord with each other according 
to the laws of a real logic which it is the task of science to make 
explicit, and which it is far from having analysed completely. Intel- 

38 



'attention' and 'judgement' 

lectualism is unequal to dealing with this perceptual life, either falling 
short of it or overshooting it: it calls up as limitations the manifold 
qualities which are merely the outer casing of the object, and from 
there it passes on to a consciousness of the object which claims to 
hold within itself the law or secret of that object, and which for this 
reason deprives the development of the experience of its contingency 
and the object of its distinctive perceptual style. This move from 
thesis to antithesis, this flying from one extreme to the other which 
is the regular procedure of intellectualism leaves the starting-point of 
analysis unaffected. We started offfrom a world in itself which acted 
upon our eyes so as to cause us to see it, and we now have conscious- 
ness of or thought about the world, but the nature of this world re- 
mains unchanged : it is still defined by the absolute mutual exteriority 
of its parts, and is merely duplicated throughout its extent by a 
thought which sustains it. We pass from absolute objectivity to 
absolute subjectivity, but this second idea is no better than the first 
and is upheld only against it, which means by it. The affinity between 
intellectualism and empiricism is thus much less obvious and much 
more deeply rooted than is commonly thought. It arises not only 
from the anthropological definition of sensation used equally by 
both, but from the fact that both persist in the natural or dogmatic 
attitude, and the survival of sensation in intellectualism is merely a 
sign of this dogmatism. Intellectualism accepts as completely valid 
the idea of truth and the idea of being in which the formative work of 
consciousness culminates and is embodied, and its alleged reflection 
consists in positing as powers of the subject all that is required to 
arrive at these ideas. The natural attitude, by throwing me into the 
world of things, gives me the assurance of apprehending a 'real' 
beyond appearance, the 'true' beyond illusion. The value of these 
notions is not questioned by intellectualism: it is merely a matter of 
conferring upon a universal creative force the power of recognizing 
this same absolute truth that realism ingenuously places in a given 
creation. Intellectualism no doubt normally sets itself up as a doctrine 
of science and not of perception, purporting to base its analysis on 
the test of mathematical truth and not on the naive acceptance of the 
self-evidence of the world: habemus ideam veranu But in reality I 
would not know that I possess a true idea if my memory did not 
enable me to relate what is now evident with what was evident a 
moment ago, and, through the medium of words, correlate my 
evidence with that of others, so that Spinozist self-evidence presup- 
poses that of memory and perception. If, on the other hand, we 
insist on basing our constitution of the past and of other people 
on our power of recognizing the intrinsic truth of the idea, we 
do away with the problem of others and that of the world, but 

39 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 



then only because we persist in the natural attitude which takes 
them for granted, and because we put into action the force of naive 
certainty. For never, as Descartes and Pascal realized, can I at one 
stroke coincide with the pure thought which constitutes even a 
simple idea. My clear and distinct thought always uses thoughts 
already formulated by myself or others, and relies on my memory, 
that is, on the nature of my mind, or else on the memory of the com- 
munity of thinkers, that is, upon the objective mind. To take for 
granted that we have %. true idea is to believe in uncritical perception. 
Empiricism retained an absolute belief in the world as the totality of 
spatio-temporal events, and treated consciousness as a province of 
this world. Analytical reflection, it is true, breaks with the world in 
itself, since it constitutes it through the working of consciousness, 
but this constituting consciousness, instead of being directly appre- 
hended, is built up in such a way as to make possible the idea of an 
absolute determinate being. It is the correlative of a universe, the 
subject possessing in absolutely completed form all the knowledge 
which is adumbrated by our actual knowledge. What happens is that 
what exists for us only in intention is presumed to be fully realized 
somewhere: there is thought to be a system of absolutely true 
thoughts, capable of co-ordinating all phenomena, a flat projection 
which clarifies all perspectives, a pure object upon which all sub- 
jective views open. Nothing less than this absolute object and this 
divine subject are needed to ward off the threat of the malicious 
demon and to ensure that we possess the true idea. Now there is 
indeed one human act which at one stroke cuts through all possible 
doubts to stand in the full light of truth: this act is perception, in the 
wide sense of knowledge of existences. When I begin to perceive this 
table, I resolutely contract the thickness of duration* which has 
elapsed while 1 have been looking at it; I emerge from my individual 
life by apprehending the object as an object for everybody. I there- 
fore bring together in one operation concordant' but discrete experi- 
ences which occupy several points of time and several temporalities. 
We do not blame intellectualism for making use of this decisive act 
which, within time, does the work of the Spinozist eternity, this 
'original doxa'; 1 what we do complain of, is that it is here used 
tacitly. There is here a de facto power, as Descartes put it, a quite 
irresistibly self-evident truth, which, by invoking an absolute truth, 
brings together the separate phenomena of my present and my past, 
of my duration* and that of others, which, however, must not be 
severed from its perceptual origins and detached from its 4 facticity\ 
Philosophy's task is to reinstate it in the private field of experience 

* durtc in the Bergsonian sense (Translator's note). 
1 Husserl, Erfahrung und Urteil, e.g., p. 331. 

40 



'attention' and 'judgement' 

from which it arises and elucidate its origin. If, however, this de facto 
power is used without being explicitly posited, we become incapable 
of seeing past the rending of separate experiences the phenomenon 
of perception, and the world born in perception; we dissolve the 
perceived world into a universe which is nothing but this very world 
cut off from its constitutive origins, and made manifest because they 
are forgotten. 

Thus intellectualism leaves consciousness on a footing of famili- 
arity with absolute being, while the idea of a world in itself persists 
as a horizon or as the clue to analytical reflection. Doubt has cer- 
tainly interrupted the explicit assertions concerning the world, but 
leaves untouched its insidious presence, even though it be sub- 
limated into the ideal realm of absolute truth. Reflection, then, 
furnishes an essence of consciousness, which is accepted dogmatic- 
ally, and no one wonders what an essence is, or whether the essence 
of thought adequately covers the fact of thought. It loses the char- 
acter of observation and henceforth there can be no question of 
describing phenomena: the perceptual appearance of illusions is 
challenged as the illusion of illusions; now only what is can be seen, 
the view itself and experience being no longer distinct from concep- 
tion. Hence a philosophy with two guises, and observable in any 
doctrine of the understanding: a leap is undertaken from a natural- 
istic view, which expresses our de facto condition, to a transcendental 
sphere in which all bondage is theoretically removed, and we never 
have to wonder how the same subject comes to be a part of the world 
and at the same time its principle because the thing constituted exists 
only for the constituting agent. In fact, the image of a constituted 
world where, with my body, I should be only one object among 
others, and the idea of an absolute constituting consciousness are 
only apparently antithetical ; they are a dual expression of a universe 
perfectly explicit in itself. Authentic reflection, instead of turning 
from one to the other as both true, in the manner of a philosophy of 
the understanding, rejects them as both false. 

It is true that we are perhaps once more distorting intellectualism. 
When we say that analytical reflection anticipates all possible know- 
ledge over and above what we at present know, that it includes 
reflection in its results and abolishes the phenomenon of finitude, 
perhaps we are caricaturing intellectualism, and offering in its name 
a world-centred reflection, a truth as seen by the prisoner in the cave 
who prefers the shadows to which he is accustomed and who does 
not understand that they owe their existence to the light. Perhaps we 
have not yet understood the real function of judgement in perception. 
The analysis of the piece of wax means, one may say, not that there 
is a reason hidden behind nature, but that reason is rooted in nature; 

41 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

the 'inspection of the mind' would then be, not the concept gravitating 
towards nature, but nature rising to the concept. Perception would 
be a judgement, which, however, is unaware of the reasons under- 
lying its own formation, 1 which amounts to saying that the perceived 
object presents itself as a totality and a unity before we have appre- 
hended the intelligible law governing it, and that the wax is not 
originally a pliable and alterable bit of extension. When he says that 
natural judgement has not 'time to weigh and consider any reasons', 
Descartes lets us know that by the word 'judgement' he is thinking 
of the constitution of a meaning for the thing perceived which is not 
prior to the perception itself and which seems to emanate from it. 2 
The vital knowledge or 'natural inclination' which shows us the 
union of body and soul, once the light of nature has taught us to 
distinguish them, is a thing which it seems contradictory to guarantee 
by divine truthfulness; for this is after all nothing but the intrinsic 
clarity of the idea, and can in any case validate only self-evident 
thoughts. But perhaps Descartes' philosophy consists in embracing 
this contradiction. 3 When Descartes says that the understanding 
knows itself incapable of knowing the union of soul and body and 
leaves this knowledge for life to achieve, 4 this means that the act of 
understanding presents itself as reflection on an unreflective ex- 
perience which it does not absorb either in fact or in theory. When I 
discover the intelligible structure of the piece of wax, I do not 
identify myself with some absolute thought in relation to which the 
wax is a mere result, I do not constitute it, I re-constitute it. 'Natural 
judgement' is nothing but the phenomenon of passivity. It will 
always be the task of perception to know perception. Reflection 
never lifts itself out of any situation, nor does the analysis of per- 
ception do away with the fact of perception, the thisness of the 
percept or the inherence of perceptual consciousness in some 
temporality and some locality. Reflection is not absolutely trans- 
parent for itself, it is always given to itself in an experience, in the 
Kantian sense of the word, it always springs up without itself know- 

1 \ . . I noticed lhat ihe judgements which I was accustomed to make about 
these objects were formed within me before I had time to weigh and consider any 
reasons which might have forced me to make them.' 6th Meditation, AT, IX, 
p. 60. 

* \ . . it seemed to me lhat I had learnt from nature all the other things that I 
judged concerning the objects of my senses . . ibid. 

3 4 . . . since it did not seem to me that the human mind was capable of con- 
ceiving distinctly and simultaneously the distinction between soul and body and 
their union, for in that case it would be necessary to conceive them as a single 
thing and at the same time as two things, which is contradictory.' To Elizabeth, 
28lh June, 1643, AT, III, p. 690 and iT. 

4 Ibid. 

42 



Attention' and Judgement' 

ing whence it springs and offers itself to me as a gift of nature. But if 
the description of the unreflective experience remains valid after 
reflection and the Sixth Meditation after the Second, conversely this 
unreflective experience is known to us only through reflection and 
cannot be posited outside itself as an unknowable final stage. Be- 
tween the self which analyses perception and the self which perceives, 
there is always a distance. But in the concrete act of reflection, I 
abolish this distance, I prove by that very token that I am capable of 
knowing what I was perceiving, I control in practice the discontinuity 
of the two selves, and it would seem that, in the last resort, the signifi- 
cance of the cogito lies not in revealing a universal constituting force 
or in reducing perception to intellection, but in establishing the fact of 
reflection which both pierces and sustains the opacity of perception. 
It would be quite consistent with the Cartesian intention to have 
thus identified reason and the human condition, and it might be 
held that the ultimate significance of Cartesianism is to be found 
here. The 'natural judgement' of intellectualism in this case antici- 
pates the Kantian judgement which sees the birth of the individual 
objects meaning in the object itself, and does not see it as im- 
posed ready-made. 1 Cartesianism, like Kantianism, would seem to 
have seen quite clearly that the problem of perception resides in its 
being an originating knowledge. There is an empirical or second- 
order perception, the one which we exercise at every moment, and 
which conceals from us the former basic phenomenon, because it is 
loaded with earlier acquisitions and plays, so to speak, on the surface 
of being. 

When I glance rapidly about at the objects surrounding me in 
order to find my bearings and locate myself among them, I scarcely 
can be said to grasp the world in some instantaneous aspect. I identify 
here the door, there the window, over there my table, all of which 
are the props and guides of a practical intention directed elsewhere, 
and which are therefore given to me simply as meanings. But when I 
contemplate an object with the sole intention of watching it exist 
and unfold its riches before my eyes, then it ceases to be an allusion 
to a general type, and I become aware that each perception, and not 
merely that of sights which I am discovering for the first time, re- 
enacts on its own account the birth of intelligence and has some 
element of creative genius about it: in order that I may recognize 
the tree as a tree, it is necessary that, beneath this familiar meaning, 

1 The faculty of judging 'must, then, itself provide a concept, which in reality 
does not bring knowledge of any thing, and which serves as a rule only for itself, 
net an objective rule to which its judgement is to be adapted; for then would be 
needed another faculty of judging in order to be able to discern whether this is or 
is not a case to which the rule applies.' (Critique of Judgement, Preface.) 

43 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

the momentary arrangement of the visible scene should begin all 
over again, as on the very first day of the vegetable kingdom, to 
outline the individual idea of this tree. Such would be natural 
judgement, which cannot yet know its reasons since it is in process of 
creating them. But even if we grant that existence, individuality, 
'facticity' are on the horizon of Cartesian thought, there remains the 
question whether it has posited them. Now we must recognize that it 
could have done so only by transforming itself radically. To make 
perception into an original knowledge, we should have had to endow 
finitude with a positive significance and take seriously the strange 
phrase in the 4th Meditation which makes me 'a middle term between 
God and nothingness'. But if nothingness is without properties, as 
the 5th Meditation leads one to understand, and as Malebranchc 
asserts, if it is nothing, this definition of the human subject is merely 
a manner of speaking and the finite has nothing positive about it. 
In order to see in reflection a creative deed, a reconstituting of 
past thought not prefigured in that past thought, yet specifying 
it perfectly validly — because only thus have we any idea of it, 
because the past in itself is for us as if it had never been — it would 
have been necessary to develop an intuition of time to which the 
Meditations contain only a brief allusion. 'Let who will deceive me, 
the fact remains that he cannot cause me to be nothing when I think 
I am something; or cause it to be true one day that I have never existed, 
since it is true that I now exist' 1 The experience of the present is that 
of a being assured of his existence once and for all, whom nothing 
could ever prevent from having been. In the certitude of the present, 
there is an intention which outruns the presentness of the present, 
which posits it in advance as an indubitable 'former present' in the 
series of recollections, and perception as knowledge of the present is 
the central phenomenon which makes possible the unity of the ego 
and with it the ideas of objectivity and truth. But in the text it is 
given merely as one of those self-evidences which are irresistible only 
de facto, and which remain in doubt. 2 The Cartesian solution is 
therefore not to accept as a guarantee of itself human thought in its 
factual reality, but to base it on a thought which possesses itself 
absolutely. The connection between essence and existence is not 
found in experience, but in the idea of the infinite. It is, then, true 
in the last resort that analytical reflection entirely rests on a dogmatic 
idea of being, and that in this sense it does not amount to an act of 
self-discovery. 3 

. 1 3rd Meditation, AT, IX, p. 28. 
* On the same footing as 2 and 3 make 5. Ibid. 

3 Following its own line, analytical reflection does not bring us back to authen- 
tic subjectivity; it conceals from us the vital node of perceptual consciousness 

44 



'attention' and 'judgement* 



When intellectualism took over the naturalistic notion of sensa- 
tion, a whole philosophy was implied in the step. Conversely, now 
that psychology finally discards this notion, we can look forward, in 
consequence, to the beginning of a new type of reflection. On the 



because it looks for the conditions in which absolutely determinate being is 
possible, and is dazzled by the theological view, falsely regarded as self-evident, 
that nothingness is nothing. The philosophers who practised this method, how- 
ever, have always felt that it was necessary to search beneath absolute conscious- 
ness. We have just seen that this is so in the case of Descartes. One could show it 
equally with Lagneau and Alain. 

Analytical reflection carried to its limit should leave on the subject's side only 
a universal creative force for which the system of experience exists, including my 
body and my empirical self, linked to the world by the laws of physics and psycho- 
physiology. The sensation which we construct as the 'psychic' extension of the 
sensory stimuli obviously does not belong to the universal force and all idea of a 
genesis of mind is a hybrid idea, because it puts back into time the mind for which 
time exists, and confuses the two selves. Nevertheless, if we are this absolute mind, 
without a history, and if nothing stands between us and the true world, if the 
empirical self is constituted by the transcendental ego and set out before it, we 
ought to pierce its opacity, and it is not possible to see how error is possible, still 
less illusion — the 'abnormal perception' which no knowledge can conjure away. 
(Lagneau, Calibres Legons, pp. 161-2.) It can be said (ibid.) that illusion and per- 
ception in its entirety are on this side of both truth and error. This does not help 
us to solve the problem, since it then becomes one of knowing how a mind can 
be 'on this side of truth and error. When we feel (sentir), we do not perceive our 
sensation as object in a network of psycho-physiological relationships. We do not 
possess the truth of sensation. We are not confronted by the true world. 'It 
amounts to the same thing to say either that we are individuals or to say that in 
these individuals there is a sentient nature in which something happens which is 
not a result of the action of the environment. If everything in our sentient nature 
were subject to necessity, if there were for us a manner of feeling which was the 
true one, if at every moment our manner of feeling were produced by the external 
world, we should not feel at all.' (Celebres Lecons> p. 164.) Thus feeling does not 
belong to the order of the constituted, nor does the ego find this order set out 
before it, it escapes from its gaze, it is as it were piled up behind it and produces a 
kind of thickness or opacity which makes error possible, it marks out an area of 
subjectivity or solitude, it represents for us what is interior to* the mind, evokes 
the latter's birth and calls for a more searching analysis capable of elucidating 
'the genealogy of logic*. The mind is conscious of itself as 'based' on this nature. 
There is therefore a dialectic of the naturata and of the naturans y of perception and 
judgement, in the course of which their relationship is reversed. 

The same tendency is to be found in Alain in the analysis of perception. One 
realizes that a tree always looks bigger than a man, even if it is at a distance and 
the man near. I am tempted to say that 'Here again a judgement enlarges the 
object. But let us look more closely. The object is unchanged because an object in 
itself has no size; size is always relative, and so the size of these objects and of all 
objects forms an indivisible whole and one truly without parts. Sizes must be 
judged together. From which it is seen that one must not confuse material things, 
always separate and made up of mutually external parts, and the thought of these 
things, in which no division can be admitted. However obscure this distinction 
may be now, and however difficult it must always remain to conceive it, let us keep 

45 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 



psychological level, the criticism of the 'constancy hypothesis' means 
merely that the judgement is abandoned as an explanatory factor 
in the theory of perception. How can we pretend that the perception 
of distance is a conclusion reached from the apparent size of objects, 
from the disparity between retinal images, from the adjustment of 
the crystalline lens, from the varying convergence of the eyes; or 
that the perception of relief is a conclusion drawn from the difference 
between the images furnished respectively by the left and right eyes, 
since, if we stick to pehnomena, none of these 'signs' is clearly given 
to consciousness, and since there could be no reasoning where the 
premises are lacking? But this criticism of intellectualism only 
affects its popularization by psychologists. And, like intellectualism 
itself, it has to be transferred to the level of reflection, where the 
philosopher is no longer trying to explain perception, but to coincide 
with and understand the perceptual process. Here the criticism of the 
constancy hypothesis reveals that perception is not an act of under- 
standing. I have only to look at a landscape upside down to recog- 
nize nothing in it. Now 'top' and 'bottom' have only a relative mean- 
ing for the understanding, which can hardly regard the orientation 
of the landscape as an absolute obstacle. For the understanding a 
square is always a square, whether it stands on a side or an angle. 
For perception it is in the second case hardly recognizable. The 
Paradox of symmetrical objects contrasted the originality of per- 
ceptual experience with logicism. This idea has to be taken up and 
generalized: there is a significance of the percept which has no 

it in mind. In a sense, considered materially, things are divided into parts of which 
one is not another; but in another sense, considered as thoughts, perceptions of 
things are indivisible and without parts.' (Quatre-vingt-un chapitres surV Esprit et 
les Passions, p. 18.) But then an inspection of the mind which surveyed them and 
established one in virtue of the other would not be true subjectivity and would 
borrow too much from things considered as in themselves. Perception does not 
draw conclusions about the size of the tree from that of the man, or about the 
man's size from the tree's, nor either from the meaning of the two objects; it does 
all these things at once : the size of the tree, that of the man, and their significance 
as tree and man, with the result that each element agrees with all the others and 
composes with them a landscape in which all co-exist. Thus do we broach the 
analysis of what makes size possible, and more generally the relations or proper- 
tics of the predicative order, and we broach that subjectivity 'prior to all geo- 
metry' which Alain nevertheless declared unknowable. (Ibid., p. 29.) Analytical 
reflection becomes more strictly conscious of itself as analysis. It becomes aware 
that it had left behind its object, perception. It recognizes behind the judgement 
which it had brought into evidence, a deeper function than judgement which 
makes judgement possible; it rediscovers, before arriving at things, phenomena. 
This is the function envisaged by psychologists when they talk about a Gestaltung 
of the landscape. It is to the description of phenomena that they redirect the 
philosopher, by separating them rigidly from the constituted objective world, and 
they do it in terms which are almost identical with Alain's. 



46 



'attention' and 'judgement' 



equivalent in the universe of the understanding, a perceptual domain 
which is not yet the objective world, a perceptual being which is not 
yet determinate being. However, the psychologists who practise the 
description of phenomena are not normally aware of the philo- 
sophical implications of their method. They do net see that the return 
to perceptual experience, in so far as it is a consequential and radical 
reform, puts out of court all forms of realism, that is to say, all 
philosophies which leave consciousness and take as given one 
of its results — that the real sin of intellectualism lies precisely in 
having taken as given the determinate universe of science, that 
this reproach applies a fortiori to psychological thinking, since it 
places perceptual consciousness in the midst of a ready-made world, 
and that the attack on the constancy hypothesis carried to its logical 
conclusion assumes the value of a genuine 'phenomenological 
reduction'. 1 Gestalt theory has clearly shown that the alleged signs 
of distance — the apparent size of the object, the number of objects 
interposed between it and us, the disparity of retinal images, the 
degree of adjustment and convergence — are expressly known only in 
an analytic or reflective perception which turns away from the object 
to its mode of presentation, and that we do not go through these 
stages in knowing distances. Nevertheless, it goes on to conclude 
that, not being signs or reasons in our perception of distance, bodily 
impressions or the interposed objects in the field can only be causes 
of this perception. 2 So we are back in an explanatory psychology, 
the ideal of which has never been abandoned by Gestalt psychology, 3 
because, as psychology, it has never broken with naturalism. But 
by this very fact it betrays its own descriptions. A subject whose 
oculo-motor muscles are paralysed sees objects moving to his left 
while he believes that he is himself turning his eyes towards the left. 
This, classical psychology maintains, is because perception reasons: 
the eye is supposed to swing to the left, and since nevertheless the 
retinal images have not moved, the view must have slipped leftwards 
to have kept them in place in the eye. Gestalt theory informs us that 
the perception of the position of objects does not pass through the 
detour of an express body-consciousness: at no moment do I know 
that the images remain stationary on the retina; I see directly the 
landscape move to the left. But consciousness is not confined to 
receiving ready-made an illusory phenomenon produced outside it- 
self by physiological causes. For the illusion to be produced, the 

1 See A. Gurwitsh, Review of Nachwort zu meiner Ideen of Husseri, pp. 401 
and ff. 

2 Cf. for example P. Guillaume, Trait 4 de Psychologies Coap. IX, La Perception 
de VEspace, p. 151. 

3 Cf. La Structure du Comportement, p. 178. 

47 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 



subject must have intended to look to the left and must have thought 
he moved his eye. The illusion regarding the subjects' body entails 
the appearance of movement in the object. The movements of his 
body are naturally invested with a certain perceptual significance, 
and form, with the external phenomena, such a well articulated sys- 
tem that external perception 'takes account' of the movement of the 
organs of perception, finding in them if not the express explanation, 
at least the motive for the changes brought about in the spectacle, 
and can thus understand them instantly. When I intend to look 
left, this movement of the eye carries within it as its natural trans- 
lation an oscillation of the visual field: the objects remain in place, 
but after a moment's fluctuation. This consequence is not learnt 
but is one of the natural formations of the psychosomatic subject. 
It is, as we shall see, an annex of our 'bodily schema', the im- 
manent meaning of a shift of 'gaze'. When it stops short of such a 
change, when we are conscious of moving our eyes without the 
view's being affected, the phenomenon is translated, without any 
express deduction, by an apparent shift cf the object leftwards. 
The gaze and the landscape remain as it were glued together, no 
quiver dissociates them, and the gaze, in its illusory movement, 
carries with it the landscape, and the latter's sideslip is funda- 
mentally nothing but its fixity in a gaze which we think is moving. 
Thus the immobility of images on the retina and the paralysis of 
the oculo-motor muscles are not objective causes which produce the 
illusion and carry it ready-made into consciousness. Nor are the in- 
tention to move the eye and the landscape's passivity in relation to 
this impulse premises or reasons for the illusion. But they are the 
motives (motifs). In the same way, the objects interposed between me 
and the thing upon which I fix my eyes are not perceived for them- 
selves; they are nevertheless perceived, and we have no reason for 
refusing to recognize that this marginal perception plays a part in see- 
ing distance, since, when the intervening objects are hidden by a 
screen, the distance appears to shrink. The objects filling up the field 
do not act on the apparent distance in the relation of cause to effect. 
When the screen is removed, we see remoteness born of the interven- 
ing objects. This is the silent language whereby perception com- 
municates with us: interposed objects, in the natural context, 'mean' 
a greater distance. It is not, however, a question of a connection 
recognized by objective logic, the logic of constituted truth: for there 
is no reason why a steeple should appear to me to be smaller and 
farther away when I am better able to see in detail the slopes and 
fields between me and it. There is no reason, but there is a motive. It 
is precisely Gestalt psychology which has brought home to us the 
tensions which run like lines of force across the visual field and the 



48 



Attention* and 'judgement' 

system: own body-world, and which breathe into it a secret and 
magic life by exerting here and there forces of distortion, con- 
traction and expansion. The disparity between retinal images, 
and the number of intermediate objects do not act either as mere 
objective causes producing from outside my perception of distance, 
or as demonstrative reasons for it. They are tacitly known to per- 
ception in an obscure form, and they validate it by a wordless 
logic. But what Gestalt psychology lacks for the adequate expres- 
sion of these perceptual relationships is a set of new categories: 
it has admitted the principle, and applied it to a few individual 
cases, but without realizing that a complete reform of understand- 
ing is called for if we are to translate phenomena accurately; 
and that to this end the objective thinking of classical logic and 
philosophy will have to be questioned, the categories of the 
world laid aside, the alleged self-evidence of realism placed in 
doubt, in the Cartesian sense, and a true 'phenomenological reduc- 
tion' undertaken. Objective thought, as applied to the universe and 
not to phenomena, knows only alternative notions; starting from 
actual experience, it defines pure concepts which are mutually 
exclusive: the notion of extension, which is that of an absolute 
externality of one part to another, and the notion of thought which 
is that of a being wrapped up in himself; the notion of the vocal sign 
as a physical phenomenon arbitrarily linked to certain thoughts, and 
that of meaning as a thought entirely clear to itself ; the notion of 
cause as a determining factor external to its effect, and that of reason 
as a law of intrinsic constitution of the phenomenon. Now, as we 
have seen, the perception of our own body and the perception of 
external things provide an example of non-positing consciousness, 
that is, of consciousness not in possession of fully determinate 
objects, that of a logic lived through which cannot account for itself, 
and that of an immanent meaning which is not clear to itself and be- 
comes fully aware of itself only through experiencing certain natural 
signs. These phenomena cannot be assimilated by objective thought, 
and that is why Gestalt psychology which, like all psychology, is 
imprisoned within the 'self-evident truths' of science and of the 
world, can choose only between reason and cause, and that is why 
any criticism of intellectualism which it undertakes ends with the 
rehabilitation of realism and causal thinking. On the other hand, 
the phenomenological notion of motivation is one of those 'fluid' 1 
1 *fiieszende\ Husserl, Erfahrung und Urteil % p. 428. It was nol umil his lasl 
period that Husserl himself became fully aware of what the return to phenomena 
meant, and tacitly broke with the philosophy of essences. He was in this way 
merely explicitly laying down analytic procedures which he had long been apply- 
ing, as is precisely shown by the notion of motivation to be found already in the 
Itieen. 

49 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

concepts which have to be formed if we want to get back to pheno- 
mena. One phenomenon releases another, not by means of some 
objective efficient cause, like those which link together natural events, 
but by the meaning which it holds out — there is a raison d'etre for a 
thing which guides the flow of phenomena without being explicitly 
laid down in any one of t-hem, a sort of operative reason. Thus 
the intention to look to the left and the fact that the landscape 
remains stubbornly fixed in one's gaze bring about the illusion of 
movement in the object. To the degree that the motivated pheno- 
menon comes into being, an internal relation to the motivating 
phenomenon appears; hence, instead of the one merely succeeding 
the other, the motivated phenomenon makes the motivating pheno- 
menon explicit and comprehensible, and thus seems to have pre- 
existed its own motive. Thus the object at a distance and its physical 
projection on the retinas explain the disparity of images, and, 
through a retrospective illusion, we speak with Malebranche about 
a natural geometry of perception. We place beforehand within 
perception a science constructed upon it, and we lose sight of the 
original relationship of motivation, in which distance springs into 
existence ahead of any science, not from a judgement of 'the two 
images', for these are not numerically distinct, but from the pheno- 
menon of the Tog', from the forces which reside in this rough out- 
line, which are trying to come to rest and which lead it to the most 
determinate form possible. To a Cartesian doctrine, these descrip- 
tions will never have any philosophic importance: they will be 
treated as allusions to unreflective states of mind, which, by their 
nature, can never become articulate and which, like any form of 
psychology, are without truth in the eyes of the understanding. In 
order to admit them completely, it would be necessary to show that 
in no case can consciousness entirely cease to be what it is in per- 
ception, that is, a fact, and that it cannot take full possession of its 
operations. The recognition of phenomena, then, implies a theory 
of reflection and a new cogito. 1 

1 See below, Part III. Gestalt psychology has adopted a kind of reflection the 
theory of which is furnished by HusserPs phenomenology. Are we wrong to dis- 
cern a whole philosophy implicit in the criticism of the 'constancy hypothesis*? 
Although we are not here concerned with history, it may be pointed out that the 
affinity of Gesialt psychology and phenomenology is equally attested by external 
similarities. It is no chance occurrence that Kohler should propose, as the task of 
psychology, 'phenomenological description' (Ober unbemerkte Empfindungen und 
Urteiktauschungen, p. 70). Or that KofTka, a former disciple of Husscrl, should 
trace the leading ideas of his psychology back to this influence, and try to show 
that the attack on psychologism leaves Gestalt psychology untouched {Principles 
of Gestalt Psychology, pp. 614-83), the Gestalt being, not a mental event of the 
type of an impression, but a whole which develops a law of internal coherence, 

50 



'attention' and Judgement' 



Or that finally Husserl, in his last period, still further away from logicism, which 
he had moreover attacked along with psychologism, should have taken up the 
notion of 'configuration* and even of Gestalt (cf. Die Krisis der europaischen 
Wissenschaften und die transzendentale Phanomenologie y I, pp. 106, 109). What is 
true is that the reaction against naturalism and against causal thinking is, in 
Gestalt psychology, neither consequential, nor radical, as can be seen from the 
naive realism of its theory of knowledge (cf. La Structure du Comportement, p. 
180). Gestalt psychology cannot see that psychological atomism is only one par- 
ticular case of a more general prejudice; the prejudice of determinate being or of 
the world, and that is why it forgets its most valid descriptions when it tries to 
provide itself with a theoretical framework. It is unexceptionable only ir. the 
middle regions of reflection. When it tries to reflect on its own analysis, it treats 
consciousness, despite its principles, as a collection of 'forms'. This is enough to 
justify Husserl's criticisms expressly directed against formalism, but applicable 
to all psychology (Nachwort zu meiner Ideen, pp. 564 and fT.) at a time when he 
was still distinguishing fact and essence, when he had not yet arrived at the idea 
of historical constitution, and when, consequently, he was stressing the break, 
rather than the parallelism, between psychology and phenomenology. We have 
quoted elsewhere {La Structure du Comporte merit, p. 280) a text of E. Fink 
restoring the balance. As for the fundamental question, which is that of the trans- 
cendental attitude in relation to the natural attitude, it will not be possible to 
settle it until we reach the last part of this work, where we shall examine the 
transcendental meaning of time. 



51 



4 

THE PHENOMENAL FIELD 



IT will now be seen in what direction the following chapters will 
carry their inquiry. 'Sense experience'* has become once more a 
question for us. Empiricism had emptied it of all mystery by bringing 
it down to the possession of a quality. This had been possible only at 
the price of moving far from the ordinary acceptation of the word. 
Between sense experience and knowing, common experience estab- 
lishes a difference which is not that between the quality and the 
concept. This rich notion of sense experience is still to be found in 
Romantic usage, for example in Herder. It points to an experience in 
which we are given not 'dead* qualities, but active ones. A wooden 
wheel placed on the ground is not, for sight, the same thing as a 
wheel bearing a load. A body at rest because no force is being 
exerted upon it is again for sight not the same thing as a body in 
which opposing forces are in equilibrium. 1 The light of a candle 
changes its appearance for a child when, after a burn, it stops 
attracting the child's hand and becomes literally repulsive. 2 The 
vision is already inhabited by a significance which gives it a function 
in the spectacle of the world and in our existence. The pure quale 
would be given to us only if the world were a spectacle and one's 
own body a mechanism with which some impartial mind made itself 
acquainted. 3 Sense experience, on the other hand, invests the quality 
with vital value, grasping it first in its meaning for us, for that heavy 
mass which is our body, whence it comes about that it always in- 
volves a reference to the body. The problem is to understand these 
strange relationships which are woven between the parts of the 
landscape, or between it and me as incarnate subject, and through 
which an object perceived can concentrate in itself a whole scene or 
become the imago of a whole segment of life. Sense experience is that 
vital communication with the world which makes it present as a 

* The original French word is 4 le sentir' (Translator's note). 

1 KofTka, Perception, an Introduction to the Gestalt Theory, pp. 558-9. 

2 Id., Mental Development, p. 138. 

3 Schclcr, Die Wissenformen mid die Gesellschaft, p. 408. 

52 



THF PTIFNOMfNA I, TITLD 



familiar setting of our life. It is to it that the perceived object and the 
perceiving subject owe their thickness. It is the intentional tissue 
which the effort to know will try to take apart. With the problem of 
sense experience, we rediscover that of association and passivity. 
They have ceased to be problematical because the classical philo- 
sophies put themselves either below or above them, giving them 
everything or nothing: sometimes association was understood as a 
mere de facto co-existence, sometimes derived from an intellectual 
construction; sometimes passivity was imported from things into the 
mind, and sometimes analytical reflection would find in it an activity 
of understanding. Whereas these notions take on their full meaning 
if sense experience is distinguished from quality: then association, or 
rather 'affinity', in the Kantian sense, is the central phenomenon of 
perceptual life, since it is the constitution, without any ideal model, 
of a significant grouping. The distinction between the perceptual life 
and the concept, between passivity and spontaneity is no longer 
abolished by analytical reflection, since we are no longer forced by 
the atomism of sensation to look to some connecting activity for our 
principle of all co-ordination. Finally, after sense experience, under- 
standing also needs to be redefined, since the general connective 
function ultimately attributed to it by Kantianism is now spread over 
the whole intentional life and no longer suffices to distinguish it. We 
shall try to bring out in relation to perception, both the instinctive sub- 
structure and the superstructures erected upon it by the exercise of 
intelligence. As Cassirer puts it, by mutilating perception from above, 
empiricism mutilated it from below too : 1 the impression is as devoid of 
instinctive and affective meaning as of ideal significance. One might 
add that mutilating perception from below, treating it immediately as 
knowledge and forgetting its existential content, amounts to mutilating 
it from above, since it involves taking for granted and passing over 
in silence the decisive moment in perception : the upsurge of a true 
and accurate world. Reflection will be sure of having precisely located 
the centre of the phenomenon if it is equally capable of bringing to 
light its vital inherence and its rational intention. 

So, 'sensation' and 'judgement' have together lost their apparent 
clearness: we have observed that they were clear only as long as the 
prejudice in favour of the world was maintained. As soon as one 
tried by means of them, to picture consciousness in the process of 
perceiving, to revive the forgotten perceptual experience, and to 
relate them to it, they were found to be inconceivable. By dint of 
making these difficulties more explicit, we were drawn implicitly into 
a new kind of analysis, into a new dimension in which they were 

1 Cassirer, Philosophic der symbolischen Formen, T. Ill, Phanomenologie der 
Erkenntnis, pp. 77-8. 

53 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

destined to disappear. The criticism of the constancy hypothesis 
and more generally the reduction of the idea of 'the world' opened up 
a phenomenal field which now has to be more accurately circum- 
scribed, and suggested the rediscovery of a direct experience which 
must be, at least provisionally, assigned its place in relation to 
scientific knowledge, psychological and philosophical reflection. 

Science and philosophy have for centuries been sustained by un- 
questioning faith in perception. Perception opens a window on to 
things. This means that it is directed, quasi-teleologically, towards a 
truth in itself \n which the reason underlying all appearances is to be 
found. The tacit thesis of perception is that at every instant ex- 
perience can be co-ordinated with that of the previous instant and 
that of the following, and my perspective with that of other con- 
sciousnesses — that all contradictions can be removed, that monadic 
and intersubjective experience is one unbroken text — that what is 
now indeterminate for me could become determinate for a more 
complete knowledge, which is as it were realized in advance in the 
thing, or rather which is the thing itself. Science has first been merely 
the sequel or amplification of the process which constitutes per- 
ceived things. Just as the thing is the invariant of all sensory fields 
and of all individual perceptual fields, so the scientific; concept is the 
means of fixing and objectifying phenomena. Science defined a 
theoretical state of bodies not subject to the action of any force, and 
ipso facto defined force, reconstituting with the aid of these ideal 
components the processes actually observed. It established statistic- 
ally the chemical properties of pure bodies, deducing from these 
those of empirical bodies, and seeming thus to hold the plan of 
creation or in any case to have found a reason immanent in the 
world. The notion of geometrical space, indifferent to its contents, 
that of pure movement which does not by itself affect the properties 
of the object, provided phenomena with a setting of inert existence 
in which each event could be related to physical conditions respon- 
sible for the changes occurring, and therefore contributed to this 
freezing of being which appeared to be the task of physics. In thus 
developing the concept of the thing, scientific knowledge was not 
aware that it was working on a presupposition. Precisely because 
perception, in its vital implications and prior to any theoretical 
thought, is presented as perception of a being, it was not considered 
necessary for reflection to undertake a genealogy of being, and it was 
therefore confined to seeking the conditions which make being 
possible. Even if one took account of the transformations of deter- 
minant consciousness, 1 even if it were conceded that the constitution 
of the object is never completed, there was nothing to add to what 
1 As L. Brunschvicg does. 
54 



THE PHENOMENAL FIELD 

science said of it; the natural object remained an ideal unity for us 
and, in the famous words of Lachelier, a network of general pro- 
perties. It was no use denying any ontological value to the principles 
of science and leaving them with only a methodical value, 1 for this 
reservation made no essential change as far as philosophy was con- 
cerned, since the sole conceivable being remained defined by scientific 
method. The living body, under these circumstances, could not 
escape the determinations which alone made the object into an 
object and without which it would have had no place in the system of 
experience. The value predicates which the reflecting judgement 
confers upon it had to be sustained, in being, by a foundation of 
physico-chemical properties. In ordinary experience we find a 
fittingness and a meaningful relationship between the gesture, the 
smile and the tone of a speaker. But this reciprocal relationship of 
expression which presents the human body as the outward mani- 
festation of a certain manner of being-in-the-world, had, for mechan- 
istic physiology, to be resolved into a series of causal relations. 

It was necessary to link to centripetal conditions the centrifugal 
phenomenon of expression, reduce to third person processes that 
particular way of dealing with the world which we know as be- 
haviour, bring experience down to the level of physical nature and 
convert the living body into an interiorless thing. The emotional 
and practical attitudes of the living subject in relation to the world 
were, then, incorporated into a psycho-physiological mechanism. 
Every evaluation had to be the outcome of a transfer whereby com- 
plex situations became capable of awakening elementary impressions 
of pleasure and pain, impressions bound up, in turn, with nervous 
processes. The impelling intentions of the living creature were con- 
verted into objective movements: to the will only an instantaneous 
fiat was allowed, the execution of the act being entirely given over to 
a nervous mechanism. Sense experience, thus detached from the 
affective and motor functions, became the mere reception of a 
quality, and physiologists thought they could follow, from the 
point of reception to the nervous centres, the projection of the 
external world in the living body. The latter, thus transformed, 
ceased to be my body, the visible expression of a concrete Ego, and 
became one object among all others. Conversely, the body of another 
person could not appear to me as encasing another Ego. It was 
merely a machine, and the perception of the other could not really be 
of the other, since it resulted from an inference and therefore placed 
behind the automaton no more than a consciousness in general, a 
transcendent cause and not an inhabitant of his movements. So we 
no longer had a grouping of factors constituting the self co-existing 

1 Cf. for example, V Experience hnmaine et la Causal ite physique y p. 536. 

55 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

in a world. The whqle concrete content of 'psychic states' resulting, 
according to the laws of psychophysiology and psychology, from a 
universal determinism, was integrated into the in-itself. There was no 
longer any real for-itself other than the thought of the scientist 
which perceives the system and which alone ceases to occupy any 
place i n it. j Thus,' while the living body became an exterior without 
'interior, subjectivity became an interior without exterior, an im- 
partial spec tator. The naturalism of science and the spiritualism of 
the universal constituting subject, to which reflection on science led, 
had this in common, that they levelled out experience: in face of the 
constituting I, the empirical selves are objects. The empirical Self is 
a hybrid notion, a mixture of in-itself and for-itself, to which reflec- 
tive philosophy could give no status. In so far as it has a concrete 
content it is inserted in the system of experience and is therefore not 
a subject; in'so far as it is a subject, it is empty and resolves itself 
into the transcendental subject. The ideality of the object, the 
objectification of the living body, the placing of spirit in an axio- 
logical dimension having no common measure with nature, such is 
the transparent philosophy arrived at by pushing further along the 
route of knowledge opened up by perception. It could be held that 
perception is an incipient science, science a methodical and com- 
plete perception, 1 since science was merely following uncritically the 
ideal of knowledge set up by the perceived thing. 

Now this philosophy is collapsing before our eyes. The natural 
object was the first to disappear and physics has itself recognized the 
limits of its categories by demanding a recasting and blending of the 
pure concepts which it had adopted. For its part the organism 
presents physico-chemical analysis not with the practical difficulties 
of a complex object, but with the theoretical difficulty of a meaningful 
being. 2 In more general terras the idea of a universe of thought or a 
universe of values, in which all thinking lives come into contact and 
arc reconciled, is called into question. Nature is not in itself geo- 
metrical, and it appears so only to a careful observer who contents 
himself with macrocosmic data. Human society is not a community 
of reasonable minds, and only in fortunate countries where a bio- 
logical and economic balance has locally and temporarily been 
' truck has such a conception of it been possible. The experience of 
haos, both on the speculative and the other level, prompts us to sec 
itionalism in a historical perspective which it set itself on principle 
) avoid, to seek a philosophy which explains the upsurge of reason 
i a world not of its making and to prepare the substructure of 

1 Cf. for example Alain, Quatre-vitigt-un chapitres sur V Esprit et les Passions^ 
). 19, and Brunschvicg, IS Experience humaine et la cousalite physique \ p. 468. 

2 Cf. La Structure du Comportement, and below, First Part. 

56 



THE PHENOMENAL FIELD 

living experience without which reason and liberty are emptied of 
their content and wither away. We shall no longer hold that per- 
ception is incipient science, but conversely that classical science is a 
form of perception which loses sight of its origins and believes itself 
complete. The first philosophical act would appear to be to return to 
the world of actual experience which is prior to the objective world, 
since it is in it that we shall be able to grasp the theoretical basis no 
less than the limits of that objective world, restore to things their 
concrete physiognomy, to organisms their individual ways of dealing 
with the world, and to subjectivity its inherence in history. Our task 
will be, moreover, to rediscover phenomena, the layer of living 
experience through which other people and things are first given to 
us, the system 'Self-others-things' as it comes into being; to re- 
awaken perception and foil its trick of allowing us to forget it as a 
fact and as perception in the interest of the object which it presents 
to us and of the rational tradition to which it gives rise. 

This phenomenal field is not an 'inner world', the 'phenomenon' is 
not a 'state of consciousness', or a 'mental fact', and the experience 
of phenomena is not an act of introspection or an intuition in 
Bergson's sense. It has long been the practice to define the object of 
psychology by saying that it was 'without extension' and 'accessible 
to one person only', with the result that this peculiar object could be 
grasped only by means of a special kind of act, 'internal perception' 
or introspection, in which subject and object were mingled and 
knowledge achieved by an act of coinciding. The return to the 
'immediate data of consciousness' became therefore a hopeless 
enterprise since the philosophical scrutiny was trying to be what it 
could not, in principle, see. The difficulty was not only to destroy 
the prejudice of the exterior, as all philosophies urge the beginner to 
do, or to describe the mind in a language made for representing 
things. It was much more fundamental, since intcriority, defined by 
the impression, by its nature evaded every attempt to express it. It 
was not only the imparting of philosophical intuitions to others 
which became difficult — or rather reduced itself to a sort of incanta- 
tion designed to induce in them experiences comparable to the 
philosopher's — but the philosopher himself could not be clearly 
aware of what he saw in the instant, since he would have had to think 
it, that is fix and distort it. The immediate was therefore a lonely, 
blind and mute life. The return to the phenomenal presents none of 
these peculiarities. The sensible configuration of an object or a 
gesture, which the criticism of the constancy hypothesis brings 
before our eyes, is not grasped in some inexpressible coincidence, it 
'is understood' through a sort of act of appropriation which we all 
experience when we say that we have 'found' the rabbit in the foliage 

57 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 



of a puzzle, or that we have 'caught' a slight gesture. Once the pre- 
judice of sensation has been banished, a face, a signature, a form of 
behaviour cease to be mere 'visual data' whose psychological mean- 
ing is to be sought in our inner experience, and the mental life of 
others becomes an immediate object, a whole charged with immanent 
meaning. More generally it is the very notion of the immediate which 
is transformed: henceforth the immediate is no longer the im- 
pression, the object which is one with the subject, but the meaning, 
the structure, the spontaneous arrangement of parts. My own 
"mental life' is given to me in precisely the same way, since the 
criticism of the constancy hypothesis teaches me to recognize the 
articulation and melodic unity of my behaviour as original data of 
inner experience, and since introspection, when brought down to its 
positive content, consists equally in making the immanent meaning 
of any behaviour explicit. 1 Thus what we discover by going beyond 
the prejudice of the objective world is not an occult inner world. 
Nor is this world of living experience completely closed to naive 
consciousness, as is Bergson's interiority. In criticizing the constancy 
hypothesis and in laying bare phenomena, the psychologist, it is 
true, runs counter to the natural direction of the process of knowing, 
which goes blindly through the operations of perception straight on 
to their teleological results. Nothing is more difficult than to know 
precisely what we see. 'There is in natural intuition a sort of "crypto- 
mechanism" which we have to break in order to reach phenomenal 
being' 2 or again a dialectic whereby perception hides itself from 
itself. But although it is of the essence of consciousness to forget its 
own phenomena thus enabling 'things' to be constituted, this forget- 
fulness is not mere absence, it is the absence of something which 
consciousness could bring into its presence: in other words con- 
sciousness can forget phenomena only because it can recall them, it 
neglects them in favour of things only because they are the cradle of 
things. For example they are never completely unknown to scientific 
consciousness, which borrows all its rriodels from the structures 
of living experience; it simply does not 'thematize' them, or make 
explicit the horizons of perceptual consciousness surrounding it 
to whose concrete relationships it tries to give objective expression. 
Experience of phenomena is not, then, like Bergsonian intuition, 
that of a reality of which we are ignorant and leading to which 
there is no methodical bridge — it is the making explicit or bring- 
ing to light of the prescientific life of consciousness which alone 

1 We shall, consequently, in (he following chapters, resort indifferently to the 
internal experience of our perception and lo the 'external' experience of per- 
ceivfng subjects. 

2 Schcler, Idole der Selbsterkenntrds, p. 106. 

58 



THE PHENOMENAL FIELD 

endows scientific operations with meaning and to which these latter 
always refer back. It is not an irrational conversion, but an inten- 
tional analysis. 

If, as we see, phenomenological psychology is distinguished in all 
its characteristics from introspective psychology, it is because' it is 
different in basic principle. Introspective psychology detected, on the 
perimeter of the physical world, a zone of consciousness in which 
physical concepts are no longer valid, but the psychologist still 
believed consciousness to be no more than a sector of being, and he 
decided to explore this sector as the physicist explores his. He tried to 
describe the givens of consciousness but without putting into question 
the absolute existence of the world surrounding it. In company with 
the scientist and common sense, he presupposed the objective world 
as the logical framework of all his descriptions, and as the setting of 
his thought. He was unaware that this presupposition dominated the 
meaning given to the word 'being', forcing it to bring consciousness 
into existence under the name of 'psychic fact', and thus diverting it 
from a true grasp of consciousness or from truly immediate ex- 
perience, and stultifying the many precautions taken to avoid dis- 
torting the 'interior'. This is what happened to empiricism when it 
replaced the physical world by a world of inner events. It is again 
what happens to Bergson precisely when he contrasts 'multiplicity of 
fusion' and 'multiplicity of juxtaposition'. For it is here still a ques- 
tion of two modes of being. All that has happened is that mechanical 
energy has been replaced by spiritual, the discontinuous being of 
empiricism by being of a fluid kind, but of which we can say that it 
flows, describing it in the third person. By taking the Gestalt as the 
theme of his reflection, the psychologist breaks with psychologism, 
since the meaning, connection and 'truth' of the percept no longer 
arise from the fortuitous coming together of our sensations as they 
are given to us by our psycho-physiological nature, but determine the 
spatial and qualitative values of these sensations, and are their 
irreducible configuration. 1 It follows that the transcendental atti- 
tude is already implied in the descriptions of the psychologist, in so 
far as they are faithful ones. Consciousness as an object of study 
presents the peculiarity of not being analysable, even naively, with- 
out carrying us beyond common sense postulates. If, for example, 
we set out to create a positive psychology of perception, while still 
allowing consciousness to be enclosed in the body, and through it 
suffer the action of a world in itself, we are led to describe the 
object and the world as they appear to consciousness, and in this 
way to inquire whether this immediately present world, the only one 
we know, may not also be the only one of which there is reason to 
1 Cf. La Structure du Comportement, pp. 106-19 and 261. 
59 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

speak. A psychology is always brought face to face with the problem 
of the constitution of the world. 

Psychological reflection, once begun, then, outruns itself through 
its own momentum. Having recognized the originality of phenomena 
in relation to the objective world, since it is through them that the 
objective world is known to 'us, it is led to integrate with them every 
possible object and to try to find out how that object is constituted 
through them. At the same time the phenomenal field becomes a 
transcendental field. Since it is now the universal focus of knowledge, 
consciousness definitely ceases to be a particular region of being, a 
certain collection of 'mental' contents; it no longer resides or is no 
longer confined within the domain of 'forms' which psychological 
reflection had first recognized, but the forms, like all things, exist 
for it. It can no longer be a question of describing the world of 
living experience which it carries within itself like some opaque 
datum, it has to be constituted. The process of making explicit, which 
had laid bare the 'lived-through' world which is prior to the objective 
one, is put into operation upon the 'lived-through* world itself, thus 
revealing, prior to the phenomenal field, the transcendental field. 
The system 'self-others-world' is in its turn taken as an object of 
analysis and it is now a matter of awakening the thoughts which 
constitute other people, myself as individual subject and the world 
as a pole of my perception. This new 'reduction' would then 
recognize only one true subject, the thinking Ego. This move from 
naturata to naturans, from constituted to constituting, would 
complete the thematizing begun by psychology and would leave 
nothing implicit or tacitly accepted in my knowledge. It would 
enable me to take complete possession of my experience, thus 
equating thinking and thought. Such is the ordinary perspective of a 
transcendental philosophy, and also, to all appearances at least, the 
programme of a transcendental phenomenology. 1 Now the pheno- 
menal field as we have revealed it in this chapter, places a funda- 
mental difficulty in the way of any attempt to make experience 
directly and totally explicit. It is true that psychologism has been left 
behind, that the meaning and structure of the percept are for us no 
longer the mere outcome of psycho-physiological events, that 
rationality is no longer a fortunate accident bringing together dis- 
persed sensations, and that the Gestalt is recognized as primary. 
But although the Gestalt may be expressible in terms of some in- 
ternal law, this law must not be considered as a model on which the 
phenomena of structure are built up. Their appearance is not the 
external unfolding of a pre-existing reason. It is not because toe 

1 It is set forth in these terms in most of Husserl's works, even in those pub- 
lished during his last period. 

60 



THE PHENOMENAL FIELD 

'form' produces a certain state of equilibrium, solving a problem of 
maximum coherence and* in the Kantian sense, making a world 
possible, that it enjoys a privileged place in our perception; it is the 
very appearance of the world and not the condition of its possibility; 
it is the birth of a norm and is not realized according to a norm; it io 
the identity of the external and the internal and not the projection of 
the internal in the external. Although, then, it is not the outcome of 
some circulation of mental states in themselves, neither is it an idea. 
The Gestalt of a circle is not its mathematical law but its physio- 
gnomy. The recognition of phenomena as an original order is a 
condemnation of empiricism as an explanation of order and reason 
in terms of a coming together of facts and of natural accidents, but 
it leaves reason and order themselves with the character of facticity. 
If a universal constituting consciousness were possible, the opacity of 
the fact would disappear. If then we want reflection to maintain, in 
the object on which it bears, its descriptive characteristics, and 
thoroughly to understand that object, we must not consider it as a 
mere return to a universal reason and see it as anticipated in un- 
reflective experience, we must regard it as a creative operation which 
itself participates in the facticity of that experience. That is why 
phenomenology, alone of all philosophies, talks about a trans- 
cendental field. This word indicates that reflection never holds, 
arrayed and objectified before its gaze, the whole world and the 
plurality of monads, and that its view is never other than partial and 
of limited power. It is also why phenomenology is phenomenology, 
that is, a study of the advent of being to consciousness, instead of 
presuming its possibility as given in advance. It is striking how 
transcendental philosophies of the classical type never question the 
possibility of effecting the complete disclosure which they always 
assume done somewhere. It is enough for them that it should be 
necessary, and in this way they judge what is by what ought to be, by 
what the idea of knowledge requires. In fact, the thinking Ego can 
never abolish its inherence in an individual subject, which knows all 
things in a particular perspective. Reflection can never make me stop 
seeing the sun two hundred yards away on a misty day, or seeing it 
'rise' and 'set', or thinking with the cultural apparatus with which 
my education, my previous efforts, my personal history, have pro- 
vided me. I never actually collect together, or call up simultaneously, 
all the primary thoughts which contribute to my perception or 
to my present conviction. A critical philosophy attaches in the last 
analysis no importance to this resistance offered by passivity, as 
if it were not necessary to become the transcendental subject in 
order to have the right to affirm it. It tacitly assumes, consequently, 
that the philosopher's thinking is not conditioned by any situation. 

61 



TRADITIONAL PREJUDICES AND THE RETURN TO PHENOMENA 

Starting from the spectacle of the world, which is that of a nature 
open to a plurality of thinking subjects, it looks for the conditions 
which make possible this unique world presented to a number of 
empirical selves, and finds it in a transcendental ego in which they 
participate without dividing it up, because it is not a Being, but a 
Unity or a Value. This is why the problem of the knowledge of other 
people is never posed in Kantian philosophy: the transcendental 
ego which it discusses is just as much other people's as mine, analysis 
is from the start located outside me, and has nothing to do but to 
determine the general conditions which make possible a world for an 
ego — myself or others equally — and so it never comes up against the 
question: who is thinking? If on the other hand contemporary 
philosophy takes this as its main theme, and if other people become a 
problem for it, it is because it is trying to achieve a more radical 
self-discovery. Reflection cannot be thorough-going, or bring a 
complete elucidation of its object, if it does not arrive at awareness 
of itself as well as of its results. We must not only adopt a reflective 
attitude, in an impregnable Cogito, but furthermore reflect on this 
reflection, understand the natural situation which it is conscious of 
succeeding and which is therefore part of its definition; not merely 
practise philosophy, but realize the transformation which it brings 
with it in the spectacle of the world and in our existence. Only on this 
condition can philosophical knowledge become absolute knowledge, 
and cease to be a speciality or a technique. So there will be no asser- 
tion of an absolute Unity, all the less doubtful for not having to 
come into Being. The core of philosophy is no longer an autonomous 
transcendental subjectivity, to be found everywhere and nowhere: 
it lies in the perpetual beginning of reflection, at the point where an 
individual life begins to reflect on itself. Reflection is truly reflection 
only if it is not carried outside itself, only if it knows itself as reflec- 
tion-on-an-unreflective -experience, and consequently as a change in 
structure of our existence. We earlier attacked Bergsonian intuition- 
ism and introspection for seeking to know by coinciding. But at the 
opposite extremity of philosophy, in the notion of a universal con- 
stituting consciousness, we encounter an exactly corresponding 
mistake. Bergson's mistake consists in believing that the thinking 
subject can become fused with the object thought about, and that 
knowledge can swell and be incorporated into being. The mistake of 
reflective philosophies is to believe that the thinking subject can 
absorb into its thinking or appropriate without remainder the object 
of its thought, that our being can be brought down to our know- 
ledge. As thinking subject we are never the unreflective subject that 
we seek to know; but neither can we become wholly consciousness, 
or make ourselves into the transcendental consciousness. If we were 

62 



THE PHENOMENAL FIELD 

consciousness, we would have to have before us the world, our 
history and perceived objects in their uniqueness as systems of trans- 
parent relationships. Now even when we are not dealing with 
psychology^ when we try to comprehend, in direct reflection and 
without the help of the varied associations of inductive thought, what 
a perceived movement, or a circle, are, we can elucidate this singular 
fact only by varying it somewhat through the agency of imagination, 
and then fastening our thought upon the invariable element of this 
mental experience. We can get through to the individual only by the 
hybrid procedure of finding an example, that is, by stripping it of its 
facticity. Thus it is questionable whether thought can ever quite 
cease to be inductive, and whether it can assimilate any experience 
to the point of taking up and appropriating its whole texture. A 
philosophy becomes transcendental, or radical, not by taking its 
place in absolute consciousness without mentioning the ways by 
which this is reached, but by considering itself as a problem; not by 
postulating a knowledge rendered totally explicit, but by recognizing 
as the fundamental philosophic problem this presumption on reason's 
part. 

That is why we had to begin our examination of perception with 
psychological considerations. If we had not done so, we would not 
have understood the whole meaning of the transcendental problem, 
since we would not, starting from the natural attitude, have 
methodically followed the procedures which lead to it. We had to 
frequent the phenomenal field and become acquainted, through 
psychological descriptions, with the subject of phenomena, if we were 
to avoid placing ourselves from the start, as does reflexive philo- 
sophy, in a transcendental dimension assumed to be eternally given, 
thus by-passing the whole problem of constitution. We could not 
begin, however, our psychological description without suggesting 
that once purged of all psychologism it can become a philosophical 
method. In order to revive perceptual experience buried under its 
own results, it would not have been enough to present descriptions 
of them which might possibly not have been understood, we had to 
establish by philosophical references and anticipations the point of 
view from which they might appear true. Thus we could begin 
neither without psychology nor with psychology alone. Experience 
anticipates a philosophy and philosophy is merely an elucidated 
experience. But now that the phenomenal field has been sufficiently 
circumscribed, let us enter this ambiguous domain and let us make 
sure of our first steps as far as the psychologist is concerned, until 
the psychologist's self-scrutiny leads us, by way of a second-order 
reflection, to the phenomenon of the phenomenon, and decisively 
transforms the phenomenal field into a transcendental one. 

63 



Experience and objective thought. The problem 
of the body 



Our perception ends in objects, and the object once constituted, 
appears as the reason for all the experiences of it which we have had 
or could have. For example, I see the next-door house from a certain 
angle, but it would be seen differently from the right bank of the 
Seine, or from the inside, or again from an aeroplane: the house itself 
is none of these appearances; it is, as Leibnitz said, the flat pro- 
jection of these perspectives and of all possible perspectives, that is, 
the perspectiveless position from which all can be derived, the house 
seen from nowhere. But what do these words mean? Is not to see 
always to see from somewhere? To say that the house itself is seen 
from nowhere is surely to say that it is invisible! Yet when I say that 
I see the house with my own eyes, I am saying something that cannot 
be challenged: I do not mean that my retina and crystalline lens, 
my eyes as material organs, go into action and cause me to see it: 
with only myself to consult, I can know nothing about this. I am 
trying to express in this way a certain manner of approaching the 
object, the 'gaze' in short, which is as indubitable as my own thought, 
as directly known by me. We must try to understand how vision can 
be brought into being from somewhere without being enclosed in its 
perspective. 

To see an object is either to have it on the fringe of the visual 
field and be able to concentrate on it, or else respond to this summons 
by actually concentrating upon it. When I do concentrate my eyes on 
it, I become anchored in it, but this coming to rest of the gaze is 
merely a modality of its movement: I continue inside one object the 
exploration which earlier hovered over them all, and in one move- 
ment I close up the landscape and open the object. The two opera- 
tions do not fortuitously coincide: it is not the contingent aspects of 
my bodily make-up, for example the retinal structure, which force 
me to see my surroundings vaguely if I want to see the object clearly. 
Even if I knew nothing of rods and cones, I should realize that it is 
necessary to put the surroundings in abeyance the better to see the 
object, and to lose in background what one gains in focal figure, 
because to look at the object is to plunge oneself into it, and because 

67 



THE BODY 

objects form a system in which one cannot show itself without 
concealing others. More precisely, the inner horizon of an object 
cannot become an object without the surrounding objects' becoming 
a horizon, and so vision is an act with two facets. For I do not 
identify the detailed object which I now have with that over which 
my gaze ran a few minutes ago, by expressly comparing these details 
with a memory of my first general view. When, in a film, the camera is 
irained on an object and moves nearer to it to give a close-up view, 
we can remember that we are being shown the ash tray or an actor's 
hand, we do not actually identify it. This is because the screen has no 
horizons. In normal vision, on the other hand, I direct my gaze 
upon a sector of the landscape, which comes to life and is disclosed, 
while the other objects recede into the periphery and become 
dormant, while, however, not ceasing to be there. Now, with them, I 
have at my disposal their horizons, in which there is implied, as a 
marginal view, the object on which my eyes at present fall. The 
horizon, then, is what guarantees the identity of the object through- 
out the exploration; it is the correlative of the impending power 
which my gaze retains over the objects which it has just surveyed, 
and which it already has over the fresh details which it is about to 
discover. No distinct memory and no explicit conjecture could fill 
this role: they would give only a probable synthesis, whereas my 
perception presents itself as actual. The object-horizon structure, or 
the perspective, is no obstacle to me when I want to see the object: 
for just as it is the means whereby objects are distinguished from each 
other, it is also the means whereby they are disclosed. To see is to 
enter a universe of beings which display themselves, and they would 
not do this if they could not be hidden behind each other or behind 
me. In other words: to look at an object is to inhabit it, and from 
this habitation to grasp all things in terms of the aspect which they 
present to it. But in so far as I see those things too, they remain 
abodes open to my gaze, and, being potentially lodged in them, I 
already perceive from various angles the central object of my present 
vision. Thus every object is the mirror of all others. When I look at 
the lamp on my table, I attribute to it not only the qualities visible 
from where I am, but also those which the chimney, the walls, 
the table can 'see'; but back of my lamp is nothing but the face 
which it Shows' to the chimney. I can therefore see an object 
in so far as objects form a system or a world, and in so far as each 
one treats the others round it as spectators of its hidden aspects 
and as guarantee of the permanence of those aspects. Any seeing of an 
object by me is instantaneously reiterated among all those objects 
in the world which are apprehended as co-existent, because each of 
them is all that the others 'see' of it. Our previous formula must 

68 



EXPERIENCE AND OBJFCTIVF THOUGHT. PROBLEM OF THE BODY 

therefore be modified; the house itself is not the house seen from 
nowhere, but the house seen from everywhere. The completed object - 
is translucent, being shot through from all sides by an infinite 
number of present scrutinies which intersect in its depths leaving 
nothing hidden. - ' 

What we have just said about the spatial perspective could equally 
be said about the temporal. If I contemplate the house attentively 
and with no thought in my mind, it has something eternal about it, 
and an atmosphere of torpor seems to be generated by it. It is true 
that I see it from a certain point in my 'duration', but it is the same 
house that I saw yesterday when it was a day younger; it is the same 
house that either an old man or a child might behold. It is true, more- 
over, that age and change affect it, but even if it should collapse 
tomorrow, it will remain for ever true that it existed today: each 
moment of time calls all the others to witness; it shows by its advent 
'how things were meant to turn out' and 'how it will all finish'; each 
present permanently underpins a point of time which calls for recog- 
nition from all the others, so that the object is seen at all times as it is 
seen from all directions and by the same means, namely the structure 
imposed by a horizon. The present still holds on to the immediate 
past without positing it as an object, and since the immediate past 
similarly holds its immediate predecessor, past time is wholly col- 
lected up and grasped in the present. The same is true of the immi- 
nent future which will also have its horizon of imminence. But with 
my immediate past T have also the horizon of futurity which sur- 
rounded it, and thus T have my actual present seen as the future of that 
past. With the imminent future, I have the horizon of past which 
will surround it, and therefore my actual present as the past of that 
future. Thus, through the double horizon of retention and proten- 
tion, my present may cease to be a factual present quickly carried 
away and abolished by the flow of duration, and become a fixed 
and identifiable point in objective time. 

But, once more, my human gaze never posits more than one facet of 
the object, even though by means of horizons it is directed towards 
all the others. It can never come up against previous appearance^ or 
those presented to other people otherwise than through the inter- 
mediary of time and language. If I conceive in the image of my own 
gaze those others which, converging from all directions, explore 
every corner of the house and define it, I have still only a harmonious 
and indefinite set of views of the object, but not the object in its 
plenitude. In the same way, although my present draws into itself 
time past and time to come, it possesses them only in intention, and 
even if, for example, the consciousness of my past which I now have 
seems to me to cpver exactly the past as it was, the past which I claim 

69 



THE BODY 



to recapture is not the real past, but my past as I now see it, perhaps 
after altering it. Similarly in the future I may have a mistaken idea 
about the present which I now experience. Thus the synthesis of 
horizons is no more than a presumptive synthesis, operating with 
certainty and precision only in the immediate vicinity of the object. 
The remoter surrounding is no longer within my grasp; it is no 
longer composed of still discernible objects or memories; it is an 
anonymous horizon now incapable of bringing any precise testi- 
mony, and leaving the object as incomplete and open as it is indeed, 
in perceptual experience. Through this opening, indeed, the sub- 
— stantiality of the object slips away. If it is to reach perfect density, in 
other words if there is to be an absolute object, it will have to con- 
sist of an infinite number of different perspectives compressed into a 
strict co-existence, and to be presented as it were to a host of eyes all 
engaged in one concerted act of seeing. The house has its water 
pipes, its floor, perhaps its cracks which are insidiously spreading in 
the thickness of its ceilings. We never see them, but it has them 
along with its chimneys and windows which we can see. We shall 
forget our present perception of the house: every time we are able to 
compare our memories with the objects to which they refer, we are 
surprised, even allowing for other sources of error, at the changes 
which they owe to their own duration. But we still believe that there 
is a truth about the past; we base our memory on the world's vast 
Memory, in which the house has its place as it really was on that day, 
and which guarantees its being at this moment. Taken in itself— and 
as an object it demands to be taken thus — the object has nothing 
cryptic about it; it is completely displayed and its parts co-exist while 
our gaze runs from one to another, its present does not cancel its 
past, nor will its future cancel its present. The positing of the object* 
therefore makes us go beyond the limits of our actual experience 
which is brought up against and halted by an alien being, with the 
result that finally experience believes that it extracts all its own 
teaching from the object. It is this ek-stase* of experience which 
causes all perception to be perception of something. 

Obsessed with being, and forgetful of the perspectivism of my 
experience, I henceforth treat it as an object and deduce it from a 
relationship between objects. I regard my body, which is my point of 
view upon the world, as one of the objects of that world. My recent 
awareness of my gaze as a means of knowledge I now repress, and 
treat my eyes as bits of matter. They then take their place in the same 
objective space in which I am trying to situate the external object and 

* Active transcendence of the subject in relation to the world. The author uses 
either the French word extase, or Heidegger's form ek-stase. The latter is the one 
used throughout this translation (Translator's note). 

70 



EXPERIENCE AND OBJECTIVE THOUGHT. PROBLEM OF THE BODY 

I believe that I am producing the perceived perspective by the pro- 
jection of the objects on my retina. In the sanie way I treat my own 
perceptual history as a result of my relationships with the objective 
world; my present, which is my point of view on time, becomes one 
moment of time among all the others, my duration a reflection or 
abstract aspect of universal time, as my body is a mode of objective 
space. In the same way, finally, if the objects which surround the 
house or which are found in it remained what they are in perceptual 
experience, that is, acts of seeing conditioned by a certain perspec- 
tive, the house would not be posited as an autonomous being. Thus 
the positing of one single object, in the full sense, demands the com- 
positive bringing into being of all these experiences in one act of 
manifold creation. Therein it exceeds perceptual experience and the 
synthesis of horizons — as the notion of a universe, that is to say, a 
completed and explicit totality, in which the relationships arc those 
of reciprocal determination, exceeds that of a world, or an open and 
indefinite multiplicity of relationships which are of reciprocal 
implication. 1 I detach myself from my experience and pass to the 
idea. Like the object, the idea purports to be the same for everybody, 
valid in all times and places, and the individuation of an object in an 
objective point of time and space finally appears as the expression of 
a universal positing power. 2 1 am no longer concerned with my body, 
nor with time, nor with the world, as I experience them in ante- 
predicative knowledge, in the inner communion that I have with 
them. I now refer to my body only as an idea, to the universe as idea, 
to the idea of space and the idea of time. Thus 'objective' thought 
(in Kierkegaard's sense) is formed — being that of common sense and 
of science — which finally causes us to lose contact with perceptual 
experience, of which it is nevertheless the outcome and the natural 
sequel. The whole life of consciousness is characterized by the- 
tendency to posit objects, since it is consciousness, that is to say self- 
knowledge, only in so far as it takes hold of itself and draws itself 
together in an identifiable object. And yet the absolute positing of a - 
single object is the death, of consciousness, since it congeals the whole 
of existence, as a crystal placed in a solution suddenly crystallizes it. 

We cannot remain in this dilemma of having to fail to understand 
either the subject or the object. We must discover the origin of the 
object at the very centre of our experience; we must describe the 
emergence of being and we must understand how, paradoxically, 
there is for us an in-itself. In order not to prejudge the issue, we shall 

1 Husserl, Umsturz der kopernikanischen Lehre: die Erde als Ur-Arche bewegt 
sich nicht (unpublished). 

2 l I understand by the sole power of judging, which resides in my mind, what 
I thought I saw with my eyes.' 2nd Meditation, AT, IX, p. 25. 

71 



THE BODY 

take objective thought on its own terms and not ask it any questions 
which it docs not ask itself. If we are led to rediscover experience 
behind it, this shift of ground will be attributable only to the diffi- 
culties which objective thought itself raises. Let us consider it then 
at work in the constitution of our body as object, since this is a 
crucial moment in the genesis of the objective world. It will be seen 
that one's own body evades, even within science itself, the treatment 
to which it is intended to subject it. And since the genesis of the 
objective body is only a moment in the constitution of the object, the 
body, by withdrawing from the objective world, will carry with it the 
intentional threads linking it to its surrounding and finally reveal to 
us the perceiving subject as the perceived world. 



72 



THE BODY AS OBJECT AND 
MECHANISTIC PHYSIOLOGY 



THE definition of the object is, as we have seen, that it exists partes 
extra partes, and that consequently it acknowledges between its 
parts, or between itself and other objects only external and mech- 
anical relationships, whether in the narrow sense of motion received 
and transmitted, or in the wider sense of the relation of function to 
variable. Where it was desired to insert the organisrti in the universe 
of objects and thereby close off that universe, it was necessary to 
translate the functioning of the body into the language of the in- 
itself and discover, beneath behaviour, the linear dependence of 
stimulus and receptor, receptor and Empfinder} It was of course 
realized that in the circuit of behaviour new particular forms 
emerge, and the theory of specific nervous energy, for example, 
certainly endowed the organism with the power of transforming the 
physical world. But in fact it attributed to the nervous systems the 
occult power of creating the different structures of our experience, 
and whereas sight, touch and hearing are so many ways of gaining 
access to the object, these structures found themselves transformed 
into compact qualities derived from the local distinction between the 
organs used. Thus the relationship between stimulus and perception 
could remain clear and objective, and the psycho-physical event was 
of the same kind as the causal relations obtaining 'in the world'. 
Modern physiology no longer has recourse to these pretences. It no 
longer links the different qualities of one and the same sense, and 
the data of different senses, to distinct material instruments. In 
reality injuries to centres and even to conductors are not translated 
into the loss of certain qualities of sensation or of certain sensory 
data, but into loss of differentiation in the function. We have already 
discussed this: wherever the seat of the injury in the sensory routes 
1 Cf. La Structure du Comportement, Chap. I and II. 
73 



THE BODY 

and whatever its origin, one observes, for example, a decay of 
sensitivity to colour; at the beginning, all colours are affected, their 
basic shade remaining the same, but their saturation decreasing; 
then the spectrum is simplified and reduced to four colours: yellow, 
green, blue, crimson, and indeed all short-wave colours tend to- 
wards a kind of blue, all long- wave colours towards a kind of yellow, 
vision being liable, moreover, to vary from moment to moment, 
according to degree of fatigue. Finally a monochrome stage in grey 
is reached, although favourable conditions (contrast, long exposure) 
may momentarily bring back dichromic sight. 1 The progress of the 
lesion in the nervous tissue does not, therefore, destroy, one after 
another, ready-made sensory contents, but makes the active differ- 
entiation of stimuli, which appears to be the essential function of the 
nervous system, increasingly unreliable. In the same way, in the case 
of non-cortical injury to the sense of touch, if certain contents 
(temperatures) are more easily destroyed and are the first to dis- 
appear, this is not because a determinate region, lost to the patient, 
enables us to feel heat and cold, since the specific sensation will be 
restored if a sufficiently extensive stimulus is applied; 2 it is rather 
that the sensation succeeds in taking its typical form only under a 
more energetic stimulus. Central lesions seem to leave qualities in- 
tact; on the other hand they modify the spatial organization of data 
and the perception of objects. This is what had led to the belief in 
specialized gnosic centres for the localization and interpretation of 
qualities. In fact, modern research shows that central lesions have 
the effect in most cases of raising the chronaxies, which are increased 
to two or three times their normal strength in the patient. The 
excitation produces its effects more slowly, these survive longer, and 
the tactile perception of roughness, for example, is jeopardized in so 
far as it presupposes a succession of circumscribed impressions or a 
precise consciousness of the different positions of the hand. 3 The 
vague localization of the stimulus is not explained by the destruction 
of a localizing centre, but by the reduction to a uniform level of 
sensations, which are no longer capable of organizing themselves 
into a stable grouping in which each of them receives a univocal 
value and is translated into consciousness only by a limited change. 4 
Thus the excitations of one and the same sense differ less by reason 
of the material instrument which they use than in the way in which 
the elementary stimuli are spontaneously organized among them- 
selves, and this organization is the crucial factor both at the level of 
sensible 'qualities' and at that of perception. It is this, and not the 
specific energy of the nervous apparatus examined, which causes an 

1 J. Stein, Pathologie der Wahrnehmung y p. 365. 

2 Ibid., p. 358. 8 Ibid., pp. 360-1. 4 Ibid., p. 362. 

74 



THE BODY AS OBJECT AND MECHANISTIC PHYSIOLOGY 

excitant to give rise to a tactile or thermic sensation. If a given area of 
skin is several times stimulated with a hair, the first perceptions are 
clearly distinguished and localized each time at the same point. As 
the stimulus is repeated, the localization becomes less precise, per- 
ception widens in space, while at the same time the sensation ceases 
to be specific: it is no longer a contact, but a feeling of burning, at 
one moment cold and at the next hot. Later still the patient thinks 
the stimulus is moving and describing a circle on his skin. Finally 
nothing more is felt. 1 It follows that the 'sensible quality', the spatial 
limits set to the percept, and even the presence or absence of a per- 
ception, are not de facto effects of the situation outside the organism, 
but represent the way in which it meets stimulation and is related to 
it. An excitation is not perceived when it strikes a sensory organ 
which is not 'attuned' to it. 2 The function of the organism in receiving 
stimuli is, so to speak, to 'conceive' a certain form of excitation. 3 
The 'psychophysical event' is therefore no longer of the type of 
'worldly' causality, the brain becomes the seat of a process of 'pattern- 
ing' which intervenes even before the cortical stage, and which, 
from the moment the nervous system comes into play, confuses the 
relations of stimulus to organism. The excitation is seized and 
reorganized by transversal functions which make it resemble the 
perception which it is about to arouse. I cannot envisage this form 
which is traced out in the nervous system, this exhibiting of a struc- 
ture, as a set of processes in the third person, as the transmission of 
movement or as the determination of one variable by another. I 
cannot gain a removed knowledge of it. In so far as I guess what 
it may be, it is by abandoning the body as an object, partes extra 
partes, and by going back to the body which I experience at this 
moment, in the manner, for example, in which my hand moves 
round the object it touches, anticipating the stimuli and itself trac- 
ing out the form which I am about to perceive. I cannot under- 
stand the function of the living body except by enacting it my- 
self, and except in so far as I am a body which rises towards the 
world. 

Thus exteroceptivity demands that stimuli be given a shape; the 
consciousness of the body invades the body, the soul spreads over 
all its parts, and behaviour overspills its central sector. But one 
might reply that this 'bodily experience' is itself a 'representation', a 
'psychic fact', and that as such it is at the end of a chain of physical 

1 J. Stein, Pathologie der Wahrnehmung, p. 364. 

* Die Reizvorgange treffen ein ungestimmles Reaktionsorgan. Siein, Pathologie 
der Wahrnehmung, p. 361. 

3 4 Die Sinne ... die Form eben durch ursprungliches Formbegreifen zu 
erkennen geben.' Ibid., p. 353. 

75 



T!ir BODY 



and physiological events which alone can be ascribed to the 'real 
body'. Is not my body, exactly as are external bodies, an object 
which acts on receptors and finally gives rise to the consciousness of 
the body? Is there not an 'interoceptivity' just as there is an 'extero- 
ceptivity*? Cannot I find in the body message-wires sent by the 
internal organs to the brain, which are installed by nature to provide 
the soul with the opportunity of feeling its body? Consciousness 
of the body, and the soul, are thus repressed. The body becomes the 
highly polished machine which the ambiguous notion of behaviour 
nearly made us forget. For example, if, in the case of a man who has 
lost a leg, a stimulus is applied, instead of to the leg, to the path from 
the stump to the brain, the subject will feel a phantom leg, because 
the soul is immediately linked to the brain and to it alone. 

What has modern physiology to say about this? Anaesthesia with 
cocaine does not do away with the phantom limb, and there are 
cases of phantom limbs without amputation as a result of brain 
injury. 1 Finally the imaginary limb is often found to retain the 
position in which the real arm was at the moment of injury: a man 
wounded in battle can still feel in his phantom arm the shell splinters 
that lacerated his real one. 2 Is it then necessary to abandon the 
'peripheral theory' in favour of a 'central theory'? But a central 
theory would get us no further if it added no more to the peripheral 
conditions of the imaginary limb than cerebral symptoms. For a 
collection of cerebral symptoms could not represent the relation- 
ships in consciousness which enter into the phenomenon.' It depends 
indeed on 'psychic' determinants. An emotion, circumstance which 
recalls those in which the wound was received, creates a phantom 
limb in subjects who had none. 3 It happens that the imaginary 
arm is enormous after the operation, but that it subsequently 
shrinks and is absorbed into the stump 'as the patient consents 
to accept his mutilation'. 4 The phenomenon of the phantom limb 
is here elucidated by that of anosognosia,* which clearly demands 
a psychological explanation. Subjects who systematically ignore 
their paralysed right hand, and hold out their left hand when 
asked for their right, refer to their paralysed arm as *a long, cold 
snake', which rules out any hypothesis of real anaesthesia and sug- 

1 Lhermilte, L Image de not re Corps, p. 47, 

* Ibid., pp. 129 and ff. 

• Ibid., p. 57. 

4 Ibid., p. 73. J. Lhermitie points out thai the illusion of the limbless bears a 
relationship to the patient's psychological make-up: it is more frequent among 
educated people. 

♦ Failure or refusal on the patient's part to recognize the existence of a disease 
or disability (Translator's note). 

76 



THE BODY AS OBJFCT AND MECHANISTIC PHYSIOLOGY 

gests one in terms of the refusal to recognize their deficiency. 1 Must 
we then conclude that the phantom limb is a memory, a volition or 
a belief, and, failing any physiological explanation, must we provide 
a psychological explanation for it? But no psychological explanation 
can overlook the fact that the severance of the nerves to the brain 
abolishes the phantom limb. 2 

What has to be understood, then, is how the psychic determining 
factors and the physiological conditions gear into each other: it is 
not clear how the imaginary limb, if dependent on physiological 
conditions and therefore the result of a third person causality, can 
in another context arise out of the personal history of the patient, 
his memories, emotions and volitions. For in order that the two sets 
of conditions might together bring about the phenomenon, as two 
components bring about a resultant, they would need an identical 
point of application or a common ground, and it is difficult to see 
what ground could be common to 'physiological facts' which are in 
space and 'psychic facts' which are nowhere: or even to objective 
processes like nervous influxes which belong to the realm of the in- 
itself, and cogitationes such as acceptance and refusal, awareness of 
the past, and emotion, which are of the order of the for-itself. A 
hybrid theory of the phantom limb which found a place for both sets 
of conditions 3 may, then, be valid as a statement of the known facts; 
but it is fundamentally obscure. The phantom limb is not the mere 
outcome of objective causality; no more is it a cogitatio. It could be a 
mixture of the two only if we could find a means of linking the 
'psychic' and the 'physiological', the 'for-itself and the 'in-itself, to 
each other to form an articulate whole, and to contrive some meet- 
ing-point for them: if the third person processes and the personal 
acts could be integrated into a common middle term. 

In order to describe the belief in the phantom limb and the un- 
willingness to accept mutilation, writers speak of a 'driving into the 
unconscious' or 'an organic repression'. 4 These un-Cartesian terms 
force us to form the idea of an organic thought through which the 
relation of the 'psychic' to the 'physiological' becomes conceivable. 
We have already met elsewhere, in the case of substitutions, pheno- 
mena which lie outside the alternatives of psychic and physiological, 
of final and mechanistic causes. 5 When the insect, in the performance 

1 Lhermitte, V Image de noire Corps, pp. 129 and ff. 

2 Ibid., pp. 129 and ff. 

3 The phantom limb lends itself neither to a purely physiological explanation, 
nor to a purely psychological one. Such is the conclusion of J. Lhermitte, V Image 
de not re Corps, p. 126. 

4 Schilder, Das Kbrperschema\ Menninger-Lerchenthal, Das Truggebilde der 
eigenen Gestalt, p. 174; Lhermitte, V Image de notre Corps, p. 143. 

6 Cf. La Structure du Comportement, pp. 47 and ff. 

77 



THE BODY 

of an instinctive act, substitutes a sound leg for one cut off, it is not, 
as we saw, that a stand-by device, set up in advance, is automatically 
put into operation and substituted for the circuit which is out of 
action. But neither is it the case that the creature is aware of an aim 
to be achieved, using its limbs as various means, for in that case the 
substitution ought to occur every time the act is prevented, and we 
know that it does not occur if the leg is merely tied. The insect 
simply continues to belong to the same world and moves in it with 
all its powers. The tied limb is not replaced by the free one, because it 
continues to count in the insect's scheme of things, and because the 
current of activity which flows towards the world still passes through 
it. There is in this instance no more choice than in the case of a drop 
of oil which uses all its strength to solve in practical terms the 
maximum and minimum problem which confronts it. The difference 
is simply that the drop of oil adapts itself to given external forces, 
while the insect itself projects the norms of its environment and itself 
lays down the terms of its vital problem; 1 but here it is a question of 
an a priori of the species and not a personal choice. Thus what is 
found behind the phenomenon of substitution is the impulse of being- 
in-the-world, and it is now time to put this notion into more precise 
terms. When we say that an animal exists, that it has a world, or that 
it belongs to a world, we do not mean that it has a perception or 
objective consciousness of that world. The situation which unleashes 
instinctive operations is not entirely articulate and determinate, its 
total meaning is not possessed, as is adequately shown by the mis- 
takes and the blindness of instinct. It presents only a practical signifi- 
cance; it asks for only bodily recognition; it is experienced as an 
'open* situation, and 'requires' the animal's movements, just as the 
first notes of a melody require a certain kind of resolution, without 
its being known in itself, and it is precisely what allows the limbs to 
be substituted for each other, and to be of equal value before the 
self-evident demands of the task. In so far as it anchors the subject 
to a certain 'environment', is 'being-in-the-world' something like 
'attention to life' in Bergson or 'the function of the real' in P. Janet? 
Attention to life is the awareness we experience of 'nascent move- 
ments' in our bodies. Now reflex movements, whether adumbrated 
or executed, are still only objective processes whose course and 
results consciousness can observe, but in which it is not involved. 2 
1 Cf. La Structure du Comportement, pp. 196 and AT. 

1 When Bergson stresses ihe unity of perception and action and invents, for its 
expression, the term Sensory-motor process', he is clearly seeking to involve con- 
sciousness in the world. But if feeling is representing a quality to oneself, and if 
movement is changing one's position in the objective world, then between sensa- 
tion and movement, even taken in their nascent state, no compromise is possible, 
and they are distinct from each other as are the for-itaelf and the iwinelf. Gener- 

78 



THE BODY AS OBJECT AND MECHANISTIC PHYSIOLOGY 

In fact the reflexes themselves arc never blind processes: they adjust 
themselves to a 'direction' of the situation, and express our orienta- 
tion towards a 'behavioural setting' just as much as the action of the 
'geographical setting' upon us. They trace out from a distance the 
structure of the object without waiting for its point by point stimula- 
tion. It is this global presence of the situation which gives a meaning 
to the partial stimuli and causes them to acquire importance, value or 
existence for the organism. The reflex does not arise from objective 
stimuli, but moves back towards them, and invests them with a mean- 
ing which they do not possess taken singly as psychological agents, 
but only when taken as a situation. It causes them to exist as a situa- 
tion, it stands in a 'cognitive' relation to them, which means that it 
shows them up as that which it is destined to confront. The reflex, 
in so far as it opens itself to the meaning of a situation, and percep- 
tion; in so far as it does not first of all posit an object of knowledge 
and is an intention of our whole being, are modalities of a pre- 
objective view which is what we call being-in-the-world. Prior to 
stimuli and sensory contents, we must recognize a kind of inner 
diaphragm which determines, infinitely more than they do, what our 
reflexes and perceptions will be able to aim at in the world, the area 
of our possible operations, the scope of our life. Some subjects can 



ally speaking, Bergson saw that the body and the mind communicate with each 
other through the medium of time, that to be a mind is to stand above time's flow 
and that to have a body is to have a present. The body, he says, is an instantaneous 
section made in the becoming of consciousness (Matiere et Memoire, p. 150). But 
the body remains for him what we have called the objective body; consciousness 
remains knowledge; time remains a successive 'now', whether it 'snowballs upon 
itself or is spread in spatial ized time. Bergson can therefore only compress or 
expand the series of 'present moments'; he never reaches the unique movement 
whereby the three dimensions of time are constituted, and one cannot see why 
duration is squeezed into a present, or why consciousness becomes involved in a 
body and a world. 

As for the 'function of the real', P. Janet uses it as an existential notion. This is 
what enables him to sketch out a profound theory of emotion as the collapse of 
our customary being, and a flight from our world. (Cf. for example the interpre- 
tation of the fit of hysterics, DeVAngoisse aVExtase, T. II, p. 450 and ff.) But this 
theory of emotion is not followed out and, as J. P. Sartre shows, it conflicts, in 
the writings of P. Janet, with a mechanistic conception rather close to that of 
James: the collapse of our existence into emotion is treated as a mere derivation 
from psychological forces, and the emotion itself as the consciousness of this pro- 
cess expressed in the third person, so that there is no longer reason to look for a 
meaning in the emotional behaviour which is the result of the blind momentum 
of the tendencies, and we return to dualism. (Cf. J. P. Sartre, Esquissed'une theorie 
deV Emotion.) P. Janet, moreover, treats psychological tension — that is, the move- 
ment whereby we spread our 'world' before us — expressly as a representative 
hypothesis; so he is far from considering it in general terms as the concrete 
essence of man, though he does so implicitly in particular analyses. 

79 



THE BODY 

come near to blindness without changing their 'world': they can be 
seen colliding with objects everywhere, but they are not aware of no 
longer being open to visual qualities, and the structure of their con- 
duct remains unmodified. Other patients, on the other hand, lose 
their world as soon as its contents are removed; they abandon their 
habitual way of life even before it has become impossible, making 
themselves into premature invalids and breaking their vital contact 
with the world before losing sensory contact with it. There is, then, 
a certain consistency in our 'world', relatively independent of 
stimuli, which refuses to allow us to treat being-in-the-world as a 
collection of reflexes — a certain energy in the pulsation of existence, 
relatively independent of our voluntary thoughts, which prevents 
us from treating it as an act of consciousness. It is because it is a 
preobjective view that being-in-the-world can be distinguished 
from every third person process, from every modality of the res 
extensa, as from every cogitatio, from every first person form of 
knowledge — and that it can effect the union of the 'psychic' and the 
'physiological'. 

Let us return now to the problem with which we began. Anosog- 
nosia and the phantom limb lend themselves neither to a physio- 
logical nor to a psychological explanation, nor yet to a mixture of the 
two, though they can be related to the two sets of conditions. A 
physiological explanation would account for anosognosia and the 
phantom limb as the straightforward suppression or equally straight- 
forward persistence of 'interoceptive' stimulations. According to this 
hypothesis, anosognosia is the absence of a fragment of representa- 
tion which ought to be given, since the corresponding limb is there; 
the phantom limb is the presence of part of the representation of the 
body which should not be given, since the corresponding limb is not 
there. If one now gives a psychological account of the phenomena, 
the phantom limb becomes a memory, a positive judgement or a 
perception, while anosognosia becomes a bit of forgetfulness, a 
negative judgement or a failure to perceive. In the first case the 
phantom limb is the actual presence of a representation, anosognosia 
the actual absence of a representation. In the second case the phan- 
tom limb is the representation of an actual presence, whereas 
anosognosia is the representation of an actual absence. In both 
cases we are imprisoned in the categories of the objective world, in 
which there is no middle term between presence and absence. In 
reality the anosognosic is not simply ignorant of the existence of his 
paralysed limb: he can evade his deficiency only because he knows 
where he risks encountering it, just as the subject, in psychoanalysis, 
knows what he does not want to face, otherwise he would not be 
able to avoid it so successfully. We do not understand the absence or 

80 



THE BODY AS OBJECT AND MECHANISTIC PHYSIOLOGY 

death of a friend until the time comes when we expect a reply from 
him and when we realize that we shall never again receive one; so at 
first we avoid asking in order not to have to notice this silence; we 
turn aside from those areas of our life in which we might meet this 
nothingness, but this very fact necessitates that we intuit them. In 
the same way the anosognosic leaves his paralysed arm out of 
account in order not to have to feel his handicap, but this means that 
he has a preconscious knowledge of it. It is true that in the case of the 
phantom limb the subject appears to be unaware of the mutilation 
and relies on his imaginary limb as he would on a real one, since he 
tries to walk with his phantom leg and is not discouraged even by a 
fall. But he can describe quite well, in spite of this, the peculiarities of 
the phantom leg, for example its curious motility, and if he treats it 
in practice as a real limb, this is because, like the normal subject, he 
has no need, when he wants to set off walking, of a clear and articu- 
late perception of his body: it is enough for him to have it 'at his 
disposal' as an undivided power, and to sense the phantom limb as 
vaguely involved in it. The consciousness of the phantom limb re- 
mains, then, itself unclear. The man with one leg feels the missing 
limb in the same way as I feel keenly the existence of a friend who is, 
nevertheless, not before my eyes; he has not lost it because he con- 
tinues to allow for it, just as Proust can recognize the death of his 
grandmother, yet without losing her, as long as he can keep her on 
the horizon of his life. The phantom arm is not a representation of 
the arm, but the ambivalent presence of an arm. The refusal of 
mutilation in the case of the phantom limb, or the refusal of disable- 
ment in anosognosia are not deliberate decisions, and do not take 
place at the level of positing consciousness which takes up its position 
explicitly after considering various possibilities. The will to have a 
sound body or the rejection of an infirm one are not formulated 
for themselves; and the awareness of the amputated arm as 
present or of the disabled arm as absent is not of the kind: *I think 
that . . : 

This phenomenon, distorted equally by physiological and psycho- 
logical explanations, is, however, understood in the perspective of 
being-in-the-world. What it is in us which refuses mutilation and 
disablement is an / committed to a certain physical and inter-human 
world, who continues to tend towards his world despite handicaps 
and amputations and who, to this extent, does not recognize them de 
jure. The refusal of the deficiency is only the obverse of our in- 
herence in a world, the implicit negation of what runs counter to the 
natural momentum which throws us into our tasks, our cares, our 
situation, our familiar horizons. To have a phantom arm is to remain 
open to all the actions of which the arm alone is capable; it is to 

81 



THE BODY 



retain the practical field which one enjoyed before mutilation. The 
body is the vehicle of being in the world, and having a body is, for a 
living creature, to be intervolved in a definite environment, to identify 
oneself with certain projects and be continually committed to them. 
In the self-evidence of this complete world in which manipulatable 
objects still figure, in the force of their movement which still flows 
towards him, and in which is still present the project of writing or 
playing the piano, the cripple still finds the guarantee of his whole- 
ness. But in concealing his deficiency from him, the world cannot fail 
simultaneously to reveal it to him: for if it is true that I am conscious 
of my body via the world, that it is the unperceived term in^the 
centre of the world towards which all objects turn their face, it is 
true for the same reason that my body is the pivot of the world: I 
know that objects have several facets because I could make a tour of 
inspection of them, and in that sense I am conscious of the world 
through the medium of my body. It is precisely when my customary 
world arouses in me habitual intentions that I can no longer, if I 
have lost a limb, be effectively drawn into it, and the utilizable 
objects, precisely in so far as they present themselves as utilizable, 
appeal to a hand which I no longer have. Thus are delimited, in the 
totality of my body, regions of silence. The patient therefore realizes 
his disability precisely in so far as he is ignorant of it, and is ignorant 
of it precisely to the extent that he knows of it. This paradox is that 
of all being in the world: when I move towards a world I bury my 
perceptual and practical intentions in objects which ultimately 
appear prior to and external to those intentions, and which never- 
theless exist for me only in so far as they arouse in me thoughts 
or volitions. In the case under consideration, the ambiguity of 
knowledge amounts to this: our body comprises as it were two dis- 
tinct layers, that of the habit-body and that of the body at this 
moment. In the first appear manipulatory movements which have 
disappeared from the second, and the problem how I can have the 
sensation of still possessing a limb which I no longer have amounts 
to finding out how the habitual body can act as guarantee for the 
body at this moment. How can 1 perceive objects as manipulatable 
when I can no longer manipulate them? The manipulatable must 
have ceased to be what I am now manipulating, and become what 
one can manipulate; it must have ceased to be a thing manipulatable 
for me and become a thing manipulatable in itself. Correspond- 
ingly, my body must be apprehended not only in an experience 
which is instantaneous, peculiar to itself and complete in itself, 
but also in some general aspect and in the light of an impersonal 
being. 

In that way the phenomenon of the phantom limb is absorbed into 

82 



THE BODY AS OBJECT AND MECHANISTIC PHYSIOLOGY 

that of repression, which we shall find throwing some light on it. 
For repression, to which psycho-analysis refers, consists in the 
subject's entering upon a certain course of action — a love affair, a 
career, a piece of work — in his encountering on this course some 
barrier, and, since he has the strength neither to surmount the 
obstacle nor to abandon the enterprise, he remains imprisoned in the 
attempt and uses up his strength indefinitely renewing it in spirit. 
Time in its passage does not carry away with it these impossible 
projects; it does not close up on traumatic experience; the subject 
remains open to the same impossible future, if not in his explicit 
thoughts, at any rate in his actual being. One present among all 
presents thus acquires an exceptional value; it displaces the others 
and deprives them of their value as authentic presents. We continue 
to be the person who once entered on this adolescent affair, or the 
one who once lived in this parental universe. New perceptions, new 
emotions even, replace the old ones, but this process of renewal 
touches only the content of our experience and not its structure. 
Impersonal time continues its course, but personal time is arrested. 
Of course this fixation does not merge into memory; it even excludes 
memory in so far as the latter spreads out in front of us, like a 
picture, a former experience, whereas this past which remains our 
true present does not leave us but remains constantly hidden behind 
our gaze instead of being displayed before it. The traumatic ex- 
perience does not survive as a representation in the mode of objective 
consciousness and as a 'dated' moment; it is of its essence to survive 
only as a manner of being and with a certain degree of generality. 
I forgo my constant power of providing myself with 'worlds' in the 
interest of one of them, and for that very reason this privileged world 
loses its substance and eventually becomes no more than a certain 
dread. All repression is, then, the transition from first person 
existence to a sort of abstraction of that existence, which lives on a 
former experience, or rather on the memory of having had the 
memory, and so on, until finally only the essential form remains. 
Now as an advent of the impersonal, repression is a universal 
phenomenon, revealing our condition as incarnate beings by relating 
it to the temporal structure of being in the world. To the extent that 
I have 'sense organs', a 'body', and 'psychic functions' comparable 
with other men's, each of the moments of my experience ceases to be 
an integrated and strictly unique totality, in which details exist only 
in virtue of the whole; I become the meeting point of a host of 
'causalities'. In so far as I inhabit a 'physical world', in which con- 
sistent 'stimuli' and typical situations recur — and not merely the 
historical world in which situations are never exactly comparable — 
my life is made up of rhythms which have not their reason in what I 

83 



THE BODY 



have chosen to be, but their condition in the humdrum setting which 
is mine. Thus there appears round our personal existence a margin of 
almost impersonal existence, which can be practically taken for 
granted, and which I rely on to keep me alive; round the human 
world which each of us has made for himself is a world in general 
terms to which one must first of all belong in order to be able to enclose 
oneself in the particular context of a love or an ambition. Just as we 
speak of repression in the limited sense when I retain through time 
one of the momentary worlds through which I have lived, and make 
it the formative element of my whole life — so it can be said that my 
organism, as a prepersonal cleaving to the general form of the world, 
as an anonymous and general existence, plays, beneath my personal 
life, the part of an inborn complex. It is not some kind of inert thing; 
it too has something of the momentum of existence. It may even 
happen when I am in danger that my human situation abolishes my 
biological one, that my body lends itself without reserve to action. 1 
But these moments can be no more than moments, 2 and for most of 
the time personal existence represses the organism without being 
able either to go beyond it or to renounce itself; without, in other 
words, being able either to reduce the organism to its existential 
self, or itself to the organism. While I am overcome by some grief 
and wholly given over to my distress, my eyes already stray in front 
of me, and are drawn, despite everything, to some shining object, 
and thereupon resume their autonomous existence. Following upon 
that minute into which we wanted to compress our whole life, time, or 
at least, prepersonal time, begins once more to flow, carrying away, 
if not our resolution, at least the heartfelt emotions which sustained 
it. Personal existence is intermittent and when this tide turns and 
recedes, decision can henceforth endow my life with only an arti- 
ficially induced significance. The fusion of soul and body in the act, 
the sublimation of biological into personal existence, and of the 
natural into the cultural world is made both possible and precarious 
by the temporal structure of our experience. Every present grasps, 
by stages, through its horizon of immediate past and near future, 
the totality of possible time; thus does it overcome the dispersal of 
instants, and manage to endow our past itself with its definitive mean- 

1 Thus Saint-Exupery, above Arras, with shells bursting all round him, can 
no longer feel as a thing distinct from him his body which shortly before 
seemed to escape him: 'It is as if my life were given to me every second, as if my 
life became every moment more keenly felt. I live. I am alive. I am still alive. 
I am always alive. I am now nothing but a source of life.' Pilole de Guerre, 
p. 174. 

* 'But it is true that, in the course of my life, when not in the grip of urgency, 
when my meaning is not at stake, I can sec no more serious problems than those 
raised by my body.' A. dc Saint-Exupcry, Pilote de Guerre, p. 169. 

84 



THE BODY AS OBJECT AND MECHANISTIC PHYSIOLOGY 

ing, re-integrating into personal existence even that past of all pasts 
which the stereotyped patterns of our organic behaviour seem to 
suggest as being at the origin of our volitional being. In this context 
even reflexes have a meaning, and each individual's style is still 
visible in them, just as the beating of the heart is felt as far away as 
the body's periphery. But this power naturally belongs to all presents, 
the old no less than the new. Even if we claim to' have a better 
understanding of our past than it had of itself, it can always reject 
our present judgement and shut itself up in its own autonomous self- 
evidence. It necessarily does so in so far as I conceive it as a former 
present. Each present may claim to solidify our life, and indeed that 
is what distinguishes it as the present. In so far as it presents itself 
as the totality of being and fills an instant of consciousness, we never 
extricate ourselves completely from it, time never completely closes 
over it and it remains like a wound through which our strength ebbs 
away. It can now be said that, a fortiori, the specific past, which our 
body is, can be recaptured and taken up by an individual life only 
because that life has never transcended it, but secretly nourishes it, 
devoting thereto part of its strength, because its present is still that 
past. This can be seen in cases of illness in which bodily events be- 
come the events of the day. What enables us to centre our existence 
is also what prevents us from centring it completely, and the 
anonymity of our body is inseparably both freedom and servitude. 
Thus, to sum up, the ambiguity of being-in-the-world is translated 
by that of the body, and this is understood through that of time. 

We shall return later to the question of time. Let it merely be noted 
for the moment that starting with this central phenomenon the 
relationships between the 'psychic' and the 'physiological' become 
conceivable. Why can the memories recalled to the one-armed man 
cause the phantom arm to appear? The phantom arm is not a 
recollection, it is a quasi-present and the patient feels it now, folded 
over his chest, with no hint of its belonging to the past. Nor can we 
suppose that the image of an arm, wandering through conscious- 
ness, has joined itself to the stump: for then it would not be a 
phantom', but a renascent perception. The phantom arm must be 
that same arm, lacerated by shell splinters, its visible substance 
burned or rotted somewhere, which appears to haunt the present 
body without being absorbed into it. The imaginary arm is, then, like 
repressed experience, a former present which cannot decide to 
recede into the past. The memories called up before the patient in- 
duce in him a phantom limb, not as an image in associationism 
summons up another image, but because any memory reopens time 
lost to us and invites us to recapture the situation evoked. Intel- 
lectual memory, in Proust's sense, limits itself to a description of the 

85 



THE BODY 

past, a past as idea, from which it extracts Characteristics' or com- 
municable meaning rather than discovering a structure. But it would 
not be memory if the object which it constructs were not still held by 
a few intentional threads to the horizon of the lived-through past, 
and to that past itself as we should rediscover it if we were to delve 
beyond these horizons and'reopen time. In the same way, if we put 
back emotion into being-in-the-world, we can understand how it can 
be the origin of the phantom limb. To feel emotion is to be involved 
in a situation which one is not managing to face and from which, 
nevertheless, -one does not want to escape. Rather than admit 
failure or retrace one's steps, the subject, caught in this existential 
dilemma, breaks in pieces the objective world which stands in his 
way and seeks symbolical satisfaction in magic acts. 1 The ruin of the 
objective world, abandonment of true action, flight into a self- 
contained realm are conditions favouring the illusion of those who 
have lost a limb in that it too presupposes the erasure of reality. In so 
far as memory and emotion can call up the phantom limb, this is not 
comparable to the action of one cogitatio which necessitates another 
cogitatio y or that of one condition bringing about its consequence. 
It is not that an ideal causality here superimposes itself on a physio- 
logical one, it is that an existential attitude motivates another and 
that memory, emotion and phantom limb are equivalents in the 
context of being in the world. 

Now why does the severing of the afferent nerves banish the 
phantom limb? In the perspective of being in the world this fact 
means that the impulses arriving from the stump keep the amputated 
limb in the circuit of existence. They establish and maintain its place, 
prevent it from being abolished, and cause it still to count in the 
organism. They keep empty an area which the subject's history fills, 
they enable the latter to build up the phantom, as structural dis- 
turbances allow the content of psychosis to form into delirium. 
From our point of view, a sensori-motor circuit is, within our com- 
prehensive being in the world, a relatively autonomous current of 
existence. Not that it always brings to our total being a separable 
contribution, but because under certain circumstances it is possible 
to bring to light constant responses to stimuli which are themselves 
constant. The question is, therefore, how the refusal of the deficiency, 
which is a total attitude of our existence, needs for its expression 
such a highly specialized modality as a sensori-motor circuit, and 
why our being-in-the-world, which provides all our reflexes with 
their meaning, and which is thus their basis, nevertheless delivers 
itself over to them and is finally based upon them. Indeed, as we 
have shown elsewhere, sensori-motor circuits are all the more 
1 Cf. J. P. Sartre, Esquisse cVune theorie de Vemotion. 

86 



THE BODY AS OBJECT AND MECHANISTIC PHYSIOLOGY 

clearly marked as one is concerned with more integrated existences, 
and the reflex in its pure state is to be found only in man, who has not 
only a setting (Umwelt), but also a world (Welt). 1 

From the existential point of view, these two facts, which scientific 
induction contents itself with setting side by side, arc linked internally 
and are understood in the light of one and the same idea. If man is 
not to be embedded in the matrix of that syncretic setting in which 
animals lead their lives in a sort of ek-stase, if he is to be aware of a 
world as the common reason for all settings and the theatre of all 
patterns of behaviour, then between himself and what elicits his 
action a distance must be set, and, as Malebranche put it, forms of 
stimulation from outside must henceforth impinge on him 'respect- 
fully'; each momentary situation must cease to be, for him, the 
totality of being, each particular response must no longer fill his 
whole field of action. Furthermore, the elaboration of these re- 
sponses, instead of occurring at the centre of his existence, must take 
place on the periphery and finally the responses themselves must no 
longer demand that on each occasion some special position be taken 
up, but they must be outlined once and for all in their generality. 
Thus it is by giving up part of his spontaneity, by becoming involved 
in the world through stable organs and pre-established circuits that 
man can acquire the mental and practical space which will theoretic- 
ally free him from his environment and allow him to see it. And 
provided that even the realization of an objective world is set in the 
realm of existence, we shall no longer find any contradiction between 
it and bodily conditioning: it is an inner necessity for the most inte- 
grated existence to provide itself with an habitual body. What allows 
us to link to each other the 'physiological' and the 'psychic', is the 
fact that, when reintegrated into existence, they are no longer dis- 
tinguishable respectively as the order of the in-itself, and that of the 
for-itself, and that they are both directed towards an intentional 
pole or towards a world. Probably the two histories never quite 
coincide: one is commonplace and cyclic, the other may be open and 
unusual, and it would be necessary to keep the term 'history' for the 
second order of phenomena if history were a succession of events 
which not only have a meaning, but furnish themselves with it. 
However, failing a true revolution which breaks up historical 
categories so far valid, the figure in history does not create his part 
completely: faced with typical situations he takes typical decisions 
and Nicholas II, repeating the very words of Louis XVI, plays the 
already written part of established power in face of a new power. 
His decisions translate the a priori of a threatened prince as our 
reflexes translate a specific a priori. These stereotypes, moreover, are 
1 La Structure du Comportement, p. 55. 
87 



THE BODY 



not a destiny, and just as clothing, jewellery and love transfigure the 
biological needs from which they arise, in the same way within the 
cultural world the historical a priori is constant only for a given 
phase and provided that the balance of forces allows the same forms 
to remain. So history is neither a perpetual novelty, nor a perpetual 
repetition, but the unique movement which creates stable forms and 
breaks them up. The organism and its monotonous dialectical pro- 
cesses are therefore not alien to history and as it were inassimilable 
to it. Man taken as a concrete being is not a psyche joined to an 
organism, but the movement to and fro of existence which at one 
time allows itself to take corporeal form and at others moves towards 
personal acts. Psychological motives and bodily occasions may over- 
lap because there is not a single impulse in a living body which is 
entirely fortuitous in relation to psychic intentions, not a single 
mental act which has not found at least its germ or its general outline 
in physiological tendencies. It is never a question of the incompre- 
hensible meeting of two causalities, nor of a collision between the 
order of causes and that of ends. But by an imperceptible twist an 
organic process issues into human behaviour, an instinctive act 
changes direction and becomes a sentiment, or conversely a human 
act becomes torpid and is continued absent-mindedly in the form of 
a reflex. Between the psychic and the physiological there may take 
place exchanges which almost always stand in the way of defining a 
mental disturbance as psychic or somatic. The disturbance described 
as somatic produces, on the theme of the organic accident, tentative 
psychic commentaries, and the 'psychic' trouble confines itself to 
elaborating the human significance of the bodily event. A patient 
feels a second person implanted in his body. He is a man in half his 
body, a woman in the other half. How are we to distinguish in this 
symptom the physiological causes and psychological motives? How 
are we to associate the two explanations and how imagine any point 
at which the two determinants meet? 'In symptoms of this kind, the 
psychic and the physical are so intimately linked that it is unthink- 
able to try to complete one of these functional domains by the other, 
and that both must be subsumed under a third . . . (We must) . . . 
move on from knowledge of psychological and physiological facts to 
a recognition of the animic event as a vital process inherent in our 
existence'. 1 Thus, to the question which we were asking, modern 
physiology gives a very clear reply: the psycho-physical event can 
no longer be conceived after the model of Cartesian physiology and 
as the juxtaposition of a process in itself and a cogitatio. The union of 
soul and body is not an amalgamation between two mutually external 
1 E. Menninger-Lerchenthal, Das Truggebilde cler eigenen Gestalt, pp. 



88 



THE BODY AS OBJECT AND MECHANISTIC PHYSIOLOGY 

terms, subject and object, brought about by arbitrary decree. It is 
enacted at every instant in the movement of existence. We found 
existence in the body when we approached it by the first way of 
access, namely through physiology. We may therefore at this stage 
examine this first result and make it more explicit, by questioning 
existence this time on its own nature, which means, by having 
recourse to psychology. 



89 



2 

THE EXPERIENCE OF THE 
BODY AND CLASSICAL 
PSYCHOLOGY 



IN its descriptions of the body from the point of view of the self, 
classical psychology was already wont to attribute to it 'characteris- 
tics' incompatible with the status of an object. In the first place it was 
stated that my body is distinguishable from the table or the lamp in 
that I can turn away from the latter whereas my body is constantly 
perceived. It is therefore an object which does not leave me. But in 
that case is it still an object? If the object is an invariable structure, it 
is not one in spite of the changes of perspective, but in that change or 
through it. It is not the case that ever-renewed perspectives simply 
provide it with opportunities of displaying its permanence, and with 
contingent ways of presenting itself to us. It is an object, which means 
that it is standing in front of us, only because it is observable: situ- 
ated, that is to say, directly under our hand or gaze, indivisibly over- 
thrown and re-integrated with every movement they make. Otherwise 
it would be true like an idea and not present like a thing. It is par- 
ticularly true that an object is an object only in so far as it can be 
moved away from me, and ultimately disappear from my field of 
vision. Its presence is such that it entails a possible absence. Now the 
permanence of my own body is entirely different in kind: it is not at 
the extremity of some indefinite exploration; it defies exploration and 
is always presented to me from the same angle. Its permanence is not 
a permanence in the world, but a permanence from my point of view. 
To say that it is always near me, always there for mc, is to say that it 
is never really in front of me, that I cannot array it before my eyes, 
that it remains marginal to all my perceptions, that it is with me. It is 
true that external objects too never turn one of their sides to me with- 
out hiding the rest, but I can at least freely choose the side which they 

90 



THE EXPERIENCE OF THE BODY AND CLASSICAL PSYCHOLOGY 

are to present to me. They could not appear otherwise than in per- 
spective, but the particular perspective which I acquire at each 
moment is the outcome of no more than physical necessity, that is to 
say, of a necessity which I can use and which is not a prison for me: 
from my window only the tower of the church is visible, but this 
limitation simultaneously holds out the promise that from elsewhere 
the whole church could be seen. It is true, moreover, that if I am a 
prisoner the church will be restricted, for me, to a truncated steeple. 
If I did not take off my clothes I could never see the inside of them, 
and it will in fact be seen that my clothes may become appendages of 
my body. But this fact does not prove that the presence of my body is 
to be compared to the de facto permanence of certain objects, or the 
organ compared to a tool which is always available. It shows that 
conversely those actions in which I habitually engage incorporate 
their instruments into themselves and make them play a part in the 
original structure of my own body. As for the latter, it is my basic 
habit, the one which conditions all the others, and by means of which 
they are mutually comprehensible. Its permanence near to me, its 
unvarying perspective are not a de facto necessity, since such necessity 
presupposes them: in order that my window may impose upon me a 
point of view of the church, it is necessary in the first place that my 
body should impose upon me one of the world ; and the first necessity 
can be merely physical only in virtue of the fact that the second is 
metaphysical; in short, I am accessible to factual situations only if my 
nature is such that there are factual situations for me. In other words, 
I observe external objects with my body, I handle them, examine 
them, walk round them, but my body itself is a thing which I do not 
observe: in order to be able to do so, I should need the use of a second 
body which itself would be unobservable. When I say that my body is 
always perceived by me, these words are not to be taken in a purely 
statistical sense, for there must be, in the way my own body presents 
itself, something which makes its absence or its variation inconceiv- 
able. What can it be? My head is presented to my sight only to the 
extent of my nose end and the boundaries of my eye-sockets. I can 
see my eyes in three mirrors, but they are the eyes of someone observ- 
ing, and I have the utmost difficulty in catching rrry living glance when 
a mirror in the street unexpectedly reflects my image back at me. My 
body in the mirror never stops following my intentions like their 
shadow, and if observation consists in varying the point of view while 
keeping the object fixed, then it escapes observation and is given to 
me as a simulacrum of my tactile body since it imitates the body's 
actions instead of responding to them by a free unfolding of perspec- 
tives. My visual body is certainly an object as far as its parts far re- 
moved from my head are concerned, but as we come nearer to the 

91 



THE BODY 



eyes, it becomes divorced from objects, and reserves among them a 
quasi-space to which they have no access, and when I try to fill this 
void by recourse to the image in the mirror, it refers me back to an 
original of the body which is not out there among things, but in my 
own province, on this side of all things seen. It is no different, in 
spite of what may appear to be the case, with my tactile body, for if 
I can, with my left hand, feel my right hand as it touches an object, 
the right hand as an object is not the right hand as it touches: the 
first is a system of bones, muscles and flesh brought down at a point 
of space, the second shoots through space like a rocket to reveal the 
external object in its place. In so far as it sees or touches the world, my 
body can therefore be neither seen nor touched. What prevents its 
ever being an object, ever being 'completely constituted' 1 is that it is 
that by which there are objects. It is neither tangible nor visible in so 
far as it is that which sees and touches. The body therefore is not 
one more among external object, with the peculiarity of always 
being there. If it is permanent, the permanence is absolute and is 
the ground for the relative permanence of disappearing objects, real 
objects. The presence and absence of external objects are only vari- 
ations within a field of primordial presence, a perceptual domain 
over which my body exercises power. Not only is the permanence 
of my body not a particular case of the permanence of external 
objects in the world, but the second cannot be understood except 
through the first : not only is the perspective of my body not a particu- 
lar case of that of objects, but furthermore the presentation of objects 
in perspective cannot be understood except through the resistance of 
my body to all variation of perspective. If objects may never show me 
more than one of their facets, this is because I am myself in a certain 
place from which I see them and which I cannot see. If nevertheless I 
believe in the existence of their hidden sides and equally in a world 
which embraces them all and co-exists with them, I do so in so far as 
my body, always present for me, and yet involved with them in so 
many objective relationships, sustains their co-existence with it and 
communicates to them all the pulse of its duration. Thus the per- 
manence of one's own body, if only classical psychology had analysed 
it, might have led it to the body no longer conceived as an object of 
the world, but as our means of communication with it, Jo the world 
no longer conceived as a collection of determinate objects, but as the 
horizon latent in all our experience and itself ever-present and an- 
terior to every determining thought. 

1 Husserl, /^*7i T. II (unpublished). We arc indebted to Mgr Noel and the Insti- 
lut Sup^rieur de Philosophic of Louvain, trustees of the collected Nachlass, and 
particularly to the kindness of the Reverend Father Van Brdda, for having been 
able to consult a certain amount of unpublished material. 

92 



THE EXPERIENCE OF THE BODY AND CLASSICAL PSYCHOLOGY 

The other 'characteristics' whereby one's own body was defined 
were no less interesting, and for the same reasons. My body, it was 
said, is recognized by its power to give me 'double sensations': when 
I touch my right hand with my left, my right hand, as an object, has 
the strange property of being able to feel too. We have just seen that 
the two hands are never simultaneously in the relationship of touched 
and touching to each other. When I press my two hands together, it 
is not a matter of two sensations felt together as one perceives two 
objects placed side by side, but of an ambiguous set-up in which both 
hands can alternate the roles of 'touching' and being 'touched'. What 
was meant by talking about 'double sensations' is that, in passing 
from one role to the other, I can identify the hand touched as the 
same one which will in a moment be touching. In other words, in this 
bundle of bones and muscles which my right hand presents to my left, 
I can anticipate for an instant the integument or incarnation of that 
other right hand, alive and mobile, which I thrust towards things in 
order to explore them. The body catches itself from the outside en- 
gaged in a cognitive process; it tries to touch itself while being 
touched, and initiates 'a kind of reflection' 1 which is sufficient to dis- 
tinguish it from objects, of which I can indeed say that they 'touch' 
my body, but only when it is inert, and therefore without ever catch- 
ing it unawares in its exploratory function. 

It was also said that the body is an affective object, whereas exter- 
nal things are from my point of view merely represented. This 
amounted to stating a third time the problem of the status of my own 
body. For if I say that my foot hurts, I do not simply mean that it is 
a cause of pain in the same way as the nail which is cutting into it, 
differing only in being nearer to me; I do not mean that it is the last 
of the objects in the external world, after which a more intimate kind 
of pain should begin, an unlocalized awareness of pain in itself, re- 
lated to the foot only by some causal connection and within the 
closed system of experience. I mean that the pain reveals itself as 
localized, that it is constitutive of a 'pain-infested space'. 'My foot 
hurts' means not: 'I think that my foot is the cause of this pain', but: 
'the pain comes from my foot* or again 'my foot has a pain'. This is 
shown clearly by the 'primitive voluminousness of pain' formerly 
spoken of by psychologists. It was therefore recognized that my body 
does not present itself as the objects of external impressions do, and 
that perhaps even these latter objects do no more than stand out 
against the affective background which in the first place throws con- 
sciousness outside itself. 

Finally when the psychologists tried to confine 'kinaesthetic 

1 Husserl, Meditations carttsiennes, p. 81. 
93 



THE BODY 



sensations' to one's own body, arguing that these sensations pre- 
sent the body's movements to us globally, while attributing the 
movements of external objects to a mediating perception and to a 
comparison between successive positions, it could have been objected 
that movement, expressing a relationship, cannot be felt, but de- 
mands a mental operation. This objection, however, would merely 
have been an indictment of their language. What they were express- 
ing, badly it is true, by 'kinaesthetic sensation', was the originality of 
the movements which I perform with my body: they directly antici- 
pate the final situation, for my intention initiates a movement 
through space merely to attain the objective initially given at the 
starting point; there is as it were a germ of movement which only 
secondarily develops into an objective movement. I move external 
objects with the aid of my body, which takes hold of them in one 
place and shifts them to another. But my body itself I move directly, 
I do not find it at one point of objective space and transfer it to an- 
other, I have no need to look for it, it is already with me — I do not 
need to lead it towards the movement's completion, it is in contact 
with it from the start and propels itself towards that end. The rela- 
tionships between my decision and my body are, in movement, magic 
ones. 

If the description of my own body given by classical psychology 
already offered all that is necessary to distinguish it from objects, how 
does it come about that psychologists have not made this distinction 
or that they have in any case seen no philosophical consequence flow- 
ing from it? The reason is that, taking a step natural to them, they 
chose the position of impersonal thought to which science has been 
committed as long as it believed in the possibility of separating, in ob- 
servation, on the one hand what belongs to the situation of the ob- 
server and on the other the properties of the absolute object. For the 
living subject his own body might well be different from all external 
objects; the fact remains that for the unsituated thought of the 
psychologist the experience of the living subject became itself an 
object and, far from requiring a fresh definition of being, took its 
place in universal being. It was the life of the 'psyche' which stood in 
opposition to the real, but which was treated as a second reality, as 
an object of scientific investigation to be brought under a set of laws. 
It was postulated that our experience, already besieged by physics and 
biology, was destined to be completely absorbed into objective know- 
ledge, with the consummation of the system of the sciences. Thence- 
forth the experience of the body degenerated into a 'representation' 
of the body; it was not a phenomenon but a fact of the psyche. In the 
matter of living appearance, my visual body includes a large gap at 
the level of the head, but biology was there ready to fill that gap, to 

94 



THE EXPERIENCE OF THE BODY AND CLASSICAL PSYCHOLOGY 

explain it through the structure of the eyes, to instruct me in what the 
body really is, showing that I have a retina and a brain like other men 
and like the corpses which I dissect, and that, in short, the surgeon's 
instrument could infallibly bring to light in this indeterminate zone 
of my head the exact replica of plates illustrating the human anatomy. 
I apprehend my body as a subject-object, as capable of 'seeing' and 
'suffering', but these confused representations were so many psycho- 
logical oddities, samples of a magical variety of thought the laws of 
which arc studied by psychology and sociology and which has its 
place assigned to it by them, in the system of the real world, as an 
object of scientific investigation. This imperfect picture of my body, 
its marginal presentation, and its equivocal status as touching and 
touched, could not therefore be structural characteristics of the body 
itself; they did not affect the idea of it; they became 'distinctive 
characteristics' of those contents of consciousness which make up our 
representation of the body: these contents are consistent, affective 
and strangely duplicated in 'double sensations', but apart from this 
the representation of the body is a representation like any other and 
correspondingly the body is an object like any other. Psychologists 
did not realize that in treating the experience of the body in this way 
they were simply, in accordance with the scientific approach, shelving 
a problem which ultimately could not be burked. The inadequacy of 
my perception was taken as a de facto inadequacy resulting from the 
organization of my sensory apparatus; the presence of my body was 
taken as a de facto presence springing from its constant action on my 
receptive nervous system; finally the union of soul and body, which 
was presupposed by these two explanations, was understood, in 
Cartesian fashion, as a de facto union whose de jure possibility need 
not be established, because the fact, as the starting point of know- 
ledge, was eliminated from the final result. Now the psychologist 
could imitate the scientist and, for a moment at least, see his body as 
others saw it, and conversely see the bodies of others as mechanical 
things with no inner life. The contribution made from the experiences 
of others had the effect of dimming the structure of his own, and 
conversely, having lost contact with himself he became blind to the 
behaviour of others. He thus saw everything from the point of view 
of universal thought which abolished equally his experience of others 
and his experience of himself. But as a psychologist he was engaged 
in a task which by nature pulled him back into himself, and he could 
not allow himself to remain unaware to this extent. For whereas 
neither the physicist nor the chemist are the objects of their own in- 
vestigation, the psychologist was himself in the nature of the case, 
the fact which exercised him. This representation of the body, this 
magical experience, which he approached in a detached frame of 

95 



THE BODY 

mind, was himself; he lived it while he thought about it. It is true 
that, as has been shown, 1 it was not enough for him to be a psyche in 
order to know this, for this knowledge, like other knowledge, is 
acquired only through our relations with other people. It does not 
emerge from any recourse to an ideal of introspective psychology, and 
between himself and others no less than between himself and himself, 
the psychologist was able and obliged to rediscover a pre-objective 
relationship. But as a psyche speaking of the psyche, he was all that 
he was talking about. This history of the psyche which he was ela- 
borating in adopting the objective attitude was one whose outcome 
he already possessed within himself, or rather he was, in his existence, 
its contracted outcome and latent memory. The union of soul and 
body had not been brought about once and for all in a remote realm; 
it came into being afresh at every moment beneath the psychologist's 
thinking, not as a repetitive event which each time takes the psyche 
by surprise, but as a necessity that the psychologist knew to be in the 
depths of his being as he became aware of it as a piece of knowledge. 
The birth of perception from 'sense-data' to 'world' had to be re- 
newed with each act of perception, otherwise the sense-data would 
have lost the meaning they owed to this development. Hence the 
'psyche' was not an object like others: it had done everything 
that one was about to say of it before it could be said; the psychol- 
ogist's being knew more about itself than he did; nothing that 
had happened or was happening according to science was completely 
alien to it. Applied to the psyche, the notion of fact, therefore, un- 
derwent a transformation. The de facto psyche, with its 'peculiarities', 
was no longer an event in objective time and in the external world, 
but an event with which we were in internal contact, of which we were 
ourselves the ceaseless accomplishment or upsurge, and which con- 
tinually gathered within itself its past, its body and its world. Before 
being an objective fact, the union of soul and body had to be, then, 
a possibility of consciousness itself and the question arose as to what 
the perceiving subject is and whether he must be able to experience a 
body as his own. There was no longer a fact passively submitted to, 
but one assumed. To be a consciousness or rather to be an experience 
is to hold inner communication with the world, the body and other 
people, to be with them instead of being beside them. To concern 
oneself with psychology is necessarily to encounter, beneath objective 
thought which moves among ready-made things^a first opening upon 
things without which there would be no objective knowledge. The 
psychologist could not fail to rediscover himself as experience, which 
means as an immediate presence to the past, to the world, to the body 



1 P. Guillaume, V Object hite* en Psychologie. 
96 



THE EXPERIENCE OF THE BODY AND CLASSICAL PSYCHOLOGY 

and to others at the very moment when he was trying to see 
himself as an object among objects. Let us then return to the 
'characteristics' of one's own body and resume the study of it 
where we left off. By doing so we shall trace the progress of 
modern psychology and thereby effect along with it the return to 
experience. 



97 



3 

THE SPATIALITY OF ONE'S 
OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 



LET us first of all describe the spatiality of my own body. If my arm 
is resting on the table I should never fliink of saying that it is beside 
the ash-tray in the way in which the ash-tray is beside the telephone. 
The outline of my body is a frontier which ordinary spatial relations 
do not cross. This is because its parts are inter-related in a peculiar 
way: they are not spread out side by side, but enveloped in each 
other. For example, my hand is not a collection of points. In cases of 
allocheiria,* in which the subject feels in his right hand stimuli ap- 
plied to his left hand, it is impossible to suppose that each of the 
stimulations changes its spatial value on its own account. 1 The vari- 
ous points on the left hand are transferred to the right as relevant to a 
total organ, a hand without parts which has been suddenly displaced. 
Hence they form a system and the space of my hand is not a mosaic 
of spatial values. Similarly my whole body for me is not an assemblage 
of organs juxtaposed in space. I am in undivided possession of it and 
I know where each of my limbs is through a body image in which all 
are included. But the notion of body image is ambiguous, as are all 
notions which make their appearance at turning points in scientific 
advance. They can be fully developed only through a reform of 
methods. At first, therefore, they are used only in a sense which falls 
short of their full sense, and it is their immanent development which 
bursts the bounds of methods hitherto used. 'Body image' was at 
first understood to mean a compendium of our bodily experience, 
capable of giving a commentary and meaning to the internal impres- 

* A disorder of sensation in which sensations arc referred to the wrong part 
of the body (Translator's note). Cf. for example Head, On disturbances of sensation 
with especial reference to the pain of visceral disease. 

1 Ibid. We have discussed the notion of the local signal in La Structure du Com- 
portement, pp. 102 and IT. 

98 



THE SPATIALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 



sions and the impression of possessing a body at any moment. It was 
supposed to register for me the positional changes of the pans of my 
body for each movement of one of them, the position of each local 
stimulus in the body as a whole, an account of the movements per- 
formed at every instant during a complex gesture, in short a continual 
translation into visual language of the kinaesthetic and articular im : 
pressions of the moment. When the term body image was first used, 
it was thought that nothing more was being introduced than a con- 
venient name for a great many associations of images, and it was 
intended merely to convey the fact that these associations were firmly 
established and constantly ready to come into play. The body image 
was supposed gradually to show itself through childhood in propor- 
tion as the tactile, kinaesthetic and articular contents were associated 
among themselves or with visual contents, and more easily evoked 
them. 1 Its physiological representation could then be no more than a 
focus of images in the classical sense. Yet in the use made of it by 
psychologists, it is clear that the body image does not fit into this 
associationist definition. For example, in order that the body image 
may elucidate allocheiria, it is not enough that each sensation of the 
left hand should take its place among generic images of all parts of 
the body acting in association to form around the left hand, as it 
were, a superimposed sketch of the body; these associations must 
be constantly subject to a unique law, the spatiality of the body must 
work downwards from the whole to the parts, the left hand and its 
position must be implied in a comprehensive bodily purpose and must 
originate in that purpose, so that it may at one stroke not only be 
superimposed on or cleave to the right hand, but actually become the 
right hand. When we try 2 to elucidate the phenomenon of the phan- 
tom limb by relating it to the body image of the subject, we add to 
the accepted explanations, in terms of cerebral tracks and recurrent 
sensations, only if the body image, instead of being the residue of 
habitual cenesthesis, becomes the law of its constitution. If a need 
was felt to introduce this new word, it was in order to make it clear 
that the spatial and temporal unity, the inter-sensory or the*sensori- 
motor unity of the body is, so to speak, de jure, that it is not confined 
to contents actually and fortuitously associated in the course of our 
experience, that it is in some way anterior to them and makes their 
association possible. We are therefore feeling our way towards a 
second definition of the body image: it is no longer seen as the 

1 Cf. for example Head, Sensory disturbances from cerebral lesion, p. 189; 
Pick, Storungen der Orientierung am eigenen Korper, and even Schilder, Das 
Korperschema, although Schilder admits that 'such a complex is not the sum of 
its parts but a new whole in relation 'to them'. 

2 As for example Lhermitte, V Image de notre Corps. 

99 



THE BODY 



straightforward result of associations established during experience, 
but a total awareness of my posture in the intersensory world, a 
'form' in the sense used by Gestalt psychology. 1 But already this 
second definition too is superseded by the analyses of the psycho- 
logists. It is inadequate to say that my body is a form, that is to say 
a phenomenon in which the totality takes precedence over the parts. 
How is such a phenomenon possible? Because a form, compared to 
the mosaic of a physico-chemical body or to that of 'cenesthesis', is 
a new type of existence. The fact that the paralysed limb of the 
anosognosic no longer counts in the subject's body image, is ac- 
counted for by the body image's being neither the mere copy nor even 
the global awareness of the existing parts of the body, and by its 
active integration of these latter only in proportion to their value to 
the organism's projects. Psychologists often say that the body image 
is dynamic. 2 Brought down to a precise sense, this term means that 
my body appears to me as an attitude directed towards a certain 
existing or possible task. And indeed its spatiality is not, like that of 
external objects or like that of 'spatial sensations', a spatiality of 
position, but a spatiality of situation. If I stand in front of my desk and 
lean on it with both hands, only my hands are stressed and the whole 
of my body trails behind them like the tail of a comet. It is not that I 
am unaware of the whereabouts of my shoulders or back, but these 
are simply swallowed up in the position of my hands, and my whole 
posture can be read so to speak in the pressure they exert on the table. 
If I stand holding my pipe in my closed hand, the position of my hand 
is not determined discursively by the angle which it makes with my 
forearm, and my forearm with my upper arm, and my upper arm with 
my trunk, and my trunk with the ground. I know indubitably where 
my pipe is, and thereby I know where my hand and my body are, as 
primitive man in the desert is always able to take his bearings im- 
mediately without having to cast his mind back, and add up distances 
covered and deviations made since setting off. The word 'here' ap- 
plied to my body does not refer to a determinate position in relation 
to other positions or to external co-ordinates, but the laying down of 
the first co-ordinates, the anchoring of the active body in an object, 
the situation of the body in face of its tasks. Bodily space can be dis- 
tinguished from external space and envelop its parts instead of 
spreading them out, because it is the darkness needed in the theatre 
to show up the performance, the background of somnolence or re- 

1 Konrad, Das Korpet schema, eine kr 'uiscke Studie undder Versuch einer Revision, 
pp. 365 and 367. Burger-Prinz and Kaila define the body image as 'knowledge of 
one's own body as the collective expression both of the mutual relations of its 
limbs and of its parts'. Ibid., p. 365. 

1 Cf. for example Konrad, op. cit. 

100 



THE SPATIALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

serve of vague power against which the gesture and its aim 1 stand 
out, the zone of not being in front of which precise beings, figures and 
points can come to light. In the last analysis, if my body can be a 
'form' and if there can be, in front of it, important figures against in- 
different backgrounds, this occurs in virtue of its being polarized by 
its tasks, of its existence towards them, of its collecting together of 
itself in its pursuit of its aims; the body image is finally a way of 
stating that my body is in-the- world. 2 As far as spatiality is concerned, 
and this alone interests us at the moment, one's own body is the third 
term, always tacitly understood, in the figure-background structure, 
and every figure stands out against the double horizon of external 
and bodily space. One must therefore reject as an abstraction any 
analysis of bodily space which takes account only of figures and 
points, since these can neither be conceived nor be without horizons. 

It will perhaps be replied that the figure-background structure or 
the point-horizon structure themselves presuppose the notion of ob- 
jective space; that in order to experience a display of dexterity as a 
figure against the massive background of the body, the hand and the 
rest of the body must be linked by this relationship of objective spa- 
tiality, so that the figure-background structure becomes once again 
one of the contingent contents of the universal form of space. But 
what meaning could the word 'against' have for a subject not placed 
by his body face to face with the world? It implies the distinction of 
a top and a bottom, or an 'orientated space'. 3 When I say that an ob- 
ject is on a table, I always mentally put myself either in the table or 
in the object, and I apply to them a category which theoretically fits 
the relationship of my body to external objects. Stripped of this 
anthropological association, the word on is indistinguishable from 
the word 'under' or the word 'beside'. Even if the universal form of 
space is that without which there would be for us no bodily space, it 
is not that by which there is one. Even if the form is not the setting in 
which, but the means whereby the content is posited, it is not the suffi- 
cient means of this act of positing as far as bodily space is concerned, 
and to this extent the bodily content remains, in relation to it, some- 
thing opaque, fortuitous and unintelligible. The only solution along 
this road would be to acknowledge that the body's spatiality has no 
meaning of its own to distinguish it from objective spatiality, which 
would do away with the content as a phenomenon and hence with 
the problem of its relation to form. But can we pretend to discover 

1 Griinbaum, Asphasie und Motorik, p. 395. 

1 We have already seen (cf. supra pp. 81-2) that the phantom limb, which is 
a modality of the body image, is understood in terms of the general movement 
of being-in-the- world. 

3 Cf. Becker, Beitrdge zur phdnomenologischen Begriindung der Geometrie und 
ihren physikalischen Anwendungen. 

101 



THE BODY 

no distinctive meaning in the words 4 on\ 'under', Reside', or in the 
dimensions of orientated space? Even if analysis discovers in all these 
relationships the universal relation of externality, the self-evidentness 
of top and bottom, right and left, for the person who has his being in 
space, prevents us from treating all these distinctions as nonsense, 
and suggests to us that we should look beneath the explicit meaning 
of definitions for the latent meaning of experiences, The relationships 
between the two spaces would therefore be as follows: as soon as I 
try to posit bodily space or bring out its meaning I find nothing in it 
but intelligible space. But at the same time this intelligible space is 
not extracted from orientated space, it is merely its explicit expression, 
and, when separated from that root has no meaning whatsoever. The 
truth is that homogeneous space can convey the meaning of orient- 
ated space only because it is from the latter that it has received that 
meaning. In so far as the content can be really subsumed under the 
form and can appear as the content of that form, it is because the 
form is accessible only through the content. Bodily space can really 
become a fragment of objective space only if within its individuality 
as bodily space it contains the dialectical ferment to transform it into 
universal space. This is what we have tried to express by saying that 
the point-horizon structure is the foundation of space. The horizon 
or background would not extend beyond the figure or round about 
it, unless they partook of the same kind of being as the figure, and un- 
less they could be converted into points by a transference of the gaze. 
But the point-horizon structure can teach me what a point is only in 
virtue of the maintenance of a hither zone of corporeality from which 
to be seen, and round about it indeterminate horizons which are the 
counterpart of this seeing. The multiplicity of points or 'heres' can in 
the nature of tilings be constituted only by a chain of experiences in 
which on each occasion one and no more of them is presented as an 
object, and which is itself built up in the heart of this space. And 
finally, far from my body's being for me no more than a fragment of 
space, there would be no space at all for me if I had no body. 

If bodily space and external space form a practical system, the 
first being the background against which the object as the goal of our 
action may stand out or the void in front of which it may come to 
light, it is clearly in action that the spatiality of our body is brought 
into being, and an analysis of one's own movement should enable us 
to arrive at a better understanding of it. By considering the body in 
movement, we can see better how it inhabits space (and, moreover, 
time) because movement is not limited to submitting passively to 
space and time, it actively assumes them, it takes them up in their 
basic significance which is obscured in the commonplaceness of 
established situations. We should like to analyse closely an example of 

102 



THE SPATI ALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

morbid motility which clearly shows the fundamental relations be- 
tween the body and space. 

A patient 1 whom traditional psychiatry would class among cases 
of psychic blindness is unable to perform 'abstract' movements with 
his eyes shut ; movements, that is, which are not relevant to any actual 
situation, such as moving arms and legs to order, or bending and 
straightening a finger. Nor can he describe the position of his body 
or even his head, or the passive movements of his limbs. Finally, 
^vhen his head, arm or leg is touched, he cannot identify the point on 
his body; he cannot distinguish two points of contact on his skin even 
as much as three inches apart; and he cannot recognize the size or 
shape of objects placed against his body. He manages the abstract 
movements only if he is allowed to watch the limb required to per- 
form them, or to go through preparatory movements involving the 
whole body. The localization of stimuli, and recognition of objects 
by touch also become possible with the aid of the preparatory move- 
ments. Even when his eyes are closed, the patient performs with 
extraordinary speed and precision the movements needed in living 
his life, provided that he is in the habit of performing them: he takes 
his handkerchief from his pocket and blows his nose, takes a match 
out of a box and lights a lamp. He is employed in the manufacture of 
wallets and his production rate is equal to three quarters of that of a 
normal workman. He can even 2 without any preparatory movement, 
perform these 'concrete' movements to order. In the same patient, and 
also in cerebellar cases, one notices 3 a dissociation of the act of point- 
ing from reactions of taking or grasping: the same subject who is un- 
able to point to order to a part of his body, quickly moves his hand 
to the point where a mosquito is stinging him. Concrete movements 
and acts of grasping therefore enjoy a privileged position for which 
we need to find some explanation. 

Let us examine the question more closely. A patient, asked to 
point to some part of his body, his nose for example, can only manage 
to do so if he is allowed to take hold of it. If the patient is set the 
task of interrupting the movement before its completion, or if he is 
allowed to touch his nose only with a wooden ruler, the action be- 
comes impossible. 4 It must therefore be concluded that 'grasping' or 
'touching', even for the body, is different from 'pointing'. From the 

1 Gelb and Goldstein, Vber den Einfluss des vollstcindigen Verlustes des optischen 
Vorstellungsvenndgens auf das taktile Erkennen. — Psychologische Analyscn him- 
pathologischer Fade, Chap. II, pp. 157-250. 

2 Goldstein, Vber die Abhiingigkeit der Bewegungen von optischen Vorgdngen. 
This second work makes use of observations made on the same patient, Schneider, 
two years after those collected in the work just referred to. 

3 Goldstein, Zeigen und Greifen, pp. 453-66. 

4 Ibid. This is a cerebellar case. 

103 



THF BODY 

outset the grasping movement is magically at its completion; it can 
begin only by anticipating its end, since to disallow taking hold is 
sufficient to inhibit the action. And it has to be admitted that a point 
on my body can be present to me as one to be taken hold of without 
being given in this anticipated grasp as a point to be indicated. But 
how is this possible ? If I know where my nose is when it is a question 
of holding it, how can I not know where it is when it is a matter of 
pointing to it? It is probably because knowledge of where something 
is can be understood in a number of ways. Traditional psychology 
has no concept to cover these varieties of consciousness of place 
because consciousness of place is always, for such psychology, a 
positional consciousness, a representation, Vor-stellung, because as 
such it gives us the place as a determination of the objective world 
and because such a representation either is or is not, but, if it is, 
yields the object to us quite unambiguously and as an end identifiable 
through all its appearances. Now here, on the other hand, we have to 
create the concepts necessary to convey the fact that bodily space may 
be given to me in an intention to take hold without being given in an 
intention to know. The patient is conscious of his bodily space as the 
matrix of his habitual action, but not as an objective setting; his body 
is at his disposal as a means of ingress into a familiar surrounding, 
but not as the means of expression of a gratuitous and free spatial 
thought. When ordered to perform a concrete movement, he first of 
all repeats the order in a questioning tone of voice, then his body 
assumes the general position required for the task; finally he goes 
through the movement. It is noticeable that the whole body is in- 
volved in it, and that the patient never cuts it down, as a normal sub- 
ject wonld, to the strict minimum. To the military salute are added 
the other external marks of respect. To the right hand pantomime of 
combing the hair is added, with the left, that of holding a mirror; 
when the right hand pretends to knock in a nail, the left pretends to 
hold the nail. The explanation is that the order is taken quite seri- 
ously and that the patient manages to perform these concrete move- 
ments to order only provided that he places himself mentally in the 
actual situation to which they correspond. The normal subject, on 
giving, to order, a military salute, sees in it no more than an ex- 
perimental situation, and therefore restricts the movement to its most 
important elements and does not throw himself into it. 1 He is using 
his body as a means to playacting; he finds it entertaining to pretend 
to be a soldier; he escapes from reality in the role of the soldier 2 just 
as the actor slips his real body into the 'great phantom' 3 of the 

1 Goldstein, Vber die Abhangigkeit, p. 175. 

2 J. P. Sartre, Vlmaginaire, p. 243. 

3 Diderot, Paradoxc sur le ComMien. 

104 



THE SPAT1 ALITY Or ONT'.S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

character to be played. The normal man and the actor do not mistake 
imaginary situations for reality, but extricate their real bodies from 
the living situation to make them breathe, speak and, if need be, weep 
in the realm of imagination. This is what our patient is no longer able 
to do. In the course of living, he says 'I experience the movements as 
being a result of the situation, of the sequence of events themselves; 
myself and my movements are, so to speak, merely a link in the whole 
process and I am scarcely aware of any voluntary initiative ... It all 
happens independently of me,' In the same way, in order to make a 
movement to order he places himself 4 in the affective situation as a 
whole, and it is from this that the movement flows, as in real life 1 . 1 If 
his performance is interrupted and he has the experimental situation 
recalled to him, all his dexterity disappears. Once more kinetic initia- 
tive becomes impossible, the patient must first of all 'find' his arm, 
'find', by the preparatory movements, the gesture called for, and the 
gesture itself loses the melodic character which it presents in ordinary 
life, and becomes manifestly a collection of partial movements strung 
laboriously together. I can therefore take my place, through the 
medium of my body as the potential source of a certain number of 
familiar actions, in my environment conceived as a set of manipulanda 
and without, moreover, envisaging my body or my surrounding as 
objects in the Kantian sense, that is, as systems of qualities linked by 
some intelligible law, as transparent entities, free from any attach- 
ment to a specific place or time, and ready to be named or at least 
pointed out. There is my arm seen as sustaining familiar acts, my 
body as giving rise to determinate action having a field or scope 
known to me in advance, there are my surroundings as a collection 
of possible points upon which this bodily action may operate, — and 
there is, furthermore, my arm as a mechanism of muscles and bones, 
as a contrivance for bending and stretching, as an articulated ob- 
ject, the world as a pure spectacle into which I am not absorbed, 
but which I contemplate and point out. As far as bodily space is 
concerned, it is clear that there is a knowledge of place which is 
reducible to a sort of co-existence with that place, and which is 
not simply nothing, even though it cannot be conveyed by a descrip- 
tion or even by the mute reference of a gesture. A patient of the 
kind discussed above, when stung by a mosquito, does not need 
to look for the place where he has been stung. He finds it straight 
away, because for him there is no question of locating it in relation to 
axes of co-ordinates in objective space, but of reaching with his 
phenomenal hand a certain painful spot on his phenomenal body, 
and because between the hand as a scratching potentiality and the 
place stung as a spot to be scratched a directly experienced relationship 
1 Goldstein, Uber die AbMngigkeit, pp. 175-6. 
105 



THE BODY 



is presented in the natural system of one's own body. The whole 
operation takes place in the domain of the phenomenal; it does not 
run through the objective world, and only the spectator, who lends 
his objective representation of the living body to the acting subject, 
can believe that the sting is perceived, that the hand moves in objec- 
tive space, and consequently find it odd that the same subject should 
fail in experiments requiring him to point things out. Similarly the 
subject, when put in front of his scissors, needle and familiar tasks, 
does not need to look for his hands or his fingers, because they are 
not objects to be discovered in objective space: bones, muscles and 
nerves, but potentialities already mobilized by the perception of scis- 
sors or needle, the central end of those 'intentional threads' which 
link him to the objects given. It is never our objective body that we 
move, but our phenomenal body, and there is no mystery in that, 
since our body, as the potentiality of this or that part of the world, 
surges towards objects to be grasped and perceives them. 1 In the 
same way the patient has no need to look for a theatre of action and 
a space in which to deploy these concrete movements: the space is 
given to him in the form of the world at this moment; it is the piece 
of leather 'to be cut up'; it is the lining 'to be sewn'. The bench, scis- 
sors, pieces of leather offer themselves to the subject as poles of 
action; through their combined values they delimit a certain situa- 
tion, an open situation moreover, which calls for a certain mode of 
resolution, a certain kind l)f work. The body is no more than an 
element in the system of the subject and his world, and the task to be 
performed elicits the necessary movements from him by a sort of 
remote attraction, as the phenomenal forces at work in my visual 
field elicit from me, without any calculation on my part, the motor 
reactions which establish the most effective balance between them, or 
as the conventions of our social group, or our set of listeners, im- 
mediately elicit from us the words, attitudes and tone which are fit- 
ting. Not that we are trying to conceal our thoughts or to please 
others, but because we are literally what others think of us and what 
our world is. In the concrete movement the patient has a positing 
awareness neither of the stimulus nor of his reaction: quite simply he 
is his body and his body is the potentiality of a certain world. 

1 It is not a question of how the soul acts on the objective body, since it is not 
on the latter that it acts, but on the phenomenal body. So the question has to be 
reframed, and we must ask why there are two views of me and of my body: my 
body for me and my body for others, and how these two systems can exist to- 
gether. It is indeed not enough to say that the objective body belongs to the realm 
of 'for others*, and my phenomenal body lo that of 'for me', and we cannot refuse 
to pose the problem of their relations, since the 'for mc 1 and the 'for others' co- 
exist in one and the same world, as is proved by my perception of an other who 
immediately brings me back to the condition of an object for him. 

106 



TIIF SPAT1 ALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

What, on the other hand, happens in experiments in which the 
patient fails? If a part of his body is touched and he is asked to locate 
the point of contact, he first of all sets his whole body in motion and 
thus narrows down the problem of location, then he comes still 
nearer by moving the limb in question, and the process is completed 
in the form of quiverings of the skin in the neighbourhood of the 
point touched. 1 Jf the subject's arm is extended horizontally, he can- 
not describe its position until he has performed a set of pcndular 
movements which convey to him the arm position in relation to the 
trunk, that of the forearm to the rest of the arm, and that of the trunk 
in relation to the vertical. In the case of passive movement, the subject 
feels that there is movement but cannot say of what kind and in what 
direction. Here again he resorts to active movements. The patient 
concludes that he is lying down from the pressure of the mattress on 
his back, or that he is standing from the pressure of the ground on his 
feet. 2 If the two points of a compass are placed on his hand, he can 
distinguish them only if he is allowed to rotate his hand, and bring 
first one and then the other point into contact with his skin. If letters 
or figures are traced out on his hand, he identifies them only provided 
that he can himself move his hand, and it is not the movement of the 
point on his hand which he perceives, but conversely the movement 
of his hand in relation to the point. This is proved by tracing on his 
left hand normal letters, which are never recognized, then the mir- 
rored image of the same letters, which is immediately understood. 
The mere touching of a paper rectangle or oval gives rise to no 
recognition, whereas the subject recognizes the figures if he is allowed 
to make exploratory movements to 'spell out' the shapes, to spot 
their 'characteristics' and to identify the object on this basis. 3 How 
are we to co-ordinate this set of facts and how are we to discover by 
means of it what function, found in the normal person, is absent in 
the patient? There can be no question of simply transferring to the 
normal person what the deficient one lacks and is trying to recover. 
Illness, like childhood and 'primitive' mentality, is a complete form 
of existence and the procedures which it employs to replace normal 
functions which have been destroyed are equally pathological pheno- 
mena. It is impossible to deduce the normal from the pathological, 
deficiencies from the substitute functions, by a mere change of the 
sign. We must take substitutions as substitutions, as allusions to some 

1 Goldstein, Vber den Einfluss . . ., pp. 167-206. 

2 Ibid., pp. 206-13. 

3 For example, the subjeel runs his fingers over an angle several limes: 'My 
fingers/ he says, 'move straight along, then slop, and ihcn move ofT again in 
another direction; it rs an angle, it must be a right angle.' — 'Two, three, four 
angles, the sides are each two centimetres long, so they are equal, all the angles 
are right angles . . . It's a dice/ Ibid., p. 195. Cf. pp. 187-206. 

107 



THE BODY 



fundamental function that they are. striving to make good, and the 
direct image of which they fail to furnish. The genuine inductive 
method is not a 'differential method*; it consists in correctly reading 
phenomena, in grasping their meaning, that is, in treating them as 
modalities and variations of the subject's total being. We observe 
that when the patient is questioned about the position of his limbs or 
of a tactile stimulus, he tries, by means of preparatory movements, to 
make his body into an object of present perception. Asked about the 
shape of an object in contact with his body, he tries to trace it out 
himself by following the outline of the object. Nothing would be more 
misleading than to suppose the normal person adopting similar 
procedures, differing merely in being shortened by constant use. The 
kind of patient under consideration sets out in search of these explicit 
perceptions only in order to provide a substitute for a certain mutual 
presence of body and object which is a datum of normal experience 
and which we still have to reconstitute. It is true that even in the nor- 
mal person the perception of the body and of objects in contact with 
the body is vague when there is no movement. 1 The fact remains that 
the normal person can, in the absence of any movements, always dis- 
tinguish a stimulus applied to his head from one applied to his body. 
Are we to suppose that 2 excitations felt as coming either from outside 
or from one's own body have brought into play, in that person, 
'kinaesthetic residua' which take the place of actual movements? But 
then how could data supplied by the sense of touch arouse 'kin- 
aesthetic residua' of a determinate kind unless they carried within 
themselves some characteristic which enables them to do so, unless 
they themselves, in other words, had some well defined or obscure 
spatial significance? 3 At least we can say that the normal subject can 
immediately 'come to grips' with his body. 4 He enjoys the use of his 
body not only in so far as it is involved in a concrete setting, he is in 
a situation not only in relation to the tasks imposed by a particular 
job, he is not open merely to real situations; for, over and above all 
this, his body is correlated with pure stimuli devoid of any practical 
bearing; he is open to those verbal and imaginary situations which he 
can choose for himself or which may be suggested to him in the 
course of an experiment. His body, when touched, is not presented to 
him as a geometrical outline in which each stimulus occupies an 
explicit position, and Schneider's disease lies precisely in his need, 
in order to find out where he is being touched, to convert the 
bodily area touched into a shape. But each stimulus applied to 

1 Goldstein, Vber den Einfluss . . ., pp. 206-13. 

2 As Goldstein docs, ibid., pp. 167-206. 

3 Cf. supra ihe general discussion of the 'association of ideas', pp. 17 and rV. 
* A patient named Schneider says he needs Anhaltspunkfe. 

108 



THE SPATI ALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

the body of the normal person arouses a kind of potential move- 
ment', rather than an actual one; the part of the body in question 
sheds its anonymity, is revealed, by the presence of a particular ten- 
sion, as a certain power of action within the framework of the ana- 
tomical apparatus. In the case of the normal subject, the body is 
available not only in real situations into which it is drawn. It can turn 
aside from the world, apply its activity to stimuli which affect its 
sensory surfaces, lend itself to experimentation, and generally speak- 
ing take its place in the realm of the potential. It is because of its con- 
finement within the actual that an unsound sense of touch calls for 
special movements designed to localize stimuli, and for the same 
reason the patient substitutes, for tactile recognition and perception, 
a laborious decoding of stimuli and deduction of objects. For a key, 
for instance, to appear as such in my tactile experience, a kind of 
fulness of touch is required, a tactile field in which local impressions 
may be co-ordinated into a shape just as notes are mere stepping- 
stones in a melody; and that very viscosity of tactile data which 
makes the body dependent upon actual situations reduces the object 
to a collection of successive 'characteristics', perception to an abstract 
account, recognition to a rational synthesis or a plausible conjecture, 
and strips the object of its carnal presence and facticity. Whereas in 
the normal person every event related to movement or sense of touch 
causes consciousness to put up a host of intentions which run from 
the body as the centre of potential action either towards the body 
itself or towards the object, in the case of the patient, on the other 
hand, the tactile impression remains opaque and sealed up. It may 
well draw the grasping hand towards itself, but does not stand in 
front of the hand in the manner of a thing which can be pointed out. 
The normal person reckons with the possible, which thus, without 
shifting from its position as a possibility, acquires a sort of actuality. 
In the patient's case, however, the field of actuality is limited to what 
is met with in the shape of a real contact or is related to these data by 
some explicit process of deduction. 

The analysis of 'abstract movement' in patients throws into relief 
this possession of space, this spatial existence which is the primary 
condition of all living perception. If the patient is ordered to shut his 
eyes and then perform an abstract movement, a set of preparatory 
operations is called for in order to enable him to 'find 1 the operative 
limb, the direction or pace of the movement, and finally the plane in 
which it is to be executed. If, for instance, he is ordered to move his 
arm, with no detail as to how, he is first of all perplexed. Then he 
moves his whole body and after a time his movements are confined 
to his arm, which the subject eventually 'finds'. It it is a question of 
'raising his arm' the patient must also 'find' his head (which symbolizes 

109 



THE BODY 



'up' for him) by means of a set of pendulum movements which are 
continued throughout the action and which serve to establish the 
objective. If the subject is asked to trace a square or a circle in the air, 
he first 'finds' his arm, then lifts it in front of him as a normal subject 
would do to find a wall in the dark and finally he makes a few rough 
movements in a straight line or describing various curves, and if one 
of these happens to be circular he promptly completes the circle. 
Moreover he can find the requisite movement only in a certain plane, 
which is not quite perpendicular to the ground, and apart from this 
special plane he cannot begin to trace the figures. 1 Clearly the patient 
finds in his body only an amorphous mass into which actual move- 
ment alone introduces divisions and links. In looking to his body to 
perform the movement for him he is like a speaker who cannot utter 
a word without following a text written beforehand. The patient him- 
self neither seeks nor finds his movement, but moves his body about 
until the movement comes. The order given is not meaningless to 
him, since he recognizes the inadequacy of his first attempts, and also 
since, if a fortuitous gesture produces the required movement, he is 
aware of it and can immediately turn his piece of good fortune to 
account. But if the order has an intellectual significance for him and 
not a motor one, it does not communicate anything to him as a 
mobile subject; he may well find in the shape of a movement per- 
formed an illustration of the order given, but he can never convert 
the thought of a movement into actual movement. What he lacks is 
neither motility nor thought, and we are brought to the recognition 
of something between movement as a third person process and 
thought as a representation of movement — something which is an 
anticipation of, or arrival at, the objective and is ensured by the body 
itself as a motor power, a 'motor project' {Bewegungsentmirf), a 
'motor intentionality' in the absence of which the order remains a 
dead letter. The patient either conceives the ideal formula for the 
movement, or else he launches his body into blind attempts to per- 
form it, whereas for the normal person every movement is, indis- 
solubly, movement and consciousness of movement. This can be ex- 
pressed by saying that for the normal person every movement has a 
background, and that the movement and its background are 'moments 
of a unique totality'. 2 The background to the movement is not a re- 
presentation associated or linked externally with the movement itself, 
but is immanent in the movement inspiring and sustaining it at every 
moment. The plunge into action is, from the subject's point of view, 

1 Goldstein, Ober den Einfluss* . ., pp.*213-22. 

2 Goldstein, Ober die Abhangigkeil, p. 161 ; Bewegung und Hintergrund bcsiiir.- 
men sich wcchselscilig, sind eigcntlich nur zwei herausgcgrifTene Momente eines 
einheitlichcn Ganzes. 



110 



THE SPATI ALITY OF ONE'S OWN HODY AND MOTILITY 

an original way of relating himself to the object, and is on the same 
footing as perception. Light is thus thrown upon the distinction be- 
tween abstract and concrete movement: the background to concrete 
movement is the world as given, whereas the background to abstract 
movement is built up. When I motion my friend to come nearer, my 
intention is not a thought prepared within me and I do not perceive 
the signal in my body. I beckon across the world, I beckon over there, 
where my friend is; the distance between us, his consent or refusal are 
immediately read in my gesture ; there is not a perception followed by 
a movement, for both form a system which varies as a whole. If, 
for example, realizing that I am not going to be obeyed, I vary my 
gesture, we have here, not two distinct acts of consciousness. What 
happens is that I see my partner's unwillingness, and my gesture of — 
impatience emerges from this situation without any intervening 
thought. 1 If I then execute 'the same* movement, but without having 
any present or even imaginary partner in mind, and treat it as 'a set 
of movements in themselves*; 2 if, that is, I perform a 'flexion' of the 
forearm in relation to the upper arm, with 'supination' of the arm and 
'flexion' of the fingers, my body, which a moment ago was the vehicle 
of the movement, now becomes its end ; its motor project is no longer 
directed towards someone in the world, but towards my fore and 
upper arm, and my fingers; and it is directed towards them, further- 
more, in so far as they are capable of breaking with their involvement 
in the given world and giving shape round about me to an imaginary 
situation, or even in so far as, independently of any fictitious partner, 
I look with curiosity upon this strange signifying contrivance and set 
it to work for my amusement. 3 The abstract movement carves out 
within that plenum of the world in which concrete movement took 
place a zone of reflection and subjectivity; it superimposes upon 
physical space a potential or human space. Concrete movement is 
therefore centripetal whereas abstract movement is centrifugal. The 
former occurs in the realm of being or of the actual, the latter on the 
other hand in that of the possible or the non-existent; the first adheres 
to a given background, the second throws out its own background. 
The normal function which makes abstract movement possible is one 
of 'projection' whereby the subject of movement keeps in front of 
him an area of free space in which what does not naturally exist may 
take on a semblance of existence. One knows of patients with powers 

1 Goldstein, Ober die Abhcingigkeit, . . ., p. 161. 

2 Ibid. 

3 Goldstein {Vber die Abhangigkeit . . ., pp. 160 and fT.) merely says lhat the 
background of abstract movement is the body, and this is true in that the body 
during abstract movement is no longer merely the vehicle, but becomes the aim 
of the movement. Nevertheless, by changing function, it also changes its existen- 
tial modality and passes from the actual to the possible. 

Ill 



THE BODY 

less seriously affected than Schneider's who perceive forms, distances 
and objects in themselves, but who are unable either to trace in objects 
the directions which are useful from the point of view of action, or 
to arrange them according to some given principle, or generally to 
assign to the spatial scerfe delimitations in human terms which make 
it the field of our action. For instance, patients faced with a dead end 
in a labyrinth have difficulty in finding 'the opposite direction'. If a 
ruler is laid between them and the doctor they cannot, to order, dis- 
tribute the objects between 'their side' and 'the doctor's side'. They 
are very inaccurate in pointing out, on another person's arm, the 
point corresponding to the one stimulated on their own. Knowing 
that the month is March and the day a Monday, they will have diffi- 
culty in saying what the previous month and day were, though they 
may well know by heart the days and months in their correct order. 
They are incapable of comparing the number of units contained in 
two sets of sticks placed in front of them: they may count the same 
stick twice over, or else include in one set of sticks some which belong 
to the other. 1 The reason is that all these operations require the same 
ability to mark out boundaries and directions in the given world, to 
establish lines of fprce, to keep perspectives in view, in a word, to 
organize the given world in accordance with the projects of the pre- 
sent moment, to build into the geographical setting a behavioural 
one, a system of meanings outwardly expressive of the subject's inter- 
nal activity. For these patients the world exists only as one ready- 
made or congealed, whereas for the normal person his projects 
polarize the world, bringing magically to view a host of signs which 
guide action, as notices in a museum guide the visitor. This function 
of 'projection' or 'summoning' (in the sense in which the meSium 
summons an absent person and causes him to appear) is also what 
makes abstract movement possible: for, in order to be in possession 
of my body independently of any urgent task to be performed; in 
order to enjoy the use of it as the mood takes me, in order to describe 
in the air a movement formulated only verbally or in terms of moral 
requirements, I must reverse the natural relationship in which the 
body stands to its environment, and a human productive power must 
reveal itself through the density of being. 

It is in these terms that the disorder discernible in the movements 
in question may be described. But it may be thought that this descrip- 
tion (and this criticism has often been made of psychoanalysis) 2 

1 Van Woerkom, Sur la notion de Tespace He sens geometrique), pp. 1 13-19. 

* Cf. for example, H. Le Savoureux, 4 Un philosophe en face de la Psychanalyse', 
Nouvelle Revue Franeaise, February 1939. 'For Freud the mere fact of having 
related symptoms to each other through plausible logical links is a sufficient con- 
firmation that a psychoanalytical interpretation, which means a psychological 
one, is soundly based. The adoption of logical coherency as the criterion for 

112 



THE SPATIALITY Or ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

presents to us only the significance or essence of the disease and not 
its cause. Science, it may be objected, waits upon explanation, which 
means looking beneath phenomena for the circumstances upon which 
they depend, in accordance with the tried methods of induction. 
Here, for example, we know that the motor disorders of Schneider 
are related to far-reaching disorders of sight, which in turn arise from 
the occipital injury which lies at the root of his condition. Schneider 
does not recognize any object by merely looking at it. 1 His visual 
data are almost-amorphous patches. 2 As for objects not in sight, he is 
unable to form any visual image of them. 3 It is known, on the other 
hand, that 'abstract' movements become possible for the subject 
provided that he keeps his eyes fixed on the limb which is to perform 
them. 4 Thus the remnant of volitional motility is aided by what 
remains of visual knowledge. The famous methods of Mill might 
allow us to conclude here that abstract movements and Zeigen are 
dependent on the power of visual representation, whereas concrete 
movements, which are preserved by the patient as are those imitative 
movements, whereby he compensates for his paucity of visual data, 
arise from the kinaesthetic or tactile sense, which incidentally was 
remarkably exploited by Schneider. It would appear, then, that the 
distinction between concrete and abstract movement, like that be- 
tween Greifen and Zeigen, is reducible to the traditional distinction 
between tactile and visual, and the function of projection or evoca- 
tion, which we brought to light above, to perception and visual 
representation. 5 



accepting an interpretation beings Freudian proof much nearer to metaphysical 
deduction than to scientific explanation ... In medical treatment of mental 
disease, psychological plausibility isregarded as practically worthless in the in- 
vestigation of causes* (p. 318). 

1 He succeeds only by being allowed imitative movements' (nachfahrende 
Bewegungen) of the head, hands or fingers which sketch in the imperfect outline of 
the object. Gelb and Goldstein, Zur Psychologie des optischen Wahrnehmxmgs-und 
Erkennungsvorganges, Psychologische Analysen hirnpathologischer Falle, Chap. I. 

* The patient's visual data lack any specific and characteristic structure. His 
impressions, unlike those of a normal person's, have no firm configuration; they 
have not, for instance, the typical look of a "square", a "triangle", a "straight 
line" or a "curve". Before him he sees only patches in which his sight allows him 
to pick out only salient characteristics, such as height and breadth and their rela- 
tion to each other'. (Ibid., p.* 77.) A gardener sweeping a path fifty yards away is 
'a long streak with something moving backwards and forwards towards the top 
of it' (p. 108). In the street the patient distinguishes men from vehicles by the fact 
that 'men are all the same; long and thin — vehicles are wide, unmistakeably so, 
and much thicker' (ibid.). 

3 Ibid., p. 116. 

4 Gelb and Goldstein, Vber den Einfluss . . ., pp. 213-22. 

* It was in this sense that Gelb and Goldstein interpreted Schneider's case in 
the first works which they devoted to him (Zur Psychologie . . . and Vber den 

113 



THH BODY 



In reality, an inductive analysis carried out according to Mill's 
methods is fruitless. For the disturbances of abstract movement and 
Zeigen are encountered not only in cases of psychological blindness, 
but also in cerebellar patients and in many other disorders. 1 There is 
no justification for picking out as crucial just one of these concord- 
ances and using it to 'explain' the act of pointing out. In face of the 
ambiguity of facts one must abandon the mere statistical noting- 
down of coincidences, and try to 'understand' the relation which they 
reveal. In cerebellar cases it is observed that visual as distinct from 
auditory stimuli produce only imperfect motor reactions, and yet 
there is with them no reason to presume any primary disturbance of 
the visual function. It is not because the latter is deficient that desig- 
nator movements become impossible, but, on the contrary, because 
the attitude of Zeigen is impossible that the visual stimuli arouse only 
partial reactions. We must admit that the sound, of itself, prompts 
rather a grasping movement, and visual perception the act of point- 
ing. 'The sound always leads us towards its content, its significance 
for us; in visual presentation, on the other hand, we can much more 
easily "disregard" the content and we are drawn much more defi- 
nitely towards the part of space where the object is to be found.' 2 A 
meaning then is definable less in terms of the indescribable quality of 
its 'mental contents' than in terms of a certain manner of presenting 
its object, of its epistemological structure having its quality as con- 
crete realization and, in the language of Kant, exhibition. The doctor 
who brings to bear upon the patient 'visual' or 'auditory stimuli' 
believes that he is testing 'visual' or 'auditory sensibility' and drawing 
up an inventory of sensible qualities which make up consciousness 
(in empiricist language) or of the material at the disposal of cognition 
(in intellectualist language). The doctor and the psychologist borrow 
the concepts of 'sight' and 'hearing' from common sense which con- 
siders them univocal, because our body includes as a matter of fact 
sets of visual and auditory apparatus which are anatomically distinct 
and to which isolatable contents of consciousness are supposed to 
correspond according to a general postulate of 'constancy' 3 which 
expresses our natural ignorance of ourselves. But, when taken up and 
systematically applied by science these confused concepts hinder re- 
search and finally necessitate a general revision of these naive cate- 



Einfluss). It will be seen how subsequently (Ober die Ahhangigkeit and particularly 
Zeigen und Greifen and the works published under their editorship by Bcnary, 
Hocheimer and Steinfeld) they broadened iheir diagnosis. The progress of their 
analysis is a particularly clear example of the progress of psychology. 

1 Zeigen und Greifen, p. 456. 

1 Ibid., pp. 458-9. 

• Cf. above, Introduction, p. 7. 

114 



THE SPAT1ALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

gories. In fact, the measuring of thresholds tests functions prior to 
any specific identification of sensible qualities and to the elabora- 
tion of knowledge, the way in which the subject makes his sur- 
roundings exist for him, either as a pole of activity and the terminus 
of an act of seizure or expulsion, or else as a spectacle and theme 
of knowledge. The motor disturbances of cerebellar cases and those 
of psychological blindness can be co-ordinated only if we identify 
the basis of movement and vision not as a collection of sen- 
sible qualities but as a certain way of giving form or structure to 
our environment. We are led back by the very use of this inductive 
method to 'metaphysical 1 questions which positivism would wish to 
avoid. Induction succeeds only provided that it is not restricted to 
noting things as present or absent, with concomitant variations, and 
that it conceives and comprehends facts as subsumed under ideas not 
contained in them. It is not a matter of choosing between a descrip- 
tion of the disorder which furnishes the meaning and an explanation 
which provides the cause. There are, moreover, no explanations with- 
out comprehension. 

But let us make our objection more explicit. On examination it is 
seen to be twofold. 

1. The 'cause' of a 'psychic fact' is- never another 'psychic fact' 
capable of being disclosed to straightforward observation. For ex- 
ample, visual representation does not explain abstract movement, for 
it is itself endowed with the same power of throwing out a spectacle 
which is revealed in abstract movement and the act of pointing. Now 
this power does not come under the senses, not even under any inner 
sense. Let it be said provisionally that it is disclosed only to a certain 
kind of reflection, the nature of which we shall examine closely later. 
It follows that psychological induction is not a mere inventory of 
facts. Psychology does not provide its explanations by identifying, 
among a collection of facts, the invariable and unconditioned ante- 
cedent. It conceives or comprehends facts in exactly the same way as 
induction in physical science, not content to note empirical sequences, 
creates notions capable of co-ordinating facts. That is why, in psy- 
chology as in physics, no induction can avail itself of any crucial 
experiment. Since explanation is not discovered but created, it is 
never given with the fact, but is always simply a probable interpreta- 
tion. So far we have merely applied to psychology what has been 
fully demonstrated with regard to physical induction, 1 and our first 
complaint is against the empiricist manner of conceiving induction 
and against Mill's methods. 

2. Now we shall see that this first objection covers a second one. In 
psychology it is not only empiricism that has to be challenged. It is 

1 Cf. Brunschvicg, V Experience humaine et la Causalite physique, Part I. 

115 



THE BODY 



the inductive method and causal thinking generally. The object of 
psychology is such that it cannot possibly be expressed as the rela- 
tions of function to variable. Let us make these two points clear in 
some detail. 

(i) We notice that Schneider's motor disturbances are associated 
with large-scale deficiency f of knowledge gained by visual means. We 
are therefore tempted to regard psychological blindness as a distinc- 
tive variety of pure tactile behaviour, and, since consciousness of 
bodily space and abstract movement, which has potential space in 
view, are almost totally absent, we are inclined to conclude that the 
sense of touch alone gives us no experience of objective space. 1 We 
shall then say that touch by itself is not of a kind to provide a back- 
ground to movement, that is to say, to set out in front of the moving 
subject his departure and arrival points in strict simultaneity. The 
patient tries to provide for himself a 4 kinaesthetic background' by 
means of preparatory movements, and is successful in thus 'marking* 
the position of his body at the outset and in launching into the 
movement, yet this kinaesthetic background is precarious, and could 
not possibly equal the visual background in constantly relating 
motion to its points of departure and arrival throughout the move- 
ment's duration. It is thrown out of gear by the movement itself and 
needs to be restored after each phase of the movement. That is why, 
as we propose to put it, Schneider's abstract movements have lost 
their melodic flow, why they are made up of fragments placed end to 
end, and why they often 'run off the rails* on the way. The practical 
field which Schneider lacks is none other than the visual field. 2 But in 
order to be justified in relating, in psychological blindness, the motor 
to the visual disturbance, and, in the normal subject, the projective 
function to vision as its invariable and unconditioned antecedent, 
then we must be sure that only the visual data have been affected by 
the disease and that all other pre-conditions of behaviour, particu- 
larly tactile experience, have been left exactly as they were in the 
normal person. Can we confidently maintain this? At this stage it 
becomes clear that the facts are ambiguous, that no experience is 
decisive and no explanation final. When we observe that a normal 
subject is capable of making abstract movements with his eyes shut, 
and that the tactile experience of the normal person is sufficient to 
govern motility, it can always be retorted that the tactile data of the 
normal person have received their objective structure from visual 
data according to the old conception of the education of the senses. 
When we observe that a blind person is able to localize stimuli on the 
surface of his body and perform abstract movements — apart from 

1 Gelb and Goldstein, Ober den Einfluss . . pp. 227 50. 

2 Goldstein, Ober die Abhcingigkeit, pp \b} and tf. 

116 



THE SPATI ALITY dF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

the fact that there are examples of preparatory movements among the 
blind, the reply can always be made that frequent associations have 
imparted the qualitative colouring of kinaesthetic impressions to tac- 
tile ones and welded the former into a quasi-simultaneous occur- 
rence. 1 Indeed, many factors in the behaviour of patients 2 lead one 
to suspect some primary modification of tactile experience. For ex- 
ample, a subject may know how to knock at a door, but he can no 
longer do so if the door is hidden or merely out of reach. In the latter 
case, the patient cannot perform the action of knocking or opening 
in a void, even if his eyes are open and fixed on the door} How can we 
invoke visual failure here, when the patient enjoys a visual perception 
of the objective which is ordinarily sufficient to govern his movements 
more or less satisfactorily? Have wc not brought to light a primary 
disturbance of touch? Clearly, for an object to be able to produce a 
movement it must be included in the patient's field of movement, and 
the disturbance consists of a shrinkage in this field, which is hence- 
forth limited to objects actually touchable, and exclusive of that 
horizon of possible touch which surrounds them for the normal per- 
son. The deficiency would appear, in the last resort, to affect a func- 
tion much deeper than vision, deeper too than touch conceived as a 
collection of given qualities. It appears to concern the subject's vital 
area: that opening upon the world which has the effect of making 
objects at present out of reach count notwithstanding for the normal 
person; they exist for him as touchable things and are part of his 
world of movement. According to this hypothesis, when patients ob- 
serve their hand and the goal of their action throughout amovement, 4 
we must understand this not as a mere amplification of a normal 
procedure, for the recourse to vision is to be seen as necessitated 
merely by the collapse of the sense of potential touch. But, on the 
strictly inductive plane this interpretation, in which touch is primarily 
involved, remains optional, and we may always prefer, with Gold- 
stein, a different one: according to this the patient, wishing to strike, 
needs a goal within physical reach, precisely because his sight, in 
which he is deficient, is no longer adequate to provide a substantial 
background to the movement. There is, then, no fact capable of 
decisively bearing out that the tactile experience of patients is or is 
not identical with that of normal people, and Goldstein's conception, 
like the physical theory, can always be reconciled with the facts, given 
some auxiliary hypothesis. No rigorously exclusive interpretation 
is possible in psychology as in physics. 

1 Goldstein, Vber den Emfluss . . ., pp. 244 and ff. 

2 We are here concerned with the case of S which Goldstein himself puts along- 
side the Schneider case, in his book Vber die Abhdngigkeit . . . 

3 Vber die Abhcingigkeit . . pp. 178-84. 4 Ibid., p. 150. 

117 



THE BODY 

However, if we look more closety, we shall see that the impossibi- 
lity of a decisive experiment, in psychology, is attributable to special 
reasons. It arises from the very nature of the object under investiga- 
tion, namely behaviour, and leads to important consequences. Be- 
tween theories, neither of which is either ruled out or completely 
vindicated by the facts, physics can nevertheless choose according to 
the degree of probability, that is, according to the number of facts 
which each succeeds in co-ordinating without loading itself with 
auxiliary hypotheses elaborated to meet the needs of the case. In 
psychology this criterion is lacking: no auxiliary hypothesis is neces- 
sary, as we have seen, to explain in terms of visual disturbance the 
impossibility of the action of 'knocking 1 in front of a door. Not only 
do we never arrive at an exclusive interpretation (deficiency of sense 
of potential touch or deficiency of visual world), but, what is more, 
we necessarily have to do with equally probable interpretations be- 
cause 'visual representations', 'abstract movement' and 'sense of 
potential touch' are only different names for one and the same central 
phenomenon. Hence psychology is not in the same position as phy- 
sics; that is to say, confined within the probability of inductions, it 
is unable to choose, even on the basis of plausibility, between 
hypotheses which from a strictly inductive point of view remain 
incompatible. For an induction, even when it is merely probable, 
to remain a possibility, the 'visual representation' or the 'tactile 
perception' must be the cause of the abstract movement, or 
alternatively both must be effects of another cause. The three or four 
terms must be able to be considered from the outside and we must 
be able to pick out the correlative variations. But if they should 
prove incapable of being isolated, if each of them presupposed the 
rest, the failure involved would not be a failure of empiricism 't>r 
of attempts to find a decisive experiment, it would be the failure 
of the inductive method or of causal thinking in the realm of 
psychology. We thus arrive at the second point that we were trying 
to make. 

(ii) If, as Goldstein recognizes, the co-existence of the tactile with 
the visual data, in the case of the normal person, modifies the former 
sufficiently to enable them to provide a background for abstract 
movement, the tactile data of the patient, which are cut off from the 
visual contribution, cannot be forthwith identified with those of the 
normal person. Tactile and visual data, says Goldstein, are not 
juxtaposed in the normal person; the former derive from the proxi- 
mity of the latter a 'qualitative colouring' which they have lost for 
Schneider. It follows, he adds, that the study of the purely tactile is 
impossible as far as the normal person is concerned, and that de- 
rangement alone provides a picture of what tactile experience reduced 

118 



THE SPATI ALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

to itself would comprise. 1 The conclusion is sound, but it amounts to 
maintaining that the word 'touch' has not the same meaning applied 
to the normal as to the abnormal subject, that the 'purely tactile 1 is 
a pathological phenomenon which does not enter as a component 
into normal experience. It is further implied that illness, by disturbing 
the visual function, has not disclosed the pure essence of touch, that 
it has indeed changed the whole of the subject's experience, or, if one 
prefers it put in this way, that there is not in the normal subject a 
tactile experience and also a visual one, but an integrated experience 
to which it is impossible to gauge the contribution of each sense. The 
experiences mediated by touch in psychological blindness have no- 
thing in common with those which touch mediates in the normal sub- 
ject, and neither set really deserves to be called 'tactile* data. Tactile 
experience is not a condition apart which might be kept constant 
while the 'visual' experience was varied with a view to pinning on to 
each its own causality, nor is behaviour a function of these variables. 
It is on the contrary presupposed in defining them just as each is 
presupposed in defining the other. 2 Psychological blindness, defi- 
ciency of sense of touch and motor disturbances are three expressions 
of a more fundamental disturbance through which they can be under- 
stood and not three component factors of morbid behaviour. Visual 
representations, tactile data and motility are three phenomena which 

1 Ober den Einfluss . . ., pp. 227 and fT. 

2 On the conditioning of sensory data by motility, cf. Structure du Comporte- 
menty p. 41 , and the experiments which show that a dog when chained up does not 
perceive as does a dog free in its movements. The procedures of traditional 
psychology are strangely mixed, in the writings of Gelb and Goldstein, with the 
concrete emphasis derived from Gestalt psychology. They recognize clearly 
enough that the perceiving subject reacts as a whole, but the totality is conceived 
as a mixture and touch receives from its co-existence with sight only a 'qualitative 
colouring', whereas according to the spirit of Gestalt psychology, two sensory 
realms can communicate only by becoming absorbed as inseparable constituents 
into an intersensory system. Now if tactile data, along with visual ones, make up 
a composite formation, it is clearly on condition that they themselves, on their 
own ground, bring into being a spatial organization, for otherwise the connection 
between touch and sight would be an external association, and the tactile data 
would remain, in the total configuration, what they are taken each in isolation — 
two consequences equally ruled out by Gestalt theory. It is fair to add that, in 
another work (Bericnt uber den IX Kongress fur experimentelle Psychologie in 
Munchen, Die psychology sche Bedeutung pathologischer Storungen der Raumwahr- 
nehmung), Gelb himself points out the inadequacy of the work which we have 
just analysed. We may not even speak, he says, of a coalescence of touch and sight 
in the normal subject, or even make any distinction between these two components 
in reactions to space. Both pure tactile and pure visual experience, with its space 
of juxtaposition and its represented spaces, are products of analysis. There is a 
concrete manipulation of space in which all senses collaborate in an 'undifTeren- 
tiated unity' (p. 76) and the sense of touch is ill-adapted only to the theoretical 
knowledge of space. 

119 



THE BODY 

stand out sharply within the unity of behaviour. When, by reason of 
the fact that they show correlated variations, we try to explain one in 
terms of the other, we forget, for example, that the act of visual re- 
presentation, as is proved in cerebellar cases, already presupposes the 
same power of projection as is seen in abstract movement and in the 
act of pointing out, and thus we beg the question. Inductive and 
causal thought, by vesting in vision or touch or any one de facto 
datum the power of projection which is found in them all, conceals 
that power from us and blinds us to that dimension of behaviour 
which is precisely the one with which psychology is concerned. In 
physics, the establishment of a law requires the scientist to conceive 
the idea under which the facts are to be co-ordinated, and this idea, 
which is not found in the facts, will never be verified by any conclu- 
sive experiment, and will never be more than probable. But it is still 
the idea of a causal link, in the sense of a relationship of function to 
variable. Atmospheric pressure had to be invented but, after all, it 
was still a third person process, the function of a certain number of 
- variables. In so far as behaviour is a form, in which 'visual' and 
'tactile contents', sensibility and motility appear only as inseparable 
moments, it remains inaccessible to causal thought and is capable of 
being apprehended only by another kind of thought, that which 
grasps its object as it comes into being and as it appears to the person 
experiencing it, with the atmosphere of meaning then surrounding it, 
and which tries to infiltrate into that atmosphere in order to discover, 
behind scattered facts and symptoms, the subject's whole being, 
when he is normal, or the basic disturbance, when he is a patient. 

We cannot explain disturbances in the power of abstract movement 
in terms of loss of visual contents, nor, consequently, the function of 
projection in terms of the actual presence of these contents. So one* 
method alone still seems possible: it consists in reconstituting the 
basic disturbance by going back from the symptoms not to a cause 
which is itself observable, but to a reason or intelligible condition of 
possibility for the state of affairs. It involves treating the human sub- 
ject as an irresolvable consciousness which is wholly present in every 
one of its manifestations. If the disturbance is not to be related to the 
contents, it must be linked to the form of knowledge; if psychology 
is not empiricist and explicative, it ought to be rationalistic and 
reflective. In exactly the same way as the act of naming, 1 the act of 
pointing out presupposes that the object, instead of being ap- 
proached, grasped and absorbed by the body, is kept at a distance 
and stands as a picture in front of the patient. Plato still allowed the 
empiricist the power of pointing a finger at things, but the truth is 
that even this silent gesture is impossible if what is pointed out is not 
1 Cf. Gclb and Goldstein, Vber Farbennamenamnesie. 
120 



THE SPATI ALITY OF ONb'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

already torn from instantaneous existence and monadic existence, 
and-ireated as representative of its previous appearances in me, and 
of its simultaneous appearances in others, in other words, subsumed 
under some category and promoted to the status of a concept. If the 
patient is no longer able to point to some part of his body which is 
touched, it is because he is no longer a subject face to face with an 
objective world, and can no longer take up a 'categorial attitude'. 1 In 
the same way, abstract movement is endangered in so far as it pre- 
supposes awareness of an objective, is borne on by that awareness, 
and is movement for itself. Indeed it is not triggered off by any 
existing object, but is clearly centrifugal, outlining in space a gratui- 
tous intention which has reference to one's own body, making an 
object of it instead of going through it to link up with things by means 
of it. It is, then, diffused with a power of objectification, a 'symbolical 
function', 2 a 'representative function', 3 a power of 'projection' 4 
which is, moreover, already at work in forming 'things'. It consists in 
treating sense-data as mutually representative, and also collectively 
representative of an 'eidos'; in giving a meaning to these data, in 
breathing a spirit into them, in systematizing them, in centring a 
plurality of experiences round one intelligible core, in bringing to 
light in them an identifiable unity when seen in different perspectives. 
To sum up, it consists in placing beneath the flow of impressions an ~ 
explanatory invariant, and in giving a form to the stuff of experience. 
Now it is not possible to maintain that consciousness has this power, 
it is this power itself. As soon as there is consciousness, and in order 
that there may be consciousness, there must be something to be con- 
scious of, an intentional object, and consciousness can move towards 
this object only to the extent that it 'derealizes' itself and throws itself 
into it, only if it is wholly in this reference to . . . something, only if 
it is a pure meaning-giving act. If a being is consciousness, he must 
be nothing but a network of intentions. If he ceases to be definable in 
terms of the act of sense-giving, he relapses into the condition of a 
thing, the thing being precisely what does not know, what slumbers 
in absolute ignorance of itself and the world, what consequently is 
not a true 'self, i.e. a 'for-itself ', and has only a spatio-temporal form 
of individuation, .existence in itself. 5 Consciousness, therefore, does 

1 Gelb and Goldstein, Zeigen unci Greifen, pp. 456-7. 

2 Head. 

3 Bouman and Grunbaum. 

4 Van Woerkom. 

5 Husserl has often been credited with this distinction. In fact, it is found 
in Descartes and Kant. In our opinion Husserl's originality lies beyond the notion 
of inieniionality: it is to be found in the elaboration of this notion and in the 
discovery, beneath the intentionality of representations, of a deeper intentionality, 
which others have called existence. 



121 



THE BODY 

not admit of degree. If the patient no longer exists as a consciousness, 
he must then exist as a thing. Either movement is movement for itself, 
in which case the 'stimulus' is not its cause but its intentional object — 
or else it disintegrates and is dispersed in existence in itself, and be- 
comes an objective process in the body, whose phases are successive 
but unknown to each other. The special status of concrete movements 
in illness is explained by seeing them as reflexes in the traditional 
sense. The patient's hand meets the point on his body where the 
mosquito has settled because pre-established nerve circuits, not the 
excitation, control the reaction. Actions performed in the course of 
his work are preserved because they are dependent upon firmly 
rooted conditioned reflexes. They persist in spite of psychic deficien- 
cies because they are movements in themselves. The distinction be- 
tween concrete and abstract movement, between Greifen and Zeigen 
comes down to that between the physiological and the psychic, 
existence in itself and existence for itself. 1 

But we shall see that in reality the first distinction, far from cover- 
ing also the second, is incompatible with it. Every 'physiological ex- 
planation' tends to become generalized. If the grasping action or the 
concrete movement is guaranteed by some factual connection be- 
tween each point on the skin and the motor muscles which guide the 

1 Gelb and Goldstein sometimes tend to interpret phenomena in this sense. 
They have done more than anyone to go beyond the traditional dualism of auto- 
matism and consciousness. But they have never named this third term between the 
psychic and the physiological, between the for itself and the in itself to which 
their analyses always led them and which we call existence. Hence their earliest 
works often fall back on the traditional dichotomy of body and consciousness: 
'The act of seizing is, much more than that of pointing, determined by relation- 
ships existing between the organism and its surrounding field . . .; it is less a 
question of relations consciously formed than of immediate reactions . . ., we are 
here concerned with a much more vital process, one describable in biological 
language as primitive.' (Zeigen unci Greifen, p. 459.) 'The act of seizing remains 
completely insensitive to modifications affecting the conscious part of this per- 
formance, to any deficiency of simultaneous apprehension (in psychological 
blindness), to the instability of perceived space (in cerebellar cases), to disturb- 
ances of sensitivity (in certain cortical lesions), because it is not carried out in 
this objective domain. It is preserved as long as the peripheral excitations are still 
sufficient to govern it accurately/ (Zeigen unci Greifen, p. 460.) Gelb and Gold- 
stein question the existence of localizing reflex movements (Henri), but only in 
so far as there might be a tendency to regard them as innate. They retain the idea 
of an 'automatic localization not inclusive of any awareness of space, since it 
operates even during sleep' (thus conceived as total unconsciousness). It is cer- 
tainly 'learnt' from the time of comprehensive reactions of the whole body to 
tactile stimuli in babyhood — but this apprenticeship is conceived as the accumula- 
tion of 'kinaesthetic residues' which are 'awakened' in the normal adult by ex- 
ternal excitations, and which direct him towards the appropriate outlets (Vber den 
Einfluss . . pp. 167-206). In correctly performing the actions required by his 
trade, Schneider shows that they are habitual totalities which demand no con- 
sciousness of space (ibid., pp. 221-2). 

122 



THE SP ATI ALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

hand, it is difficult to sec why the same nerve circuit communicating 
a scarcely different movement to the same muscles should not guaran- 
tee the gesture of Zeigen as it does the movement ot Greifen. Between 
the mosquito which pricks the skin and the ruler which the doctor 
presses on the same spot, the physical difference is not great enough 
to explain why the grasping movement is possible, but the act of 
pointing impossible. The two 'stimuli' are really distinguishable only 
if we take into account their affective value or biological meaning, 
and the two responses cease to merge into one another only if we 
consider the Zeigen and the Greifen as two ways of relating to the 
object and two types of being in the world. But this is precisely what 
cannot be done once we have reduced the living body to the condition 
of an object. If it is once conceded that it may be the seat of third 
person processes, nothing in behaviour can be reserved for conscious- 
ness. Both gestures and movements, employing as they do the same 
organ-objects, the same nerve-objects, must be given their place on 
the map of interiorless processes, and inserted in the compactly 
woven stuff of 'physiological conditions'. Does not the patient who, 
in doing his job, moves his hand towards a tool lying on the table, 
displace the segments of his arm exactly as he would have to do to 
perform the abstract movement of extending it? Does not an every- 
day gesture involve a series of muscular contractions and innerva- 
tions? It is therefore impossible to set limits to physiological ex- 
planation. In another way it is impossible also to set limits to con- 
sciousness. If we relate the act of pointing to consciousness, if once 
the stimulus can cease to be the cause of the reaction and become its 
intentional object, it becomes inconceivable that it should ever func- 
tion as a pure cause or that the movement should ever be blind. For 
if 'abstract' movements are possible, in which consciousness of the 
starting and finishing points is present, we must at every moment in 
our. life know where our body is without having to look for it as we 
look for an object moved from its place during our absence. Even 
'automatic' movements must therefore announce themselves to our 
consciousness, which means that there never occur, in our bodies, 
movements in themselves. And if all objective space is for intellectual 
consciousness only, we must recognize the categorial attitude even in 
the movement of grasping itself. 1 Like physiological causality, arrival 

1 Goldstein himself, who tended (as we have seen in the preceding nole) to 
relate Greifen to the body and Zeigen to the categorial attitude, is forced to go 
back on this 'explanation 1 . The act of grasping, he says, may 'be performed to 
order, and the patient tries to grasp. In order to do so he does not need to be 
aware of the point in space towards which he thrusts forward his hand, but he 
nevertheless has a feeling of orientation in space . . .' {Zeigen unci Greifen, p. 461 ). 
The act of grasping, as found in normal subjects, 'still demands a categorial and 
conscious attitude' (ibid., p. 465). 

123 



THE BODY 



at self-awareness has nowhere to start. We must either reject physio- 
logical explanation or admit that it is all-inclusive — either deny con- 
sciousness or accept it as comprehensive. We cannot relate certain 
movements to bodily mechanism and others to consciousness. The 
body and consciousness are not mutually limiting, they can be only 
parallel. Any physiological explanation becomes generalized into 
mechanistic physiology, any achievement of self-awareness into in- 
tellectualist psychology, and mechanistic physiology or intellectualist 
psychology bring behaviour down to the same uniform level and wipe 
out the distinction between abstract and concrete movement, between 
Zeigen and Greifen. This distinction can survive only if there are 
several ways for the body to be a body, several ways for consciousness 
to be consciousness. As long as the body is defined in terms of exist- 
ence in-itself, it functions uniformly like a mechanism, and as long as 
the mind is defined in terms of pure existence for-itself, it knows only 
objects arrayed before it. The distinction between abstract and con- 
crete movement is therefore not to be confused with that between 
body and consciousness; it does not belong to the same reflective 
dimension, but finds its place only in the behavioural dimension. 
Pathological phenomena introduce variations before our eyes in 
something which is not the pure awareness of an object. Any diag- 
nosis, like that of intellectualist psychology, which sees here a col- 
lapse of consciousness and the freeing of automatism, or again that 
of an empiricist psychology of contents, would leave the fundamental 
disturbance untouched. 

The intellectualist analysis, here as everywhere, is less false than 
abstract. It is true that the 'symbolic function' or the 'representative 
function' underlies our movements, but it *is not a final term for 
analysis. It too rests on a certain groundwork. The mistake of intel- 
lectualism is to make it self-subsistent, to remove it from the stuff in 
which it is realized, and to recognize in us, as a non-derivative entity, 
an undistanced presence in the world. For, using this consciousness, 
an entirely transparent consciousness, this intentionality which ad- 
mits of no degrees of more or less, as a starting point, everything that 
separates us from the real world — error, sickness, madness, in short 
incarnation — is reduced to the status of mere appearance. Admit- 
tedly intellectualism does not bring consciousness into being in- 
dependently of its material. For example it takes great care not to 
introduce behind the word, the action and the perception, any 'sym- 
bolic consciousness' as the common and numerically sole form of 
linguistic, perceptual and motor material. There is no. 'general sym- 
bolic faculty', says Cassirer, 1 and analytical reflection does not seek 

1 Symbol vermogen schlechlhin, Cassirer, Philosophie der symbol ischen Formen, 
III, p. 320. 

124 



THE SPAT! ALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

to establish between pathological phenomena relating to perception, 
language and action a Community in being', but a 'community in 
meaning'. 1 Just because it has finally gone beyond causal thought and 
realism, intellectualist psychology would be able to see the meaning 
or essence of illness, and recognize a unity of consciousness which io 
not evident on the plane of being, and which is vouched for, in its 
own eyes, on the plane of truth. But the distinction between com- 
munity in being and community in sense, the conscious passage from 
the existential order to the order of value and the transvaluation 
which allows meaning and value to be declared autonomous are, for 
practical purposes, equivalent to an abstraction, since, from the point 
of view finally adopted, the variety of phenomena becomes insignifi- 
cant and incomprehensible. If consciousness is placed outside being, 
the latter cannot breach it, the empirical variety of consciousnesses — 
morbid, primitive, childlike consciousness, the consciousness of 
others — cannot be taken seriously, there is nothing to be known or 
understood, one thing alone makes sense: the pure essence of con- 
sciousness. None of these consciousnesses could fail to effect the 
Cogito. The lunatic, behind his ravings, his obsessions and lies, knows 
that he is raving, that he is allowing himself to be haunted by an 
obsession, that he is lying, in short he is not mad, he thinks he is. All 
is then for the best and insanity is only perversion of the will. The 
analysis of the meaning of illness, once it ends with the symbolic func- 
tion, identifies all disorders as the same, uniting aphasia, apraxia and 
agnosia 2 and perhaps even has no way of distinguishing them from 
schizophrenia. 3 It then becomes understandable that doctors and 
psychologists should decline the invitation to intellectualism and fall 
back, for want of anything better, on the-attempts at causal explana- 
tion which at least have the merit of taking into account what is 
peculiar to illness, and to each form of it, and which by this means 
give at any rate the illusion of possessing actual knowledge. Modern 
pathology shows that there is no strictly elective disturbance, but it 
shows equally that each one is coloured by the sector of behaviour 
which it principally attacks. 4 Even if all aphasia, when closely ob- 
served, is seen to involve disturbances of both gnosic* and praxic 

1 Gemeinsamkeit im Sein, Gemeinsamkeit im Sinn, ibid. 

2 Cf. for example Cassirer, Philosophic der Symbolischen Formen, III, Chap. VI, 
Pathologie des Symbolbewusstseins. 

s One can indeed imagine an intellectualist interpretation of schizophrenia 
which would equate the atomistic conception of time and the loss of the future 
with a collapse of the categorial attitude. 

* Structure du Comport ement, pp. 91 and AT. 

* Gnosia: The perceptive faculty, enabling one to recognize the form and 
nature of persons and things (Translator's note). 

125 



THE BODY 



kinds; if all apraxia* involves linguistic and perceptual disturbances, 
and all agnosiaf disturbances of language and action, the fact re- 
mains that the core of these disorders is here to be found in the 
domain of language, there in that of perception, and elsewhere in 
that of action. When we invoke in all these cases the symbolic func- 
tion, we are, it is true, characterizing the structure common to the 
different derangements, but this structure should not be separated 
from the stuff through which on each occasion it is realized, if not 
electively, at least in great measure. After all Schneider's trouble was 
not initially metaphysical, for it was a shell splinter which wounded 
him at the back of the head. The damage to his sight was serious, but 
it would be ridiculous, as we have said, to explain all the other defi- 
ciencies in terms of the visual one as their cause; but no less ridiculous 
to think that the shell splinter directly struck symbolic consciousness. 
- It was through his sight that Mind in him was impaired. 

Until some means has been discovered whereby we can link the 
origin and the essence or meaning of the disturbance; until some de- 
finition is found for a concrete essence, a structure of illness which 
shall express both its generality and its particularity, until pheno- 
menology becomes genetic phenomenology, unhelpful reversions to 
causal thought and naturalism will remain justified. Our problem 
(•""therefore becomes clearer. Th e task for us_is to c onceiye t _between the 
\ linguistic, perceptual and motor .co ntents a nd the form given to them 
or the symbolic function which breathes life into them, a relationship 
which^halLb e_neither the re duclktOLoLform to content, nor the sub- 
suming of content under an autonomous form. We need to under- 
sta7f3~{kTth how Schneider's complaint everywhere overshoots par- 
ticular contents — visual, tactile and motor — of his experience, and 
how it nevertheless attacks the symbolic function only through the 
specially chosen material provided by sight. The senses and one's own 
oody generally present the mystery of a collective entity which, with- 
out abandoning its thisness and its individuality, puts forth beyond it- 
self meanings capable of providing a framework for a whole series of 
thoughts and experiences. Although Schneider's trouble affects moti- 
lity and thought as well as perception, the fact remains that what it 
damages, particularly in the domain of thought, is his power of ap- 
prehending simultaneous wholes, and in the matter of motility, that, 

* Apraxia: (i) A disorder of voluntary movemenl, consisting in a more or less 
complete incapacity lo execute purposeful movements, notwithstanding the pre- 
servation of muscular power, sensibility, and co-ordination in general, (ii) A 
psychomotor defect in which one is unable lo apply to its proper use an object 
which one is nevertheless able lo name and the uses of which one can describe 
(Translator's note). 

t Agnosia: Absence of ability to recognize the form and nature of persons and 
things, or the perceptive faculty (Translator's note). 

126 



THE SPATIALITY OF ONC'S OWN IJODY AND MOTILITY 

so to speak, of taking a bird's-eye view of movement and projecting 
it outside himself. It is then in some sense mental space and practical 
space which are destroyed or impaired, and the words themselves are 
a sufficient indication of the visual origin of the disturbance. Visual 
trouble is not the cause of the other disturbances, particularly that 
directly affecting thought. But neither is it a mere consequence of 
them. Visual contents, moreover, are not the cause of the function of 
projection, but neither is sight a mere opportunity given to Mind to 
bring into play a power in itself unconditioned. Visual contents are 
taken up, utilized and sublimated to the level of thought by a sym- 
bolical power which transcends them, but it is on the basis of sight 
that this power can be constituted. The relationship between matter 
and form is called in phenomenological terminology a relationship of 
Fundierung: the symbolic function rests on the visual as on a ground; 
not that vision is its cause, but because it is that gift of nature which 
Mind was called upon to make use of beyond all hope, to which it 
was to give a fundamentally new meaning, yet which was needed, not 
only to be incarnate, but in order to be at all. Form integrates within 
itself the content until the latter finally appears as a mere mode of 
form itself, and the historical stages leading up to thought as a ruse of 
Reason disguised as Nature. But conversely, even in its intellectual 
sublimation, content remains in the nature of a radical contingency, 
the initial establishment or foundation 1 of knowledge and action, the 
first laying hold of being or value, whose concrete richness will never 
be finally exhausted by knowledge and action, and whose sponta- 
neous method they will ceaselessly reapply. This dialectic of form and 
content is what we have to restore, or rather, since 'reciprocal action* 
is as yet only a compromise with causal thought, and a contradictory 
principle, we have to describe the circumstances under which this 
contradiction is conceivable, which means existence, the perpetual 
re-ordering of fact and hazard by a reason non-existent before and 
without those circumstances. 2 

1 We are translating HusseiTs favourite word: Stiftung. 

2 See below third part. E. Cassirer clearly has the same aim when he takes Kant 
to task for having most of the time analysed only an 'intellectual sublimation of 
experience' (Philosophie der Symbolischen Formen, T. Ill, p. 14), when he tries to 
express, through the notion of symbolic pregnancy, the absolute simultaneity of 
matter and form, or when he adopts for his own purposes Hegel's declaration that 
the mind carries and preserves its past in the depths of its present. But the relation- 
ships between the various symbolic forms remain ambiguous. One always wonders 
whether the function of Darstellung is a stage in the return to itself of an eternal 
consciousness, the shadow of the function of Bedeutimg — or whether, on the con- 
trary, the function of Bedeutung is an unforeseeable amplification of the first 
constitutive 'wave'. When Cassirer takes up the Kantian formula according to 
which consciousness can analyse only what it has synthesized, he is manifestly 
returning to intellectualism despite the phenomenological and even existentail 
analyses which his book contains and which we shall have occasion to use. 

127 



THE BODY 



If we want to observe what underlies the 'symbolic function* itself, 
we must first of all realize that even intelligence is not reconcilable 
with intellectualism. What impairs thought in Schneider's Case is not 
that he is incapable of perceiving concrete data as specimens of a 
unique eidos> or of subsuming them under some category, but on the 
contrary, that he can relate them only by a quite explicit subsump- 
tion. It is noticeable, for example, that the patient does not under- 
stand even such simple analogies as: 'fur is to cat as plumage is to 
bird', or 'light is to lamp as heat is to stove', or 'eye is to light and 
colour as ear is to sounds*. In the same way he cannot understand, in 
their metaphorical sense, such common expressions as 'the chair leg' 
or 'the head of a nail', although he knows what part of the object is 
indicated by these words. It may happen that normal subjects of 
equal educational standard are no more able to explain the analogy, 
but this is for diametrically opposed reasons. It is easier for the nor- 
mal subject to understand the analogy than to analyse it, whereas the 
patient manages to understand only when he has made it explicit by 
recourse to conceptual analysis. 'He looks for ... a common 
material characteristic from which he can infer, as from a middle 
term, the identity of the two relationships'. 1 For example, he thinks 
about the analogy between eye and ear and clearly does not under- 
stand it until he can say: The eye and the ear are both sense organs, 
therefore they must give rise to something similar.' If we described 
analogy as the apperception of two given terms under a co-ordinating 
concept, we should be giving as normal a procedure which is exclu- 
sively pathological, and which represents the roundabout way in 
which the patient makes good the normal understanding of analogy. 
'This freedom in choosing a tertium comparationis on the patient's 
part is the opposite of the intuitive formation of the image in the 
normal subject: the latter seizes a specific identity in conceptual 
structures, for him the living processes of thought are symmetrical 
and mutually complementary. Thus does he 'catch' the essential 
feature of the analogy, and one may always wonder whether a subject 
does not remain able to understand, even when this understanding is 
not adequately expressed through the formulation and clarification 
which he provides.' 2 Living thought, then, does not consist in sub- 
suming under some category. The category imposes on the terms 
brought together a meaning external to them. It is by drawing upon 
already constituted language and upon the sense-relationships which 
it holds in store that Schneider succeeds in relating eye to car as 
'sense-organs'. In normal thought eye and ear are immediately ap- 

1 Bcnary, Studien zur Untersuchung tier Intelligenz bei einem Fall von Seelen- 
blifhl/wil, p. 262. 

2 Ibid., p. 263. 

128 



THE SPAT1 ALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOT! I IT Y 

prehendcd in accordance with the analogy of their function, and their 
relationship can be fixed in a 'common characteristic' and recorded 
in language only because it has first been perceived in its origin in the 
singularity of sight and hearing. 

It will perhaps be objected that our criticism is valid only against a 
summary intellectualism which absorbs thought into a purely logical 
activity, whereas analytical reflection goes back to the origin of pre- 
dication, finding behind the judgement of inherence that of relation, 
behind subsumption, seen as a mechanical and formal operation, the 
categorial act whereby thought bestows upon the subject the meaning 
expressed in the predicate. Thus our criticism of the categorial func- 
tion, it might be said, does nothing but reveal, behind the empirical 
use of the category, a transcendental use without which indeed the 
first is incomprehensible. The distinction, however, between the em- 
pirical and transcendental use conceals the problem rather than 
solves it. Critical philosophy duplicates the empirical operations of 
thought with a transcendental activity which has the task of bringing 
about all those syntheses for which empirical thought provides the 
elements. But when 1 think something at the present moment, the 
guarantee of a non-temporal synthesis is insufficient and even un- 
necessary as a basis of my thought. It is now, in the living present that 
the synthesis has to be effected, otherwise thought would be cut off 
from its transcendental premises. It cannot therefore be asserted that 
when I think I take my place once more in the eternal subject which 
1 have never ceased to be. For the true subject of thought is the person 
who achieves the conversion and resumption of action at this very 
moment, and it is he who breathes his own life into the non-temporal 
ghost. We need therefore to understand how temporal thought links 
up with itself and brings about its own synthesis. The fact that the 
normal subject immediately grasps that the eye is to sight as the ear 
is to hearing shows that the eye and ear are immediately given to him 
as means of access to one and the same world, and furthermore that 
one world is for him antepredicatively self-evident, so that the equiva- 
lence of the 'sense-organs' and their analogy is to be read off from 
things and can be lived before being conceived. The Kantian subject 
posits a world, but, in order to be able to assert a truth, the actual 
subject must in the first place have a world or be in the world, that is, 
sustain round about it a system of meanings whose reciprocities, 
relationships and involvements do not require to be made explicit in 
order to be exploited. When I move about my house, I know without 
thinking about it that walking towards the bathroom means passing 
near the bedroom, that looking at the window means having the fire- 
place on my left, and in this small world each gesture, each perception 
is immediately located in relation to a great number of possible 

129 



THE BODY 

co-ordinates. When I chat with a friend whom I know well, each of 
his remarks and each of mine contains, in addition to the meaning it 
carries for everybody else, a host of references to the main dimensions 
of his character and mine, without our needing to recall previous 
conversations with each other. These acquired worlds, which confer 
upon my experience its secondary meaning, are themselves carved 
out of a primary world which is the basis of the primary meaning. In 
the same way there is a 'world of thoughts', or a sediment left by our 
mental processes, which enables us to rely on our concepts and ac- 
quired judgements as we might on things there in front of us, presented 
globally, without there being any need for us to resynthesize them. 

In this way there can be for us a sort of mental panorama, with its 
clear-cut and its vague areas, a physiognomic disposition of questions 
and intellectual situations, such as research, discovery and certainty. 
But the word 'sediment* should not lead us astray: this acquired 
knowledge is not an inert mass in the depths of our consciousness. 
My flat is, for me, not a set of closely associated images. It remains 
a familiar domain round about me only as long as I still have 'in my 
hands' or 'in my legs' the main distances and directions involved, and 
as long as from my body intentional threads run out towards it. 
Similarly my acquired thoughts are not a final gain, they continually 
draw their sustenance from my present thought, they offer me a 
meaning, but I give it back to them. Indeed our available store ex- 
presses for ever afresh the energy of our present consciousness. 
Sometimes it weakens, as in moments of weariness, and then my 
'world' of thought is impoverished and reduced to one or two obses- 
sive ideas; sometimes, on the other hand, I am at the disposal of all 
my thoughts and every word spoken in front of mc then stimulates 
questions and ideas, recasting and reorganizing the mental panorama, 
and presenting itself with a precise physiognomy. Thus what is 
acquired is truly acquired only if it is taken up again in a fresh 
momentum of thought, and a thought is assigned to its place only if 
it takes up its place itself. The essence of consciousness is to provide 
itself with one or several worlds, to bring into being its own thoughts 
before itself, as if they were things, and it demonstrates its vitality in- 
divisibly by outlining these landscapes for itself and then by abandon- 
ing them. The world-structure, with its two stages of sedimentation 
and spontaneity, is at the core of consciousness, and it is in the light 
of a levelling-down of the 'world' that we shall succeed in understand- 
ing Schneider's intellectual, perceptual and motor disturbances, with- 
out assimilating them to each other. 

The traditional analysis of perception 1 distinguishes within it sense- 

1 We arc holding over until the second part a closer study of perception, and 
we here confine our remarks to what is essential for the elucidation of the basic 

130 



THE SPATIALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

givens and the meaning which they receive from an act of understand- 
ing. Perceptual disturbances, from this point of view, could be only 
sensory deficiencies or gnosic disturbances. -Schneider's case, on the 
other hand, shows deficiencies affecting the junction of sensitivity and 
significance, deficiencies which disclose the existential conditioning of 
both. If a fountain pen is shown to the patient, in such a way that the 
clip is not seen, the phases of recognition arc as follows. 'It ; s black, 
blue and shiny, 1 says the patient. There is a white patch on it, and it 
is rather long; it has the shape of a stick. It may be some sort of 
instrument. It shines and reflects light. It could also be a coloured 
glass.* The pen is then brought closer and the clip is turned towards 
the patient. He goes on: 4 lt must be a pencil or a fountain pen.* (He 
touches his breast pocket). 'It is put there, to make notes with.' 1 It 
is clear that language intervenes at every stage of recognition by 
providing possible meanings for what is in fact seen, and that recog- 
nition advances pari passu with linguistic connections : from 'long* to 
'shaped like a stick', from 'stick* to 'instrument', and from there to 
'instrument for noting things down', and finally to 'fountain pen'. 
The sense-data are limited to suggesting these meanings as a fact sug- 
gests a hypothesis to the physicist. The patient, like the scientist, 
verifies mediately and clarifies his hypothesis by cross-checking facts, 
and makes his way blindly towards the one which co-ordinates them 
all. 

This procedure contrasts with, and by so doing throws into relief, 
the spontaneous method of normal perception, that kind of living 
system of meanings which makes the concrete essence of the object 
immediately recognizable, and allows its 'sensible properties' to ap- 
pear only through that essence. It is this familiarity and communica- 
tion with the object which is here interrupted. In the normal subject 
the object 'speaks' and is significant, the arrangement of colours 
straight away 'means' something, whereas in the patient the meaning 
has to be brought in from elsewhere by a veritable act of interpreta- 
tion. Conversely in the normal person the subject's intentions are im- 
mediately reflected in the perceptual field, polarizing it, or placing 
their seal upon it, or setting up in it, effortlessly, a wave of signifi- 
cance. In the patient the perceptual field has lost this plasticity. If he 
is asked to make a square with four triangles identical with a given 
one, he replies that it is impossible and that with four triangles only 
two squares can be built. The experimenter insists, showing him that 
a square has two diagonals and can always be divided into four 

and also the nWtor disturbance in Schneider's case. These anticipations and 
repetitions are unavoidable if, as we shall try to show, perception and experience 
of one's own body are mutually implied. 
1 Hochheimer, Analyse eines Seelenblinden von der Sprache, p. 49. 

131 



THE BODY 



triangles. The patient's reply is: 4 Yes, but that is because the parts 
necessarily fit each other. When a square is divided into four, if the 
parts arc brought together in the correct way, they must make a 
square.' 1 He knows therefore what a square and a triangle are; even 
the relationship between these two meanings does not escape him, at 
least after the doctor's explanations, and he understands that any 
square can be split into triangles. But he does not go on to conclude 
that any right-angled isosceles triangle can be used to construct a 
square, because the construction of this square requires that the given 
triangles be arranged differently and that the sensory-givens must be- 
come the means of illustration of an imaginary meaning. The world in 
its entirety no longer suggests any meaning to him and conversely the 
meanings which occur to him are not embodied any longer in the 
given world. We shall say, in a word, that the world no longer has any 
physiognomy for him. 2 This is what reveals the nature of the peculiari- 
ties seen in his drawings. Schneider never draws from the model 
(nachzeichnen); perception is not carried directly into movement. 
With his left hand he feels the object, recognizes certain characteris- 
tics (a corner, a right angle), formulates his discovery and finally 
draws without any model a figure corresponding to the verbal 
formula. 3 

The translation of percept into movement is effected via the ex- 
press meanings of language, whereas the normal subject penetrates 
into the object by perception, assimilating its structure into his sub- 
stance, and through this body the object directly regulates his move- 
ments. 4 This subject-object dialogue, this drawing together, by the 
subject, of the meaning diffused through.the object, and, by the ob- 
ject, of the subject's intentions — a process which is physiognomic 
perception — arranges round the subject a world which speaks to him 
of himself, and gives his own thoughts their place in the world. Since 
this function is impaired in Schneider's case, it is foreseeable that, a 
fortiori, perception of human events and other people will show de- 
ficiencies, for these presuppose the same taking up of external by 
internal and of internal by external. And indeed if a story is told to 
the patient, it is observed that instead of grasping it as a melodic 
whole with down and up beats, with its characteristic rhythm or 

1 Benary, op. cit., p. 255. 

* Schneider can hear read, or himself read, without recognizing it, a letter 
which he has written. He even states that without signature one cannot know 
whose a letter is (Hochheimer, op. cit., p. 12). 

3 Benary, op. cit., p. 256. 

' It is this appropriation of the 'motive* in its full sense that Cezanne achieved 
after hours of meditation. 'We are germinating,* he would say. After which sud- 
denly: Everything would fall into place.' J. Gasquet, Cezanne, II* Partie, Le 
Motif, pp. 81-3. 

132 



THE SPATIALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

flow, he remembers it only as a succession of facts to be noted one by 
one. That is why he can understand it only if pauses are made in the 
narrative and used to sum up briefly the gist of what he has so far 
been told. When he tells back the story, he never does so according to 
the account given to him (nacherzahlen): he finds nothing to em- 
phasize; he can understand the course of the story only as he tells it, 
and it is, as it were, reconstituted part by part. 5 There is, then, in the 
normal subject an essence of the story which emerges as it is told, 
without any express analysis, and this subsequently guides along any 
reproduction of the narrative. The story for him is a certain human 
event, recognizable by its style, and here the subject 'understands' 
because he has the power to live, beyond his immediate experience, 
through the events described. Generally speaking, nothing but what 
is immediately given is present to the speaker. The thought of others 
will never be present to him, since he has no immediate experience of 
it. 2 The words of others are for him signs which have to be severally 
deciphered, instead of being, as with the normal subject, the trans- 
parent envelope of a meaning within which he might live. Like events, 
words are for the patient not the theme of an act of drawing together 
or projecting, but merely the occasion for a methodical interpreta- 
tion. Like the object, other people 'telP him nothing, and the phan- 
toms which present themselves to him are devoid, not, it is true, of 
that intellectual meaning arrived at through analysis, but that primary 
meaning reached through co-existence. 

Specifically intellectual disturbances, those of judgement and 
meaning — cannot be considered ultimate deficiencies, and must also 
be placed in the same existential context. Take, for example, 'number 
blindness'. 3 It has been possible to demonstrate that the patient, 
though able to count, add, subtract, multiply or divide in relation to 
the things placed in front of him, cannot conceive number, and that 
all his results are obtained by ritual procedures, which have no signi- 
ficant bearing on it. He knows by heart the sequence of numbers and 
recites it mentally, while checking off on his fingers the objects to be 
counted, added, subtracted, multiplied or divided: 'a number for him 
merely belongs to a sequence of numbers, and has no meaning as a 
fixed quantity, as a group or a determinate measure' 4 Of two numbers 

1 Benary, op. cit., p. 279. 

2 Of a conversation of importance to him, he recalls only the general theme and 
the decision taken at the end of it, but not his interlocutor's words: 'I know what 
I said in a conversation from the reasons I had for saying it; what the other said is 
more difficult because I have nothing to hold on to (Anhahspunkt) in order to 
remember* (Benary, op. cit., p. 214). It can be seen, furthermore, that the patient 
reconstitutes and infers his own attitude at the time of the conversation, and that 
he is incapable of directly 'taking hold' even of his own thoughts. 

3 Benary, op. cit., p. 224. 4 Ibid., p. 223. 

133 



THE BODY 



the greater for him is the one which comes 'after' in the numerical 
series. When he is given 5 + 4 — 4 to work out, he does the sum in 
two stages without 'noticing anything in particular'. He merely 
agrees, if it is pointed out to him, that the number 5 'remains'. He 
fails to understand that 'twice half a given number is the number 
itself. 1 Are we then to say that he has lost number as a category or 
schema? Yet when he runs his eyes over the objects to be counted, 
checking each of them on his fingers, even though it often happens 
that he confuses objects already counted with those still to come, 
even though the synthesis may be vague, he obviously has the notion 
of a synthetic operation which is nothing other than numeration. 
And conversely, with the normal subject the sequence of numbers as 
a kinetic melody practically devoid of genuinely numerical meaning 
is most often substituted for the concept of number. Number is never 
a pure concept, the absence of which would allow us to define Schnei- 
der's mental state, it is a structure of consciousness involving degrees 
of more or less. The true act of counting requires of the subject that 
his operations as they develop and cease to occupy the centre of his 
consciousness, shall not cease to be there for him and shall constitute, 
for subsequent operations, a ground on which they may be estab- 
lished. Consciousness holds in reserve, behind itself, completed syn- 
theses; these are still available and might be brought back into action, 
and it is on this basis that they are taken up and transcended in the 
total act of numeration. What is called pure number or authentic 
number is only a development or extension, through repetition, of the 
process which constitutes any perception. Schneider's conception of 
number is affected only in so far as it implies, to a great extent, the 
power of laying out a past in order to move towards a future. It is 
this existential basis of intelligence which is affected, much more than 
intelligence itself, for, as we have shown, 2 Schneider's general intel- 
ligence is intact: his replies are slow, never meaningless, but those of 
a mature, thinking man who takes an interest in the doctor's experi- 
ments. Beneath the intelligence as an anonymous function or as a 
categorial process, a personal core has to be recognized, which is the 
patient's being, his power of existing. It is here that the illness has its 
seat. Schneider would still like to arrive at political or religious 
opinions, but knows that it is useless to try. 'He must now be content 
with large-scale beliefs, without the power to express them/ 3 He 
never sings or whistles of his own accord. 4 We shall see later that he 
never takes any initiative sexually. He never goes out for a walk, but 
always on an errand, and he never recognizes Professor Goldstein's 
house as he passes it 'because he did not go out with the intention of 

1 Benary, op. cil., p. 240. - Ibid., p. 284. 

3 Ibid., op. cit., p. 213. 1 Hochhcimcr, op. cil., p. ^7. 

134 



THE SPAT1ALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

going there*. 1 Just as he needs, by means of preparatory movements, 
to be able to 'take a grip' on his own body before performing move- 
ments when they arc not mapped out ahead in a familiar situation, — 
so, a conversation with another person does not constitute for him a 
situation significant in itself, and requiring extempore replies. He can 
speak only in accordance with a plan drawn up in advance: 'He can- 
not fall back on the inspiration of the moment in order to find the 
ideas required in response to a complex stage of the conversation, and 
this is true whether it is a question of new or old points of view.' 2 
There is in his whole conduct something meticulous and serious which 
derives from the fact that he is incapable of play-acting. To act is to 
place oneself for a moment in an imaginary situation, to find satisfac- 
tion in changing one's 'setting'. The patient, on the other hand, can- 
not enter into a fictitious situation without converting it into a real 
one: he cannot tell the difference between a riddle and a problem. 3 In 
his case, the possible situation at every moment is so narrow that two 
sectors of the environment not having anything in common for him 
cannot simultaneously form a situation. 4 If one talks to him he can- 
not hear the sound of another conversation in the next room; if a 
dish is brought and placed on the table, he does not stop to wonder 
where the dish comes from. He states that one can see only in the 
direction in which one is looking, and only objects at which one is 
looking. 5 Future and past are for him only 'shrunken' extensions of the 
present. He has lost 'our power of looking according to the temporal 
vector'. 6 He cannot take a bird's eye view of his past and unhesitat- 
ingly rediscover it by going from the whole to the parts : he rebuilds it, 
starting with a fragment which has kept its meaning and which 
provides him with a 'supporting-point'. 7 Since he complains of the 
weather, he is asked if he feels better in winter. He replies : 'I can't 
say now, I can't say anything at the moment'. 8 Thus all Schneider's 
troubles are reducible to a unity, but not the abstract unity of the 
'representative function': he is 'tied' to actuality, he 'lacks liberty', 9 
that concrete liberty which comprises the general power of putting 
oneself into a situation. Beneath intelligence as beneath perception, 
we discover a more fundamental function, 'a vector mobile in all 
directions like a searchlight, one through which we can direct our- 
selves towards anything, in or outside ourselves, and display a form 

1 Hochheimer, op. cit., p. 56. 

2 Benary, op. cit., p. 213. 

3 In the same way there are for him no double meanings or puns because words 
have only one meaning at a time, and because the actual is entirely without any 
horizon of possibilities. Benary, op. cit., p. 283. 

4 Hochheimer, op. cit., p. 32. 6 Ibid., pp. 32-33. 

6 'Useres Hineinsehen in den Zeitvektor\ ibid. 7 Benary, op. cit., p. 213. 
8 Hochheimer, op. cit., p. 33. 9 Ibid., p. 32. 

135 



THE BODY 



of behaviour in relation to that object'. 1 Yet the analogy of the search- 
light is inadequate, since it presupposes given objects on to which the 
beam plays, whereas the nuclear function to which we refer, before 
bringing objects to our sight or knowledge, makes them exist in a 
more intimate sense, for us. Let us therefore say rather, borrowing 
a term from other works, 2 that the life of consciousness — cognitive 
life, the life of desire or perceptual life — is subtended by an 'inten- 
tional arc' which projects round about us our past, our future, our 
human setting, our physical, ideological and moral situation, or 
rather which results in our being situated in all these respects. It is 
this intentional arc which brings about the unity of the senses, of in- 
telligence, of sensibility and motility. And it is this which 'goes limp' 
in illness. 

The study of a pathological case, then, has enabled us to glimpse 
a new mode of analysis — existential analysis — which goes beyond 
the traditional alternatives of empiricism and rationalism, of explana- 
tion and introspection. If consciousness were a collection of mental 
facts each disturbance should be elective. If it were a 'representative 
function', a pure power of signification, it could be or not be (and 
with it everything else), but it could not cease to be having once been, 
or become sick, that is, deteriorate. If, in short, it is a projective 
activity, which leaves objects all round it, like traces of its own acts, 
but which nevertheless uses them as springboards from which to leap 
towards other spontaneous acts, then it becomes understandable that 
any 'content' deficiency should have its repercussions on the main 
body of experience and open the door to its disintegration, that any 
pathological degeneration should affect the whole of consciousness — 
and that nevertheless the derangement should on each occasion attack 
a certain 'side' of consciousness, that in each case certain symptoms 
should dominate the clinical picture of the disease, and, in short, that 
consciousness should be vulnerable and able to receive the illness into 
itself. In attacking the 'visual sphere', illness is not limited to destroy- 
ing certain contents of consciousness, 'visual representations' or sight 
literally speaking; it affects sight in the figurative sense, of which the 
former is no more than the model or symbol — the power of 'looking 
down upon' (uberschauen) simultaneous multiplicities, 3 a certain way 
of positing the object or being aware. However, as this type of con- 
sciousness is only the sublimation of sensory vision, as it is schema- 
tized constantly within the dimensions of the visual field, albeit en- 
dowing them with a new meaning, it will be realized that this general 
function has its psychological roots. Consciousness freely develops 

1 Hocliheimer, op. cit., p. 69. 

2 Cf. Fischer, Raunt-Zeiistruktur unci Denkstorung in der Schizophrenic, p. 250. 

3 Q\ La Structure du Comportement, pp. 91 and IF. 

136 



THE SPATIALITY OF ONE'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

its visual data beyond their own specific significance; it ires them for 
the expression of its spontaneous acts, as semantic evolution clearly 
shows in loading the terms intuition, self-evidence and natural light 
with increasingly rich meaning. But conversely, not one of these 
terms, in the final sense which history has given them, is understand- 
able without reference to the structures of visual perception. Hence 
one cannot say that man sees because he is Mind, nor indeed that he - 
is Mind because he sees: to see as a man sees and to be Mind are 
synonymous. In so far as consciousness is consciousness of something 
only by allowing its furrow to trail behind it, and in so far as, in order 
to conceive an object one must rely on a previously constructed 
'world of thought', there is always some degree of depersonalization 
at the heart of consciousness. Hence the principle of an intervention 
from outside: consciousness may be ailing, the world of its thoughts 
may collapse into fragments, — or rather, as the 'contents' dissociated 
by the illness did not appear in the role of parts in normal conscious- 
ness and served only as stepping-stones to significances which outstrip 
them, consciousness can be seen trying to hold up its superstructures 
when their foundations have given way, aping its everyday processes, 
but without being able to come by any intuitive realization, and with- 
out being able to conceal the particular deficiency which robs them 
of their complete significance. It is in the same way theoretically un- 
derstandable that mental illness may, in its turn, be linked with some 
bodily accident; consciousness projects itself into a physical world 
and has a body, as it projects itself into a cultural world and has its 
habits: because it cannot be consciousness without playing upon' 
significances given either in the absolute past ofViature or in its own 
personal past, and because any form of lived experience tends to- 
wards a certain generality whether that of our habits or that of our 
'bodily functions'. 

These elucidations enable us clearly to understand motility as basic 
intentionality. Consciousness is in the first place not a matter of 'I 
think that' but of 'I can'. 1 Schneider's motor trouble cannot, any 
more than his visual deficiency, be reduced to any failure of the 
general function of representation. Sight and movement are specific 
ways of entering into relationship with objects and if, through all 
these experiences, some unique function finds its expression, it is the 
momentum of existence, which docs not cancel out the radical diver- 
sity of contents, because it links them to each other, not by placing 
them all under the control of an 'I think', but by guiding them to- 
wards the intersensory unity of a 'world'. Movement is not thought 
about movement, and bodily space is not space thought of or repre- 
sented. 'Each voluntary movement takes place in a setting, against a 
1 This lerm is ihe usual one in HusserTs unpublished writings. 
137 



TIIL BODY 



background which is determined by the movement itself. . . . We per- 
form our movements in a space which is not "empty" or unrelated to 
them, but which on the contrary, bears a highly determinate relation 
to them: movement and background are, in fact, only artificially 
separated stages of a unique totality/ 1 In the action of the hand 
which is raised towards an object is contained a reference to the 
object, not as an object represented, but as that highly specific thing 
towards which we project ourselves, near which we are, in anticipa- 
tion, and which we haunt. 2 Consciousness is being towards the thing 

1 Goldstein, liber die Abhangigkeit, p. 163. 

2 It is not easy to reveal pure motor intentionality : it is concealed behind the 
objective world which it helps to build up. The history of apraxia would show 
how the description of Praxis is almost always contaminated and finally made 
impossible by the notion of representation. Liepmann (Ober Storungen des 
Handelns bei Gehirnkranken) draws a clear distinction between apraxia and 
agnosic disturbances of conduct, in which the object is not recognized, but in 
which, however, conduct is in harmony with the representation of the object, and 
generally between apraxia and disturbances affecting the 'ideational preparation 
of action' (forgetting the aim, confusing two aims, premature performance, trans- 
fer of the aim through some intrusive perception) (op. cit., pp. 20-31). With Liep- 
mann's subject (the 'counsellor of state'), the ideational process is normal, since 
the subject can perform with his left hand everything that he is prevented from per- 
forming with his right. Moreover, the hand is not paralysed. 'The case of the coun- 
sellor of state shows that between the so-called higher mental processes and motor 
nerve-impulses there is room for another deficiency which prevents any applica- 
tion of the project {Entwurj ")for action to the motility of one particular limb . . . 
The whole sensory-motor apparatus of a limb is so to speak dislocated (exarti- 
culiert) in relation to the whole physiological process (ibid., pp. 40-1). Normally, 
then, every formula of movement, while ofTcring us a representation, presents 
itself to our body as a specific practical possibility. The patient has retained the 
formula of movement as a representation, but it no longer conveys anything to 
his right hand, or at any rate his right hand has no longer any sphere of action.' 
'He has retained everything communicable in an action, everything objective and 
perceptible in it for others. What he lacks, namely his capacity to move his right 
hand according to a plan already mapped out, is something incommunicable and 
incapable of being an object for an outside consciousness; it is a power, not a 
thing known (ein Konnen, kein KennenY (ibid., p, 47). But when Liepmann tries to 
make his analysis more explicit, he returns to traditional views and dissects move- 
ment into a representation (the 'formula of movement' which, along with the 
main goal provides me with intermediate aims) and a system of automatisms 
(which, for each intermediate aim, brings appropriate nerve impulses into play) 
(ibid., p. 59). The 'power' earlier mentioned becomes a 'property of the nervous 
substance' (ibid., p. 47). This brings us back to the dualism of consciousness and 
body which we thought we had left behind when we introduced the notion of 
Bewegungsentwurf or motor project. If it is a question of a simple action, the 
representation of the goal and of the intermediate aims is transformed into move- 
ment because it releases involuntary actions acquired once and for all (p. 55). If 
it is a matter of complex action, it calls up the 'kinacsthetic memory of the com- 
ponent movements: as movement is composed of partial acts, the project of 
movement is composed of the representation of its parts or of the intermediate 
aims: it is this representation that we have called the formula of movement' (p. 

138 



THF SPATI ALITY OF ONF/S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

through the intermediary of the body. A movement is learned when 
the body has understood it, that is, when it has incorporated it into 
its 'world', and to move one's body is to aim at things through it; it 
is to allow oneself to respond to their call, which is made upon it in- 
dependently of any representation. Motility, then, is not, as it were, 
a handmaid of consciousness, transporting the body to that point in 
space of which we have formed a representation beforehand. In order 
that we may be able to move our body towards an object, the object 
must first exist for it, our body must not belong to the realm of the 
'in-itself. Objects no longer exist for the arm of the apraxic, and this 
is what causes it to remain immobile. Cases of pure apraxia in which 
the perception of space remains unaffected, in which even the 'intel- 
lectual notion of the gesture to be made' does not appear to be 
obscured, and yet in which the patient cannot copy a triangle; 1 cases 
of constructive apraxia, in which the subject shows no gnosic dis- 
turbance except as regards the localization of stimuli on his body, 
and yet is incapable of copying a cross, a v or an o> 2 all prove that 
the body has its world and that objects or space may be present to 
our knowledge but not to our body. 

We must therefore avoid saying that our body is in space, or in — 
time. It inhabits space and time. If my hand traces a complicated path 



57). Praxis is torn asunder by representations and automatic actions. The case of 
the counsellor of state becomes unintelligible, since it becomes necessary to relate 
his troubles either to the ideational preliminaries to movement, or else to some 
deficiency of the automatic actions, which Liepmann ruled out from the start. So 
motor apraxia comes down either to ideational apraxia, which is a form of 
agnosia, or else to paralysis. We shall make sense of apraxia and do justice to 
Liepmann's observations only if the movement to be performed can be antici- 
pated, though not by a representation. This is possible only provided that con- 
sciousness is understood not as the explicit positing of its objects, but more 
generally as reference to a practical as well as a theoretical object, as being in the 
world, and if the body for its part is understood not as one object among all 
objects, but as the vehicle of being in the world. As long as consciousness is under- 
stood as representation, the only possible operation for it is to form representa- 
tions. Consciousness will be motor as long as it furnishes itself with a "representa- 
tion of movement'. The body then executes the movement by copying it from the 
representation which consciousness presents to itself, and in accordance with a 
formula of movement which it receives from that representation. (Cf. O. Sittig, 
Vber Apraxie, p. 98.) We still need to understand by what magical process the 
representation of a movement causes precisely that movement to be made by the 
body. The problem can be solved only provided that we cease to draw a distinction 
between the body as a mechanism in itself and consciousness as being for itself. 

1 Lhermitte, G. L6vy and Kyriako, Les Perturbations de la representation 
spatiale chez les apraxiques y p. 597. 

2 Lhermitte and Trelles, Sur Vapraxie constructive, les troubles de la pensee 
spatiale et de la somatognosie dansFapraxie y p. 428. Cf. Lhermitte, de Massary and 
Kyriako, Le Role de la pensee spatiale dans Vapraxie. 

139 



JUV. BODY 



through the air, I do not need, in order to know its final position, to 
add together all movements made in the same direction and subtract 
those made in the opposite direction. 'Every identifiable change 
reaches consciousness already loaded with its relations to what has 
preceded it, as on a taximeter the distance is given already converted 
into shillings and pence. 1 At every moment, previous attitudes and 
movements provide an ever ready standard of measurement. It is not 
a question of a visual or motor 'memory' of the starting position of 
the hand : cerebral lesions may leave visual memory intact while de- 
stroying awareness of movement. As for the 'motor memory', it is 
clear that it could hardly establish the present position of the hand, 
unless the perception which gave rise to it had not, stored up in it, an 
absolute awareness of 'here', for without this we should be thrown 
back from memory to memory and never have a present perception. 
Just as it is necessarily 'here', the body necessarily exists 'now'; it can 
never become 'past', and if we cannot retain in health the living 
memory of sickness, or, in adult life that of our body as a child, these 
'gaps in memory' merely express the temporal structure of our body. 
At each successive instant of a movement, the preceding instant is not 
lost sight of. It is, as it were, dovetailed into the present, and present 
perception generally speaking consists in drawing together, on the 
basis of one's present position, the succession of previous positions, 
which envelop each other. But the impending position is also covered 
by the present, and through it all those which will occur throughout 
the movement. Each instant of the movement embraces its whole 
span, and particularly the first which, being the active initiative, in- 
stitutes the link between a here and a yonder, a now and a future 
which the remainder of the instants will merely develop.^In so far as I 
+ have a body through which I act in the world, space and time are not, 
for me, a collection of adjacent points nor are they a limitless number 
of relations synthesized by my consciousness, and into which it 
draws my body. I am not in space and time, nor do I conceive space 
and time; I belong to them, my body combines with them and in- 
cludes them. The scope of this inclusion is the measure of that of my 
existence ; but in any case it can never be all-embracing. The space and 
time which I inhabit are always in their different ways indeterminate 
horizons which contain other points of view. The synthesis of both 
time and space is a task that always has to be performed afresh. Our 
bodily experience of movement is not a particular case of knowledge ; 
it provides us with a way of access to the world and the object, with 
a 'praktognosia', 2 which has to be recognized as original and perhaps 
as primary. My body has its world, or understands its world, without 

1 Head and Holmes, Sensory disturbances from cerebral lesions, p. 187. 
* Grunbaum, Aphasie und Motor ik. 

140 



THE SPATIALITY OF ONF.'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

having to make use of my 'symbolic' or 'objectifying function'. Cer- 
tain patients can imitate the doctor's movements and move their right 
hand to their right ear and their left to their nose, so long as they 
stand beside the doctor and follow his movements through a mirror, 
but not if they face him. Head explained the patient's failure in terms 
of the inadequacy of his 'formulation': according to him the imita- 
tion of the action is dependent upon a verbal translation. In fact, the 
formulation may be correct although the imitation is unsuccessful, or 
again the imitation may be successful without any formulation. 
Writers on the subject 1 then introduce, if not exactly verbal symbol- 
ism, at least a general symbolic function, an ability to 'transpose', in 
which imitation, like perception or objective thought, is merely a 
particular case. But it is obvious that this general function does not 
explain adapted action. For patients are capable, not only of formu- 
lating the action to be performed, but of picturing it to themselves. 
They are quite aware of what they have to do, and yet, instead of 
moving the right hand to the right ear and the left hand to the nose, 
they touch one ear with both hands, or else their nose and one eye, or 
one ear and one eye. 2 What has become impossible is the application 
and adaptation to their own body of the objective particularity of the 
action. In other words, the right and left hand, the eye and ear are 
still presented to them as absolute locations, and not inserted into 
any system of correlations which links them up with the correspond- 
ing parts of the doctor's body, and which makes them usable for 
imitation, even when the doctor is face to face with the patient. In 
order to imitate the actions of someone facing me, it is not necessary 
that I should know expressly that 'the hand which appears on the 
right side of my visual field is for my partner the left one'. Now it is 
precisely the victim of disturbances who has recourse to these ex- 
planations. In normal imitation, the subject's left hand is immediately 
identified with his partner's, his action immediately models itself on 
the other's, and the subject projects himself or loses his separate 
reality in the other, becomes identified with him, and the change of 
co-ordinates is pre-eminently embodied in this existential process. 
This is because the normal subject has his body not only as a system 
of present positions, but besides, and thereby, as an open system of 
an infinite number of equivalent positions directed to other ends. 
What we have called the body image is precisely this system of equi- 
valents, this immediately given invariant whereby the different motor 
tasks are instantaneously transferable. It follows that it is not only an 
experience of my body, but an experience of my body in the world, 
and that this is what gives a motor meaning to verbal orders. The 

1 Goldstein, Van Woerkom, Bouman and Grunbaum. 
* Grunbaum, op, cit., pp. 386-92. 

141 



THE BODY 



function destroyed in apraxic disturbances is therefore a motor one. 
'It is not the symbolic or sense-giving function in general which is 
affected in cases of this kind: it is a much more primary function, in 
its nature motor, in other words, the capacity for motor differentia- 
tion within the dynamic body image'. 1 The space in which normal 
imitation operates is not, as opposed to concrete space with its abso- 
lute locations, an 'objective space' or a 'representative space' based on 
an act of thought. It is already built into my bodily structure, and is 
its inseparable correlative. 'Already motility, in its pure state, pos- 
sesses the basic power of giving a meaning (Sinngebung)\ 2 Even if 
subsequently, thought and the perception of space are freed from 
motility and spatial being, for us to be able to conceive space, it is in 
the first place necessary that we should have been thrust into it by our 
body, and that it should have provided us with the first model of 
those transpositions, equivalents and identifications which make 
space into an objective system and allow our experience to be one of 
objects, opening out on an 'in itself. 'Motility is the primary sphere 
in which initially the meaning of all significances (der Sinn alter 
Signifikationeri) is engendered in the domain of represented space.' 3 
The cultivation of habit as a rearrangement and renewal of the 
body image presents great difficulties to traditional philosophies, 
which are always inclined to conceive synthesis as intellectual syn- 
thesis. It is quite true that what brings together, in habit, component 
actions, reactions and 'stimuli' is not some external process cf asso- 
ciation. 4 Any mechanistic theory runs up against the fact that the 
learning process is systematic: the subject does not weld together 
individual movements and individual stimuli but acquires the power 
to respond with a certain type of solution to situations of a certain 
general form. The situations may differ widely from case to case, and 
the response movements may be entrusted sometimes to one opera- 
tive organ, sometimes to another, both situations and responses in 
the various cases having in common not so much a partial identity 
of elements as a shared significance. Must we then see the origin of 
habit in an act of understanding which organizes the elements only 
to withdraw subsequently? 5 For example, is it not the case that 
forming the habit of dancing is discovering, by analysis, the formula 
of the movement in question, and then reconstructing it on the basis 
of the ideal outline by the use of previously acquired movements, 
those of walking and running? But before the formula of the new 
dance can incorporate certain elements of general motility, it must 

1 Griinbaum, op. cit., pp. 397-98. 2 Ibid., p. 394. * Ibid., p. 396. 
4 See, on this point, La Structure du Comportement, pp. 125 and IT. 
1 As Bergson, for example, thinks when he defines habit as *thc fossilized 
residue of a spiritual activity*. 

142 



THE SPATI ALITY OF ONIl'S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

first. have had, as it were, the stamp of movement set upon it. As has 
often been said, it is the body which 'catches' (kapiert) and 'compre- 
hends' movement. The cultivation of habit is indeed the grasping of 
a significance, but it is the motor grasping of a motor significance. 
Now what precisely does this mean ? A woman may, without any cal- 
culation, keep a safe distance between the feather in her hat and 
things which might break it off. She feels where the feather is just as 
we feel where our hand is. 1 If I am in the habit of driving a car, 1 
enter a narrow opening and see that I can 'get through' without com- 
paring the width of the opening with that of the wings, just as 1 go 
through a doorway without checking the width of the doorway 
against that of my body. 2 The hat and the car have ceased to be ob- 
jects with a size and volume which is established by comparison with 
other objects. They have become potentialities of volume, the demand 
for a certain amount of free space. In the same way the iron gate to 
the Underground platform, and the road, have become restrictive 
potentialities and immediately appear passable or impassable for my 
body with its adjuncts. The blind mufsi's stick has ceased to be an 
object for him, and is no longer perceived for itself; its point has be- 
come an area of sensitivity, extending the scope and active radius of 
touch, and providing a parallel to sight. In the exploration of things, 
the length of the stick does not enter expressly as a middle term: the 
blind man is rather aware of it through the position of objects than 
of the position of objects through it. The position of things is im- 
mediately given through the extent of the reach which carries him to 
it, which comprises besides the arm's own reach the stick's range of 
action. If I want to get used to a stick, I try it by touching a few 
things with it, and eventually I have it 'well in hand', I can see what 
things are 'within reach' or out of reach of my stick. There is no ques- 
tion here of any quick estimate or any comparison between the objec- 
tive length of the stick and the objective distance away of the goal to 
be reached. The points in space do not stand out as objective posi- — 
tions in relation to the objective position occupied by our body; they 
mark, in our vicinity, the varying range of our aims and our gestures. 
To get used to a hat, a car or a stick is to be transplanted into them, 
or conversely, to incorporate them into the bulk of our own body. 
Habit expresses our power of dilating our being in the world, or 
changing our existence by appropriating fresh instruments. 3 It is 

1 Head, Sensory disturbances from cerebral lesion, p. 188. 

2 Grtinbaum, Aphasie und Motorik, p. 395. 

3 It thus elucidates the nature of the body image. When we say that it presents 
us immediately with our bodily position, we do not mean, after the manner of 
empiricists, that it consists of a mosaic of 'extensive sensations*. It is a system 
which is open on to the world, and correlative with it. 

143 



THE BODY 

possible to know how to type without being able to say where the 
letters which make the words are to be found on the banks of keys. 
To know how to type is not, then, to know the place of each letter 
among the keys, nor even to have acquired a conditioned reflex for 
each one, which is set in motion by the letter as it comes before our 
eye. If habit is neither a form of knowledge nor an involuntary action, 
what then is it? It is knowledge in the hands, which is forthcoming 
only when bodily effort is made, and cannot be formulated in 
detachment from that effort. The subject knows where the letters are 
on the typewriter as we know where one of our limbs is, through a 
knowledge bred of familiarity which does not give us a position in 
objective space. The movement of her fingers is not presented to the 
typist as a path through space which can be described, but merely as 
a certain adjustment of motility, physiognomically distinguishable 
from any other. The question is often framed as if the perception of 
a letter written on paper aroused the representation of the same letter 
which in turn aroused the representation of the movement needed to 
strike it on the machine. But this is mythological language. When I 
run my eyes over the text set before me, there do not occur percep- 
tions which stir up representations, but patterns are formed as I look, 
and these are endowed with a typical or familiar physiognomy. When 
I sit at my typewriter, a motor space opens up beneath my hands, in 
which I am about to 'play' what I have read. The reading of the word 
is a modulation of visible space, the performance of the movement is 
a modulation of manual space, and the whole question is how a cer- 
tin physiognomy of 'visual' patterns can evoke a certain type of motor 
response, how each 'visual' structure eventually provides itself with 
its mobile essence without there being any need to spell the word or 
specify the movement in detail in order to translate one into the other. 
But this power of habit is no different from the general one which we 
exercise over our body: if I am ordered to touch my ear or my knee, 
I move my hand to my ear or my knee by the shortest route, without 
having to think of the initial position of my hand, or that of my ear, or 
the path between them. We said earlier that it is the body which 'un- 
derstands' in the cultivation of habit. This way of putting it will ap- 
pear absurd, if understanding is subsuming a sense-datum under an 
idea, and if the body is an object. But the phenomenon of habit is 
just what prompts us to revise our notion of 'understand' and our 
notion of the body. To understand is* to experience the harmony be- 
tween what wc aim at and what is given, between the intention and the 
performance — and the body is our anchorage in a world. When I put 
my hand to my knee, I experience at every stage of the movement the 
fulfilment of an intention which was not directed at my knee as an 
idea or even as an object, but as a present and real part of my living 

144 



THE SPATI ALITY OF ONL*S OWN BODY AND MOTILITY 

body, that is, finally, as a stage in my perpetual movement towards a 
world. When the typist performs the necessary movements on the 
typewriter, these movements are governed by an intention, but the 
intention does not posit the keys as objective locations. It is literally - 
true that the subject who learns to type incorporates the key-bank 
space into his bodily space. 

The example of instrumentalists shows even better how habit has 
its abode neither in thought nor in the objective body, but in the body 
as mediator of a world. It is known 1 that an experienced organist is 
capable of playing an organ which he does not know, which has more 
or fewer manuals, and stops differently arranged, compared with 
those on the instrument he is used to playing. He needs only an hour's 
practice to be ready to perform his programme. Such a short pre- 
paration rules out the supposition that new conditioned reflexes have 
here been substituted for the existing sets, except where both form a 
system and the change is all-embracing, which takes us away from 
the mechanistic theory, since in that case the reactions are mediated 
by a comprehensive grasp of the instrument. Are we to maintain that 
the organist analyses the organ, that he conjures up and retains a 
representation of the stops, pedals and manuals and their relation to 
each other in space? But during the short rehearsal preceding the 
concert, he does not act like a person about to draw up a plan. He 
sits on the scat, works the pedals, pulls out the stops, gets the measure 
of the instrument with his body, incorporates within himself the rele- 
vant directions and dimensions, settles into the organ as one settles 
into a house. He does not learn objective spatial positions for each 
stop and pedal, nor does he commit them to 'memory'. During the 
rehearsal, as during the performance, the stops, pedals and manuals 
are given to him as nothing more than possibilities of achieving cer- 
tain emotional or musical values, and their positions are simply the 
places through which this value appears in the world. Between the 
musical essence of the piece as it is shown in the score and the notes 
which actually sound round the organ, so direct a relation is estab- 
lished that the organist's body and his instrument are merely the 
medium of this relationship. Henceforth the music exists by itself and 
through it all the* rest exists. 2 There is here no place for any 'memory' 
of the position of the stops, and it is not in objective space that the 
organist in fact is playing. In reality his movements during rehearsal 

1 Cf. Chevalier, UHabitude, pp. 202 and ff. 

3 'As though the musicians were not nearly so much playing the little phrase as 
performing the rites on which it insisted before it would consent to appear.' 
(Proust, Swanns Way, II, trans. C. K. Scott MoncrierT, Chatto & Windus, p. 180.) 

'Its cries were so sudden that the violinist must snatch up his bow and race 
to catch them as they came/ (Ibid., p. 186.) 

145 



THE BODY 



are consecratory gestures: they draw affective vectors, discover emo- 
tional sources, and create a space of expressiveness as the movements 
of the augur delimit the templum. 

The whole problem of habit here is one of knowing how the musical 
significance of an action can be concentrated in a certain place to the 
extent that, in giving himself entirely to the music, the organist 
reaches for precisely those stops and pedals which are to bring it into 
being. Now the body is essentially an expressive space. If I want to 
take hold of an object, already, at a point of space about which I 
have been quite unmindful, this power of grasping constituted by my 
hand moves upwards towards the thing. I move my legs not as things 
in space two and a half feet from my head, but as a power of loco- 
motion which extends my motor intention downwards. The main 
areas of my body are devoted to actions, and participate in their 
value, and asking why common sense makes the head the seat of 
thought raises the same problem as asking how the organist distri- 
butes, through 'organ space', musical significances. But our body is 
not merely one expressive space among the rest, for that is simply the 
constituted body. It is the origin of the rest, expressive movement it- 
self, that which causes them to begin to exist as things, under our 
hands and eyes. Although our body does not impose definite in- 
stincts upon us from birth, as it does upon animals, it does at least 
give to our life the form of generality, and develops our personal acts 
into stable dispositional tendencies. In this sense our nature is not 
long-established custom, since custom presupposes the form of pas- 
sivity derived from nature. The body is qur general medium for hav- 
ing a world. Sometimes it is restricted to the actions necessary for the 
conservation of life, and accordingly it posits around us a biological 
world; at other times, elaborating upon these primary actions and 
movirg from their literal to a figurative meaning, it manifests through 
them a core of new significance: this is true of motor habits such as 
dancing. Sometimes, finally, the meaning aimed at cannot be achieved 
by the body's natural means; it must then build itself an instrument, 
and it projects thereby around itself a cultural world. At all levels it 
performs the same function which is to endow the instantaneous ex- 
pressions of spontaneity with *a little renewable action and indepen- 
dent existence'. 1 Habit is merely a form of this fundamental power. 
We say that the body has understood and habit has been cultivated 
when it has absorbed a new meaning, and assimilated a fresh core of 
significance^ 

To sum up, what we have discovered through the study of motility, 
is a new meaning of the word 'meaning'. The great strength of intel- 
lectualist psychology and idealist philosophy comes from their having 
1 Valcry, Introduction a la Met hock de Leonard de Vinci, Van etc, p. 177. 

146 



THE SPAT I ALITY OI ONl;'S OWN BODY AND MOT I I.I 1 Y 

no difficulty in showing that perception and thought have an intrinsic 
significance and cannot be explained in terms of the external associa- 
tion of fortuitously agglomerated contents. The Cogito was the com- 
ing to self-awareness of this inner core. But all meaning was ipso facto 
conceived as an act of thought, as the work of a pure /, and although 
rationalism easily refuted empiricism, it was itself unable to account 
for the variety of experience, for the clement of senselessness in it, for 
the contingency of contents. Bodily experience forces us to acknow- 
ledge an imposition of meaning which is not the work of a universal 
constituting consciousness, a meaning which clings to certain con- 
tents. My body is that meaningful core which behaves like a general 
function, and which nevertheless exists, and is susceptible to disease. 
In it we learn to know that union of essence and existence which wc 
shall find again in perception generally, and which we shall then have 
to describe more fully. 



147 



4 

THE SYNTHESIS OF ONE'S 
OWN BODY 



THE analysis of bodily space has led us to results which may be 
generalized. We notice for the first time, with regard to our own 
body, what is true of all perceived things: that the perception of space 
and the perception of the thing, the spatiality of the thing and its 
being as a thing are not two distinct problems. The Cartesian and 
Kantian tradition already teaches us this; it makes the object's spatial 
limits its essence; it shows in existence partes extra partes, and in 
spatial distribution, the only possible significance of existence in itself. 
But it elucidates the perception of the object through the perception 
of space, whereas the experience of our own body teaches us to 
realize space as rooted in existence. Intellectualism clearly sees that 
the 'motif of the thing' and the 'motjf of space' 1 are interwoven, 
but reduces the former to the latter. Experience discloses beneath 
objective space, in which the body eventually finds its place, a primi- 
tive spatiality of which experience is merely the outer covering and 
which merges with the body's very being. To be a body, is to be tied 
to a certain world, as we have seen; our body is not primarily in 
space: it is of it. Anosognosics who describe their arm as Mike a 
snake', long and cold, 2 do not, strictly speaking, fail to recognize its 
objective outline and, even when the patient looks unsuccessfully for 
his arm or fastens it in order not to lose it, 3 he knows well enough 
where his arm is, since that is where he looks for it and fastens it. If, 
however, patients experience their arm's space as something alien, if 
generally speaking 1 can feel my body's space as vast or minute de- 
spite the evidence of my senses, this is because there exists an affective 
presence and enlargement for which objective spatiality is not a sufli- 

1 Cassirer, Philosophic der symbolischen For men t III, Second Part, Chap. II. 

1 Lhermiltc, L Image dc noire corps, p. 130. 

' Van Bogacrt, Sur la Pathologic de F Image dc soi, p. 541. 

148 



THE SYNTHESIS OF ONE'S OWN BODY 

cicnt condition, as anosognosia shows, and indeed not even a neces- 
sary condition, as is shown by the phantom arm. Bodily spatiality is 
the deployment of one's bodily being, the way in which the body 
comes into being as a body. In trying to analyse it, we were therefore 
simply anticipating what we have to say about bodily synthesis in 
general. 

We find in the unity of the body the same implicatory structure as ' 
we have already described in discussing space. The various parts of 
my body, its visual, tactile and motor aspects are not simply co- 
ordinated. If I am sitting at my table and I want to reach the tele- 
phone, the movement of my hand towards it, the straightening of the 
upper part of the body, the tautening of the leg muscles are super- 
imposed on each other. I desire a certain result and the relevant tasks 
are spontaneously distributed amongst the appropriate segments, the 
possible combinations being presented in advance as equivalent: I 
can continue leaning back in my chair provided that I stretch my arm 
further, or lean forward, or even partly stand up. All these move- 
ments are available to us in virtue of their common meaning. That 
is why, in their first attempts at grasping, children look, not at their 
hand, but at the object: the various parts of the body are known to 
us through their functional value only, and their co-ordination is not 
learnt. Similarly, when I am sitting at my table, I can instantly visual- 
ize the parts of my body which are hidden from me. As I contract my 
foot in my shoe, I can see it. This power belongs to me even with 
respect to parts of the body which I have never seen. Thus certain 
patients have the hallucination of their own face seen from inside. 1 
It has been possible to show that we do not recognize our own hand 
in a photograph, and that many subjects are even uncertain about 
identifying their own handwriting among others, and yet that every- 
one recognizes his own silhouette or his own walk when it is filmed. 
Thus we do not recognize the appearance of what we have often seen, 
and on the other hand we immediately recognize the visual repre- 
sentation of what is invisible to us in our own body. 2 In heautoscopy 
the double which the subject sees in front of him is not always re- 
cognized by certain visible details, yet he feels convinced that it is 
himself, and consequently declares that he sees his double. 3 Each of 
us sees himself as it were through an inner eye which from a few 
yards away is looking at us from the head to the knees. 4 Thus the 
connecting link between the parts of our body and that between our 

1 Lhermitte, Vintage de noire corps, p. 238. 

2 Wolff, Selbstbeurteilung und Fremdbeurieilung in wissentlichen und unmssent- 
lichen Versuch. 

1 Menninger-Lerchental, Das Truggebilde der eigenen Gestalt, p. 4. 
4 Lhermitte, V Image de noire corps, p. 238. 

149 



THE BODY 



visual and tactile experience are not forged gradually and cumula- 
tively. I do not translate the 'data of touch* 'into the language of see- 
- ing' or vice versa — I do not bring together one by one the parts of my 
body; this translation and this unification are performed once and 
for all within me: they are my body.itself. Are we then to say that we 
perceive our body in virtue of its law of construction, as we know in 
advance all the possible facets of a cube in virtue of its geometrical 
structure? But — to say nothing at this stage about external objects — 
our own body acquaints us with a species of unity which is not a 
matter of subsumption under a law. In so far as it stands before ine 
and presents its systematic variations to the observer, the external 
object lends itself to a cursory mental examination of its elements and 
it may, at least by way of preliminary approximation, be defined in 
terms of the law of their variation. But I am not in front of my body, 
I am in it, or rather I am it. Neither its variations nor their constant 
can, therefore, be expressly posited. We do not merely behold as 
spectators the relations between the parts of our body, and the cor- 
relations between the visual and tactile body: we are ourselves the 
unifier of these arms and legs, the person who both sees and touches 
them. The body is, to use Leibnitz's term, the 'effective law' of its 
changes. If we can still speak of interpretation in relation to the per- 
ception of one's own body, we shall have to say that it interprets itself. 
Here the 'visual data 1 make their appearance only through the sense 
of touch, tactile data through sight, each localized movement against 
a background of some inclusive position, each bodily event, whatever 
the 'analyser' which reveals it, against a background of significance 
in which its remotest repercussions are at least foreshadowed and the 
possibility of an intersensory parity immediately furnished. What 
unites 'tactile sensations' in the hand and links them to visual per- 
ceptions of the same hand, and to perceptions of other bodily areas, 
is a certain style informing my manual gestures and implying in turn 
a certain style of finger movements, and contributing, in the last 
resort, to a certain bodily bearing. 1 The body is to be compared, not 
to a physical object, but rather to a work of art. In a picture or a 
piece of music the idea is incommunicable by means other than the 
display of colours and sounds. Any analysis of Cezanne's work, if I 
have not seen his pictures, leaves me with a choice between several 
possible Cezannes, and it is the sight of the pictures which provides 
me with the only existing Cezanne, and therein the analyses find their 
full meaning. The same is true of a poem or a novel, although they 
are made up of words. It is well known that a poem, though it has a 

1 The mechanics of ihc skeleton cannot, even at the scientific level, account for 
the distinctive positions and movements of my body. Cf. La Structure du Com- 
por lenient, p. 196. 

150 



THE SYNTHESIS OF ONE'S OWN BODY 

superficial meaning translatable into prose, leads, in the reader's 
mind, a further existence which makes it a poem. Just as the spoken 
word is significant not only through the medium of individual words, 
but also through that of accent, intonation, gesture and facial expres- 
sion, and as these additional meanings no longer reveal the speaker'c 
thoughts but the source of his thoughts and his fundamental manner 
of being, so poetry, which is perhaps accidentally narrative and in 
that way informative, is essentially a variety of existence. It is dis- 
tinguishable from the cry, because the cry makes use of the body as 
nature gave it to us: poor in expressive means; whereas the poem 
uses language, and even a particular language, in such a way that the 
existential modulation, instead of being dissipated at the very instant 
of its expression, finds in poetic art a means of making itself eternal. 
But although it is independent of the gesture which is inseparable 
from living expression, the poem is not independent of every material 
aid, and it would be irrecoverably lost if its text were not preserved 
down to the last detail. Its meaning is not arbitrary and does not 
dwell in the firmament of ideas: it is locked in the words printed on 
some perishable page. In that sense, like every work of art, the poem 
exists as a thing and does not eternally survive as does a truth. As for 
the novel, although its plot can be summarized and the 'thought' of 
the writer lends itself to abstract expression, this conceptual signifi- 
cance is extracted from a wider one, as the description of a person is 
extracted from the actual appearance of his face. The novelist's task 
is not to expound ideas or even analyse characters, but to depict an 
inter-human event, ripening and bursting it upon us with no ideo- 
logical commentary, to such an extent that any change in the order 
of the narrative or in choice of viewpoint would alter the literary 
meaning of the event. A novel, poem, picture or musical work are 
individuals, that is, beings in which the expression is indistinguish- 
able from the thing expressed, their meaning, accessible only through 
direct contact, being radiated with no change of their temporal and 
spatial situation. It is in this sense that our body is comparable to 
a work of art. It is a nexus of living meanings, not the function 
of a certain number of mutually variable terms. A certain experience 
tactile felt in the upper arm signifies a certain tactile experience in 
the forearm and shoulder, along with a certain visual aspect of 
the same arm, not because the various tactile perceptions among 
themselves, or the tactile and visual ones, are all involved in one 
intelligible arm, as the different facets of a cube are related to the 
idea of a cube, but because the arm seen and the arm touched, like 
the different segments of the arm, together perform one and the same 
action. 

Just as we saw earlier that motor habit threw light on the particular 

151 



THE BODY 

nature of bodily space, so here habit in general enables us to under- 
stand the general synthesis of one's own body. And, just as the analy- 
sis of bodily spatiality foreshadowed that of the unity of one's own 
body, so we may extend to all habits what we have said about motor 
ones. In fact every habit is both motor and perceptual, because it lies, 
as we have said, between explicit perception and actual movement, in 
the basic function which sets boundaries to our field of vision and our 
field of action. Learning to find one's way among things with a stick, 
which we gave a little earlier as an example of motor habit, is equally 
an example of perceptual habit. Once the stick has become a familiar 
instrument, the world of feelable things recedes and now begins, not 
at the outer skin of the hand, but at the end of the stick. One is 
tempted to say that through the sensations produced by the pressure 
of the stick on the hand, the blind man builds up the stick along with 
its various positions, and that the latter then mediate a second order 
object, the external thing. It would appear in this case that perception 
is always a reading off from the same sensory data, but constantly 
accelerated, and operating with ever more attenuated signals. But 
habit does not consist in interpreting the pressures of the stick on the 
hand as indications of certain positions of the stick, and these as 
signs of an external object, since it relieves us of the necessity of doing 
so. The pressures on the hand and the stick are no longer given; the 
stick is no longer an object perceived by the blind man, but an instru- 
ment with which he perceives. It is a bodily auxiliary, an extension of 
the bodily synthesis. Correspondingly, the external object is not the 
flat projection or invariant of a set of perspectives, but something to- 
wards which the stick leads us, and the perspectives of which, accord- 
ing to perceptual evidence, are not signs, but aspects. Intellectualism 
cannot conceive any passage from the perspective to the thing itself, 
or from sign to significance otherwise than as an interpretation, an 
apperception, a cognitive intention. According to this view sensory 
data and \ erspectives are at each level contents grasped as (aufgefasst 
als) manifestations of one and the same intelligible core. 1 But this 
analysis distorts both the sign and the meaning; it separates out, by a 
-*- process of objectification of both, the sense-content, which is already 
4 pregnant' with a meaning, and the invariant core, which is not a law 
but a thing: it conceals the organic relationship between subject and 
world, the active transcendence of consciousness, the momentum 

1 Husserl, for example, for a long time defined consciousness or the imposition 
of a significance in terms of the Auffassung-Inhalt framework, and as a beseelende 
Aujffassung. He takes a decisive step forward in recognizing, from the time oT his 
Lectures on Time, that this operation presupposes another deeper one whereby 
the content is itself made ready for this apprehension. 'Not every constitution is 
brought about through the Auffassungsinhalt-Auffassung' Vorlesungen zur Phcino- 
menologie des inneren Zeitbewusstseins, p. 5, note 1. 

152 



THE SYNTHESIS OF ONE'S OWN BODY 

which carries it into a thing and into a world by means of its organs 
and instruments. The analysis of motor habit as an extension of 
existence leads on, then, to an analysis of perceptual habit as the 
coming into possession of a world. Conversely, every perceptual 
habit is still a motor habit and here equally the process of grasping 
a meaning is performed by the body. When a child grows accustomed 
to distinguishing blue from red, it is observed that the habit cultivated 
in relation to these two colours helps with the rest. 1 Is it, then, the 
case that through the pair blue-red the child has perceived the mean- 
ing: 'colour'? Is the crucial moment of habit-formation in that com- 
ing to awareness, that arrival at a 'point of view of colour', that in- 
tellectual analysis which subsumes the data under one category? But 
for the child to be able to perceive blue and red under the category of 
colour, the category must be rooted in the data, otherwise no sub- 
sumption could recognize it in them. It is necessary that, on the 
'blue' and 'red' panels presented to him, the particular kind of vibra- 
tion and impression on the eye known as blue and red should be 
represented. In the gaze we have at our disposal a natural instrument 
analogous to the blind man's stick. The gaze gets more or less from 
things according to the way in which it questions them, ranges over 
or dwells on them. To learn to see colours is to acquire a certain style 
of seeing, a new use of one's own body; it is to enrich and recast the 
body image. Whether a system of motor or perceptual powers, our 
body is not an object for an 'I think', it is a grouping of lived-through 
meanings which moves towards its equilibrium. Sometimes a new 
cluster of meanings is formed: our former movements are integrated 
into a fresh motor entity, the first visual data into a fresh sensory 
entity, our natural powers suddenly come together in a richer mean- 
ing, which hitherto has been merely foreshadowed in our perceptual 
or practical field, and which has made itself felt in our experience by 
no more than a certain lack, and which by its coming suddenly re- 
shuffles the elements of our equilibrium and fulfils our blind expecta- 
tion. 

1 Koffka, Growth of the Mind, pp. 174 and ff. 



153 



5 

THE BODY IN ITS SEXUAL 
BEING 



OUR constant aim is to elucidate the primary function whereby we 
bring into existence, for ourselves, or take a hold upon, space, the 
object or the instrument, and to describe the body as the place where 
this appropriation occurs. Now so long as we considered space or the 
things perceived, it was not easy to rediscover the relationship be- 
tween the embodied subject and its world, because it is transformed 
by its own activity into the intercourse between the epistemological 
subject and the object. Indeed the natural world presents itself as 
existing in itself over and above its existence for me; the act of trans- 
cendence whereby the subject is thrown open to the world runs away 
with itself and we find ourselves in the presence of a nature which has 
no need to be perceived in order to exist. If then we want to bring to 
light the birth of being for us, we must finally look at that area of our 
experience which clearly has significance and reality only for us, and 
that is our affective life. Let us try to see how a thing or a being begins 
to exist for us through desire or love and we shall thereby come to 
understand better how things and beings can exist in general. 

Ordinarily affectivity is conceived as a mosaic of emotional states, 
of pleasures and pains each sealed within itself, mutually incompre- 
hensible, and explicable only in terms of the bodily system. If it is 
conceded that in man the emotional life is 'shot through with intel- 
ligence' we mean that simple representations can take the place of 
the natural stimuli of pleasure and pain, according to the laws govern- 
ing the association of ideas or governing the conditioned reflex, that 
these substitutions superimpose pleasure and pain on circumstances 
which arc, naturally speaking, matters of indifference to us and that, 
through one displacement after another, second or third order values 
arc created which bear no obvious relation to our natural pleasures 
and pains. The objective world plays less and less directly on the 

154 



THE BODY IN ITS SEXUAL BEING 

keyboard of 'elementary' emotional states, but their value remains 
nevertheless as a possibility of pleasure and pain. Apart from ex- 
perience of pleasure and pain, of which there is nothing to be said, 
the subject stands out by his power of representation, and affectivity 
is not recognized as a distinctive form of consciousness. If this con- 
ception were correct, any sexual incapacity ought to amount either to 
the loss of certain representations or else to a weakening of the capa- 
city for satisfaction. We shall see that this is not the case. One patient 1 
no longer seeks sexual intercourse of his own accord. Obscene pic- 
tures, conversations on sexual topics, the sight of a body do not 
arouse desire in him. The patient hardly ever kisses, and the kiss for 
him has no value as sexual stimulation. Reactions are strictly local 
and do not begin to occur without contact. If the prelude is inter- 
rupted at this stage, there is no attempt to pursue the sexual cycle. In 
the sexual act intromission is never spontaneous. If orgasm occurs 
first in the partner and she moves away, the half-fulfilled desire 
vanishes. At every stage it is as if the subject did not know what is to 
be done. There are no active movements, save a few seconds before 
the orgasm which is extremely brief. Nocturnal emissions are rare and 
never accompanied by dreams. Are we to try to explain this sexual 
inertia — as earlier we explained the loss of initiative in general move- 
ments — in terms of the disappearance of visual representations? The 
difficulty here is in maintaining that there is no tactile representation 
of sexual activity, and one is thus still left wondering why in Schnei- 
der's case touch stimulation, and not only visual perception, has lost 
much of its sexual significance. If now we work on the supposition of 
some general failure of representation, both of touch and vision, the 
problem still remains of describing the concrete aspect assumed by 
this wholly formal deficiency in the realm of sexuality. For indeed 
the infrequency of nocturnal emissions, for example, is not explained 
by the weakness of representations, which are its effect rather than its 
cause, and which would seem to point to some change in the charac- 
ter of the sexual life itself. If we presuppose some decline of normal 
sexual reflexes or of pleasurable states, we are then faced with a case 
tending rather to show that there are no sexual reflexes and no pure 
state of pleasure. For, it will be recalled, all Schneider's troubles 
spring from a wound of limited extent in the occipital region. If 
sexuality in man were an autonomous reflex apparatus, if the object 
of sexual desire affected some organ of pleasurable sensation 
anatomically defined, then the effect of the cerebral injury would be 
to free these automatic responses and take the form of accentuated 

1 Schneider once more, lhe patient whose motor and intellectual deficiencies we 
have studied above, and whose emotional and sexual behaviour has been analysed 
by Steinfeld, Ein Beitrog zur Analyse cier Sexual funkt ion, pp. 175-80. 

155 



THH BODY 

sexual behaviour. Pathology brings to light, somewhere between 
automatic response and representation, a vital zone in which the 
sexual possibilities of the patient are elaborated, in the same way, as 
we saw above, as are his motor, perceptual and even intellectual 
possibilities. There must be, immanent in sexual life, some function 
which ensures its emergence, and the normal extension of sexuality 
must rest on internal powers of the organic subject. There must be an 
Eros or a Libido which breathes life into an original world, gives 
sexual value or meaning to external stimuli and outlines for each 
subject the use he shall make of his objective body. It is the very struc- 
ture of perception or erotic experience which has undergone change 
in Schneider. In the case of the normal subject, a body is not per- 
ceived merely as any object; this objective perception has within it a 
more intimate perception: the visible body is subtended by a sexual 
schema, which is strictly individual, emphasizing the erogenous areas, 
outlining a sexual physiognomy, and eliciting the gestures of the 
masculine body which is itself integrated into this emotional totality. 
But for Schneider a woman's body has no particular essence: it is, he 
says, pre-eminently character which makes a woman attractive, for 
physically they are all the same. Close physical contact causes only a 
'vague feeling', the knowledge of 'an indeterminate something' which 
is never enough to 'spark off' sexual behaviour and create a situation 
which requires a definite mode of resolution. Perception has lost its 
erotic structure, both spatially and temporally. What has disappeared 
from the patient is his power of projecting before himself a sexual 
world, of putting himself in an erotic situation, or, once such a situa- 
tion is stumbled upon, of maintaining it or following it through to 
complete satisfaction. The very word satisfaction has no longer any 
meaning for him, since there is no intention or initiative of a sexual 
kind which calls up a cycle of movements and states, which 'patterns' 
them and finds its satisfaction in them. In so far as the tactile stimuli 
themselves, which the patient turns to excellent account under dif- 
ferent circumstances, have lost their sexual significance, it is because 
they have so to speak ceased to speak to his body, to locate it in a 
sexual context, or, in other words, because the patient no longer asks, 
of his environment, this mute and permanent question which con- 
stitutes normal sexuality. Schneider, and the majority of impotent 
subjects, 'do not throw themselves into what they are doing'. But 
absent-mindedness and inappropriate representations are not causes 
but effects, and in so far as the subject coolly perceives the situation, 
it is in the first place because he does not live it and is not caught up 
in it. At this stage one begins to suspect a mode of perception distinct 
from objective perception, a kind of significance distinct from intel- 
lectual significance, an intentionality which is not pure 'awareness of 

156 



THE BODY IN ITS SEXUAL BEING 

something'. Erotic perception is not a cogitatio which aims at a 
cogitatum\ through one body it aims at another body, and takes 
place in the world, not in a consciousness. A sight has a sexual sig- 
nificance for me, not when I consider, even confusedly, its possible 
relationship to the sexual organs or to pleasurable states, but when it 
exists for my body, for that power always available for bringing to- 
gether into an erotic situation the stimuli applied, and adapting sexual 
conduct to it. There is an erotic 'comprehension' not of the order of 
understanding, since understanding subsumes an experience, once 
perceived, under some idea, while desire comprehends blindly by 
linking body to body. Even in the case of sexuality, which has never- 
theless long been regarded as pre-eminently the type of bodily func- 
tion, we are concerned, not with a peripheral involuntary action, but 
with an intentionality which follows the general flow of existence and 
yields to its movements. Schneider can no longer put himself into a 
sexual situation any more than generally he occupies an affective or 
an ideological one. Faces are for him neither attractive nor repul- 
sive, and people appear to him in one light or another only in so 
far as he has direct dealings with them, and according to the attitude 
they adopt towards him, and the attention and solicitude which 
they bestow upon him. Sun and rain are neither gay nor sad; his 
humour is determined by elementary organic functions only, and 
the world is emotionally neutral. Schneider hardly extends his 
sphere of human relationships at all, and when he makes new friend- 
ships they sometimes come to an unfortunate end: this is because 
they never result, as can be seen on analysis, from a spontaneous im- 
pulse, but from a decision made in the abstract. He would like to be 
able to think about politics and religion, but he does not even try, 
knowing that these realms are closed to him, and we have seen that 
generally speaking he never performs an act of authentic thought and 
substitutes for the intuitive understanding of number or the grasp of 
meanings the manipulation of signs and a technique depending on 
'points of support'. 1 We discover both that sexual life is one more 
form of original intentionality, and also bring to view the vital 
origins of perception, motility and representation by basing all these 
'processes' on an 'intentional arc' which gives way in the patient, 
and which, in the normal subject, endows experience with its degree ^ 
of vitality and fruitfulness. 

Thus sexuality is not an autonomous cycle. It has internal links 
with the whole active and cognitive being, these three sectors of 
behaviour displaying one typical structure, and standing in a relation- 
ship to each other of reciprocal expression. Here we concur with the 
most lasting discoveries of psychoanalysis. Whatever the theoretical 

1 Cf. supra, p. 133. 
157 



THE BODY 



declarations of Freud may have been, psychoanalytical research is in 
fact led to an explanation of man, not in terms of his sexual substruc- 
ture, but to a discovery in sexuality of relations and attitudes which 
had previously been held to reside in consciousness. Thus the signifi- 
cance of psychoanalysis is less to make psychology biological than to 
discover a dialectical process in functions thought of as 'purely 
bodily', and to reintegrate sexuality into the human being. A break- 
away disciple of Freud 1 shows, for example, that frigidity is scarcely 
ever bound up with anatomical or physiological conditions, but that 
it expresses in most cases a refusal of orgasm, of femininity or of 
sexuality, and this in turn expresses the rejection of the sexual partner 
and of the destiny which he represents. It would be a mistake to 
imagine that even with Freud psychoanalysis rules out the description 
of psychological motives, and is opposed to the phenomenological 
method: psychoanalysis has, on the contrary, albeit unwittingly, 
helped to develop it by declaring, as Freud puts it, that every human 
action 'has a meaning', 2 and by making every effort to understand 
the event, short of relating it to mechanical circumstances. 

For Freud himself the sexual is not the genital, sexual life is not a 
mere effect of the processes having their seat in the genital organs, the 
libido is not an instinct, that is, an activity naturally directed towards 
definite ends, it is the general power, which the psychosomatic subject 
enjoys, of taking root in different settings, of establishing himself 
through different experiences, of gaining structures of conduct. It is 
what causes a man to have a history. In so far as a man's sexual 
history provides a key to his life, it is because in his sexuality is pro- 
jected his manner of being towards the world, that is, towards time 
and other men. There are sexual symptoms at the root of all neuroses, 
but these symptoms, correctly interpreted, symbolize a whole atti- 
tude, whether, for example, one of conquest or of flight. Into the 
sexual history, conceived as the elaboration of a general form of life, 
all psychological constituents can enter, because there is no longer an 
interaction of two causalities and because the genital life is geared to 
the whole life of the subject. So the question is not so much whether 
human life does or does not rest on sexuality, as of knowing what is 
to be understood by sexuality. Psychoanalysis represents a double 

1 W. Stekel, La Femme frigide. 

2 Freud, Introductory Lectures, p. 31. Freud himself, in his concrete analyses, 
abandons causal thought, when he demonstrates that symptoms always have 
several meanings, or, as he puts it, are 4 overdetermined\ For this amounts to 
admitting that a symptom, at the time of its onset, always finds raisonsd'itre in 
ihe subject, so that no event in a life is, strictly speaking, externally determined. 
Freud compares the accident occurring from outside to the foreign body which, 
for the oyster, is merely the occasion for secreting a pearl. Sec for example Cinq 
psychanalyses. Chap. I, p. 91, note 1. 

158 



THE BODY IN ITS SEXUAL BEING 

trend of thought: on the one hand it stresses the sexual substructure 
of life, on the other it 'expands* the notion of sexuality to the extent 
of absorbing into it the whole of existence. But precisely for that 
reason, its conclusions, like those of our last paragraph but one, re- 
main ambiguous. When we generalize the notion of sexuality, making 
it a manner of being in the physical and inter-human world, do we 
mean, in the last analysis, that all existence has a sexual significance 
or that every sexual phenomenon has an existential significance? In 
the first hypothesis, existence would be an abstraction, another name 
for the sexual life. But since sexual life can no longer be circum- 
scribed, sinoe it is no longer a separate function definable in terms of 
the causality proper to a set of organs, there is now no sense in saying 
that all existence is understood through the sexual life, or rather this 
statement becomes a tautology. Must we then say, conversely, that 
the sexual phenomenon is merely an expression of our general man- 
ner of projecting our setting? But the sexual life is not a mere reflec- 
tion of existence: an effective life, in the political and ideological 
field, for example, can be associated with impaired sexuality, and may 
even benefit from such impairment. On the other hand, the sexual 
life may, as in Casanova's case for example, possess a kind of techni- 
cal perfection corresponding to no particularly vigorous version of 
being in the world. Even though the sexual apparatus has, running 
through it, the general current of life, it may monopolize it to its own 
advantage. Life is particularized into separate currents. If words are 
to have any meaning, the sexual life is a sector of our life bearing a 
special relation to the existence of sex. There can be no question of 
allowing sexuality to become lost in existence, as if it were no more 
then an epiphenomenon. For if we admit that the sexual troubles of 
neurotics are an expression of their basic drama in magnified form, 
it still remains to be seen why the sexual expression of the drama is 
more immature, more frequent and more striking than the rest; and 
why sexuality is not only a symptom, but a highly important one. 
Here we meet once more a problem which we have already encoun- 
tered several times. We showed with Gestalt theory that no layer of 
sensory data can be identified as immediately dependent on sense- 
organs: the smallest sensory datum is never presented in any other 
way than integrated into a configuration and already 'patterned'. This, 
as we have said, does not prevent the words 'see' and 'hear' from hav- 
ing a meaning. We have drawn attention elsewhere 1 to the fact that 
the specialized regions of the brain, the 'optical zone', for example, 
never function in isolation. The fact remains, as we pointed out, that 
the visual or auditory side predominates in the picture of the illness, 
according to the region in which the lesions are situated. Finally, as 
1 La Structure du Comportement, pp. 80 and ff. 
159 



THE BODY 

we have indicated above, biological existence is synchronized with 
human existence and is never indifferent to its distinctive rhythm. 
Nevertheless, we shall now add, 'living' (leben) is a primary process 
from which, as a starting point, it becomes possible to 'live' (erlehen) 
this or that world, and we must eat and breathe before perceiving 
and awakening to relational living, belonging to colours and lights 
through sight, to sounds through hearing, to the body of another 
through sexuality, before arriving at the life of human relations. Thus 
sight, hearing, sexuality, the body are not only the routes, instru- 
ments or manifestations of personal existence: the latter takes up and 
absorbs into itself their existence as it is anonymously given. When we 
say that the life of the body, or the flesh, and the life of the psyche 
are involved in a relationship of reciprocal expression, or that the 
bodily event always has a psychic meaning, these formulations need 
to be explained. Valid as they are for excluding causal thought, they 
do not mean that the body is the transparent integument of Spirit. 
The return to existence, as to the setting in which the communication 
between body and mind can be understood, is not a return to Con- 
sciousness or Spirit, and existential psychoanalysis must not serve as 
a pretext for a revival of mentalistic philosophy {spiritualisme). This 
will be better understood if we clarify the notions of 'expression' and 
'meaning' which belong to the world of language and thought as 
already constituted, which we have just applied uncritically to the 
body-mind relationship, and which bodily experience must in fact 
lead us to correct. 

A girl 1 whose mother has forbidden her to see again the young man 
with whom she is in love, cannot sleep, loses her appetite and finally 
the use of speech. An initial manifestation of this loss of speech is 
found to have occurred during her childhood, after an earthquake, 
and subsequently again following a severe fright. A strictly Freudian 
interpretation of this would introduce a reference to the oral phase of 
sexual development. But what is 'fixated' on the mouth is not merely 
sexual existence, but, more generally, those relations with others 
having the spoken word as their vehicle. In so far as the emotion 
elects to find its expression in loss of speech, this is because of all 
bodily functions speech is the most intimately linked with communal 
existence, or, as we shall put it, with co-existence. Loss of speech, 
then, stands for the refusal of co-existence, just as, in other subjects, 
a fit of hysterics is the means of escaping from the situation. The 
patient breaks with relational life within the family circle. More 
generally, she tends to break with life itself: her inability to swallow 
food arises from the fact that swallowing symbolizes the movement of 
existence which carries events and assimilates them; the patient is 
unable, literally, to 'swallow' the prohibition which has been imposed 
1 Binswanger, Ober Psychotherapie, pp. 113 and ff. 
160 



THE BODY IN ITS SEXUAL BEING 

upon her. 1 In the subject's childhood, fear was translated by loss of 
speech because the imminence of death violently interrupted co- 
existence, and threw her back upon her own personal fate. The symp- 
tom of aphonia reappears because the mother's prohibition restores 
the situation metaphorically, and because, moreover, by shutting off 
the future from the subject, it leads her back to her favourite forms of 
behaviour. These motivations may be supposed to take advantage of 
a particular sensitivity of the throat and the mouth in the case of our 
subject, a sensitivity which may be related to the history of her libido 
and to the oral phase of sexuality. Thus through the sexual signifi- 
cance of symptoms can be discerned, in faint outline, their more 
general significance in relation to past and future, to the self and 
others, that is to say, to the fundamental dimensions of existence. But 
as we shall see, the body does not constantly express the modalities 
of existence in the way that stripes indicate rank, or a house-number 
a house: the sign here does not only convey its significance, it is filled 
with it; it is, in a way, what it signifies, as a portrait is the quasi- 
presence of the absent Peter, 2 or as wax figures in magic are what they 
stand for. The sick girl does not mime with her body a drama played 
out 'in her consciousness'. By losing her voice she does not present a 
public version of an 'inner state', she does not make a 'gesture' like 
that of the head of a state shaking hands with the engine driver and 
embracing a peasant, or that of a friend who takes offence and stops 
speaking to me. To have lost one's voice is not to keep silence: one 
keeps silence only when one can speak. It is true that loss of voice is 
not paralysis, and this is proved by the fact that, treated by psycho- 
logical means and left free by her family to see the man she loves, the 
girl recovers her power of speech. Yet neither is aphonia a deliberate 
or voluntary silence. It is generally known how, by the notion of 
pithiatism,* the theory of hysteria has been carried beyond the 
dilemma of paralysis (or of anasthesia) and simulation. If the hysteri- 
cal patient is a deceiver, it is first and foremost himself that he de- 
ceives, so that it is impossible to separate what he really feels or thinks 
and what he overtly expresses: pithiatism is a disease of the Cogito, 
consciousness which has become ambivalent and not a deliberate 
refusal to declare what one knows. Here, in the same way, the girl 
does not cease to speak, she 'loses' her voice as one loses a memory. 
It is true again that, as psychoanalysis shows, the lost memory is not 
accidentally lost, it is lost rather in so far as it belongs to an area of 

1 Binswanger (Uber Psychotherapie, p. 188), points out that one patient, as he 
recollects a traumatic memory, and tells it to the doctor, relaxes the sphincter. 

2 J. P. Sartre, Vlmaginaire, p. 38. 

* Pithiatism: the class of hysterical symptoms which can be made to disappear 
or be reproduced by means of suggestion (Translator's note). 

161 



tin: body 

my life Which I reject, in so far as it lias a certain significance and, 
like all significances, this one exists only for someone. Forgetfulness 
is therefore an act: 1 keep the memory at arm's length, as I look past 
a person whom I do not wish to see. Yet, as psychoanalysis too shows 
to perfection, though the resistance certainly presupposes an inten- 
tional relationship with the memory resisted, it does not set it before 
us as an object ; it docs not specifically reject the memory. It is directed 
against a region of our experience, a certain category, a certain class 
of memories. The subject who has left a book, which was a present 
from his wife, in a drawer, and forgotten all about it, and who re- 
discovers it when they have become reconciled once more, 1 haft not 
really lost the book, but neither did he know where it was. Everything 
connected with his wife had ceased to exist for him, he had shut it out 
from his life, and at one stroke, broken the circuit of all actions relat- 
ing to her, and thus placed himself on the hither side of all knowledge 
and ignorance, assertion and negation, in so far as these were volun- 
tary. Thus, in hysteria and repression, we may well overlook some- 
thing although we know of it, because our memories and our body, 
instead of presenting themselves to us in singular and determinate 
conscious acts, are enveloped in generality. Through this generality 
we still 'have them\ but just enough to hold them at a distance from 
us. We discover in this way that sensory messages or memories are 
expressly grasped and recognized by us only in so far as they adhere 
generally to that area of our body and our life to which they are rele- 
vant. Such adherence or rejection places the subject in a definite 
situation and sets bounds, as far as he is concerned, to the immediately 
available mental field, as the acquisition or loss of a sense organ pre- 
sents to or removes from his direct grasp an object in the physical 
field. It cannot be said that the factual situation thus created is the 
mere consciousness of a situation, for that would amount to saying 
that the 'forgotten' memory, arm or leg arc arrayed before my con- 
sciousness, present and near to me in the same sense as are the 'pre- 
served' regions of my past or of my body. No more can it be said that 
the loss of voice is voluntary. Will presupposes a field of possibilities 
among which 1 choose: here is Peter, I can speak to him or not. But 
if 1 lose my power of speech, Peter no longer exists for me as an inter- 
locutor, sought after or rejected; what collapses is the whole field of 
possibilities. I cut myself off even from that mode of communication 
and significance which silence provides. Of course we may go on to 
speak of hypocrisy or bad faith. But then it will be necessary to draw 
a distinction between psychological and metaphysical hypocrisy. The 
former deceives others by concealing from them thoughts expressly 
in the mind of the subject. It is fortuitous and easily avoided. The 
1 Freud, Introductory Lectures, p. 43. 
162 



THE BODY IN ITS SEXUAL BEING 

latter is self-deceiving through the medium of generality, thus leading 
finally to a state or a situation which is not an inevitability, but which 
is not posited or voluntary. It is even to be found in the 'sincere' or 
'authentic' man whenever he undertakes to be something or other 
unqualifiedly. It is part of the human lot. When the hysterical fit has 
reached its climax, even if the subject has sought it as the means of es- 
caping from an intolerable situation and plunges into it as into a place 
of refuge, he scarcely hears anything more, he can scarcely see, he has 
almost become the spasmodic and panting existence which struggles 
on the bed. The intensity of resentment is such that it becomes resent- 
ment against X, against life, an absolute resentment. With every 
minute that passes, freedom is depreciated and becomes less probable. 
Even if freedom is never impossible and even if it may always derail 
the dialectics of bad faith, the fact remains that a night's sleep has 
the same power: what can be surmounted by this anonymous force 
must indeed be of the same nature as it, and so it must at least be 
admitted that resentment or loss of voice, as they persist, become 
consistent like things, that they assume a structure, and that any deci- 
sion that interrupted them would come from a lower level than that 
of 'will'. The patient cuts himself off from his voice as certain insects 
sever one of their own legs. He is literally without a voice. In treating 
this condition, psychological medicine does not act on the patient by 
making him know the origin of his illness: sometimes a touch of 
the hand puts a stop to the spasms and restores to the patient his 
speech 1 and the same procedure, having acquired a ritual signifi- 
cance, will subsequently be enough to deal with fresh attacks. In any 
case, in psychological treatment of any kind, the coming to awareness 
would remain purely cognitive, the patient would not accept the 
meaning of his disturbances as revealed to him without the personal 
relationship formed with the doctor, or without the confidence and 
friendship felt towards him, and the change of existence resulting 
from this friendship. Neither symptom nor cure is worked out at the 
level of objective or positing consciousness, but below that level. 
Loss of voice as a situation may be compared to sleep: I lie down in 
bed, on my left side, with my knees drawn up; I close my eyes and 
breathe slowly, putting my plans out of my mind. But the power of 
my will or consciousness stops there. As the faithful, in the Dionysian 
mysteries, invoke the god by miming scenes from his life, I call up 
the visitation of sleep by imitating the breathing and posture of the 
sleeper. The god is actually there when the faithful can no longer dis- 
tinguish themselves from the part they are playing, when their body 
and their consciousness cease to bring in, as an obstacle, their par- 
ticular opacity, and when they are totally fused in the myth. There is a 
1 Binswanger, Ober Psychotherapie, pp. 113 and ft\ 
163 



THE BODY 

moment when sleep 'comes', settling on this imitation of itself which 
I have been offering to it, and I succeed in becoming what I was trying 
to be: an unseeing and almost unthinking mass, riveted to a point in 
space and in the world henceforth only through the anonymous alert- 
ness of the senses. It is true that this last link makes waking up a pos- 
sibility: through these half-open doors things will return or the 
sleeper will come back into the world. In the same way the patient 
who has broken with co-existence can still perceive the sensible in- 
tegument of other people, and abstractly conceive the future by 
means, for instance, of a calendar. In this sense the sleeper is never 
completely isolated within himself, never totally a sleeper, and the 
patient is never totally cut off from the intersubjective world, never 
totally ill. But what, in the sleeper and the patient, makes possible a 
return to the real world, are still only impersonal functions, sense 
organs and language. We remain free in relation to sleep and sickness 
to the exact extent to which we remain always involved in the waking 
and healthy state, our freedom rests on our being in a situation, and 
is itself a situation. Sleep and waking, illness and health arc not 
modalities of consciousness or will, but presuppose an 'existential 
step'. 1 Loss of voice does not merely represent a refusal of speech, or 
anorexia* a refusal of life; they are that refusal of others or refusal 
of the future, torn from the transitive nature of 'inner phenomena', 
generalized, consummated, transformed into de facto situations. 

The body's role is to ensure this metamorphosis. It transforms 
ideas into things, and my mimicry of sleep into real sleep. The body 
can symbolize existence because it brings it into being and actualizes 
it. It sustains its dual existential action of systole and diastole. On the 
one hand, indeed, it is the possibility enjoyed by my existence of dis- 
carding itself, of making itself anonymous and passive, and of bog- 
ging itself down in a scholastic. In the case of the girl just discussed, 
the move towards the future, towards the living present or towards 
the past, the power of learning, of maturing, of entering into com- 
munication with others, have become, as it were, arrested in a bodily 
symptom, existence is tied up and the body has become 'the place 
where life hides away'. 2 For the patient, nothing further happens, 
nothing assumes meaning and form in life, or more precisely there 
occurs only a recurrent and always identical 'now', life flows back on 
itself and history is dissolved in natural time. Even when normal and 
even when involved in situations with other people, the subject, in 
so far as he has a body, retains every moment the power to withdraw 
from it. At the very moment when I live in the world, when I am given 

1 Binswangcr, Ober Psvchothcrapic, p. 188. 

2 Ibid., p. 182. 

* Anorexia : loss of appciitc (Translator's nolc). 
164 



THE BODY IN ITS SEXUAL BEING 

over to my plans, my occupations, piy friends, my memories, I can 
close my eyes, lie down, listen to the blood pulsating in my ears, lose 
myself in some pleasure or pain, and shut myself up in this anony- 
mous life which subtends my personal one. But precisely because my 
body can shut itself off from the world, it is also what opens me out 
upon the world and places me in a situation there. The momentum of 
existence towards others, towards the future, towards the world can 
be restored as a river unfreezes. The girl will recover her voice, not by 
an intellectual effort or by an abstract decree of the will, but through 
a conversion in which the whole of her body makes a concentrated 
effort in the form of a genuine gesture, as we seek and recover a name 
forgotten not 'in our mind', but 'in our head' or 'on the tip of our 
tongue'. The memory or the voice is recovered when the body once 
more opens itself to others or to the past, when it opens the way to 
co-existence and once more (in the active sense) acquires significance 
beyond itself. Moreover, even when cut off from the circuit of exist- 
ence, the body never quite falls back on to itself. Even if I become 
absorbed in the experience of my body and in the solitude of sensa- 
tions, I do not succeed in abolishing all reference of my life to a world. 
At every moment some intention springs afresh from me, if it is only 
towards the things round about me which catch my eye, or towards 
the instants, which are thrown up, and which thrust back into the 
past what I have just lived through. I never become quite a thing in 
the world; the density of existence as a thing always evades me, my 
own substance slips away from me internally, and some intention is 
always foreshadowed. In so far as it carries within it 'sense organs*, 
bodily existence is never self-sufficient, it is always a prey to an active 
1 nothingness, it continually sets the prospect of living before me, and 

natural time at every successive moment adumbrates the empty form 
of the true event. This prospect may indeed fail to elicit any response. 
The instant of natural time does not establish anything, it has to be 
immediately renewed, and indeed is renewed in another instant, and 
the sensory functions by themselves do not cause me to be in the 
world : when I become absorbed in my body, my eyes present me with 
no more than the perceptible outer covering of things and of other 
people, things themselves take on unreality, behaviour degenerates 
into the absurd, and the present itself, as in cases of false recognition, 
loses its consistency and takes on an air of eternity. Bodily existence 
which runs through me, yet does so independently of me, is only the 
barest raw material of a genuine presence in the world. Yet at least 
it provides the possibility of such presence, and establishes our first 
consonance with the world. I may very well take myself away from 
the human world and set aside personal existence, but only to redis- 
cover in my body the same power, this time unnamed, by which I am 

165 



THE BODY 



condemned to being, it may be said that the body is 'the hidden form 
of being ourself', 1 or on the other hand, that personal existence is the 
taking up and manifestation of a being in a given situation. If we 
therefore say that the body expresses existence at every moment, this 
is in the sense in which a word expresses thought. Anterior to conven- 
tional means of expression, which reveal my thoughts to others only 
because already, for both myself and them, meanings are provided 
for each sign, and which in this sense do not give rise to genuine 
communication at all, we must, as we shall see, recognize a primary 
process of signification in which the thing expressed does not exist 
apart from the expression, and in which the signs themselves induce 
their significance externally. In this way the body expresses total 
existence, not because it is an external acccmpanimcnt to that exist- 
ence, but because existence comes into its own in the body. This 
incarnate significance is the central phenomenon of which body and 
mind, sign and significance are abstract moments. 

Understood in this way, the relation of expression to thing ex- 
pressed, or of sign to meaning is not a one-way relationship like that 
between original text and translation. Neither body nor existence can 
be regarded as the original of the human being, since they presuppose 
each other, and because the body is solidified or generalized existence, 
and existence a perpetual incarnation. What is particularly important, 
is that when we say that sexuality has an existential significance or 
that it expresses existence, this is not to be understood as meaning 
that the sexual drama 2 is in the last analysis only a manifestation or a 
symptom of an existential drama. The same reason that prevents us 
from 'reducing' existence to the body or to sexuality, prevents us also 
from 'reducing' sexuality to existence: the fact is that existence is not 
a set of facts (like 'psychic facts') capable of being reduced to others 
or to which they can reduce themselves, but the ambiguous setting 
of their inter-communication, the point at which their boundaries run 
into each other, or again their woven fabric. There is no question of 
making human existence walk 'on its head'. There is no doubt at all 
that we must recognize in modesty, desire and love in general a meta- 
physical significance, which means that they are incomprehensible if 
man is treated as a machine governed by natural laws, or even as 'a 
bundle of instincts', and that they are relevant to man as a conscious- 
ness and as a freedom. Usually man does not show his body, and, 
when he docs, it is either nervously or with an intention to fascinate. 
He has the impression that the alien gaze which runs over his body is 

1 Binswangcr, Ober Psvchotherapie, 'cine verdeckte Form unscres Selbstseins' 
p. 188. 

2 We here take the word in lis etymological sense (and without any Romantic 
overtone) as did Politzcr, Critique des fondemetits de la psychologic, p. 23. 

166 



THE BODY IN ITS SEXUAL BEING 

stealing it from him, or else, on the other hand, that the display of his 
body will deliver the other person up to him, defenceless, and that in 
this case the other will be reduced to servitude. Shame and im- 
modesty, then, take their place in a dialectic of the self and the other 
which is that of master and slave: in so far as I have a body, I may 
be reduced to the status of an object beneath the gaze of another 
person, and no longer count as a person for him, or else I may be- 
come his master and, in my turn, look at him. But this mastery is 
self-defeating, since, precisely when my value is recognized through 
the other's desire, he is no longer the person by whom I wished to be 
recognized, but a being fascinated, deprived of his freedom, and who 
therefore no longer counts in my eyes. 

Saying that I have a body is thus a way of saying that I can be seen 
as an object and that I try to be seen as a subject, that another can 
be my master or my slave, so that shame and shamelessness express 
the dialectic of the plurality of consciousnesses, and have a meta- 
physical significance. The same might be said of sexual desire: if it 
cannot accept the presence of a third party as witness, if it feels that 
too natural an attitude or over-casual remarks, on the part of the 
desired person, are signs of hostility, this is because it seeks to fasci- 
nate, and because the observing third party or the person desired, if 
he is too free in manner, escapes this fascination. What we try to 
possess, then, is not just a body, but a body brought to life by con- 
sciousness. As Alain says, one does not love a madwoman, except in 
so far as one has loved her before the onset of madness. The im- 
portance we attach to the body and the contradictions of love are, 
therefore, related to a more general drama which arises from the 
metaphysical structure of my body, which is both an object for others 
and a subject for myself. The intensity of sexual pleasure would not 
be sufficient to explain the place occupied by sexuality in human life 
or, for example, the phenomenon of eroticism, if sexual experience 
were not, as it were, an opportunity, vouchsafed to all and always 
available, of acquainting oneself with the human lot in its most 
general aspects of autonomy and dependence. The embarrassments 
and fears involved in human behaviour are not explainable in terms 
of the sexual concern, since it contains them already. On the other 
hand we do not reduce sexuality to something other than itself by 
relating it to the ambiguity of the body. For, to thought, the body as 
an object is not ambiguous; it becomes so only in the experience 
which we have of it, and pre-eminently in sexual experience, and 
through the fact of sexuality. To treat sexuality as a dialectic is not 
to make a process of knowledge out of it, nor to identify a man's 
history with the history of his consciousness. The dialectic is not a 
relationship between contradictory and inseparable thoughts; it is 

167 



THE BODY 

the tending of an existence towards another existence which denies 
it, and yet without which it is not sustained. Metaphysics — the com- 
ing to light of something beyond nature — is not localized at the level 
of knowledge: it begins with the opening out upon 'another', and is 
to be found everywhere, and already, in the specific development of 
sexuality. It is true that, witfi Freu^i, we have generalized the notion 
of sexuality. How can we then talk about a distinctive development 
of sexuality? How can we identify a content of consciousness as 
sexual ? Indeed we cannot. Sexuality conceals itself from itself be- 
neath a mask of generality, and continually tries to escape from the 
tension and drama which it sets up. But again, how are we justified 
in saying that it hides itself from itself, as if it were our life's subject? 
Should we not simply say that it is transcended and submerged in 
the more general drama of existence? Here two mistakes are to be 
avoided : one is to fail to recognize in existence any content other than 
its obvious one, which is arranged in the form of distinct representa- 
tions, as do philosophies of consciousness; the other is to duplicate 
this obvious content with a latent content, also consisting of re- 
presentations, as do psychologies of the unconscious. Sexuality is 
neither transcended in human life nor shown up at its centre by 
unconscious representations. It is at all times present there like an 
atmosphere. The dreamer does not first visualize the latent content 
of his dream, the one, that is, which is to be revealed with the help of 
suitable images by the 'second account'; he does not first openly 
perceive the stimuli of genital origin as being genital, only subse- 
quently translating the text into figurative language. For the dreamer, 
indeed, who is far removed from the language of the waking state, 
this or that genital excitation or sexual drive is without more ado this 
image of a wall being climbed or cliff-face being scaled, which are seen 
as the obvious content. Sexuality becomes diffused in images which 
derive from it only certain typical relationships, only a certain general 
emotional physiognomy. The dreamer's penis becomes the serpent 
which appears in the manifest content. 1 What we have just said about 
the dreamer applies equally to that ever slumbering part of ourselves 
which we feel to be anterior to our representations, to that individual 
haze through which we perceive the world. There are here blurred 
outlines, distinctive relationships which are in no way 'unconscious' 
and which, we are well aware, are ambiguous, having reference to 
sexuality without specifically calling it to mind. From the part of the 
body which it especially occupies, sexuality spreads forth like an 
odour or like a sound. Here we encounter once more that general 
function of unspoken transposition which we have already recognized 
in the body during our investigation of the body image. When I move 
1 Laforgue, VEchec de Baudelaire, p. 126. 
168 



THE BODY IN ITS SEXUAL BEING 

my hand towards a thing, I know implicitly that my arm unbends. 
When I move my eyes, I take account of their movement, without 
being expressly conscious of the fact, and am thereby aware that the 
upheaval caused in my field of vision is only apparent. Similarly 
sexuality, without being the object of any intended act of conscious 
ness, can underlie and guide specified forms of my experience. Taken 
in this way, as an ambiguous atmosphere, sexuality is co-extensive 
with life. In other words, ambiguity is of the essence of human exist- 
ence, and everything we live or think has always several meanings. A 
way of life — an attitude of escapism and need of solitude — is perhaps 
a generalized expression of a certain state of sexuality. In thus becom- 
ing transformed into existence, sexuality has taken upon itself so 
general a significance, the sexual theme has contrived to be for the 
subject the occasion for so many accurate and true observations in 
themselves, of so many rationally based decisions, and it has become 
so loaded with the passage of time that it is an impossible undertaking 
to seek, within the framework of sexuality, the explanation of the 
framework of existence. The fact remains that this existence is the 
act of taking up and making explicit a sexual situation, and that in 
this way it has always at least a double sense. There is interfusion 
between sexuality and existence, which means that existence per- 
meates sexuality and vice versa, so that it is impossible to determine, 
in a given decision or action, the proportion of sexual to other 
motivations, impossible to label a decision or act 'sexual* or 'non- 
sexual'. Thus there is in human existence a principle of indeter- 
minacy, and this indeterminacy is not only for us, it does not stem 
from some imperfection of our knowledge, and we must not imagine 
that any God could sound our hearts and minds and determine what 
we owe to nature and what to freedom. Existence is indeterminate in 
itself, by reason of its fundamental structure, and in so far as it is the 
very process whereby the hitherto meaningless takes on meaning, 
whereby what had merely a sexual significance assumes a more 
general one, chance is transformed into reason; in so far as it is the 
act of taking up a de facto situation. We shall give the name trans- 
cendence to this act in which existence takes up, for its own purposes, 
and transforms such a situation. Precisely because it is transcendence, 
existence never utterly outruns anything, for in that case the tension 
which is essential to it would disappear. It never abandons itself. 
What it is never remains external and accidental to it, since this is 
always taken up and integrated into it. Sexuality therefore ought not, 
any more than the body in general, to be regarded as a fortuitous 
content of our experience. Existence has no fortuitous attributes, no 
content which does not contribute towards giving it its form; it does 
not give admittance to any pure fact because it is the process by 

169 



THE BODY 

which facts are drawn up. It will perhaps be objected that the or- 
ganization of our body is contingent, that we can 'conceive a man 
without hands, feet, head' 1 and, a fortiori a sexless man, self-pro- 
pagating by cutting or layering. But this is the case only if we take an 
abstract view of hands, feet, head or sexual apparatus, regarding 
them, that is, as fragments of matter, and ignoring their living func- 
tion. Only, indeed, if we form an abstract notion of man in general, 
into which only the Cogitatio is allowed to enter. If, on the other 
hand, we conceive man in terms of his experience, that is to say, of 
his distinctive way of patterning the world, and if we reintegrate the 
'organs' into the functional totality in which they play their part, a 
handless or sexless man is as inconceivable as one without the power 
of thought. It will be further objected that our contention ceases to 
be paradoxical only at the price of becoming a tautology: we are 
saying in effect that a man would be different from what he is, and 
would therefore no longer be a man, if he were without any of the 
relational systems which in fact he possesses. But, it will be added, 
this arises from our conception of man as empirical man, as he in 
fact exists, and from our relating, as through an essential necessity 
and within the context of a human a priori, characteristics of this 
given totality which have been brought together simply by the inter- 
play of multiple causes and the caprice of nature. In fact, we do not 
imagine, through any backward-looking illusion, any essential neces- 
sity, we point out an existential connection. Since, as we have shown 
above in the examination of Schneider's case, all human 'functions', 
from sexuality to motility and intelligence, are rigorously unified in 
one synthesis, it is impossible to distinguish in the total being of man 
a bodily organization to be treated as a contingent fact, and other 
attributes necessarily entering into his make-up. Everything in man 
is a necessity. For example, it is no mere coincidence that the rational 
being is also the one who holds himself upright or has a thumb which 
can be brought opposite to the fingers; the same manner of existing 
is evident in both aspects. 2 On the other hand everything in man is 
contingency in the sense that this human manner of existence is not 
guaranteed to every human child through some essence acquired at 
birth, and in the sense that it must be constantly reforged in him 
through the hazards encountered by the objective body. Man is a 
historical idea and not a natural species. In other words, there is in 
human existence no unconditioned possession, and yet no fortuitous 
attribute. Human existence will force us to revise our usual notion 
of necessity and contingency, because it is the transformation of 
contingency into necessity by the act of taking in hand. All that we 

1 Pascal, Pensees et Opuscules (ed. Brunschvicg), Section VI, No. 339, p. 486. 
1 Cf. La Structure du Comportement, pp. 160-1. 

170 



THE BOD Y IN ITS SEXUAL BEING 



are, we are on the basis of a de facto situation which we appropriate 
to ourselves and which we ceaselessly transform by a sort of escape 
which is never an unconditioned freedom. There is no explanation of 
sexuality which reduces it to anything other than itself, for it is 
already something other than itself, and indeed, if we like, our whole 
being. Sexuality, it is said, is dramatic because we commit our whole 
personal life to it. But just why do we do this? Why is our body, for 
us, the mirror of our being, unless because it is a natural self, a cur- 
rent of given existence, with the result that we never know whether 
the forces which bear us on are its or ours — or with the result rather 
that they are never entirely either its or ours. There is no outstripping 
of sexuality any more than there is any sexuality enclosed within 
itself. No one is saved and no one is totally lost. 1 

1 One can no more get rid of historical materialism than of psychoanalysis by 
impugning 'reductionist' conceptions and causal thought in the name of a de- 
scriptive and phenomenological method, for historical materialism is no more 
linked to such 'causal* formulations as* may have been given than is psycho- 
analysis, and like the latter it could be expressed in another language. It consists 
just as much in making economics historical as in making history economic. The 
economics on which it bases history is not, as in classical economics, a closed 
cycle of objective phenomena, but a correlation of productive forces and forms 
of production, which is completed only when the former emerge from their 
anonymity, become aware of themselves and are thus capable of imposing a form 
on the future. Now, the coming to awareness is clearly a cultural phenomenon, 
and through it all psychological motivations may find their way into the web of 
history. A 'materialist* history of the 1917 Revolution does not consist of explain- 
ing each revolutionary thrust in terms of the retail price index at the moment in 
question, but of putting it back in the class dynamism and interplay of psycho- 
logical forces, which fluctuated between February and October, between the new 
proletarian power and the old conservative power. Economics is reintegrated into 
history rather than history's being reduced to economics. 'Historical materialism*, 
in the works inspired by it, is often nothing but a concrete conception of history 
which brings under consideration, besides its obvious content (the official rela- 
tions between 'citizens' in a democracy, for instance) its latent content, or the 
relations between human persons as they are actually established in concrete 
living. When 'materialist* history identifies democracy as a 'formal' regime, and 
describes the conflicts with which such a regime is torn, the real subject of history, 
which it is trying to extract from beneath the juridical abstraction called the 
citizen, is not only the economic subject, man as a factor in production, but in 
more general terms the living subject, man as creativity, as a person trying to 
endow his life with form, loving, hating, creating or not creating works of art, 
having or not having children. Historical materialism is not a causality exclusive 
to economics. One is tempted to say that it does not base history and ways of 
thinking on production and ways of working, but more generally on ways of 
existing and co-existing, on human relationships. It does not bring the history of 
ideas down to economic history, but replaces these ideas in the one history which 
they both express, and which is that of social existence. Solipsism as a philoso- 
phical doctrine is not the result of a system of private property; nevertheless 
into economic institutions as into conceptions of the world is projected the same 
existential prejudice in favour of isolation and mistrust. 

171 



THE BODY 



Yet this interpretation of historical materialism may appear ambiguous. We 
are Expanding' the notion of economics as Freud expands that of sexuality; we 
are bringing into it, besides the process of production and the struggle of economic 
forces against economic forms, the constellation of psychological and moral 
motives which combine to determine this struggle. But does not the word Eco- 
nomics* thus lose all definite meaning? If it is not that economic relations are 
expressed in the mode of Mitsein, is it not the mode of Mitsein that is expressed in 
economic relations? When we relate both private property and solipsism to a 
certain structure of Mitsein, are we not once more turning history upside down? 
And must we not choose between the following two theses: either the drama of 
co-existence has a purely economic significance, or else the economic drama is 
absorbed into a wider drama and has only an existential meaning, which brings 
back mentalistic philosophy (spiritualisme). 

It is precisely this dilemma, which the notion of existence, properly understood, 
enables us to leave behind, and what we have said above about the existential 
conception of Expression* and Significance' must be reapplied here. An existential 
theory of history is ambiguous, but this ambiguity cannot be made a matter of 
reproach, for it is inherent in things. Only at the approach of revolution does his- 
tory follow the lines dictated by economics, and, as in the case of the individual 
life, sickness subjects a man to the vital rhythm of his body, so in a revolutionary 
situation such as a general strike, factors governing production come clearly to 
light, and are specifically seen as decisive. Even so we have seen just now that the 
outcome depends on how the opposing forces think of each other. It is all the 
more true, then, that during periods of depression, economic factors are effective 
only to the extent that they are lived and taken up by a human subject, wrapped 
up, that is, in ideological shreds by a process amounting to s.'f-deception, or 
rather permanent equivocation, which is yet part of history and has a weight of 
its own. Neither the conservative nor the proletarian is conscious of being engaged 
in merely an economic struggle, and they always bring a human significance to 
their action. In this sense there is never any pure economic causality, because 
economics is not a closed system but is a part of the total and concrete existence 
of society. But an existential conception of history does not deprive economic 
situations of their power of motivation. If existence is the permanent act by which 
man takes up, for his own purposes, and makes his own a certain de facto situa- 
tion, none of his thoughts will be able to be quite detached from the historical 
context in which he lives, and particularly from his economic situation. Precisely 
because economics is not a closed world, and because all motivations intermingle 
at the core of history, the external becomes internal, and the internal external, 
and no constituent of our existence can ever be outrun. It would be ridiculous to 
regard Paul Vatery's poetry as a mere episode of economic disturbance: pure 
poetry can have an eternal meaning. But it is not ridiculous to seek, in the social 
and economic drama, in the world of our Mitsein, the motive for this coming to 
awareness. Just as all our life, as we have said, breathes a sexual atmosphere, 
without its being possible to identify a single content of consciousness which is 
'purely sexual' or which is not sexual at all, so the economic and social drama 
provides each consciousness with a certain background or even a certain imago 
which it sets about deciphering in its own way and, in this sense, it is co-extensive 
with history. Tne act of the artist or philosopher is free, but not motiveless. Their 
freedom resides in the power of equivocation of which we spoke above, or in the 
process of escape discussed earlier; it consists in appropriating a de facto situation 
by endowing it with a figurative meaning beyond its real one. Thus Marx, not 
content to be the son of a lawyer and student of philosophy, conceives his own 
situation as that of a 'lower middle class intellectual' in the new perspective of the 
class struggle. Thus does Valery transmute into pure poetry a disquiet and solitude 

172 



THE BODY IN ITS SEXUAL BEING 



of which others would have made nothing. Thought is the life of human relation 
ships as it understands and interprets itself. In this voluntary act of carrying for- 
ward, this passing from objective to subjective, it is impossible to say just where 
historical forces end and ours begin, and strictly speaking the question is mean- 
ingless, since there is history only for a subject who lives through it, and a subject 
only in so far as he is historically situated. There is no one meaning of history; 
what we do has always several meanings, and this is where an existential con- 
ception of history is distinguishable from materialism and from spiritualism. But 
every cultural phenomenon has, among others, an economic significance, and 
history by its nature never transcends, any more than it is reducible to, econo- 
mics. Conceptions of law, morality, religion and economic structure are involve-1 
in a network of meanings within the Unity of the social event, as the parts of the 
body are mutually implicatory within the Unity of the gesture, or as 'physio- 
logical*, 'psychological' and 'moral' motives are linked in the Unity of an action. 
It is impossible to reduce the life which involves human relationships either to 
economic relations, or to juridical and moral ones thought up by men, just as it 
is impossible to reduce individual life either to bodily functions or to our know- 
ledge of life as it involves them. But in each case, one of the orders of significance 
can be regarded as dominant : one gesture as 'sexual', another as 'amorous*, an- 
other as 'warlike', and even in the sphere of co-existence, one period of history 
can be seen as characterized by intellectual culture, another as primarily political 
or economic. The question whether the history of our time is pre-eminently signi- 
ficant in an economic sense, and whether our ideologies give us only a derivative 
or secondary meaning of it is one which no longer belongs to philosophy, but to 
politics, and one which will be solved only by seeking to know whether the eco- 
nomic or ideological scenario fits the facts more completely. Philosophy can only 
show that it is possible^ starting from the human condition. 



173 



THE BODY AS EXPRESSION, 
AND SPEECH 



WE have seen in the body a unity distinct from that of the scientific 
object. We have just discovered, even in its 'sexual function', inten- 
tionally and sense-giving powers. In trying to describe the pheno- 
menon of speech and the specific act of meaning, we shall have the 
opportunity to leave behind us, once and for all, the traditional 
subject-object dichotomy. 

The realization that speech is an originating realm naturally comes 
late. Here as everywhere, the relation of having, which can be seen in 
the very etymology of the word habit, is at first concealed by relations 
belonging to the domain of being, or, as we may equally say, by ontic 
relations obtaining within the world. 1 The possession of language is 
in the first place understood as no more than the actual existence of 
'verbal images', or traces left in us by words spoken or heard. 
Whether these traces are physical, or whether they are imprinted on 
an 'unconscious psychic life', is of little importance, and in both cases 
the conception of language is the same in that there is no 'speaking 
subject'. Whether the stimuli, in accordance with the laws of neuro- 
logical mechanics, touch off excitations capable of bringing about the 
articulation of the word, or whether the states of consciousness cause, 
by virtue of acquired associations, the appearance of the appropriate 

1 This distinction of having and being does not coincide with M. G. Marcel's 
(fare et Avoir), although not incompatible with it. M. Marcel takes having in the 
weak sense which the word has when it designates a proprietary relationship (I 
have a house, I have a hat) and immediately takes being in the existential sense of 
belonging to . . ., or taking up (I am my body, I am my life). We prefer to take 
account of the usage which gives to the term 'being' the weak sense of existence 
as a thing, or that of predication (the table is, or is big), and which reserves 'having' 
for the relation which the subject bears to the term into which it projects itself (I 
have an idea, I have a desire, I have fears). Hence our 'having' corresponds 
roughly to M. Marcel's being, and our being to his 'having'. 

174 



THE BODY AS EXPRESSION, AND SPEECH 

verbal image, in both cases speech occurs in a .circuit of third person 
phenomena. There is no speaker, there is a flow of words set in 
motion independently of any intention to speak. The meaning of 
words is considered to be given with the stimuli or with the states of 
consciousness which it is simply a matter of naming; the shape of the 
word, as heard or phonetically formed, is given with the cerebral or 
mental tracks; speech is not an action and does not show up the inter- 
nal possibilities of the subject : man can speak as the electric lamp can 
become incandescent. Since there are elective disturbances which 
attack the spoken language to the exclusion of the written one, or 
vice versa, and since language can disintegrate into fragments, we 
have to conclude that it is built up by a set of independent contribu- 
tions, and that speech in the general sense is an entity of rational 
origin. 

The theory of aphasia and of language seemed to be undergoing 
complete .transformation when it became necessary to distinguish, 
over and above anarthria,* which affects the articulation of the word, 
true aphasia which is inseparable from disturbances affecting intelli- 
gence — and over and above automatic language, which is in effect a 
third person motor phenomenon, an intentional language which is 
alone involved in the majority of cases of aphasia. The individuality 
of the Verbal image' was, indeed, dissociated: what the patient has 
lost, and what the normal person possesses, is not a certain stock of 
words, but a certain way of using them. The same word which remains 
at the disposal of the patient in the context of automatic languages 
escapes him in that of language unrelated to a purpose— the patient 
who has no difficulty in finding the word 'no' in answer to the doctor's 
questions, that is when he intends to furnish a denial arising from his 
present experience, cannot do so when it is a question of an exercise 
having no emotional and vital bearing. There is thus revealed, under- 
lying the word, an attitude, a function of speech which condition it. 
The word could be identified as an instrument of action and as a 
means of disinterested designation. Though Concrete* language re- 
mained a third person process, gratuitous language, or authentic 
denomination, became a phenomenon of thought, and it is in some 
disturbance of thinking that the origin of certain forms of aphasia must 
be sought. For example, amnesia concerning names of colours, when 
related to the general behaviour of the patient, appeared as a special 
manifestation of a more general trouble. The same patients who can- 
not name colours set before them, are equally incapable of classifying 
them in the performance of a set task. If, for example, they are asked 
to sort out samples according to basic colour, it is immediately noticed 
that they do it more slowly and painstakingly than a normal subject: 
* Anarthria: loss of power of articulate speech (Translator's note). 

175 



THE BODY 

they slowly place together the samples to be compared and fail to see 
at a glance which ones 'go together'. Moreover, having correctly as- 
sembled several blue ribbons, they make unaccountable mistakes: if 
for example the last blue ribbon was of a pale shade, they carry on by 
adding to the collection of 'blues' a pale green or pale pink — as if it 
were beyond them to stick to the proposed principle of classification, 
and to consider the samples from the point of view of basic colour 
from start to finish of the operation. They have thus become unable 
to subsume the sensory givens under a category, to see immediately 
the samples as representatives of the eidos blue. Even when, at the 
beginning of the test, they proceed correctly, it is not the conformity 
of the samples to an idea which guides them, but the experience of 
an immediate resemblance, and hence it comes about that they can 
classify the samples only when they have placed them side by side. 
The sorting test brings to light in these subjects a fundamental 
disorder, of which forgetting names of colours is simply another 
manifestation. For to name a thing is to tear oneself away from its 
individual and unique characteristics to see it as representative of an 
essence or a category, and the fact that the patient cannot identify 
the samples is a sign, not that he has lost the verbal image of the 
words red or blue, but that he has lost the general ability to subsume 
a sensory given under a category, that he has lapsed back from the 
categorial to the concrete attitude. 1 These analyses and other similar 
ones lead us, it would seem, to the antithesis of the theory of the ver- 
bal image, since language now appears as conditioned by thought. 

In fact we shall once again see that there is a kinship between the 
empiricist or mechanistic psychologies and the intellectualist ones, 
and the problem of language is not solved by going from one extreme 
to the other. A short time ago the reproduction of the word, the 
revival of the verbal image, was the essential thing. Now it is no more 
than what envelops true denomination and authentic speech, which 
is an inner process. And yet these two conceptions are at one in hold- 
ing that the word has no significance. In the first case this is obvious 
since the word is not summoned up through the medium of any con- 
cept, and since the given stimuli or 'states of mind' call it up in ac- 
cordance with the laws of neurological mechanics or those of associa- 
tion, and that thus the word is not the bearer of its own meaning, 
has no inner power, and is merely a psychic, physiological or even 
physical phenomenon set alongside others, and thrown up by the 
working of an objective causality. It is just the same when we dupli- 
cate denomination with a categorial operation. The word is still 
bereft of any effectiveness of its own, this time because it is only the 
external sign of an internal recognition, which could take place 
1 Gclb and Goldsiein, Vber Farbennamenamnesie. 
176 



the: body as expression, and speech 

without it, and to which it makes no contribution. It is not without 
meaning, since behind it there is a categorial operation, but this 
meaning is something which it does not have, does not possess, since 
it is thought which has a meaning, the word remaining an empty 
container. It is merely a phenomenon of articulation, of sound, or 
the consciousness of such a phenomenon, but in any case language 
is but an external accompaniment of thought. In the first case, we are 
on this side of the word as meaningful; in the second we are beyond 
it. In the first there is nobody to speak; in the second, there is cer- 
tainly a subject, but a thinking one, not a speaking one. As far as 
speech itself is concerned, intellectualism is hardly any different from 
empiricism, and is no better able than the latter to dispense with an 
explanation in terms of involuntary action. Once the categorial 
operation is performed, the appearance of the word which completes 
the process still has to be explained, and this will still be done by 
recourse to a physiological or psychic mechanism, since the word is a 
passive shell. Thus we refute both intellectualism and empiricism by 
simply saying that the word has a meaning. 

If speech presupposed thought, if talking were primarily a matter 
of meeting the object through a cognitive intention or through a 
representation, we could not understand why thought tends towards 
expression as towards its completion, why the most familiar thing 
appears indeterminate as long as we have not recalled its name, why 
the thinking subject himself is in a kind of ignorance of his thoughts 
so long as he has not formulated them for himself, or even spoken 
and written them, as is shown by the example of so many writers 
who begin a book without knowing exactly what they are going to 
put into it. A thought limited to existing for itself, independently of 
the constraints of speech and communication, would no sooner ap- 
pear than it would sink into the unconscious, which means that it 
would not exist even for itself. To Kant's celebrated question, we can 
reply that it is indeed part of the experience of thinking, in the sense 
that we present our thought to ourselves through internal or external 
speech. It does indeed move forward with the instant and, as it were, 
in flashes, but we are then left to lay hands on it, and it is through 
expression that we make it our own. The denomination of objects 
does not follow upon recognition; it is itself recognition. When I fix 
my eyes on an object in the half-light, and say: 'It is a brush', there 
is not in my mind the concept of a brush, under which I subsume the 
object, and which moreover is linked by frequent association with the 
word 'brush', but the word bears the meaning, and, by imposing it on 
the object, I am conscious of reaching that object. As has often been 
said, 1 for the child the thing is not known until it is named, the name 
1 E.g. Piaget, La Representation du Monde chez V Enfant, pp. 60 and rT. 

177 



THE BODY 

is the essence of the thing and resides in it on the same footing as its 
colour and its form. For pre-scientific thinking, naming an object is 
causing it to exist or changing it: God creates beings by naming 
them and magic operates upon them by speaking of them. These 
Mistakes' would be unexplainable, if speech rested on the concept, 
for the latter ought always to know itself as distinct from the former, 
and to know the former as an external accompaniment. If it is pointed 
out in reply that the child learns to know objects through the designa- 
tions of language, that thus, given in the first place as linguistic enti- 
ties, objects receive only secondarily their natural existence, and that 
finally the actual existence of a linguistic community accounts for 
childish beliefs, this explanation leaves the problem untouched, since, 
if the child can know himself as a member of a linguistic community 
before knowing himself as thinking about some Nature, it is con- 
ditional upon the subject's being able to overlook himself as universal 
thought and apprehend himself as speech, and on the fact that the 
word, far from being the mere sign of objects and meanings, inhabits 
things and is the vehicle of meanings. Thus speech, in the speaker, 
does not translate ready-made thought, but accomplishes it. 1 A 
fortiori must it be recognized that the listener receives thought from 
speech itself. At first sight, it might appear that speech heard can 
bring him nothing: it is he who gives to words and sentences their 
meaning, and the very combination of words and sentences is not an 
alien import, since it would not be understood if it did not encounter 
in the listener the ability spontaneously to effect it. Here, as every- 
where, it seems at first sight true that consciousness can find in its 
experience only what it has itself put there. Thus the experience of 
communication would appear to be an illusion. A consciousness con- 
structs — for x — that linguistic mechanism which will provide another 
consciousness with the chance of having the same thoughts, but 
nothing really passes between them. Yet, the problem being how, to 
all appearances, consciousness learns something, the solution cannot 
consist in saying that it knows everything in advance. The fact is that 
we have the power to understand over and above what we may have 
spontaneously thought. People can speak to us only a language which 
we already understand, each word of a difficult text awakens in us 
thoughts which were ours beforehand, but these meanings sometimes 
combine to form new thought which recasts them all, and we are 
transported to the heart of the matter, we find the source. Here there 
is nothing comparable to the solution of a problem, where we dis- 

1 There is, of course, every reason to distinguish between an aulhcnlic speech, 
which formulalcs for the first time, and second-order expression, speech about 
speech, which makes up the general run of empirical language. Only the first is 
identical with thought. 

178 



THE BODY AS EXPRESSION, AND SPEECH 

cover an unknown quantity through its relationship with known ones. 
For the problem can be solved only if it is determinate, that is, if the 
cross-checking of the data provides the unknown quantity with one 
or more definite values. In understanding others, the problem is al- 
ways indeterminate 1 because only the solution will bring the data re- 
trospectively to light as convergent, only the central theme of a 
philosophy, once understood, endows the philosopher's writings with 
the value of adequate signs. There is, then, a taking up of others' 
thought through speech, a reflection in others, an ability to think ac- 
cording to others 2 which enriches our own thoughts. Here the mean- 
ing of words must be finally induced by the words themselves, or 
more exactly, their conceptual meaning must be formed by a kind of 
deduction from a gestural meaning, which is immanent in speech. And 
as, in a foreign country, I begin to understand the meaning of words 
through their place in a context of action, and by taking part in a 
communal life — in the same way an as yet imperfectly understood 
piece of philosophical writing discloses to me at least a certain 
'style' — either a Spinozist, criticist or phenomenological one — which 
is the first draft of its meaning. I begin to understand a philosophy by 
feeling my way into its existential manner, by reproducing the tone 
and accent of the philosopher. In fact, every language conveys its 
own teaching and carries its meaning into the listener's mind. A 
school of music or painting which is at first not understood, eventu- 
ally, by its own action, creates its own public, if it really says some- 
thing; that is, it does so by secreting its own meaning. In the case of 
prose or poetry, the power of the spoken wqrd is less obvious, be- 
cause we have the illusion of already possessing within ourselves, in 
the shape of the common property meaning of words, what is re- 
quired for the understanding of any text whatsoever. The obvious 
fact is, however, that the colours of the palette or the crude sounds of 
instruments, as presented to us in natural perception, are insufficient 
to provide the musical sense of music, or the pictorial sense of a 
painting. But, in fact, it is less the case that the sense of a literary 
work is provided by the common property meaning of words, than 
that it contributes to changing that accepted meaning. There is thus, 
either in the man who listens or reads, or in the one who speaks or 
writes, a thought in speech the existence of which is unsuspected by 
intellectualism. 

To realize this, we must turn back to the phenomenon of speech 

1 Again, what we say here applies only to first-hand speech — that of the child 
uttering its first word, of the lover revealing his feelings, of the 'first man who 
spoke*, or of the writer and philosopher who reawaken primordial experience 
anterior to all traditions. 

a Nachdenken, nachvollziehen of Husserl, Ursprung der Geometries pp. 212 and ff. 

179 



THf BODY 

and reconsider ordinary descriptions which immobilize thought and 
speech, and make anything other than external relations between 
them inconceivable. We must recognize first of all that thought, in 
the speaking subject, is not a representation, that is, that it does not 
expressly posit objects or relations. The orator does not think before 
speaking, nor even while speaking; his speech is his thought. In the 
same way the listener does not form concepts on the basis of signs. 
The orator's 'thought' is empty while he is speaking and, when a 
text is read to us, provided that it is read with expression, we have no 
thought marginal to the text itself, for the words fully occupy our 
mind and exactly fulfil our expectations, and we feel the necessity of 
the speech. Although we are unable to predict its course, we are pos- 
sessed by it. The end of the speech or text will be the lifting of a spell. 
It is at this stage that thoughts on the speech or text will be able to 
arise. Previously the speech was improvised and the text understood 
without the intervention of a single thought ; the sense was everywhere 
present, and nowhere posited for its own sake. The speaking subject 
does not think of the sense of what he is saying, nor does he visualize 
the words which he is using. To know a word or a language is, as we 
have said, not to be able to bring into play any pre-established 
nervous network. But neither is it to retain some 'pure recollection' 
of the word, some faded perception. The Bergsonian dualism of 
habit-memory and pure recollection does not account for the near- 
presence of the words I know: they are behind me, like things behind 
my back, or like the city's horizon round my house, I reckon with 
them or rely on them, but without having any 'verbal image'. In so 
far as they persist within me, it is rather as does the Freudian Imago 
which is much less the representation of a former perception than a 
highly specific emotional essence, which is yet generalized, and de- 
tached from its empirical origins. What remains to me of the word 
once learnt is its style as constituted by its formation and sound. 
What we have said earlier about the 'representation of movement' 
must be repeated concerning the verbal image: I do not need to 
visualize external space and my own body in order to move one with- 
in the other. It is enough that they exist for me, and that they form 
a certain field of action spread around me. In the same way I do not 
need to visualize the word in order to know and pronounce it. It is 
enough that I possess its articulatory and acoustic style as one of the 
modulations, one of the possible uses of my body. I reach back for 
the word as my hand reaches towards the part of my body which is 
being pricked; the word has a certain location in my linguistic world, 
and is part of my equipment. I have only one means of representing 
it, which is uttering it, just as the artist has only one means of repre- 
senting the work on which he is engaged : by doing it. When I imagine 

180 ' 



THE BODY AS EXPRESSION, AND SPEECH 

Peter absent, I am not aware of contemplating an image of Peter 
numerically distinct from Peter himself. However far away he is, I 
visualize him in the world, and my power of.imagining is nothing but 
the persistence of my world around me. 1 To say that I imagine Peter 
is to say that I bring about the pseudo-presence of Peter by putting 
into operation the 'Peter-behaviour-pattern'. Just as Peter in imagina- 
tion is only one of the modalities of my being in the world, so the 
verbal image is only one of the modalities of my phonetic gesticula- 
tion, presented with many others in the all-embracing consciousness 
of my body. This is obviously what Bergson means when he talks 
about a 'motor framework* of recollection, but if pure representa- 
tions of the past take their place in this framework, it is not clear why 
they should need it to become actual once more. The part played by 
the body in memory is comprehensible only if memory is, not only 
the constituting consciousness of the past, but an effort to reopen 
time on the basis of the implications contained in the present, and if 
the body, as our permanent means of 'taking up attitudes' and thus 
constructing pseudo-presents, is the medium of our communication 
with time as well as with space. 2 The body's function in remembering 
is that same function of projection which we have already met in 
starting to move: the body converts a certain motor essence into 
vocal form, spreads out the articulatory style of a word into audible 
phenomena, and arrays the former attitude, which is resumed, into 
the panorama of the past, projecting an intention to move into actual 
movement, because the body is a power of natural expression. 

These considerations enable us to restore to the act of speaking its 
true physiognomy. In the first place speech is not the 'sign' of thought, 
if by this we understand a phenomenon which heralds another as 

1 Sartre, U Imagination, p. 148. 

1 \ . . when I awoke like this, and my mind struggled in an unsuccessful attempt 
to discover where I was, everything would be moving round me through the dark- 
ness, things, places, years. My body, still too heavy with sleep to move, would 
make an effort to construe the form which its tiredness took as an orientation of 
its various members, so as to induce from that where the wall lay and the furniture 
stood, to piece together and to give a name to the house in which it must be living. 
Its memory, the composite memory of its ribs, knees, and shoulder-blades offered 
it a whole series of rooms in which it had at one time or another slept; while the 
unseen walls kept changing, adapting themselves to the shape of each successive 
room that it remembered, whirling madly through the darkness. . . . My body, 
the side upon which I was lying, loyally preserving from the past an impression 
which my mind should never have forgotten, brought back before my eyes the 
glimmering flame of the night-light in its bowl of Bohemian glass, shaped like an 
urn and hung by chains from the ceiling, and the chimney-piece of Sienna marble 
in my bedroom at Combray, in my great-aunt's house, in those far-distant days 
which, at the moment of waking, seemed present without being clearly defined.* 
(Proust, Swanris Way, I, trans. C. K, Scott MoncriefT, Chatto and Windus, pp. 
5-6.) 

181 



THE BODY 



smoke betrays fire. Speech and thought would admit of this external 
relation only if they were both thematically given, whereas in fact they 
are intervolved, the sense being held within the word, and the word 
being the external existence of the sense. Nor can we concede, as is 
commonly done, that speech is a mere means of fixation, nor yet 
that it is the envelope and clothing of thought. Why should it be 
easier to recall words or phrases than thoughts, if the alleged verbal 
images need to be reconstructed on every occasion? And why should 
thought seek to duplicate itself or clothe itself in a succession of utter- 
ances, if the latter do not carry and contain within themselves their 
own meaning? Words cannot be Strongholds of thought', nor can 
thought seek expression, unless words are in themselves a compre- 
hensible text, and unless speech possesses a power of significance 
entirely its own. The word and speech must somehow cease to be a 
way of designating things or thoughts, and become the presence of 
that thought in the phenomenal world, and, moreover, not its cloth- 
ing but its token or its body. There must be, as psychologists say, a 
'linguistic concept' (Sprachbeghff) 1 or a word concept (Wortbegriff), 
a 'central inner experience, specifically verbal, thanks to which the 
sound, heard, uttered, read or written, becomes a linguistic fact'. 2 
Certain patients can read a text, 'putting expression into it', without, 
however, understanding it. This is because the spoken or written 
words carry a top coating of meaning which sticks to them and which 
presents the thought as a style, an affective value, a piece of existen- 
tial mimicry, rather than as a conceptual statement. We find here, 
beneath the conceptual meaning of the wgrds, an existential meaning 
which is not only rendered by them, but which inhabits them, and is 
inseparable from them. The greatest service done by expression is 
not to commit to writing ideas which might be lost. A writer hardly 
ever re-reads his own works, and great works leave in us at a first 
reading all that we shall ever subsequently get out of them. The pro- 
cess of expression, when it is successful, does not merely leave for the 
reader and the writer himself a kind of reminder, it brings the mean- 
ing into existence as a thing at the very heart of the text, it brings it to 
life in an organism of words, establishing it in the writer or the reader 
as a new sense organ, opening a new field or a new dimension to our 
experience. This power of expression is well known in the arts, for 
example in music. The musical meaning of a sonata is inseparable 
from the sounds which are its vehicle: before we have heard it no 
analysis enables us to anticipate it; once the performance is over, we 
shall, in our intellectual analyses of the music, be unable to do any- 
thing but carry ourselves back to the moment of experiencing it. 

1 Cassirer, Philosophic dcr symbolischen Formen, III, p. 383. 

* Goldstein, V Analyse de Vaphasie et V essence du langage, p. 459. 

182 



THE BODY AS EXPRESSION, AND SPEECH 

During the performance, the notes are not only the 'signs* of the 
sonata, but it is there through them, it enters into them. 1 In the same 
way the actress becomes invisible, and it is Phaedra who appears. 
The meaning swallows up the signs, and Phaedra has so completely 
taken possession of Berma that her passion as Phaedra appears the 
apotheosis of ease and naturalness. 2 Aesthetic expression confers on 
what it expresses an existence in itself, installs it in nature as a thing 
perceived and accessible to all, or conversely plucks the signs them- 
selves — the person of the actor, or the colours and canvas of the 
painter — from their empirical existence and bears them off into an- 
other world. No one will deny that here the process of expression 
brings the meaning into being or makes it effective, and does not 
merely translate it. It is no different, despite what may appear to be 
the case, with the expression of thoughts in speech. Thought is no 
'internal* thing, and does not exist independently of the world and of 
words. What misleads us in this connection, and causes us to believe 
in a thought which exists for itself prior to expression, is thought 
already constituted and expressed, which we can silently recall to 
ourselves, and through which we acquire the illusion of an inner life. 
But in reality this supposed silence is alive with words, this inner life 
is an inner language. 'Pure* thought reduces itself to a certain void of 
consciousness, to a momentary desire. The new sense-giving intention 
knows itself only by donning already available meanings, the out- 
come of previous acts of expression^ The available meanings sud- 
denly link up in accordance with an unknown law, and once and for 
all a fresh cultural entity has taken on an existence. Thought and ex- 
pression, then, are simultaneously constituted, when our cultural 
store is put at the service of this unknown law, as our body suddenly 
lends itself to some new gesture in the formation of habit. The spoken 
word is a genuine gesture, and it contains its meaning in the same way 
as the gesture contains its. This is what makes communication pos- 
sible. In order that I may understand the words of another person, it 
is clear that his vocabulary and syntax must be 'already known* to 
me. But that does not mean that words do their work by arousing in 
me 'representations* associated with them, and which in aggregate 
eventually reproduce in me the original 'representation* of the 
speaker. What I communicate with primarily is not 'representations' 
or thought, but a speaking subject, with a certain style of being and 
with the 'world' at which he directs his aim. Just as the sense-giving 
intention which has set in motion the other person's speech is not an 
explicit thought, but a certain lack which is asking to be made good, 
so my taking up of this intention is not a process of thinking on my 

1 Proust, Swann's Way, II, trans. C. K. Scott MoncrierT, p. 185. 

2 Proust, The Guer mantes Way, I, pp. 55 and ff. 

183 



THE BODY 



part, but a synchronizing change of my own existence, a transforma- 
tion of my being. We live in a world where speech is an institution. 
For all these many commonplace utterances, we possess within our- 
selves ready-made meanings. They arouse in us only ^second order 
thoughts; these in turn are translated into other words which demand 
from us no real effort of expression and will demand from our hearers 
no effort of comprehension. Thus language and the understanding of 
language apparently raise no problems. The linguistic and intersub- 
jective world no longer surprises us, we no longer distinguish it from 
the world itself, and it is within a world already spoken and speaking 
that we think. We become unaware of the contingent element in ex- 
pression and communication, whether it be in the child learning to 
speak, or in the writer saying and thinking something for the first 
time, in short, in all who transform a certain kind of silence into 
speech. It is, however, quite clear that constituted speech, as it oper- 
ates in daily life, assumes that the decisive step of expression has been 
taken. Our view of man will remain superficial so long as we fail to 
go back to that origin, so long as we fail to find, beneath the chatter 
of words, the primordial silence, and as long as we do not describe 
the action which breaks this silence. The spoken word is a gesture, 
and its meaning, a world. 

Modern psychology 1 has demonstrated that the spectator does not 
look about within himself among his closest experiences for the mean- 
fng of the gestures which he is witnessing. Faced with an angry or 
threatening gesture, I have no need, in order to understand it, to 
recall the feelings which I myself experienced when I used these 
gestures on my own account. I know very little, from inside, of the 
mime of anger so that a decisive factor is missing for any association 
by resemblance or reasoning by analogy, and what is more, I do 
not see anger or a threatening attitude as a psychic fact hidden 
behind the gesture, I read anger in it. The gesture does not make 
me think of anger, it is anger itself. However, the meaning of the 
gesture is not perceived as the colour of the carpet, for example, 
is perceived. If it were given to me as a thing, it is not clear why my 
understanding of gestures should for the most part be confined to 
human ones. I do not 'understand' the sexual pantomime of the dog, 
still less of the cockchafer or the praying mantis. I do not even under- 
stand the expression of the emotions in primitive people or in circles 
too unlike the ones in which I move. If a child happens to witness 
sexual intercourse, it may understand it although it has no experience 
of desire and of the bodily attitudes which translate it. The sexual 
scene will be merely an unfamiliar and disturbing spectacle, without 
meaning unless the child has reached the stage of sexual maturity at 

1 For example, M. Scheler, Nature et Formes de la Sympathies pp. 347 and ff. 

184 



THE BODY AS EXPRESSION, AND SPEECH 

which this behaviour becomes possible for it. It is true that offen 
knowledge of other people lights up the way to self-knowledge: the 
spectacle outside him reveals to the child the'meaning of its own im- 
pulses, by providing them with an aim. The example would pass un- 
noticed if it did not coincide with the inner possibilities of the child. 
The sense of the gestures is not given, but understood, that is, recap- 
tured upon by an act on the spectator's part. The whole difficulty is to 
conceive this act clearly without confusing it with a cognitive opera- 
tion. The communication or comprehension of gestures comes about 
through the reciprocity of my intentions and the gestures of others, of 
my gestures and intentions discernible in the conduct of other people. 
It is as if the other person's intention inhabited my body and mine 
his. The gesture which I witness outlines an intentional object. This 
object is genuinely present and fully comprehended when the powers 
of my body adjust themselves to it and overlap it. The gesture presents 
itself to me as a question, bringing certain perceptible bits of the 
world to my notice, and inviting my concurrence in them. Com- 
munication is achieved when my conduct identifies this path with its 
own. There is mutual confirmation between myself and others. Here 
we must rehabilitate the experience of others which has been dis- 
torted by intellectualist analyses, as we shall have to rehabilitate the 
perceptual experience of the thing. When I perceive a thing, a fire- 
place for example, it is not the concordance of its various aspects 
which leads me to believe in the existence of the fireplace as the fiat 
projection and collective significance of all these perspectives. On the 
contrary I perceive the thing in its own self-evident completeness and 
this is what gives me the assurance that, in the course of perceptual 
experience, I shall be presented with an indefinite set of concordant 
views. The identity of the thing through perceptual experience is only 
another aspect of the identity of one's own body throughout ex- 
ploratory movements; thus they are the same in kind as each other. 
Like the body image, the fireplace is a system of equivalents not 
founded on the recognition of some law, but on the experience of a 
bodily presence. I become involved in things with my body, they 
co-exist with me as an incarnate subject, and this life among things 
has nothing in common with the elaboration of scientifically con- 
ceived objects. In the same way, I do not understand the gestures of 
others by some act of intellectual interpretation: communication be- 
tween consciousnesses is not based on the common meaning of their 
respective experiences, for it is equally the basis of that meaning. The 
act by which I lend myself to the spectacle must be recognized as 
irreducible to anything else. I join it in a kind of blind recognition 
which precedes the intellectual working out and clarification of the 
meaning. Successive generations 'understand' and perform sexual 

185 



THE BODY 

gestures, such as the caress, before the philosopher 1 makes its intel- 
lectual significance clear, which is that we lock within itself a passive 
body, enwrap it in a pleasurable lethargy, thus imposing a temporary 
respite upon the continual drive which projects it into things and 
towards others. It is through my body that I understand other people, 
just as it is through my body that I perceive things'. The meaning of 
a gesture thus 'understood' is not behind it, it is intermingled with 
the structure of the world outlined by the gesture, and which I take 
up on my own account. It is arrayed all over the gesture itself— as, in 
perceptual experience, the significance of the fireplace does not lie 
beyond the perceptible spectacle, namely the fireplace itself as my 
eyes and movements discover it in the world. 

The linguistic gesture, like all the rest, delineates its own meaning. 
This idea seems surprising at first, yet one is forced to accept it if one 
wishes to understand the origin of language, always an insistent prob- 
lem, although psychologists and linguistics both question its validity 
in the name of positive knowledge. It seems in the first place impos- 
sible to concede to either words or gestures an immanent meaning, 
because the gesture is limited to showing a certain relationship be- 
tween man and the perceptible world, because this world is presented 
to the spectator by natural perception, and because in this way the 
intentional object is offered to the spectator at the same time as the 
gesture itself. Verbal 'gesticulation', on the other hand, aims at a 
mental setting which is not given to everybody, and which it is its task 
to communicate. But here what nature does not provide, cultural 
background does. Available meanings, in other words former acts of 
expression, establish between speaking subjects a common world, to 
which the words being actually uttered in their novelty refer as does 
the gesture to the perceptible world. And the meaning of speech is 
nothing other than the way in which it handles, this linguistic world 
or in which it plays modulations on the keyboard of acquired mean- 
ings. I seize it in an undivided act which is as short as a cry. It is true 
that the problem has been merely shifted one stage further back: how 
did the available meanings themselves come to be constituted? Once 
language is formed, it is conceivable that speech may have meaning, 
like the gesture, against the mental background held in common. But 
do syntactical forms and vocabulary, which are here presupposed, 
carry their meaning within themselves? One can see what there is in 
common between the gesture and its meaning, for example in the 
case of emotional expression and the emotions themselves: the smile, 
the relaxed face, gaiety of gesture really have in them the rhythm of 
action, the mode of being in the world which are joy itself. On the 
other hand, is not the link between the verbal sign and its meaning 
1 Here J. P. Sartre, V&tre et le Neant, pp. 453 and ff. 
186 



THE BODY AS EXPRESSION, AND SPEECH 

quite accidental, a fact demonstrated by the existence of a number of 
languages? And was not the communication of the elements of lan- 
guage between the 'first man to speak' and the second necessarily of 
an entirely different kind from communication through gesture ? This 
is what is commonly expressed by saying that gesture or emotional 
pantomime are 'natural signs', and the word a 'natural convention'. 
But conventions are a late form of relationship between men; they 
presuppose an earlier means of communication, and language must 
be put back into this current of intercourse. If we consider only the 
conceptual and delimiting meaning of words, it is true that the verbal 
form — with the exception of endings — appears arbitrary. But it would 
no longer appear so if we took into account the emotional content of 
the word, which we have called above its 'gestural' sense, which is 
all-important in poetry, for example. It would then be found that the 
words, vowels and phonemes are so many ways of 'singing' the world, 
and that their function is to represent things not, as the naive ono- 
matopoeic theory had it, by reason of an objective resemblance, but 
because they extract, and literally express, their emotional essence. 
If it were possible, in any vocabulary, to disregard what is attribut- 
able to the mechanical laws of phonetics, to the influences of other 
languages, the rationalization of grammarians, and assimilatory pro- 
cesses, we should probably discover in the original form of each lan- 
guage a somewhat restricted system of expression, but such as would 
make it not entirely arbitrary, if we designate night by the word 
'nuit', to use 'lumiere' for light. The predominance of vowels in one 
language, or of consonants in another, and constructional and syn- 
tactical systems, do not represent so many arbitrary conventions for 
the expression of one and the same idea, but several ways for the 
human body to sing the world's praises and in the last resort to live 
it. Hence the full meaning of a language is never translatable into 
another. We may speak several languages, but one of them always 
remains the one in which we live. In order completely to assimilate a 
language, it would be necessary to make the world which it expresses 
one's own, and one never does belong to two worlds at once. 1 If 

1 'In my case, the effort for these years to live in the dress of Arabs, and to 
imitate their mental foundation, quitted me of my English self, and let me look 
at the West and its conventions with new eyes: they destroyed it all for me. At the 
same time I could not sincerely take on the Arab skin: it was an affectation only. 
Easily was a man made an infidel, but hardly might he be converted to another 
faith. I had dropped one form and not taken on the other, and was become like 
Mohammed's coffin in our legend. . . . Such detachment came at times to a man 
exhausted by prolonged physical effort and isolation. His body plcJded on 
mechanically, while his reasonable mind left him, and from without looked down 
critically on him, wondering what that futile lumber did and why. Sometimes 
these selves would converse in the void; and then madness was very near, as I 

187 



THE BODY 



there is such a thing as universal thought, it is achieved by taking up 
the effort towards expression and communication in one single 
language, and accepting all its ambiguities, all the suggestions and 
overtones of meaning of which a linguistic tradition is made up, and 
which are the exact measure of its jower of expression. A conven- 
tional algorithm — which moreover is meaningful only in relation to 
language — will never express anything but nature without man. 
Strictly speaking, therefore, there are no conventional signs, standing 
as the simple notation of a thought pure and clear in itself, there are 
only words into which the history of a whole language is compressed, 
and which effect communication with no absolute guarantee, dogged 
as they are by incredible linguistic hazards. We think that language 
is more transparent than music because most of the time we remain 
within the bounds of constituted language, we provide ourselves with 
available meanings, and in our definitions we are content, like the 
dictionary, to explain meanings in terms of each other. The meaning 
of a sentence appears intelligible throughout, detachable from the 
sentence and finitely self-subsistent in an intelligible world, because 
we presuppose as given all those exchanges, owed to the history of the 
language, which contribute to determining its sense. In music, on the 
other hand, no vocabulary is presupposed, the meaning appears as 
linked to the empirical presence of the sounds, and that is why music 
strikes us as dumb. But in fact, as we have said, the clearness of lan- 
guage stands out from an obscure background, and if we carry our 
research far enough we shall eventually find that language is equally 
uncommunicative of anything other than itself, that its meaning is 
inseparable from it. We need, then, to seek the first attempts at lan- 
guage in the emotional gesticulation whereby man superimposes on 
the given world the world according to man. There is here nothing 
resembling the famous naturalistic conceptions which equate the 
artificial sign with the natural one, and -try to reduce language to 
emotional expression. The artificial sign is not reducible to the natural 
one, because in man there is no natural sign, and in assimilating 
language to emotional expressions, we leave untouched its specific 
quality, if it is true that emotion, viewed as a variation of our being 
in the world, is contingent in relation to the mechanical resources 
contained in our body, and shows the same power of giving shape to 
stimuli and situations which is at its most striking at the level of 
language. It would be legitimate to speak of 'natural signs' only if 
the anatomical organization of our body produced a correspondence 



believe it would be near the man who could see things through the veils at once 
of two customs, two educations, two environments.* T. E. Lawrence, The Seven 
Pillars of Wisdom, Jonathan Cape, pp. 31-2. 

188 



THE BODY AS EXPRESSION, AND SPEECH 

between specific gestures and given 'states of mind'. The fact is that 
the behaviour associated with anger or love is not the same in a 
Japanese and an Occidental. Or, to be more precise, the difference 
of behaviour corresponds to a difference in the emotions themselves. 
It is not only the gesture which is contingent in relation to the body's 
organization, it is the manner itself in which we meet the situation 
and live it. The angry Japanese smiles, the westerner goes red and 
stamps his foot or else goes pale and hisses his words. It is not 
enough for two conscious subjects to have the same organs and 
nervous system for the same emotions to produce in both the same 
signs. What is important is how they use their bodies, the simul- 
taneous patterning of body and world in emotion. The psycho- 
physiological equipment leaves a great variety of possibilities open, 
and there is no more here than in the realm of instinct a human 
nature finally and immutably given. The use a man is to make of his 
body is transcendent in relation to that body as a mere biological 
entity. It is no more natural, and no less conventional, to shout in 
anger or to kiss in love 1 than to call a table 'a table'. Feelings and 
passional conduct are invented like words. Even those which, like 
paternity, seem to be part and parcel of the human make-up are in 
reality institutions. 2 It is impossible to superimpose on man a lower 
layer of behaviour which one chooses to call 'natural', followed by a 
manufactured cultural or spiritual world. Everything is both manu- 
factured and natural in man, as it were, in the sense that there is not 
a word, not a form of behaviour which does not owe something to 
purely biological being — and which at the same time does not elude 
the simplicity of animal life, and cause forms of vital behaviour to 
deviate from their pre-ordained direction, through a sort of leakage 
and through a genius for ambiguity which might serve to define man. 
Already the mere presence of a living being transforms the physical 
world, bringing to view here 'food', there a 'hiding place', and giving 
to 'stimuli' a sense which they have not hitherto possessed. A fortiori 
does this apply to the presence of a man in the animal world. Be- 
haviour creates meanings which are transcendent in relation to the 
anatomical apparatus, and yet immanent to the behaviour as such, 
since it communicates itself and is understood. It is impossible to 
draw up an inventory of this irrational power which creates meanings 
and conveys them. Speech is merely one particular case of it. 

1 It is well known that the kiss is not one of the traditional customs of Japan. 

2 Paternity is unknown to the Trobriand Islanders. Children are brought up 
under the authority of the maternal uncle. A husband, on his return from a long 
journey, is delighted to find new children in his home. He looks after them, watches 
over them and cherishes them as if they were his own children. Malinowski, The 
Father in Primitive Psychology, quoted by Berlrand Russell, Marriage and Morals, 
Allen and Unwin, pp. 20 and ft. 

189 



THE BODY 



What is true, however — and justifies the view that we ordinarily 
take of language, as being in a peculiar category — is that, alone of 
all expressive processes, speech is able to settle into a sediment and 
constitute an acquisition for use in human relationships. This fact 
cannot be explained by pointing out that speech can be recorded on 
paper, whereas gestures or forms of behaviour are transmitted only 
by direct imitation. For music too can be written down, and, although 
there is in music something in the nature of an initiation into the 
tradition, although, that is, it would probably be impossible to 
graduate to atonal music without passing through classical music, yet 
every composer starts his task at the beginning, having a new world 
to deliver, whereas in the realm of speech, each writer is conscious of 
taking as his objective the same world as has already been dealt with 
by other writers. The worlds of Balzac and Stendhal are not like 
planets without communication with each other, for speech implants 
the idea of truth in us as the presumptive limit of its effort. It loses 
sight of itself as a contingent fact, and takes to resting upon itself; 
this is, as we have seen, what provides us with the ideal of thought 
without words, whereas the idea of music without sounds is ridicu- 
lous. Even if this is pushing the principle beyond its limits and reduc- 
ing things to the absurd, even if a linguistic meaning can never be 
delivered of its inherence in some word or other, the fact remains that 
the expressive process in the case of speech can be indefinitely reiter- 
ated, that it is possible to speak about speech whereas it is impossible 
to paint about painting, and finally that every philosopher has 
dreamed of a form of discourse which would supersede all others, 
whereas the painter or the musician does not hope to exhaust all 
possible painting or music. Thus there is a privileged 'position ac- 
corded to Reason. But if we want to understand it clearly, we 
must begin by putting thought back among the phenomena of 
expression. 

This conception of language carries further the best and most re- 
cent analysis of aphasia, of which we have so far made use of only a 
part. We have seen, to start with, that after an empiricist phase, the 
theory of aphasia, since Pierre Marie, seemed to move over to intel- 
lectualism, and that, in linguistic disturbances, it invoked the 'repre- 
sentative function' (Darstellungsfunktiori) or 'catcgoriaF activity 1 and 
that it based speech on thought. In reality, it is not towards a new 
intellectualism that the theory moves. Whether its authors are aware 
of it or not, they are trying to formulate what we shall call an existen- 
tial theory of aphasia, that is, a theory which treats thought and ob- 
jective language as two manifestations of that fundamental activity 

1 Notions of this kind appear in the works of Head, van Woerkom, Bouman 
and Griinbaum, and Goldstein. 

190 



THE BODY AS EXPRESSION, AND SPEECH 

whereby man projects himself towards a 'world'. 1 Take, for example, 
amnesia relating to names of colours. It is demonstrated, by sorting 
tests, that the sufferer from amnesia has lost the general ability to 
subsume colours under a category, and to this same cause is attri- 
buted the verbal deficiency. But if we go back to concrete descrip- 
tions we notice that the categorial activity, before being a thought or 
a form of knowledge, is a certain manner of relating oneself to the 
world, and, correspondingly, a style or shape of experience. In a 
normal subject, the perception of a heap of samples is organized in 
virtue of the task set: 'The colours belonging to the same category as 
the model sample stand out against the background of the rest', 2 all 
the reds, for example, forming a group, and the subject has now only 
to split up this group in order to bring together all the samples which 
belong to it. For the patient, on the other hand, each of the samples 
is confined within its individual existence. Against the formation of 
any group according to a given principle, they bring a sort of vis- 
cosity or inertia. When two objectively similar colours are presented 
to the patient, they do not necessarily appear similar: it may happen 
that in one the basic shade is dominant, in the other the degree of 
lightness or warmth. 3 We can ourselves experience something similar 
by taking up, before a pile of samples, an attitude of passive percep- 
tion: the identical colours group themselves before our eyes, but 
those colours which are merely rather alike establish only vague 
mutual relations, 'the heap seems unstable, shifting, and we observe 
an incessant alteration in it, a kind of contest between several pos- 
sible groupings of colours according to different points of view'. 4 We 
are reduced to the immediate experience of relationships {Koharenzer- 
lebnis, Erlebnis des Passens) and such is probably the experience of 
the patient. We were wrong to say that he cannot abide by a given 
principle of classification, but goes from one to the other: in reality 
he never adopts any. 5 The disturbance touches 'the way in which the 
colours group themselves for the observer, the way in which the visual 
field is put together from the point of view of colours'. 6 It is not only 
the thought or knowledge, but the very experience of colours which 
is in question. We might say with another author that normal ex- 
perience involves 'circles' or 'vortices' within which each element is 
representative of all others and carries, as it were, 'vectors' which 

1 Griinbaum, for example (Aphasie und Motorik) shows both that aphasic dis- 
turbances are general and that they are motor, in other words he makes motility 
into an original mode of intentionality or meaning (cf. above, pp. 227-8), which 
amounts to conceiving man, no longer in terms of consciousness, but in terms of 
existence. 

2 Gelb and Goldstein, Ober Farbennamenamnesie, p. 151. 

3 Ibid., p. 149. 4 Ibid., pp. 151-2. 
6 Ibid., p. 150. • Ibid., p. 162. 

191 



THE BODY 

link it to them. In the patient, 'this life is enclosed in narrower limits, 
and, compared to the normal subject's perceived world, it moves in 
smaller and more restricted circles. A movement which has its origin 
on the periphery of the vortex no longer spreads immediately as far 
as its centre, but remains, so to speak, within the stimulated area or 
may be transmitted to its immediate surrounding, but no further. 
More comprehensive units of meaning can no longer be built up with- 
in the perceived world. . . . Here again, each sense impression is pro- 
vided with a "meaning-vector", but these vectors have no common 
direction, for, being no longer directed towards main determinate 
centres, they diverge much more than in the normal person.' 1 Such 
is the disturbance of 'thought' discoverable at the root of amnesia; it 
can be seen that it concerns not so much the judgement as the setting 
of experience in which the judgement has its source, not so much 
spontaneity as the footing which spontaneity has in the perceptible 
world, and our ability to discern in it any intention whatsoever. In 
Kantian terms: it affects not so much the understanding as the pro- 
ductive imagination. The categorial act is therefore not an ultimate 
fact, it builds itself up into a certain 'attitude' (Einstellung). It is on 
this attitude, moreover, that speech is based, so that there can be no 
question of making language rest upon pure thought. 'Categorial 
behaviour and the possession of meaningful language express one 
and the same fundamental form of behaviour. Neither can be a cause 
or effect of the other.' 2 In the first place, thought is not an effect of 
language. It is true that certain patients, 3 being unable to group 
colours by comparing them to a given sample, succeed through the 
intermediary of language: they name the colour of the exemplar and 
subsequently collect together all the samples which that name fits 
without looking back at the exemplar. It is true also that abnormal 
children* classify even different colours together if they have been 
taught to call ihem by the same name. But these are precisely abnor- 
mal procedures; they do not express the essential relationship be- 
tween language and thought, but the pathological or accidental rela- 
ship of language and thought both cut off from their living signifi- 
cance. Indeed, many patients are able to repeat the names of the 
colours without being any more capable of classifying them. In cases 
of amnesic aphasia, 'it cannot, therefore, be the lack of the word 
taken in itself which makes categorial behaviour difficult or impos- 
sible. Words must have lost something which normally belongs to 
them and which fits them for use in relation to categorial behaviour.' 5 

1 E. Cassirer, Philosophic der symbolischen Formen, T. Ill, p. 258. 

* Gclb and Goldstein, Vber Farbennamenamnesie, p. 158. 

* Ibid. 4 Ibid. 
5 Ibid. 

192 



THE BODY AS EXPRESSION, AND SPEECH 

What have they lost? Their notional significance? Must wc say that 
the concept has been withdrawn from them, thus making thought 
the cause of language? But clearly, when the word loses its meaning, 
it is modified down to its sensible aspect, // is emptied. 1 The patient 
suffering from amnesia, to whom a colour name is given, and who :3 
asked to choose a corresponding sample, repeats the name as if he 
expected something to come of it. But the name is now useless to him, 
it tells him nothing more, it is alien and absurd, as are for us names 
which wc go on repeating for too long a time. 2 Patients for whom 
words have lost their meaning sometimes retain in the highest degree 
the ability to associate ideas. 3 The name, therefore, has not become 
separated from former 'associations', it has suffered deterioriation, 
like some inanimate body. The link between the word and its living 
meaning is not an external link of association, the meaning inhabits 
the word, and language 'is not an external accompaniment to intellec- 
tual processes'. 4 We are therefore led to recognize a gestural or exis- 
tential significance in speech, as we have already said. Language cer- 
tainly has an inner content, but this is not self-subsistent and self- 
conscious thought. What then does language express, if it does not 
express thoughts? It presents or rather it is the subject's taking up of 
a position in the world of his meanings. The term 'world' here is not 
a manner of speaking: it means that the 'mental' or cultural life 
borrows its structures from natural life and that the thinking subject 
must have its basis in the subject incarnate. The phonetic 'gesture* 
brings about, both for the speaking subject and for his hearers, a 
certain structural co-ordination of experience, a certain modulation 
of existence, exactly as a pattern of my bodily behaviour endows the 
objects around me with a certain significance both for me and for 
others. The meaning of the gesture is not contained in it like some 
physical or physiological phenomenon. The meaning of the word is 
not contained in the word as a sound. But the human body is defined 
in terms of its property of appropriating, in an indefinite series of dis- 
continuous acts, significant cores which transcend and transfigure its 
natural powers. This act of transcendence is first encountered in the 
acquisition of a pattern of behaviour, then in the mute communica- 
tion of gesture: it is through the same power that the body opens 
itself to some new kind of conduct and makes it understood to exter- 
nal witnesses. Here and there a system of definite powers is suddenly 

1 Gelb and Goldstein, Vber Farbennamenamnesie ', p. 158. 

* Ibid. 

* One sees them faced with a given sample (red), recalling some object of the 
same colour (strawberry), and from there rediscovering the name of the colour 
(red strawberry, red). Ibid., p. 177. 

4 Ibid., p. 158. 

193 



THE BODY 

decentralized, broken up and reorganized under a fresh law unknown 
to the subject or to the external witness, and one which reveals itself 
to them at the very moment at which the process occurs. For example, 
the knitting of the brows intended, according to Darwin, to protect 
the eye from the sun, or the narrowing of the eyes to enable one to 
see sharply, become component parts of the human act of medita- 
tion, and convey this to an observer. Language, in its turn, presents 
no different a problem: a contraction of the throat, a sibilant emis- 
sion of air between the tongue and teeth, a certain way of bringing 
the body into play suddenly allows itself to be invested with a figura- 
tive significance which is conveyed outside us. This is neither more 
nor less miraculous than the emergence of love from desire, or that 
of gesture from the unco-ordinated movements of infancy. For the 
miracle to come about, phonetic 'gesticulation' must use an alphabet 
of already acquired meanings, the word-gesture must be performed 
in a certain setting common to the speakers, just as the comprehen- 
sion of other gestures presupposes a perceived world common to all, 
in which each one develops and spreads out its meaning. But this 
condition is not sufficient: speech puts up a new sense, if it is authen- 
tic speech, just as gesture endows the object for the first time with 
human significance,' if it is an initiating gesture. Moreover signifi- 
cances now acquired must necessarily have been new once. We must 
therefore recognize as an ultimate fact this open and indefinite power 
of giving significance — that is, both of apprehending and conveying 
a meaning — by which man transcends himself towards a new form 
of behaviour, or towards other people, or towards his own thought, 
through his body and his speech. 

When authors try to bring the analysis of aphasia to its conclusion 
in some general conception of language 1 they can more clearly be 
seen forsaking the intellectualist language which they adopted after 
Pierre Marie and in reaction against the conceptions of Broca. It 
cannot be said of speech either that it is an 'operation of intelligence', 
or that it is a 'motor phenomenon 1 : it is wholly motility and wholly 
intelligence. What establishes its inherence in the body is the fact 
that linguistic deficiencies cannot be reduced to a unity, and that the 
primary disturbances affect sometimes the body of the word, the 
material instrument of verbal expression — sometimes the word's 
physiognomy, the verbal intention, the kind of group image on the 
basis of which we succeed in saying or writing down a word exactly — 
sometimes the immediate meaning of the word, what German writers 
call the verbal concept — and sometimes the structure of the whole 
experience, not merely the linguistic experience, as in the case of 
amnesic aphasia examined above. Speech, then, rests upon a strati- 
1 Cf. Goldstein, V Analyse de Vaphasic ci I s essence du langage. 
194 



THE BODY AS EXPRESSION, AND SPEECH ' 

fication of powers relatively capable of being isolated. But at the 
same time it is impossible to find anywhere a linguistic disturbance 
which is 'purely motor' and which does not* to some extent impinge 
upon the significance of language. In pure alexia,* if the subject can 
no longer recognize the letters of a word, it is through inability to 
pattern the visual data, or constitute the word's structure, or appre- 
hend its visual significance. In motor aphasia, the list of words lost 
and preserved does not correspond to their objective characteristics 
(length or complexity), but to their value from the subject's point of 
view : the patient is unable to pronounce, in isolation, a letter or word 
within a familiar motor series, through being incapable of differen- 
tiating between the 'figure' and 'background' and freely conferring 
upon a certain word or letter the value of a figure. Articulatory and 
syntactical accuracy always stand in inverse ratio to each other, 
which shows that the articulation of a word is not a merely motor 
phenomenon, but that it draws upon the same energies which orga- 
nize the syntactical order. When disturbances of verbal intention are 
present, as in the case of literal paraphasia f in which letters are omit- 
ted, displaced, or added, and in which the rhythm of the word is 
changed, it is, a fortiori, clearly not a question of a destruction of 
engrams,^ but of the reduction to a common level of figure and 
background, of a powerlessness to structurize the word and grasp its 
articulatory physiognomy. 1 

If we are to summarize these two sets of observations, we shall 
have to say that any linguistic operation presupposes the apprehen- 
sion of a significance, but that the significance in both cases is, as it 
were, specialized: there are different layers of significance, from the 
visual to the conceptual by way of the verbal concept. These two 
ideas will never be simultaneously understood unless we cease to 
vacillate between the notions of 'motility' and 'intelligence', and un- 
less we discover a third notion which enables us to integrate them, a 

* Alexia: Loss of power to grasp meaning of written or printed words and 
sentences: word-blindness (Translator's note). 

t Paraphrasia: jargon; form of aphasia in which patient has lost power of 
speaking correctly, though words are heard and comprehended: he substitutes 
one word for another, and jumbles his words and sentences in such a way as to 
make his speech unintelligible (Translator's note). 

% Engram: traces left by stimuli on protoplasm of animal or plant (Translator's 
note). 

1 Goldstein, V Analyse de Vaphasie et V essence du langage, p. 460. Goldstein here 
agrees with Griinbaum (Aphasie und Motorik) in going beyond the situation in 
which one is faced with the choice between the traditional conception (Broca) 
and the modern works (Head). Griinbaum's complaint against the moderns is 
that they do not 'give absolute priority to motor exteriorization, and the psycho- 
physical structures on which it rests, as a fundamental field which dominates the 
picture of aphasia' (p. 386). 

195 



THE BODY 



function which shall be the same at all levels, which shall be equally 
at work in the hidden preliminaries to speech and in articulator^ 
phenomena, which shall support the whole edifice of language, and 
which nevertheless shall be stabilized in relatively autonomous pro- 
cesses. We shall have the opportunity of seeing this power, essential 
to speech, in cases in which neither thought nor 'motility' is notice- 
ably affected, and yet in which the 'life* of language is impaired. It 
does happen that vocabulary, syntax and the body of language ap- 
pear intact, the only peculiarity being that main clauses predominate. 
But the patient does not make the same use as the normal subject of 
these materials. He speaks practically only when he is questioned, or, 
if he himself takes the initiative in asking a question, it is never other 
than of a stereotyped kind, such as he asks daily of his children when 
they come home from school. He never uses language to convey a 
merely possible situation, and false statements (e.g. the sky is black) 
are meaningless to him. He can speak only if he has prepared his 
sentences. 1 It cannot be held that language in his case has become 
automatic; there is no sign of a decline of general intelligence, and it 
is still the case that words are organized through their meaning. But 
the meaning is, as it were, ossified. Schneider never feels the need to 
speak; his experience never tends towards speech, it never suggests a 
question to him, it never ceases to have that kind of self-evidence and 
self-sufficiency of reality which stifles any interrogation, any reference 
to the possible, any wonder, any improvisation. We can perceive, in 
contrast with this, the essence of normal language: the intention to 
speak can reside only in an open experience. It makes its appearance 
like the boiling point of a liquid, when, in the density of being, 
volumes of empty space are built up and move outwards. 'As soon 
as man uses language to establish a living relation with himself or 
with his fellows, language is no longer an instrument, no longer a 
means; it is a manifestation, a revelation of intimate being and of the 
psychic link which unites us to the world and our fellow men. The 
patient's language may display great knowledge, it may be capable of 
being turned to account for specific activities, but it is totally lacking 
in that productivity which is man's deepest essence and which is 
perhaps revealed nowhere so clearly, among civilisation's creations, 
as in the creation of language itself.' 2 It might be said, restating a 
celebrated distinction, that languages or constituted systems of 
vocabulary and syntax, empirically existing 'means of expression*, 
are both the repository and residue of acts of speech, in which un- 
formulated significance not only finds the means of being conveyed 

1 Benary, Analyse eines Seelenbildes von der Sprache aits. This is again Schneider's 
case, which we have analysed in connection with motility and sexuality. 

' Goldstein, L* Analyse de Vaphasie et Vessence du langage, p. 496. Our italics. 

196 



THE BODY AS EXPRESSION, AND SPEECH 

outwardly, but moreover acquires existence for itself, and is genuinely 
created as significance. Or again one might draw a distinction between 
the word in the speaking and the spoken word. The former is the one 
in which the significant intention is at the stage of coming into being. 
Here existence is polarized into a certain 'significance' 1 which cannot 
be defined in terms of any natural object. It is somewhere at a point 
beyond being that it aims to catch up with itself again, and that is 
why it creates speech as an empirical support for its own not-being. 
Speech is the surplus of our existence over natural being. But the act 
of expression constitutes a linguistic world and a cultural world, and 
allows that to fall back into being which was striving to outstrip it. 
Hence the spoken word, which enjoys available significances as one 
might enjoy an acquired fortune. From these gains other acts of 
authentic expression — the writer's, artist's or philosopher's — are 
made possible. This ever-recreated opening in the plenitude of being 
is what conditions the child's first use of speech and the language of 
the writer, as it does the construction of the word and that of con- 
cepts. Such is the function which we intuit through language, which 
reiterates itself, which is its own foundation, or which, like a wave, 
gathers and poises itself to hurtle beyond its own limits. 

The analysis of speech and expression brings home to us the enig- 
matic nature of our own body even more effectively than did our 
remarks on bodily space and unity. It is not a collection of particles, 
each one remaining in itself, nor yet a network of processes defined 
once and for all — it is not where it is, nor what it is — since we see it 
secreting in itself a 'significance' which comes to it from nowhere, 
projecting that significance upon its material surrounding, and com- 
municating it to other embodied subjects. It has always been observed 
that speech or gesture transfigure the body, but no more was said on 
the subject than that they develop or disclose another power, that of 
thought or soul. The fact was overlooked that, in order to express it, 
the body must in the last analysis become the thought or intention 
that it signifies for us. It is the body which points out, and which 
speaks; so much we have learnt in this chapter. Cezanne used to say 
of a portrait: 'If I paint in all the little blue and brown touches, I 
make him gaze as he does gaze. . . . Never mind if they suspect how, 
by bringing together a green of various shades and a red, we sadden 
a mouth or bring a smile to a cheek.' 2 This disclosure of an immanent 
or incipient significance in the living body extends, as we shall see, 
to the whole sensible world, and our gaze, prompted by the ex- 
perience of our own body, will discover in all other 'objects' the 
miracle of expression. In his Peau de Chagrin Balzac describes a 

1 'sens* in French means 'direction* and 'significance* (Translator's note). 
* J. Gasquet, Cezanne, d. 117. 

197 



THE BODY 

'white tablecloth, like a covering of snow newly fallen, from which 
rose symmetrically the plates and napkins crowned with light- 
coloured rolls'. 'Throughout my youth,' Cezanne said, 'I wanted to 
paint that table-cloth like freshly fallen snow. ... I know now that 
one must try to paint only: "the plates and napkins rose sym- 
metrically , \ and "the light-coloured rolls". If I paint: "crowned", 
Pm finished, you see. And if I really balance and shade my napkins 
and rolls as they really are, you may be sure that the crowning, the 
snow and all the rest of it will be there.' 1 The problem of the world, 
and, to begin with, that of one's own body, consists in the fact that 
it is all there. 

We have become accustomed, through the influence of the Carte- 
sian tradition, to jettison the subject: the reflective attitude simul- 
taneously purifies the common notions of body and soul by defining 
the body as the sum of its parts with no interior, and the soul as a 
being wholly present to itself without distance. These definitions 
make matters perfectly clear both within and outside ourselves: we 
have the transparency of an object with no secret recesses, the trans- 
parency of a subject which is nothing but what it thinks it is. The 
object is an object through and through, and consciousness a con- 
sciousness through and through. There are two senses, and two only, 
of the word 'exist' : one exists as a thing or else one exists as a con- 
sciousness. The experience of our own body, on the other hand, 
reveals to us an ambiguous mode of existing. If I try to think of it as 
a cluster of third person processes— 'sight', 'motility', 'sexuality' — I 
observe that these 'functions' cannot be interrelated, and related to 
the external world, by causal connections, they are all obscurely 
drawn together and mutually implied in a unique drama. Therefore 
the body is not an object. For the same reason, my awareness of it is 
not a thought, that is to say, I cannot take it to pieces and reform it to 
make a clear idea. Its unity is always implicit and vague. It is always 
something other than what it is, always sexuality and at the same time 
freedom, rooted in nature at the very moment when it is transformed 
by cultural influences, never hermetically sealed and never left be- 
hind. Whether it is a question of another's body or my own, I have 
no means of knowing the human body other than that of living it, 
which means taking up on my own account the drama which is being 
played out in it, and losing myself in it. I am my body, at least wholly 
to the extent that I possess experience, and yet at the same time my 
body is as it were a 'natural' subject, a provisional sketch of my total 
being. Thus experience of one's own body runs counter to the reflec- 
tive procedure which detaches subject and object from each other, 
1 J. Gasquet, CJzanne, pp. 123 and fT. 
198 



THE BODY AS EXPRESSION, AND SPEECH 

and which gives us only the thought about the body, or the body as 
an idea, and not the experience of the body or the body in reality. 
Descartes was well aware of this, since a famous letter of his to Eliza- 
beth draws the distinction between the body as it is conceived through 
use in living and the body as it is conceived by the understanding. 1 
But in Descartes this peculiar knowledge of our body, which we enjoy 
from the mere fact that we are a body, remains subordinated to our 
knowledge of it through the medium of ideas, because, behind man 
as he in fact is, stands God as the rational author of our de facto 
situation. On the basis of this transcendent guarantee, Descartes can 
blandly accept our irrational condition: it is not we who are required 
to bear the responsibility for reason and, once we have recognized it 
at the basis of things, it remains for us only to act and think in the 
world. 2 But if our union with the body is substantial, how is it pos- 
sible for us to experience in ourselves a pure soul from which to 
accede to an absolute Spirit? Before asking this question, let us look 
closely at what is implied in the rediscovery of our own body. It is 
not merely one object among the rest which has the peculiarity of 
resisting reflection and remaining, so to speak, stuck to the subject. 
Obscurity spreads to the perceived world in its entirety. 

1 To Elizabeth, 28th June 1643, AT, T. Ill, p. 690. 

2 'Finally, as I consider that it is very necessary to have understood, once in 
one's lifetime, the principles of metaphysics, since they are what provide us with 
knowledge of God and our soul, I think too, however, that it would be extremely 
harmful to occupy our mind often in meditating upon them, since it could not 
then attend so effectively to the work of imagination and the senses; but that the 
best course is merely to retain in memory and belief conclusions once arrived at, 
and thenceforth to employ the rest of the lime one can devote to study to thoughts 
in which the understanding acts along with the imagination and the senses.' Ibid. 



199 



PART TWO 



The World as Perceived 



The theory of the body is already a theory of 
perception 

Our own body is in the world as the heart is in the organism : it keeps 
the visible spectacle constantly alive, it breathes life into it and sus- 
tains it inwardly, and with it forms a system. When I walk round my 
flat, the various aspects in which it presents itself to me could not 
possibly appear as views of one and the same thing if I did not know 
that each of them represents the flat seen from one spot or another, 
and if I were unaware of my own movements, and of my body as re- 
taining its identity through the stages of those movements. I can of 
course take a mental bird's eye view of the flat, visualize it or draw a 
plan of it on paper, but in that case too I could not grasp the unity 
of the object without the mediation of bodily experience, for what I 
call a plan is only a more comprehensive perspective: it is the flat 
'seen from above', and the fact that I am able to draw together in it 
all habitual perspectives is dependent on my knowing that one and 
the same embodied subject can view successively from various posi- 
tions. It will perhaps be objected that by restoring the object to bodily 
experience as one of the poles of that experience, we deprive it of 
precisely that which constitutes its objectivity. From the point of view 
of my body I never see as equal the six sides of the cube, even if it is 
made of glass, and yet the word 'cube' has a meaning; the cube itself, 
the cube in reality, beyond its sensible appearances, has Us six equal 
sides. As I move round it, I see the front face, hitherto a square, 
change its shape, then disappear, while the other sides come into 
view and one by one become squares. But the successive stages of 
this experience are for me merely the opportunity of conceiving the 
whole cube with its six equal and simultaneous faces, the intelligible 
structure which provides the explanation of it. And it is even neces- 
sary, for my tour of inspection of the cube to warrant the judgement: 
'here is a cube*, that my movements themselves be located in objec- 
tive space and, far from its being the case that the experience of my 
own movement conditions the position of an object, it is, on the 
contrary, by conceiving my body itself as a mobile object that I am 
able to interpret perceptual appearance and construct the cube as it 
truly is. The experience of my own movement would therefore appear 
to be no more than a psychological circumstance of perception and to 

203 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



make no contribution to determining the significance of the object. 
The object and my body would certainly form a system, but we 
would then have a nexus of objective correlations and not, as we 
were saying earlier, a collection of lived-through correspondences. 
The unity of the object is thus conceived, and not experienced as the 
correlate of our body's unity. 

But can the object be thus detached from the actual conditions 
under which it is presented to us? One can bring together discursively 
the notion of the number six, the notion of 'side* and that of equality, 
and link them together in a formula which is the definition of the 
cube. But this definition rather puts a question to us than offers us 
something to conceive. One emerges from blind, symbolic thought 
only by perceiving the particular spatial entity which bears these pre- 
dicates all together. It is a question of tracing in thought that particu- 
lar form which encloses a fragment of space between six equal faces. 
Now, if the words 'enclose* and 'between' have a meaning for us, it 
is because they derive it from our experience as embodied subjects. 
In space itself independently of the presence of a psycho-physical 
subject, there is no direction, no inside and no outside. A space is 
'enclosed' betv/een the sides of a cube as we are enclosed between the 
walls of our room. In order to be able to conceive the cube, we take 
up a position in space, now on its surface, now in it, now outside it, 
and from that moment we see it in perspective. The cube with six equal 
sides is not only invisible, but inconceivable; it is the cube as it would 
be for itself ; but the cube is not for itself, since it is an object. There is a 
first order dogmatism, of which analytical reflection rids us, and which 
consists in asserting that the object is in itself, or absolutely, without 
wondering what it is. But there is another, which consists in affirming 
the ostensible significance of the object, without wondering how it* 
enters into our experience. Analytical reflection puts forward, instead 
of the absolute existence of the object, the thought of an absolute 
object, and, through trying to dominate the object and think of it 
from no point of view, it destroys the object's internal structure. If 
there is, for me, a cube with six equal sides, and if I can link up with 
the object, this is not because I constitute it from the inside: it is 
because I delve into the thickness of the world by perceptual ex- 
perience. The cube with six equal sides is the limiting idea whereby 
I express the material presence of the cube which is there before my 
eyes, under my hands, in its perceptual self-evidence. The sides of 
the cube are not projections of it, but precisely sides. When I perceive 
them successively, with the appearance they present in different per- 
spectives, I do not construct the idea of the flat projection which 
accounts for these perspectives; the cube is already there in front of 
me and reveals itself through them. I do not need to take an objective 

204 



THEORY OF THE BODY IS ALREADY A THEORY OF PERCEPTION 

view of my own movement, or take it into account, in order to recon- 
stitute the true form of the object behind its appearance; the account 
is already taken, and already the new appearance has compounded 
itself with the lived-through movement and presented itself as an 
appearance of a cube. The thing, and the world, are given to me 
along with the parts of my body, not by any 'natural geometry', but 
in a living connection comparable, or rather identical, with that 
existing between the parts of my body itself. 

External perception and the perception of one's own body vary 
in conjunction because they are the two facets of one and the same 
act. The attempt has long been made to explain Aristotle's celebrated 
illusion by allowing that the unaccustomed position of the fingers 
makes the synthesis of their perceptions impossible: the right side of 
the middle finger and the left side of the index do not ordinarily 
'work' together, and if both are touched at once, then there must be 
two marbles. In reality, the perceptions of the two fingers are not 
only disjoined, they are inverted: the subject attributes to the index 
what is touched by the middle finger and vice versa, as can be shown 
by applying two distinct stimuli to the fingers, a point and a ball, for 
example. 1 Aristotle's illusion is primarily a disturbance of the body 
image. What makes the synthesis of the two tactile perceptions in one 
single object impossible, is not so much that the position of the 
fingers is unaccustomed or statistically rare, it is that the right face 
of the middle finger and the left face of the index cannot combine in 
a joint exploration of the object, that the crossing of the fingers, being 
a movement which has to be imposed on them, lies outside the motor 
possibilities of the fingers themselves and cannot be aimed at in a 
project towards movement. The synthesis of the object is here 
effected, then, through the synthesis of one's own body, it is the reply 
or correlative to it, and it is literally the same thing to perceive one 
single marble, and to use two fingers as one single organ. The dis- 
turbance of the body image may even be directly translated into the 
external world without the intervention of any stimulus. In heauto- 
scopy, before seeing himself, the subject always passes through a state 
akin to dreaming, musing or disquiet, and the image of himself which 
appears outside him is merely the counterpart of this depersonaliza- 
tion. 2 The patient has the feeling of being in the double outside 

1 Tastevin, Czermak, Schilder, quoted by Lhermitte, V Image de notre Corps, 
pp. 36 and ff. 

1 Lhermitte, Vintage de notre Corps, pp. 136-88, cf. p. 191 : 'During the period 
of autoscopy the subject is overcome by a feeling of profound sadness which 
spreads outwards and into the very image of the double, which seems to be filled 
with effective vibrations identical with those experienced by the original person'; 
4 his consciousness seems to have moved wholly outside himself. And Menninger- 
Lerchenthal, Das Truggebilde der eigenen Gestalt, p. 180: 'I suddenly had the 
impression of being outside my body.* 

205 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

himself, just as, in a lift which goes upwards and suddenly stops, I feel 
the substance of my body escaping from me through my head and 
overrunning the boundaries of my objective body. It is in his own 
body that the patient feels the approach of this Other whom he has 
never seen with his eyes, as the normal person is aware, through a 
certain burning feeling in the nape of the neck, that someone is 
watching him from behind. 1 Conversely, a certain form of external 
experience implies and produces a certain consciousness of one's own 
body. Many patients speak of a 'sixth sense' which seems to produce 
their hallucinations. Stratton's subject, whose visual field has been 
objectively inverted, at first sees everything upside down; on the 
third day of the experiment, when things are beginning to regain 
their upright position, he is filled with 'the strange impression of 
looking at the fire out of the back of his head'. 2 This is because there 
is an immediate equivalence between the orientation of the visual 
field and the awareness of one's own body as the potentiality of that 
field, so that any upheaval experimentally brought about can appear 
indifferently either as the inversion of phenomenal objects or as a 
redistribution of sensory functions in the body. If a subject focuses 
for long-distance vision, he has a double image of his own finger as 
indeed of all objects near to him. If he is touched or pricked, he is 
aware of being touched or pricked in two places. 3 Diplopia is thus 
- extended into a bodily duplication. Every external perception is 
immediately synonymous with a certain perception of my body, 
just as every perception of my body is made explicit in the language 
of external perception. If, then, as we 'have seen to be the case, 
the body is not a transparent object, and is not presented to us in 
virtue of the law of its constitution, as the circle is to the geometer, 
if it is an expressive unity which we can learn to know only by 
actively taking it up, this structure will be passed on to the 
sensible world. The theory of the body image is, implicitly, a theory 
of perception. We have relearned to feel our body; we have found 
underneath the objective and detached knowledge of the body 
that other knowledge which we have of it in virtue of its always being 
with us and of the fact that we are our body. In the same way we shall 
need to reawaken our experience of the world as it appears to us in so 
far as we are in the world through our body, and in so far as we per- 
ceive the world with our body. But by thus remaking contact with 
the body and with the world, we shall also rediscover ourself, since, 
perceiving as we do with our body, the body is a natural self and, as 
it were, the subject of perception. 

1 Jaspers, quoted by Menningcr-Lerchcnihal, op. cit., p. 76. 
1 Stratton, Vision without Inversion of the Retinal Image, p. 350. 
3 Lhcrmitle, V Image de not re Corps, p. 39. 

206 



I 

SENSE EXPERIENCE 



OBJECTIVE thought is unaware of the subject of perception. This 
is because it presents itself with the world ready made, as the setting of 
every possible event, and treats perception as one of these events. For 
example, the empiricist philosopher considers a subject x in the act of 
perceiving and tries to describe what happens : (here are sensations 
which are the subject's states or manners of being and, in virtue of 
this, genuine mental things. The perceiving subject is the place where 
jthese things occur, and the philosopher describes sensations and their 
substratum as one might describe the fauna of a distant land — with- 
out being aware that he himself perceives, that he is the perceiving 
subject and that perception as he lives it belies everything that he 
says of perception in general. For, seen from the inside, perception 
owes nothing to what we know in other ways about the world, about 
stimuli as physics describes them and about the sense organs as de- 
scribed by biology. It does not present itself in the first place as an 
event in the world to which the category of causality, for example, 
can be applied, but as a re-creation or re-constitution of the world at 
every moment. In so far as we believe in the world's past, in the 
physical world, in 'stimuli', in the organism as our books depict it, 
it is first of all because we have present at this moment to us a per- 
ceptual field, a surface in contact with the world, a permanent 
rootedness in it, and because the world ceaselessly assails and be- 
leaguers subjectivity as waves wash round a wreck on the shore. All 
knowledge takes its place within the horizons opened up by percep- 
tion. There can be no question of describing perception itself as one 
of the facts thrown up in the world, since we can never fill up, in the 
picture of the world, that gap which we ourselves are, and by which 
it comes into existence for someone, since perception is the 'flaw' 
in this 'great diamond'.* Intellectualism certainly represents a step 

* Cf. Mes repentirs, mes doutes, mes contraintes 

Sont le defaut de ton grand diamant. 
Translator's note.) Paul Val6r y> u Cimetiire marin. 

207 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

forward in coming to self-consciousness : that place outside the world 
at which the empiricist philosopher hints, and in which he tacitly takes 
up his position in order to describe the event of perception, now re- 
ceives a name, and appears in the description. It is the transcendental 
Ego. Through it every empiricist thesis is reversed: the state of con- 
sciousness becomes the consciousness of a state, passivity the positing 
of passivity, the world becomes the correlative of thought about the 
world and henceforth exists only for a constituting agent. And yet it 
remains true to say that intellectualism too provides itself with a 
ready-made world. For the constitution of the world, as conceived 
by it, is a mere requirement that to each term of the empiricist de- 
scription be added the indication 'consciousness of . . The whole 
system of experience — world, own body and empirical self— are 
subordinated to a universal thinker charged with sustaining the re- 
lationships between the three terms. But, since he is not actually in- 
volved, these relationships remain what they were in empiricism: 
causal relations spread out in the context of cosmic events. Now, if 
one's own body and the empirical self are no more than elements of 
the system of experience, objects among other objects -in the eyes of 
the true /, how can we ever be confused with our body ? How can we 
ever have believed that we saw with our eyes what we in fact grasp 
through an inspection of the mind; how is it that the world does not 
present itself to us as perfectly explicit; why is it displayed only 
gradually and never 'in its entirety'? In short, how does it come 
about that we perceive? We shall understand this only if the empirical 
self and the body are not immediately objects, in fact only if they 
never quite become objects, if there is a certain significance in saying 
that I can see the piece of wax with my eyes, and if correlatively the 
possibility of absence, the dimension of escape and freedom which 
reflection opens in the depths of our being, and which is called the 
transcendental Ego, are not initially given and are never absolutely 
acquired; if I can never say T absolutely, and if every act of reflec- 
tion, every voluntary taking up of a position is based on the ground 
and the proposition of a life of pre-personal consciousness. The sub- 
ject of perception will remain overlooked as long as we cannot avoid 
the dilemma of natura naturata and natura naturans, of sensation as 
a state of consciousness and as the consciousness of a state, of exist- 
ence in itself and existence for itself. Let us then return to sensation 
and scrutinize it closely enough to learn from it the living relation of 
the perceiver to his body and to his world. 

Inductive psychology will help us in our search for a new status 
for sensation, by showing that it is neither a state or a quality, nor 
the consciousness of a state or of a quality. In fact, each of the alleged 
qualities — red, blue, colour, sound — is inserted into a certain form of 

208 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 



behaviour. In the normal subject a sensory excitation, particularly 
of the experimental kind which has practically no living significance 
for him, scarcely has any effect on general motility. But diseases of 
the cerebellum or the frontal cortex clearly show what effect sensory 
excitations would have on muscular tonicity, if they were not in- 
tegrated into a comprehensive situation, and if tonicity were not, in 
the normal person, adjusted to certain special tasks. The gesture of 
raising the arm, which can be taken as an indicator of motor dis- 
turbance, is differently modified in its sweep and its direction accord- 
ing as the visual field is red, yellow, blue or green. Red and yellow 
are particularly productive of smooth movements, blue and green of 
jerky ones; red applied to the right eye, for example, favours a corre- 
sponding stretching of the arm outwards, green the bending of the 
arm back towards the body. 1 The privileged position of the arm — 
the one in which the arm is felt to be balanced and at rest — which is 
farther away from the body in the patient than in the normal sub- 
ject, is modified by the presentation of colours : green brings it back 
nearer to the body. 2 The colour of the visual field affects the accuracy 
of the subject's reactions, whether it is a question of performing a 
movement of a given extent or measuring with the finger a definite 
length. With a green visual field the assessment is accurate, with a 
red one the subject errs on the side of excess. Movements outwards 
are accelerated by green and slowed down by red. Localization of 
stimuli on the skin is modified by red in the direction of abduction. 
Yellow and red emphasize errors in judging weight and time, though 
in the case of cerebellar patients blue and particularly green have a 
compensating effect. In these various experiments each colour always 
acts with the same tendency, with the result that a definite motor 
value can be assigned to it. Generally speaking, red and yellow favour 
abduction, blue and green adduction. Now, on the whole, the signi- 
ficance of adduction is that the organism turns towards the stimulus 
and is attracted by the world — of abduction that it turns away from 
the stimulus and withdraws towards its centre. 3 Sensations, 'sensiblel 
qualities' are then far from being reducible to a certain indescribable \ 
state or quale; they present themselves with a motor physiognomy, \ 
and are enveloped in a living significance. It has long been known 
that sensations have a 'motor accompaniment', that stimuli set in i 
motion 'incipient movements' which are associated with the sensation 1 
of the quality and create a halo round it, and that the 'perceptual I 
side' and the 'motor side' of behaviour are in communication with \ 

1 Goldstein and Rosenthal, Zum Problem der Wirkung der Farben auf den 
Organismus, pp. 3-9. 
* Ibid. 

8 La Structure du Comport ement, p. 201 . 

209 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



each other. But it is usual to proceed as if this relation left unaffected 
the terms between which it stands. For there is no question, in the 
examples given above, of an external, causal relationship leaving the 
sensation itself unchanged. Motor reactions produced by blue, 'blue- 
occasioned conduct', are not the effects of colour on the objective 
body, defined in terms of specific wavelength and intensity: for a blue 
produced by contrast, and therefore having no physical phenomenon 
corresponding to it, has around it the same motor halo. 1 Where the 
motor physiognomy of colour is constituted is not in the physicist's 
world, as a result of some occult process. Is it then 'in consciousness', 
and must we say that the experience of blue as a sensible quality 
produces a certain change in the phenomenal body? But it is not 
obvious why the clear awareness of a certain quale should affect my 
judgement of sizes, and moreover the felt effect of colour does not 
always exactly correspond to the influence exerted by it on behaviour: 
red may accentuate my reactions without my being aware of it. 2 The 
motor significance of colours is comprehensible only if they cease to 
be closed states or indescribable qualities presented to an observing 
and thinking subject, and if they impinge within me upon a certain 
general setting through which I come to terms with the world; if, 
moreover, they suggest to me a new manner of evaluating, and yet if 
motility ceases to be the mere consciousness of my movements from 
place to place in the present or immediate future, and becomes the 
function which constantly lays down my standards of size and the 
varying scope of my being in the world. Blue is that which prompts 
me to look in a certain way, that which, allows my gaze to run over 
it in a specific manner. It is a certain field or atmosphere presented 
to the power of my eyes and of my whole body. Here the experience 
of colours confirms and elucidates the correlations established by 
inductive psychology. Green is commonly regarded as a 'restful' 
colour. 'It encloses me within myself and brings a peaceful state,' 
says one patient. 3 It 'makes no demands on us and does not enjoin us 
to do anything,' says Kandinsky. Blue seems to 'yield to our gaze,' 
says Goethe. On the other hand, he adds, red 'invades the eye.' 4 Red 
has a 'rending', and yellow a 'stinging' effect, says one of Goldstein's 
patients. Generally speaking we have on the one hand, with red and 
yellow, 'an experience of being torn away, of a movement away from 
the centre'; on the other hand, with blue and green, that of 'repose 
and concentration'. 5 We can reveal the soporific and motor basis of 
1 Goldstein and Rosenthal, art. cit., p. 23. 

* Ibid. 
a Ibid. 

4 Kandinsky, Form und Farbc in der Malerei] Goethe, Farbenlehre, in particular 
Abs. 293; quoted by Goldstein and Rosenthal. Ibid. 

* Goldstein and Rosenthal, pp. 23-5. 

210 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 

qualities, or their vital significance, by employing stimuli which are 
either weak or of short duration. In this case the colour, before being 
seen, gives itself away through the experience of a certain bodily 
attitude appropriate only to that colour and precisely indicative of 
it: 'there is in my body a sensation of slipping downwards, so that it 
cannot be green, and can be only blue but in fact I see no blue', 1 says 
one subject. Another says: 'I clenched my teeth, and so I know that it 
is yellow.' 2 If a light stimulus is gradually increased from a sub- 
liminal intensity, there is first of all the experience of a certain bodily 
disposition and suddenly the sensation runs into and 'spreads through 
the visual domain'. 3 Just as, when I look closely at snow, I break its 
apparent 'whiteness' up into a world of reflections and transpar- 
encies, so within a musical note a 'micromelody' can be picked out 
and the interval heard is merely the final patterning of a certain 
tension felt throughout the body. 4 

The representation of a colour in subjects who have lost it is made 
possible by displaying before them any real colours whatsoever. The 
real colour produces in the subject a 'concentration of colour experi- 
ence' which enables him to 'draw together the colours in his eye'. 6 
Thus, before becoming an objective spectacle, quality is revealed by a 
type of behaviour which is directed towards it in its essence, and this 
is why my body has no sooner adopted the attitude of blue than I am 
vouchsafed a quasi-presence of blue. We must therefore stop wonder- 
ing how and why red signifies effort or violence, green restfulness and 
peace; we must rediscover how to live taese colours as our body does, 
that is, as peace or violence in concrete form. When we say that red 
increases the compass of our reactions, we are not to be understood 
as having in mind two distinct facts, a sensation of redness and motor 
reactions — we must be understood as meaning that red, by its texture 
as followed and adhered to by our gaze, is already the amplification 
of our motor being. The subject of sensation is neither a thinker who 
takes note of a quality, nor an inert setting which is affected or 
changed by it, it is a power which is born into, and simultaneously 
with, a certain existential environment, or is synchronized with it. 
The relations of sentient to sensible are comparable with those of the 
sleeper to his slumber: sleep comes when a certain voluntary attitude 
suddenly receives from outside the confirmation for which it was 
waiting. / am breathing deeply and slowly in order to summon sleep, 
and suddenly it is as if my mouth were connected to some great lung 
outside myself which alternately calls forth and forces back my 

1 Werner, Untersuchungen uber Empfindung und Empfinden, I, p. 158. 

2 Ibid. 3 Ibid., p. 159. 

4 Werner, Vber die Auspragung von Tongestalten. 

6 Werner, Untersuchungen uber Empfindung und Empfinden y I, p. 160. 

211. 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

breath. A certain rhythm of respiration, which a moment ago I 
voluntarily maintained, now becomes my very being, and sleep, until 
now aimed at as a significance, suddenly becomes a situation. In the 
sanW way I give ear, or look, in the expectation of a sensation, and 
suddenly the sensible takes possession of my ear or my gaze, and I 
surrender a part of my body, even my whole body, to this particular 
manner of vibrating and filling space known as blue or red. Just as 
the sacrament not only symbolizes, in sensible species, an operation 
of Grace, but is also the real presence of God, which it causes to 
occupy a fragment of space and communicates to those who eat of 
the consecrated bread, provided that they are inwardly prepared, in 
the same way the sensible has not only a motor and vital significance, 
but is nothing other than a certain way of being in the world sug- 
gested to us from some point in space, and seized and acted upon by 
our body, provided that it is capable of doing so, so that sensation is 
literally a form of communion. 

Taking this view, it becomes possible to attach to the notion of 
'significance' a value which intellectualism withholds from it. My 
sensation and my perception, according to this theory, are capable of 
being specified and hence of existing for me only by being the sensa- 
tion or perception of something — for instance, the sensation of blue 
or red, or the perception of the table or the chair. Now blue and red 
are not those incommunicable experiences which are mine when I 
coincide with them, nor are the table and the chair those short-lived 
appearances which are dependent on my gaze. The object is made 
determinate as an identifiable being only through a whole open series 
of possible experiences, and exists only for a subject who carries out 
this identification. Being is exclusively for someone who is able to 
step back from it and thus stand wholly outside being. In this way 
the mind becomes the subject of perception and the notion of 'signi- 
ficance' becomes inconceivable. If seeing or hearing involved ex- 
tricating oneself from the impression in order to lay siege to it in 
thought, ceasing, that is, to be in order to know, then it would be 
ridiculous to say that I see with my eyes or hear with my ears, for my 
eyes and ears are themselves entities in the world and as such are 
quite incapable of maintaining on the hither side of it that area of 
subjectivity from which it is seen or heard. Even by making them 
instruments of my perception I cannot ensure that my eyes and ears 
retain any cognitive power, for the notion of perception is ambigu- 
ous: they are instruments of bodily excitation only, and not of per- 
ception itself. There is no middle term between in itself and for itself, 
and since my senses, being several, are not myself, they can be only 
objects. I say that my eyes see, that my hand touches, that my foot 
is aching, but these naive expressions do not put into words my true 

212 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 

experience. Already they provide me with an interpretation of that 
experience which detaches it from its original subject. Because I 
know that the light strikes my eyes, that contact is made by the skin, 
that my shoe hurts my foot, I distribute through my body percep- 
tions which really belong to my soul, and put perception into the 
thing perceived. But that is merely the spatial and temporal furrow 
left by the acts of consciousness. If I consider them from the inside, 
I find one single, unlocalized knowledge, one single indivisible soul, 
and there is no such difference between thinking and perceiving as 
there is between seeing and hearing. Can we remain within this per- 
spective? If it is true that I do not see with my eyes, how can I ever 
have been ignorant of this truth? Perhaps I did not know what I was 
saying, or perhaps I had not thought about it. But how could I not 
have thought about it? How could the scrutiny of my mind, how 
could the working of my own thought be concealed from me, since 
by definition my thought is for itself? If reflection is to justify itself 
as reflection, that is to say, as progress towards the truth, it must not 
merely put one view of the world in place of another, it must show us 
how the naive view of the world is included in and transcended by 
the sophisticated one. Reflection must elucidate the unreflective view 
which it supersedes, and show the possibility of this latter, in order 
to comprehend itself as a beginning. To say that it is still myself who 
conceive myself as situated in a body and furnished with five senses 
is clearly a purely verbal solution, since I who reflect cannot recognize 
myself in this embodied /, since therefore embodiment remains in the 
nature of the case an illusion, and since the possibility of this illusion 
remains incomprehensible. We must re-examine the dilemma of for 
itself and in itself which involved putting 'significances' back into 
the world of objects and freeing subjectivity, as absolute non-being, 
of any kind of inherence in the body. This is what we are doing when 
we define sensation as co-existence or communion. The sensation of 
blue is not the knowledge or positing of a certain identifiable quale 
throughout all the experiences of it which I have, as the geometer's 
circle is the same in Paris and Tokyo. It is in all probability intentional, 
which means that it does not rest in itself as does a thing, but that it 
is directed and has significance beyond itself. But what it aims at is 
recognized only blindly, through my body's familiarity with it. It is 
not constituted in the full light of day, it is reconstituted or taken up 
once more by a knowledge which remains latent, leaving it with its 
opacity and its thisness. Sensation is intentional because I find that 
in the sensible a certain rhythm of existence is put forward — abduc- 
tion or adduction — and that, following up this hint, and stealing into 
the form of existence which is thus suggested to me, I am brought 
into relation with an external being, whether it be in order to open 

213 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



myself to it or to shut myself off from it. If the qualities radiate 
around them a certain mode of existence, if they have the power to 
cast a spell and what we called just now a sacramental value, this is 
because the sentient subject does not posit them as objects, but enters 
into a sympathetic relation with them, makes them his own and finds 
in them his momentary law. 

Let us be more explicit. The sentient and the sensible do not stand 
in relation to each other as two mutually external terms, and sensa- 
tion is not an invasion of the sentient by the sensible. It is my 
gaze which subtends colour, and the movement of my hand which 
subtends the object's form, or rather my gaze pairs off with colour, 
and my hand with hardness and softness, and in this transaction 
between the subject of sensation and the sensible it cannot be held 
that one acts while the other suffers the action, or that one confers 
significance on the other. Apart from the probing of my eye or my 
hand, and before my body synchronizes with it, the sensible is 
nothing but a vague beckoning. 'If a subject tries to experience a 
specific colour, blue for example, while trying to take up the bodily 
attitude appropriate to red, an inner conflict results, a sort of spasm 
which stops as soon as he adopts the bodily attitude corresponding 
to blue.'^ Thus a sensible datum which is on the point of being felt 
sets a kind of muddled problem for my body to solve. I must find the 
attitude which will provide it with the means of becoming deter- 
minate, of showing up as blue; I must find the reply to a question 
which is obscurely expressed. And yet I do so only when I am invited 
by it, my attitude is never sufficient to make me really see blue or 
really touch a hard surface. The sensible gives back to me what I lent 
to it, but this is only what I took from it in the first place. As I con- 
template the blue of the sky I am not set over against it as an acosmic 
subject; I do not possess it in thought, or spread out towards it some 
idea of blue such as might reveal the secret of it, I abandon myself to 
it and plunge into this mystery, it 'thinks itself within me',* I am the 
sky itself as it is drawn together and unified, and as it begins to exist 
for itself; my consciousness is saturated with this limitless blue. But, 
it may be retorted, the sky is not mind and there is surely no sense in 
saying that it exists for itself. It is indeed true that the geographer's 
or the astronomer's sky does not exist for itself. But of the sky, as it is 
perceived or sensed, subtended by my gaze which ranges over and 
resides in it, and providing as it does the theatre of a certain living 

1 Werner, Untersuchungen iiber Empfindung und Empfinden, I, p. 158. 

* Cf. 4 Midi la-haut, Midi sans mouvement 

En soi se pense et convient a soi-m£me.' 

Valery, Le Cimettire mar in 

(Translator's note.) 

214 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 



pulsation adopted by my body, it can be said that it exists for itself, 
in the sense that it is not made up of mutually exclusive parts, that 
each part of the whole is Sensitive' to what happens in all the others; 
and 'knows them dynamically'. 1 As for the subject of sensation, he 
need not be a pure nothingness with no terrestrial weight. That 
would be necessary only if, like constituting consciousness, he had 
to be simultaneously omnipresent, coextensive with being, and in 
process of thinking universal truth. But the spectacle perceived does 
not partake of pure being. Taken exactly as I see it, it is a moment of 
my individual history, and since sensation is a reconstitution, it pre- 
supposes in me sediments left behind by some previous constitution, 
so that I am, as a sentient subject, a repository stocked with natural 
powers at which I am the first to be filled with wonder. I am not, 
therefore, in Hegel's phrase, *a hole in being', but a hollow, a fold, 
which has been made and which can be unmade. 2 

We must stress this point. How have we managed to escape from 
the dilemma of the for itself and the in itself how can perceptual con- 
sciousness be saturated with its object, how can we distinguish 
sensible consciousness from intellectual consciousness? Because: (1) 
Every perception takes place in an atmosphere of generality and is 
presented to us anonymously. I cannot say that / see the blue of the 
sky in the sense in which I say that I understand a book or again in 
which I decide to devote my life to mathematics. My perception, 
even when seen from the inside, expresses a given situation: I can see 
blue because I am sensitive to colours, whereas personal acts create 
a situation : I am a mathematician because I have decided to be one. 
So, if I wanted to render precisely the perceptual experience, I ought 
to say that one perceives in me, and not that I perceive. Every sensa- 
tion carries within it the germ of a dream or depersonalization such 
as we experience in that quasi-stupor to which we are reduced when 
we really try to live at the level of sensation. It is true that knowledge 
teaches me that sensation would not occur unless my body were in 
some way adapted to it, for example, that there would be no specific 
contact unless I moved my hand. But this activity takes place on the 
periphery of my being. I am no more aware of being the true subject 
of my sensation than of my birth or my death. Neither my birth nor 
my death can appear to me as experiences of my own, since, if I 
thought of them thus, I should be assuming myself to be pre-existent 
to, or outliving, myself, in order to be able to experience them, and I 
should therefore not be genuinely thinking of my birth or my death. 

1 Koehler, Die physischen Gesta\ten y p. 180. 

2 We have pointed out elsewhere that consciousness seen from outside cannot 
be a pure for itself {La Structure du Comporiement, pp. 168 and fT.). We are be- 
ginning to see that the same applies to consciousness seen from the inside. 

215 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

I can, then, apprehend myself only as 'already born* and 'still alive* — 
I can apprehend my birth and my death only as prepersonal horizons : 
I know that people are born and die, but I cannot know my own birth 
and death. Each sensation, being strictly speaking, the first, last and 
only one of its kind, is a birth and a death. The subject who experi- 
ences it begins and ends with it, and as he can neither precede nor 
survive himself, sensation necessarily appears to itself in a setting of 
generality, its origin is anterior to myself, it arises from sensibility 
which has preceded it and which will outlive it, just as my birth and 
death belong to a natality and a mortality which are anonymous. By 
means of sensation I am able to grasp, on the fringe of my own 
personal life and acts, a life of given consciousness from which these 
latter emerge, the life of my eyes, hands and ears, which are'so many 
natural selves. Each time I experience a sensation, I feel that it con- 
cerns not my own being, the one for which I am responsible and for 
which I make decisions, but another self which has already sided 
with the world, which is already open to certain of its aspects and 
synchronized with them. Between my sensation and myself there 
stands always the thickness of some primal acquisition which pre- 
vents my experience from being clear of itself. I experience the sensa- 
tion as a modality of a general existence, one already destined for a 
physical world and which runs through me without my being the 
cause of it. 

(2) Sensation can be anonymous only because it is incomplete. 
The person who sees and the one who touches is not exactly myself, 
because the visible and the tangible worlds are not the world in its 
entirety. When I see an object, I always feel that there is a portion of 
being beyond what I see at this moment, not only as regards visible 
being, but also as regards what is tangible or audible. And not only 
sensible being, but a depth of the object that no progressive sensory 
deduction will ever exhaust. In a corresponding way, I am not myself 
wholly in these operations, they remain marginal. They occur out in 
front of me, for the self which sees or the self which hears is in some 
way a specialized self, familiar with only one sector of being, and it is 
precisely for this reason that eye and hand are able to guess the 
movement which will fix the perception, thus displaying that fore- 
knowledge which gives them an involuntary appearance. 

We may summarize these two ideas by saying that any sensation 
belongs to a certain field. To say that I have a visual field isto say 
that by reason of my position I have access to and an opening upon 
a system of beings, visible beings, that these are at the disposal of my 
gaze in virtue of a kind of primordial contract and through a gift of 
nature, with no effort made on my part; from which it follows that 
vision is prepersonal. And it follows at the same time that it is always 

216 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 

limited, that around what I am looking at at a given moment is spread 
a horizon of things which are not seen, or which are even invisible. 
Vision is a thought subordinated to a certain field, and this is what is 
called a sense. When I say that I have senses and that they give me 
access to the world, I am not the victim of some muddle, I do not 
confuse causal thinking and reflection, I merely express this truth 
which forces itself upon reflection taken as a whole: that I am able, 
being connatural with the world, to discover a sense in certain 
aspects of being without having myself endowed them with it through 
any constituting operation. 

The distinction between the different senses finds its justification 
along with that between the senses and intellection. Intellectualism 
does not talk about the senses because for it sensations and senses 
appear only when I turn back to the concrete act of knowledge in 
order to analyse it. I then distinguish in it a contingent matter and a 
necessary form, but matter is an unreal phase and not a separable 
element of the total act. Therefore there are not the senses, but only 
consciousness. For example, intellectualism declines to state the 
notorious problem of the contribution of the senses to the experience 
of space, because sensible qualities and the senses, as materials of 
knowledge, cannot possess space in their own right, for it is the form 
of objectivity in general, and in particular the means whereby any 
consciousness of quality becomes possible. A sensation would be no 
sensation at all if it were not the sensation of something, and 'things' 
in the most general sense of the word, for example specific qualities, 
stand out from the amorphous mass of impressions only if the latter 
is put into perspective and co-ordinated by space. Thus all senses are 
spatial if they are to give us access to some form or other of being, if, 
that is, they are senses at all. And, by the same necessity, they must 
all open on the same space, otherwise the sensory beings with which 
they bring us into communication would exist only for the relevant 
sense — like ghosts which appear only by night — they would lack full- 
ness of being and we could not be truly conscious of them, that is to 
say, posit them as true beings. Empiricism could not find facts to refute 
this deduction. If for example we desire to show that the sense of 
touch is not spatial by itself, if we try, in cases of real or psychic 
blindness, to discover a pure tactile experience, and to prove that its 
articulation owes nothing to space, these experimental proofs pre- 
suppose what they are meant to establish. How are we to know in 
fact whether blindness and psychic blindness have abstracted from 
the patient's experience the merely 'visual data', and whether they 
have not also affected the structure of his tactile experience? Em- 
piricism takes the former hypothesis for granted, which fact alone 
makes it possible for its assumption to be regarded as crucial, but 

217 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

which equally involves postulating the separation of the senses, 
which is precisely what has to be proved. To be more precise: if I 
admit that space belongs primarily to sight and that from sight it is 
transmitted to touch and the other senses, then since there is in the 
adult, to all appearances, a tactile perception of space, I must at least 
concede that the 'pure tactile data' are displaced and overlaid by an 
experience having its source in sight, and that they become integrated 
into a total experience in which they are ultimately indiscernible. But 
then what justification is there for distinguishing, within this adult 
experience, a 'tactile' contribution? Is not the alleged 'purely tactile , 
which I try to extract by investigating blindness, a highly particu- 
larized kind of experience, which has nothing in common with the 
functioning of touch in its wholeness, and which cannot give any 
help in the analysis of integrated experience? No conclusions about 
the spatiality of the senses by the inductive method and by adducing 
'facts' (for example, a sense of touch without space in the case of the 
blind man) can be drawn, for this fact needs to be interpreted, and it 
will indeed be interpreted as a significant fact which brings to light 
the distinctive nature of touch, or as an accidental fact showing the 
peculiar properties of touch when modified by some disorder, 
according to the notion entertained of the senses in general and of 
their relations to each other within total consciousness. The pro- 
blem belongs to the domain of reflection and not to that of experi- 
ment .as the empiricist understands it, which is also as scientists 
understand it when they dream of an absolute objectivity. There 
is therefore reason for holding a priori that all the senses are spatial, 
and the question which is the one which presents us with space must 
be considered unintelligible if we reflect on just what a sense is. Two 
sorts of reflection, however, are possible here. One — intellectualist 
reflection — thematizes the object and consciousness, and, to use a 
Kantian expression, it 'leads them to the concept'. The object then 
becomes what is, and consequently what is for everybody and for 
ever (even if only as a fleeting episode, yet of which it will for ever 
be true to say that it existed at an objective moment of time). Con- 
sciousness, thematized by reflection, is existence for itself. And, with 
the help of this idea of consciousness and this other idea of object, 
it is easily shown that every sensible quality is fully an object only in 
the context of universal relations, and that there can be sensation 
only on condition that it exists for a central and unique /. If we 
wished to call a halt in the reflective process, and talk, for example, 
about a partial consciousness or an isolated object, we should then 
have a consciousness which in some respect did not know itself and 
which would therefore not be consciousness at all, and an object 
which would not be accessible from everywhere, and which to this 

218 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 

extent would not be an object. But we may always inquire of in- 
tellectualism whence it derives this idea or this essence of conscious- 
ness and of the object. If the subject is pure for itself, 'the / think 
must be able to accompany all our representations'. 'If a world must 
be capable of being thought', quality must contain it in embryo. But 
in the first place by what means do we know that there is any pure 
for itself, and where do we learn that the world must be capable of 
being thought? The reply will perhaps be that that is the definition 
of subject and world and that, short of understanding them in this 
way, we no longer know what we are talking about when we speak 
of them. And indeed, at the level of constituted speech, such is in fact 
the significance of world and subject. But from where do the words 
themselves derive their sense? Radical reflection is what takes hold 
of me as I am in the act of forming and formulating the ideas of sub- 
ject and object, and brings to light the source of these two ideas; it is 
reflection, not only in operation, but conscious of itself in operation. 
It will perhaps be replied that analytical reflection does not merely 
grasp subject and object 'as an idea', but that it is an experience, that 
by reflecting I put myself back inside that subject without finite limits, 
that I was before, and put back the object among the relations which 
previously subtended it. Finally that there is no reason to ask whence 
I derive these ideas of subject and object, since they are simply the 
formulation of those conditions without which nothing would exist 
for anybody. But the reflective / differs from the unreflective at least 
in having been thematized, and what is given is not consciousness or 
pure being; it is, as Kant himself profoundly put it, experience, in 
other words the communication of a finite subject with an opaque 
being from which it emerges but to which it remains committed. It 
is 'pure and, in a way, still mute experience which it is a question of 
bringing to the pure expression of its own significance'. 1 We have the 
experience of a world, not understood as a system of relations which 
wholly determine each event, but as an open totality the synthesis of 
which is inexhaustible. We have the experience of an / not in the 
sense of an absolute subjectivity, but indivisibly demolished and re- 
made by the course of time. The unity of either the subject or the 
object is not a real unity, but a presumptive unity on the horizon of 
experience. We must rediscover, as anterior to the ideas of subject 
and object, the fact of my subjectivity and the nascent object, that 
primordial layer at which both things and ideas come into being. 
As far as consciousness is concerned, I can arrive at a notion of it 
only by taking myself back in the first place to that consciousness 
which I am. I must be particularly careful not to begin by defining 
the senses; I must instead resume contact with the sensory life which 
1 Husserl, Meditations cartesietmes, p. 33. 
219 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

I live from within. We are not obliged to endow the world a priori 
with those conditions in the absence of which it is unthinkable, for, 
in order to be thought of, it must in the first place not be outside 
knowledge, it must exist for me, that is, be given, and the transcen- 
dental aesthetic would be confused with the transcendental analytic 
only if I were a God who posits the world and not a man who finds 
himself thrown into it, and who, in every sense of the word, 'is 
wrapped up in it\ We do not therefore need to follow Kant in his 
deduction of one single space. The single space is the indispensable 
condition for being able to conceive the plenitude of objectivity, and 
it is quite true that if I try to thematize several spaces, they merge 
into a unity, each one standing in a certain positional relationship 
to the others, and therefore amalgamating with them. But do we 
know whether plenary objectivity can be conceived? Whether all 
perspectives are compossible? Whether they can all be thematized 
together somewhere? Do we know whether tactile and visual ex- 
periences can, strictly speaking, be joined without an intersensory 
experience ? Whether my experience and that of another person can 
be linked in a single system of intersubjective experience ? There may 
well be, either in each sensory experience or in each consciousness, 
'phantoms' which no rational approach can account for. The whole 
Transcendental Deduction hangs on the affirmation of a complete 
system of truth. It is precisely to the sources of this affirmation that 
we must revert if we wish to adopt a reflective method. In this con- 
nection we may hold with Husserl 1 that Hume went, in intention, 
further than anyone in radical reflection, since he genuinely tried 
to take us back to those phenomena of which we have experience, on 
the hither side of any formation of ideas, — even though he went on 
to dissect and emasculate this experience. The idea of a single space 
and a single time, being grounded upon that of a summation of 
being, which is precisely what Kant subjected to criticism in the 
Transcendental Dialectic, needs in particular to be bracketed and to 
produce its genealogy from the starting point of our affective ex- 
perience. This new conception of reflection which is the phenomeno- 
logical conception of it, amounts in other words to giving a new 
definition of the a priori. Kant has already shown that the a priori is 
not knowable in advance of experience, that is, outside our horizon 
of facticity, and that there can be no question of distinguishing two 
elements of knowledge: one a priori and the other a posteriori. In so 
far as the a priori in his philosophy retains the character of what 
must necessarily be, as opposed to what in fact exists and is deter- 
minate in human terms, this is only to the extent that he has not 
followed out his programme, which was to define our cognitive 
1 Formate und Transzcndentale Logik, e.g. p. 226. 
220 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 

powers in terms of our factual condition, and which necessarily com- 
pelled him to set every conceivable being against the background of 
this world. From the moment that experience — that is, the opening 
on to our de facto world— is recognized as the beginning of know- 
ledge, there is no longer any way of distinguishing a level of a priori 
truths and one of factual ones, what the world must necessarily be 
and what it actually is. The unity of the senses, which was regarded 
as an a priori truth, is no longer anything but the formal expression 
of a fundamental contingency: the fact that we are in the world — the 
diversity of the senses, which was regarded as given a posteriori, 
including the concrete form that it assumes in a human subject, 
appears as necessary to this world, to the only world which we can 
think of consequentially; it therefore becomes an a priori truth. 
Every sensation is spatial; we have adopted this thesis, not because 
the quality as an object cannot be thought otherwise than in space, 
but because, as the primordial contact with being, as the assumption 
by the sentient subject of a form of existence to which the sensible 
points, and as the co-existence of sentient and sensible, it is itself 
constitutive of a setting for co-existence, in other words, of a space. 
We say a priori that no sensation is atomic, that all sensory experi- 
ence presupposes a certain field, hence co-existences, from which we 
conclude, against Lachelier, that the blind man has the experience 
of a space. But these a priori truths amount to nothing other than 
the making explicit of a fact: the fact of the sensory experience as the 
assumption of a form of existence. Moreover, this assumption im- 
plies also that I can at each moment absorb myself almost wholly 
into the sense of touch or sight, and even that I can never see or 
touch without my consciousness becoming thereby in some measure 
saturated, and losing something of its availability. Thus the unity 
and the diversity of the senses are truths of the same order. The a 
priori is the fact understood, made explicit, and followed through 
into all the consequences of its latent logic; the a posteriori is the 
isolated and implicit fact. It would be contradictory to assert that 
the sense of touch is devoid of spatiality, and it is a priori impossible 
to touch without touching in space, since our experience is the ex- 
perience of a world. But this insertion of the tactile perspective into 
a universal being does not represent any necessity external to touch, 
it comes about spontaneously in the experience of touching itself, 
in accordance with its own distinctive mode. Sensation as it is brought 
to use by experience is no longer some inert substance or abstract 
moment, but one of our surfaces of contact with being, a structure 
of consciousness, and in place of one single space, as the universal 
condition of all qualities, we have with each one of the latter, a 
particular manner of being in space and, in a sense, of making space. 

221 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



It is neither contradictory nor impossible that each sense should 
constitute a small world within the larger one, and it is even in virtue 
of its peculiarity that it is necessary to the whole and opens upon the 
whole. 

To sum up, once distinctions between the a priori and the em- 
pirical, between form and content, have been done away with, the 
spaces peculiar to the senses become concrete 'moments' of a com- 
prehensive configuration which is the one and only space, and the 
power of going to it is inseparable from that of cutting oneself off 
from it by the sequestration of a sense. When, in the concert hall, I 
open my eyes, visible space seems to me cramped compared to that 
other space through which, a moment ago, the music was being un- 
folded, and even if I keep my eyes open while the piece is being 
played, I have the impression that the music is not really contained 
within this circumscribed and unimpressive space. It brings a new 
dimension stealing through visible space, and in this it surges for- 
ward, just as, in victims of hallucinations, the clear space of things 
perceived is mysteriously duplicated by a 'dark space' in which other 
presences are possible. Like the perspective of other people making 
its impact on the world for me, the spatial realm of each sense is an 
unknowable absolute for the others, and to that extent limits their 
spatiality. These descriptions, which to critical philosophy appear as 
empirical oddities, leaving a priori certainties untouched, assume, as 
far as we are concerned, philosophical importance, because the unity 
of space can be discovered only in the interplay of the sensory 
realms. That is what remains true in the celebrated empiricist de- 
scription of a non-spatial perception. The experience of persons 
blind from birth and operated upon for cataract has never proved, 
and could never prove, that for them space begins with sight. Yet 
the patient never ceases to marvel at this visual space to which he 
has just gained access, and compared to which tactile experience 
seems to him so poor that he is quite prepared to admit that he has 
never enjoyed the experience of space before the operation. 1 The 
patient's amazement, and his hesitant attitude in the new visual 
world into which he is entering, show that the sense of touch is not 
spatial as is sight. 'After the operation/ it is said, 2 'form as given by 

1 One subject declares that the spatial notions that he thought he entertained 
before the operation did not in fact give him a genuine representation of space, 
and were only a species of 'knowledge gained through the workings of thought*. 
(Von Scndcn, Raum-und Gestaltauffassung hei operierten Blindgeborenen vor und 
nach der Operation, p. 23.) The acquisition of sight involves a general reorganiza- 
tion of existence which equally concerns touch. The world's centre is displaced, 
the tactile image is forgotten, recognition through touch is less reliable, the exis- 
tential current henceforth runs through vision, and what the patient is talking 
about is this weakened sense of touch. 2 Ibid., p. 36. 

222 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 



sight is for these patients something quite new which they fail to 
relate to their tactile experience', 'the patient states that he can see, 
but does not know what he sees. ... He never recognizes his hand 
as such, and talks only about a moving, white patch.' 1 To distinguish 
by sight a circle from a rectangle, he has to run his eyes round the 
outline of the figure, as he might with his hand, 2 and he always tends 
to take hold of objects set before his eyes. 3 What conclusion is to be 
drawn from this? that tactile experience is no preparation for the 
perception of space? But unless it were in some way spatial, would 
the subject stretch out his hand towards the object shown to him? 
This gesture presupposes that touch opens on to a setting at least 
analogous to that of visual data. The facts show above all else that 
sight is nothing unless the subject is more or less used to using his 
eyes. Patients 'at first see colours in the way that we smell an odour: 
it closes round us, and acts upon us, without however filling a deter- 
minate form of a determinate extent'. 4 Everything is at first confused 
and apparently in motion. Discrimination between coloured surfaces 
and the correct apprehension of movement do not come until later, 
when the subject has learned 'what it is to see' 5 that is, when he 
directs and shifts his gaze as "a gaze, and no longer as a hand. This 
proves that each organ of sense explores the object in its own way, 
that it is the agent of a certain type of synthesis, but, short of reserv- 
ing the word space, by way of nominal definition, for the visual 
synthesis, we cannot withhold from the sense of touch spatiality in 
the sense of a grasp of co-existences. The very fact that the way is 
paved to true vision through a phase of transition and through a sort 
of touch effected by the eyes would be incomprehensible unless there 
were a quasi-spatial tactile field, into which the first visual percep- 
tions may be inserted. Sight would never communicate directly with 
touch, as it in fact does in the normal adult, if the sense of touch, 
even when artificially isolated, were not so organized as to make co- 
existences possible. Far from ruling out the idea of a tactile space, 
the facts prove on the contrary that there is a space so strictly tactile 
that its articulations do not and never will stand in a relationship of 
synonymity with those of visual space. Empiricist analyses present, 
in a confused form, a genuine problem. The fact, for example, that 
touch cannot simultaneously cover more than a small amount of 
space — that of the body and its instruments — does not affect merely 
the presentation of tactile space, but also changes its significance. 
For the intelligence — or at least for a certain intelligence which is 

1 Von Senden, Raum- und Gestaltauffassung bei operierten Blindgeborenen 
vor und nach der Operation, p. 93. 
a Ibid., pp. 102-4. 3 Ibid., p. 124. 

4 Ibid., p. 113. 6 Ibid., p. 123. 

223 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

that of classical physics — simultaneity is the same, whether it occurs 
between two adjacent points or two remote ones, and in any case it is 
possible gradually to construct with short-distance simultaneities a 
long-distance one. But for experience, the thickness of time which 
thus intrudes into the operation affects the result, producing a certain 
blurring' in the simultaneity of the extreme points, and to this extent 
the breadth of visual perspectives will be a true revelation to the 
patient whose blindness has been cured by operation, because it pro- 
vides a demonstration, for the first time, of remote simultaneity 
itself. These patients declare that tactile objects are not genuine 
spatial totalities, that the apprehension of the object is here a mere 
'knowledge of the mutual relation of parts', that the circle and the 
square are not really perceived by touch, but recognized from certain 
'signs' — the presence or absence of Corners'. 1 We conclude that the 
tactile field has never the fullness of the visual, that the tactile object 
is never wholly present in each of its parts as is the case with the 
visual object, and in short that touching is not seeing. It is true that 
the blind and the normal person talk to each other, and that it is 
perhaps impossible to find a single word, even in colour vocabulary, 
to which the blind man does not manage to attach at least a rough 
meaning. One blind boy of twelve gives a very good definition of the 
dimensions of sight: Those who can see,* he Says, 'are related to me 
through some unknown sense which completely envelops me from a 
distance, follows me, goes through me, and, from the time I get up 
to the time I go to bed, holds me in some way in subjection to it' (mich 
gewissermassen beherrscht). 2 But such indications remain theoretical 
and problematic for the blind person. They ask a question to which 
only sight could provide an answer. And this is why the blind person, 
having undergone his operation, finds the world different from what 
he expected, 3 as we always find a man different from what we have 
heard about him. The blind man's world differs from the normal 
person's not only through the quantity of material at his disposal, 
but also through the structure of the whole. A blind man knows quite 
precisely through his sense of touch what branches and leaves, or an 
arm and fingers, are. After the operation he marvels that there should 
be 'such a difference' between a tree and a human body. 4 It is clear 
that sight has not only added fresh details to his knowledge of the 
tree. What we are dealing with is a mode of presentation and a type 
of synthesis which are new and which transfigure the object. If we 
take as an example the structure light-illuminated object' we shall find 
only somewhat vague analogies in the realms of touch. This is why a 

1 Von Senden, Raum- und Gestaltauffassung bei operierten Blindgeborenen vor 
und nach der Operation, p. 29. 

2 Ibid., p. 45. 3 Ibid. 4 Ibid., pp. 50 and ff. 

224 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 

patient operated upon after being blind for eighteen years tries to 
touch a ray of sunlight. 1 The whole significance of our life — from 
which theoretical significance is merely extracted — would be differ- 
ent if we were sightless. There is a general function of substitution and 
replacement which enables us to gain access to the abstract significance 
of experiences which we have not actually had, for example, to speak 
of what we have not seen. But just as in the organism the renewed 
functions are never the exact equivalent of the damaged ones, and 
give only an appearance of total restitution, the intelligence ensures 
no more than an apparent communication between different experi- 
ences, and the synthesis of visual and tactile worlds in the person 
bora blind and operated upon, the constitution of an intersensory 
world must be effected in the domain of sense itself, the community 
of significance between the two experiences being inadequate to 
ensure their union in one single experience. The senses are distinct 
from each other and distinct from intellection in so far as each one 
of them brings with it a structure of being which can never be exactly 
transposed. We can recognize this because we have rejected any formal- 
ism of consciousness, and made the body the subject of perception. 

And we can recognize it without any threat to the unity of the 
senses. For the senses communicate with each other. Music is not 
in visible space, but it besieges, undermines and displaces that space, 
so that soon these overdressed listeners who take on a judicial air 
and exchange remarks or smiles, unaware that the floor is trembling 
beneath their feet, are like a ship's crew buffeted about on the surface 
of a tempestuous sea. The two spaces are distinguishable only against 
the background of a common world, and can compete with each 
other only because they both lay claim to total being. They are united 
at the very instant in which they clash. If I try to shut myself up in 
one of my senses and, for instance, project myself wholly into my 
eyes, and abandon myself to the blue of the sky, soon I am unaware 
that I am gazing and, just as I strive to make myself sight and nothing 
but sight, the sky stops being a 'visual perception', to become my 
world of the moment. Sensory experience is unstable, and alien to 
natural perception, which we achieve with our whole body all at 
once, and which opens on a world of inter-acting senses. Like that 
of the sensible quality, the experience of the separate 'senses' is 
gained only when one assumes a highly particularized attitude, and 
this cannot be of any assistance to the analysis of direct conscious- 
ness. I am sitting in my room, and I look at the sheets of white paper 
lying about on the table, some in the light shed through the window, 
others in the shadow. If I do not analyse my perception but content 

1 Von Senden, Raum- and Gestaltauffassung bei operierten Blindgeborenen 
vor und nach der Operation, p. 1 86. 

225 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

myself with the spectacle as a whole, I shall say that all the sheets of 
paper look equally white. However, some of them are in the shadow 
of the wall. How is it that they are not less white than the rest? I 
decide to look more closely. I fix my gaze upon them, which means 
that I restrict my visual field. I may even look at them through a 
match-box lid, which will separate them from the rest of the field, or 
through a 'reduction screen' with a window in it. Whether I use one 
of these devices or merely observe with the naked eye, provided that 
in the latter case I assume the 'analytic attitude', 1 the sheets change 
their appearance: this is no longer white paper over which a shadow 
is cast, but a grey or steely blue substance, thick and not definitely 
localized. If I once more look at the general picture, I notice that the 
sheets over which a shadow is thrown were at no time identical with 
the sheets lying in the light, nor yet were they objectively different 
from them. The whiteness of the shaded paper does not lend itself 
to precise classification within the black-white range. 2 It appeared 
as no definite quality, and I have brought out the quality by fixing 
my eyes on a portion of the visual field: then and then only have I 
found myself before a certain quale which absorbs my gaze. Now 
what actually is fixing one's gaze? From the point of view of the 
object, it is separating the region under scrutiny from the rest of the 
field, it is interrupting the total life of the spectacle, which assigned 
to each visible surface a determinate coloration, taking the light into 
account; from the subject's point of view, it is substituting for the 
comprehensive vision, in which our gaze lends itself to the whole 
spectacle and is permeated by it, an observation, that is, a localized 
vision which it controls according to its own requirements. The 
sensible quality, far from being co-extensive with perception, is the 
peculiar product of an attitude of curiosity or observation. It appears 
when, instead of yielding up the whole of my gaze to the world, I 
turn towards this gaze itself, and when I ask myself what precisely it 
is that I see; it does not occur in the natural transactions between my 
sight and the world, it is the reply to a certain kind of questioning on 
the part of my gaze, the outcome of a second order or critical vision 
which tries to know itself in its own particularity, of an 'attention to 
the pure visual', 3 which I exercise either when I am afraid of being 
mistaken, or when I want to undertake a scientific study of the 
spectacle presented. This attitude does away with the spectacle 
properly speaking: the colours which I see through the reduction 
screen or those obtained by the painter when he half-closes his eyes 
are no longer object-colours — the colour of the walls or the colour 

1 Gclb, Die Farbenkonstanz der Sehdinge, p. 600. 
8 Ibid., p. 613. 

3 Einstellung auf reine Optik, Kaiz quoted by Gclb, op. cit., p. 600. 

226 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 

of the paper — but coloured areas having a certain density, and all 
rather vaguely localized in the same unreal plane. 1 Thus there is a 
natural attitude of vision in which I make common cause with my 
gaze and, through it, surrender myself to the spectacle: in this case 
the parts of the field are linked in an organization which makes them 
recognizable and identifiable. The quality, the separate sensory 
impact occurs when I break this total structuralization of my vision, 
when I cease to adhere to my own gaze, and when, instead of living 
the vision, I question myself about it, I want to try out my possi- 
bilities, I break the link between my vision and the world, between 
myself and my vision, in order to catch and describe it. When I have 
taken up this attitude, at the same time as the world is atomized into 
sensible qualities, the natural unity of the perceiving subject is 
broken up, and I reach the stage of being unaware of myself as the 
subject of a visual field. Now just as, within each sense, we must find 
the natural unity which it offers, we shall reveal a 'primary layer' of 
sense experience which precedes its division among the separate 
senses. 2 According as I fix my eyes on an object or allow them to 
wander, or else wholly submit myself to the event, the same colour 
appears to me as superficial {Oberfldchenfarbe) — being in a definite 
location in space, and extending over an object — or else it becomes 
an atmospheric colour (Raumfarbe) and diffuses itself all round the 
object. Or I may feel it in my eye as a vibration of my gaze; or finally 
it may pass on to my body a similar manner of being, fully pervading 
me, so that it is no longer entitled to be called a colour. Similarly 
there is an objective sound which reverberates outside me in the 
instrument, an atmospheric sound which is between the object and 
my body, a sound which vibrates in me 'as if I had become the flute 
or the clock'; and finally a last stage in which the acoustic element 
disappears and becomes the highly precise experience of a change 
permeating my whole body. 3 The sensory experience has only a 
narrow margin at its disposal: either the sound and the colour, 
through their own arrangement, throw an object into relief, such as an 
ashtray or a violin, and this object speaks directly to all the senses; 
or else, at the opposite end of experience, the sound and the colour 
are received into my body, and it becomes difficult to limit my ex- 
perience to a single sensory department: it spontaneously overflows 
towards all the rest. The sensory experience, at the third stage just 
described, is distinguished only by an 'accent' which is indicative 
rather of the direction of the sound or the colour. 4 At this level, the 

1 Einstellung auf reine Optik, Katz quoted by Gelb, op. cit., p. 600. 

2 Werner, Untersuchungen iiber Empfindung und Empfinden, I, p. 1 55. 

3 Ibid., p. 157. 

4 Ibid., p. 162. 

227 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

ambiguity of experience is such that an audible rhythm causes cine- 
matograph pictures to run together and produces a perception of 
movement whereas, without auditory support, the same succession 
of images would be too slow to give rise to stroboscopic movement. 1 
The sounds modify the consecutive images of the colours: a louder 
note intensifies them, the interruption of the sound produces a waver- 
ing effect in them, and a low note makes blue darker or deeper. 2 
The constancy hypothesis, 3 which allows to each stimulus one sensa- 
tion and one only, is progressively less verifiable as natural percep- 
tion is approached. 'It is in so far as conduct is intellectual and im- 
partial (sachlicher) that the constancy hypothesis becomes accep- 
table as regards the relation of stimulus to specific sensory response, 
and that the auditory stimulus, for instance, is limited to its specific 
sphere, in this case the acoustic one.' 4 The influence of mescalin, by 
weakening the attitude of impartiality and surrendering the subject 
to his vitality, should therefore favour forms of synaesthetic experi- 
ence. And indeed, under mescalin, the sound of a flute gives a bluish- 
green colour, the tick of a metronome, in darkness, is translated as 
grey patches, the spatial intervals between them corresponding to the 
intervals of time between the ticks, the size of the patch to the loud- 
ness of the tick, and its height to the pitch of the sound. 5 A subject 
under mescalin finds a piece of iron, strikes the window-sill with it 
and exclaims: This is magic 1 ; the trees are growing greener. 6 The 
barking of a dog is found to attract light in an indescribable way, and 
is re-echoed in the right foot. 7 It is as if one could sometimes see 'the 
occasional collapse of the barriers established, in the course of evolu- 
tion, between the senses. 8 Seen in the perspective of the objective 
world, with its opaque qualities, and the objective body with its 
separate organs, the phenomenon of synaesthetic experience is para- 
doxical. The attempt is therefore made to explain it independently 
of the concept of sensation: it is thought necessary, for example, to 
suppose that the excitations ordinarily restricted to one region of the 
brain — the optical or auditory zone — become capable of playing a 
part outside these limits, and that in this way a specific quality is 
associated with a non-specific one. Whether or not this explanation 

1 Zietz and Werner, Die dynamische Struktur der Bewegung. 

2 Werner, op. cit., p. 163. 

3 Cf. above. Introduction, section I. 

4 Werner, op. cit., p. i 54. 

* Stein, Pathologie der Wahrnemung, p. 422. 

• Mayer-Gross and Stein, Ober einige Abanderungcn der Sinnestatigkeit im 
Meskalinrausch, p. 385. 

7 Ibid. 

8 Ibid. 

228 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 



is supported by arguments drawn from brain physiology, 1 this ex- 
planation does not account for synaesthetic experience, which thus 
becomes one more occasion for questioning the concept of sensation 
and objective thought. For the subject does not say only that he has the 
sensation both of a sound and a colour: it is the sound itself that he sees 
where colours are formed. 2 This formulation is literally meaningless 
if vision is defined by the visual quale, and the sound by the acoustic 
quale. But it rests with us to word our definition in such a way as to 
provide it with a meaning, since the sight of sounds and the hearing 
of colours exist as phenomena. Nor are these even exceptional 
phenomena. Synaesthetic perception is the rule, and we are unaware 
of it only because scientific knowledge shifts the centre of gravity of 
experience, so that we have unlearned how to see, hear, and generally 
speaking, feel, in order to deduce, from our bodily organization and 
the world as the physicist conceives it, what we are to see, hear and 
feel. 

Sight, it is said, can bring us only colours or lights, and with them 
forms which are the outlines of colours, and movements which are 
the patches of colour changing position. But how shall we place 
transparency or 'muddy 1 colours in the scale? In reality, each colour, 
in its inmost depths, is nothing but the inner structure of the thing 
overtly revealed. The brilliance of gold palpably holds out to us its 
homogeneous composition, and the dull colour of wood its hetero- 
geneous make-up. 3 The senses intercommunicate by opening on to 
the structure of the thing. One sees the hardness and brittleness of 
glass, and when, with a tinkling sound, it breaks, this sound is con- 
veyed by the visible glass. 4 One sees the springiness of steel, the duc- 
tility of red-hot steel, the hardness of a plane blade, the softness of 
shavings. The form of objects is not their geometrical shape: it 
stands in a certain relation to their specific nature, and appeals to all 
our other senses as well as sight. The form of a fold in linen or cotton 
shows us the resilience or dryness of the fibre, the coldness or warmth 
of the material. Furthermore, the movement of visible objects is not 
the mere transference from place to place of coloured patches which, 

1 It is for example possible that under mescalin a modification of the chronaxies 
might be observable. This fact would in no way count as an explanation of syn- 
aesthesia in terms of the objective body, if, as we shall show, the juxtaposition of 
several sensible qualities fails to make clear to us perceptual ambivalence as it is 
presented to us in synaesthetic experience. The change in the chronaxies could 
not be the cause of synaesthesia, but the objective expression or sign of a more 
profound and all-embracing event, which has no seat in the objective body, but 
which is relevant to the phenomenal body as a vehicle of being in the world. 

1 Werner, op. cit., p. 163. 

8 Schapp, Beitrcige zur Phanomenologie der Wahrnehmung, pp. 23 and ff. 
Mbid., p. 11. 

229 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

in the visual field, correspond to those objects. In the jerk of the 
twig from which a bird has just flown, we read its flexibility or elas- 
ticity, and it is thus that a branch of an apple-tree or a birch are im- 
mediately distinguishable. One sees the weight of a block of cast iron 
which sinks in the sand, the fluidity of water and the viscosity of 
syrup. 1 In the same way, I hear the hardness and unevenness of 
cobbles in the rattle of a carriage, and wc speak appropriately of a 
'soft', 'dull' or 'sharp' sound. Though one may doubt whether the 
sense of hearing brings us genuine 'things', it is at least certain that it 
presents us, beyond the sounds in space, with something which 
'murmurs', and in this way communicates with the other senses. 2 
Finally, if, with my eyes closed, I bend a steel bar and a lime branch, 
I perceive in my hands the most essential texture of the metal and the 
wood. If, then, taken as incomparable qualities, the 'data of the 
different senses' belong to so many separate worlds, each one in its 
particular essence being a manner of modulating the thing, they all 
communicate through their significant core. 

We must, however, give a clearer account of the nature of sensible 
significance, otherwise we shall merely slip back into the inteilec- 
tualist analysis which we rejected earlier. The table which I touch is 
the same one as the table which I see. But must one go on to say, as 
lias in fact been said : the sonata which I hear is the same one as Helen 
Keller touches, and the man I sec is the same one as the blind painter 
paints? 3 Gradually we should come to find that there was no longer 
any difference between the perceptual and the intellectual syntheses. 
The unity of the senses would then be of the same order as the unity 
of the objects of science. When I both touch and look at an object, 
it would be said, the single object is the common ground of these two 
appearances as Venus is the common ground of the Morning Star 
and the Evening Star, and so perception would be an incipient 
science. 4 Now, though perception brings together our sensory ex- 
periences into a single world, it does not do so in the way that 
scientific colligation gathers together objects or phenomena, but in 
the way that binocular vision grasps one sole object. Let us describe 
carefully this 'synthesis'. When my gaze is fixed on a remote thing, 
I have a double image of objects nearby. When I transfer my gaze to 
the latter, I see the two images converge on what is to be the single 
object, and merge into it. We must not at this point say that the 
synthesis consists in thinking of them together as images of one 

1 Schapp, Beitrdge zur Phdnorncnologie der Wahrnehmung y pp. 21 and fT. 

2 Ibid., pp. 32-3. 

3 Specht, Zur Phdnorncnologie unci Morphologic der pathohgischen Wahmehm- 
ungstduschungen, p. 1 1 . 

* Alain, SJ Chapitres stir V Esprit ct ies Passions, p. 38. 

230 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 



single object ; if we were dealing with a mental act or an apperception, 
this ought to occur as soon as I notice the identity of the two images, 
whereas I have to wait much longer for the unity of the object to 
appear: until the moment when correct focusing does away with 
them. The single object is not a certain way of thinking of the two 
images, since they cease to be given the moment it appears. Has the 
'fusion of images' been effected, then, by some innate device of the 
nervous system, and do we mean that finally we have, if not on the 
periphery, at least at the centre, a single excitation mediated by the 
two eyes? But the mere existence of one visual centre cannot explain 
the single object, since double vision sometimes occurs, as moreover 
the mere existence of two retinas cannot explain double vision, since 
it is not a constant phenomenon. 1 If double vision as well as the 
single object can be included in normal vision, this is not attributable 
to the anatomical lay-out of the visual apparatus, but to its function- 
ing and to the use which the psychosomatic subject makes of it. 
Shall we thea say that double sight occurs because our eyes do not 
converge on the object, and because it throws non-symmetrical 
images on our two retinas? And that these two images merge into 
one because fixation brings them back to corresponding points on the 
two retinas? But are divergence and convergence of the eyes the cause 
or the effect of double and normal vision? In the case of people born 
blind and operated on for cataract, it is impossible to say, during the 
period following the operation, whether it is non-co-ordination of the 
eyes which hampers vision, or whether it is the confusion in the visual 
field which favours non-co-ordination — whether they fail to see 
through failure to focus, or whether they fail to focus through not 
having anything to see. When I focus on the remote distance and, for 
example, one of my fingers held near my eyes throws its image on 
non-symmetrical points on my retinas, the arrangement of images on 
the retinas cannot be the cause of the action of focusing which will 
put an end to the double vision. For, as has been pointed out, 2 the 
disappearance of images does not exist in itself. My finger forms its 
image on a certain area of my left retina, and on an area of my 
right retina which is not symmetrical with the former. But the sym- 
metrical area of the right retina is also full of visual excitations, the 
distribution of stimuli on the two retinas is 'dissymmetrical' only to a 
subject who compares the two groupings and identifies them. On the 

1 'The convergence of the conductors as it exists does not condition the non- 
distinction of images in simple binocular vision, since a rivalry between the mon- 
ocular visions can take place, and the separation of the retinas does not account 
for their distinction when it occurs, since, normally, when nothing varies in 
receptor and conductors, this distinction is not made/ R. Dejean, Etude 
psychologique de la distance dans la vision, p. 74. 

1 KoflTka, Some Problems of Space Perception, p. 179. 

231 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

retinas themselves, considered as objects, there are only two group- 
ings of stimuli that cannot be compared. It will perhaps be replied 
that, unless the eyes are focused, these two groupings cannot be 
superimposed on each other, nor give rise to the vision of anything, 
and that in this sense their presence alone creates a state of un- 
balance. But this is admitting what we are trying to show: that the 
sight of one single object is not a simple outcome of focusing the eyes, 
that it is anticipated in the very act of focusing, or that, as has been 
stated, the focusing of the gaze is a 'prospective activity'. 1 For my 
gaze to alight on near objects and to focus my eyes on them, it must 
experience double vision as an unbalance 2 or as an imperfect vision, 
and tend towards the single object as towards the release of tension 
and the completion of vision. 'It is necessary to "look" in order to 
see.' 3 The unity of the object in binocular vision is not, therefore, the 
result of some third person process which eventually produces a 
single image through the fusion of two monocular images. When we 
go from diplopia to normal vision, the single object replaces the two 
images, one is clearly not superimposed on the other: it is not of 
the same order as they, but is incomparably more substantial. The 
/ two images of diplopia are not amalgamated into one single one in 
binocular vision; the unity of the object is intentional. But — and 
this is the point we are trying to make — it is not therefore a notional 
unity. We pass from double vision to the single object, not through 
an inspection of the mind, but when the two eyes cease to function 
each on its own account and are used as a single organ by one single 
gaze. It is not the epistemological subject who brings about the syn- 
thesis, but the body, when it escapes from dispersion, pulls itself 
together and tends by all means in its power towards one single goal 
of its activity, and when one single intention is formed in it through 
the phenomenon of synergy. We withdraw this synthesis from the 
objective body only to transfer it to the phenomenal body, the body, 
that is, in so far as it projects a certain 'setting' round itself, 4 in so 
far as its 'parts' are dynamically acquainted with each other, and its 

1 R. Dejean, op. cit., pp. 1 10-1 1. The author says: 'a prospective activity of the 
mind\ and on this point it will be seen that we do not follow him. 

1 It is known that Gestalt psychology bases this orientated process on some 
physical phenomenon in the 'combination zone'. We have said elsewhere that it 
is contradictory to recall the psychologist to the variety of phenomena or struc- 
tures, and to explain them all in terms of some of their number, in this case 
physical forms. The focus as a temporal form is not a physical or physiological 
fact for the simple reason that all the forms belong to the phenomenal world. 
Cf. on this point La Structure du Comportement, pp. 175 and fT., 191 and fT. 

• R. Dejean, ibid. 

4 In so far as there is an 'UmweltintentionalitaY, Buylendijk and Plessner, 
Die Deutung des mimischen Ausdrucks, p. 81. 

232 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 

receptors are so arranged as to make possible, through their synergy, 
the perception of the object. What is meant by saying that this in- 
tentionally is not a thought is that it does not come into being 
through the transparency of any consciousness, but takes for 
granted all the latent knowledge of itself that my body possesses. 
Being supported by the prelogical unity of the body image, the per- 
ceptual synthesis no more holds the secret of the object than it does 
that of one's own body, and this is why the perceived object always 
presents itself as transcendent, and why the synthesis seems to be 
effected on the object itself, in the world, and not at that metaphysical 
point occupied by the thinking subject. Herein lies the distinction 
between the perceptual synthesis and the intellectual. On passing 
from double to normal vision, I am not simply aware of seeing with 
my two eyes the same object, I am aware of progressing towards the 
object itself and finally enjoying its concrete presence. Monocular 
images float vaguely in front of things, having no real place in the 
world; then suddenly they fall back towards a certain location in 
the world and are swallowed up in it, as ghosts, at daybreak, repair 
to the rift in the earth which let them forth. The binocular object, in 
which the synthesis occurs, absorbs the monocular images, which, in 
this new light, finally recognize themselves as appearances of that 
object. My set of experiences is presented as a concordant whole, and 
the synthesis takes place not in so far as they all express a certain 
invariant, and in the identity of the object, but in that they are all 
collected together, by the last of their number, in the ipseity of the 
thing. The ipseity is, of course, never reached: each aspect of the 
thing which falls to our perception is still only an invitation to per- 
ceive beyond it, still only a momentary halt in the perceptual process. 
If the thing itself were reached, it would be from that moment 
arrayed before us and stripped of its mystery. It would cease to exist 
as a thing at the very moment when we thought to possess it. What 
makes the 'reality' of the thing is therefore precisely what snatches 
it from our grasp. The aseity of the thing, its unchallengeable presence 
and the perpetual absence into which it withdraws, are two insepar- 
able aspects of transcendence. Intellectualism overlooks both, and if 
we want to account for the thing as the transcendent terminus of an 
open series of experiences, we must provide the subject of percep- 
tion with the unity of the body image, which is itself open and 
limitless. That is what we learn from the synthesis of binocular 
vision. 

Let us apply it to the problem of the unity of the senses. It cannot 
be understood in terms of their subsumption under a primary con- 
sciousness, but of their never-ending integration into one knowing 
organism. The intersensory object is to the visual object what the 

233 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

visual object is to the monocular images of double vision, 1 and the 
senses interact in perception as the two eyes collaborate in vision. 
The sight of sounds or the hearing of colours come about in the same 
way as the unity of the gaze through the two eyes : in so far as my 
body is, not a collection of adjacent organs, but a synergic system, 
all the functions of which are exercised and linked together in the 
general action of being in the world, in so far as it is the congealed 
face of existence. There is a sense in saying that I see sounds or hear 
colours so long as sight or hearing is not the mere possession of an 
opaque quale, but the experience of a modality of existence, the syn- 
chronisation of my body with it, and the problem of forms of syn- 
aesthetic experience begins to look like being solved if the experience 
of quality is that of a certain mode of movement or of a form of 
conduct. When I say that I see a sound, I mean that I echo the vibra- 
tion of the sound with my whole sensory being, and particularly with 
that sector of myself which is susceptible to colours. Movement, 
understood not as objective movement and transference in space, but 
as a project towards movement or 'potential movement' 2 forms the 
basis for the unity of the senses. It is fairly well known that the talking 
film not only adds & sound accompaniment to the show, but also 
changes the tenor of the show itself. When I go to see a film 'dubbed' 
in French, I do not merely notice the discrepancy between word and 
image, I suddenly have the impression that something else is being 
said over there. The 'dubbed' text, though it fills the auditorium and 
my ears, has not even an auditory existence for me, and I have ears 
for nothing but those other soundless words that emanate from the 
screen. When a breakdown of sound all at once cuts off the voice 
from a character who nevertheless goes on gesticulating on the screen, 
not only does the meaning of his speech suddenly escape me : the 
spectacle itself is changed. The face which was so recently alive 
thickens and freezes, and looks nonplussed, while the interruption 
of the sound invades the screen as a quasi-stupor. For the spectator, 
the gestures and words are not subsumed under some ideal signi- 
ficance, the words take up the gesture and the gesture the words, and 

1 It is true that the senses should not be put on the same basis, as if they were 
all equally capable of objectivity and accessible to intentionality. Experience does 
not present them to us as equivalent: I think that visual experience is truer than 
tactile experience, that it garners within itself its own truth and adds to it, because 
its richer structure offers me modalities of being unsuspected by touch. The unity 
of the senses is achieved transversally, according to their own structure. But 
something like it is found in binocular vision, if it is true that we have a 'directing 
eye* which brings the other under its control. These two facts — the taking over of 
sensory experiences in general in visual experience, and that of the functions of 
one eye by the other — prove that the unity of experience is not a formal unity, 
but a primary organization. 

1 Palagyi, Stein. 

234 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 



they inter-communicate through the medium of my body. Like the 
sensory aspects of my body they are immediately and mutually sym- 
bolical, precisely because my body is a ready-made system of equiva- 
lents and transpositions from one sense to another. The senses trans- 
late each other without any need of an interpreter, and are mutually 
comprehensible without the intervention of any idea. These remarks 
enable us to appreciate to the full Herder's words: 'Man is a per- 
manent sensorium commune, who is affected now from one quarter, 
now from another.' 1 With the notion of the body image we find that 
not only is the unity of the body described in a new way, but also, 
through this, the unity of the senses and of the object. My body is 
the seat or rather the very actuality of the phenomenon of expression 
(Ausdruck), and there the visual and auditory experiences, for ex- 
ample, are pregnant one with the other, and their expressive value is 
the ground of the antepredicative unity of the perceived world, and, 
through it, of verbal expression {Darstellung) and intellectual signi- 
cance (Bedeutung). 2 My body is the fabric into which all objects are 
woven, and it is, at least in relation to the perceived world, the general 
instrument of my 'comprehension'. 

It is my body which gives significance not only to the natural 
object, but also to cultural objects like words. If a word is shown 
to a subject for too short a time for him to be able to read it, the 
word 'warm', for example, induces a kind of experience of warmth 
which surrounds him with something in the nature of a meaningful 
halo. 3 The word 'hard' 4 produces a sort of stiffening of the back and 
neck, and only in a secondary way does it project itself into the visual 
or auditory field and assume the appearance of a sign or a word. 
Before becoming the symbol of a concept it is first of all an event 
which grips my body, and this grip circumscribes the area of signi- 
ficance to which it has reference. One subject states that on presenta- 
tion of the world 'damp' (feucht), he experiences, in addition to a 
feeling of dampness and coldness, a whole rearrangement of the body 
image, as if the inside of the body came to the periphery, and as if the 
reality of the body, until then concentrated into his arms and legs, 
were in search of a new balance of its parts. The word is then indis- 
tinguishable from the attitude which it induces, and it is only when 
its presence is prolonged that it appears in the guise of an external 
image, and its meaning as a thought. Words have a physiognomy 
because we adopt towards them, as towards each person, a certain 

1 Quoted by Werner, op. cit., p. 152. 

2 The distinction between Ausdruck, Darstellung and Bedeutung is made by 
Cassirer, Philosophic der symbolischen Formen, 10. 

3 Werner, op. cit., pp. 160 and ff. 
* German 'hart*. 

235 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

form of behaviour which makes its complete appearance the moment 
each word is given. 'I try to grasp the word rot (red) in its living ex- 
pression; but at first it is no more than peripheral for me, no more 
than a sign along with the knowledge of its meaning. It is not red 
itself. But suddenly I notice that the word pushes its way through my 
body. I have the feeling, difficult to describe, of a kind of numbed 
fullness which invades my body, and which at the same time imparts 
to my mouth cavity a spherical shape. And, precisely at that moment, 
I notice that the word on the paper takes on its expressive value, it 
comes to meet me in a dark red halo, while the letter o intuitively 
presents me with that spherical cavity which I previously felt in my 
mouth/ 1 What is particularly brought out by the word's behaviour 
here is its indissoluble identity with something said, heard and seen. 
The word as read is not a geometrical structure in a segment of 
visual space, it is the presentation of a form of behaviour and of a 
linguistic act in its dynamic fullness.' 2 Whether it is a question of 
perceiving words or more generally objects, 'there is a certain bodily 
attitude, a specific kind of dynamic tension which is necessary to 
give structure to the image; man, as a dynamic and living totality 
has to "pattern" himself in order to trace out a figure in his visual 
field as part of the psychosomatic organism'. 3 In short, my body is 
not only an object among all other objects, a nexus of sensible quali- 
ties among others, but an object which is sensitive to all the rest, 
which reverberates to all sounds, vibrates to all colours, and provides 
words with their primordial significance through the way in which it 
receives them. It is not a matter of reducing the significance of the 
word 'warm' to sensations of warmth by empiricist standards. For the 
warmth which I feel when I read the word 'warm' is not an actual 
warmth. It is simply my body which prepares itself for heat and 
which, so to speak, roughs out its outline. In the same way, when a 
part of my body is mentioned to me, or when I represent it to myself, 
I experience in the corresponding part a quasi-sensation of contact 
which is merely the emergence of that part of my body into the total 
body image. We are not, then reducing the significance of the word, 

1 Werner, Untersuchung iiber Empfindung unci Empfinden, J I, Die Rolle der 
Sprachempfindung im Prozess der Gestaltimg ausdrucksmiissig erlebter \Vorter y p. 
238. 

2 Ibid., p. 239. What has been said of the word is even truer of the sentence. 
Before even having read through the sentence, we can say that it is 'journalese' 
(ibid., pp. 251-3). We can understand a phrase or at least give it a certain meaning 
by going from the whole to the parts. Not, as Bergson s:ys, because we evolve a 
'hypothesis' on the strength of the first words, but because we have an organ of 
language which takes on the linguistic shape of what is set before it, as our organs 
of sense are given a direction by the stimulus and are synchronized with it. 

3 Ibid., p. 230. 

236 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 



or even of the percept, to a collection of 'bodily sensations' but we 
are saying that the body, in so far as it has 'behaviour patterns', is 
that strange object which uses its own parts as a general system of 
symbols for the world, and through which we can consequently 'be 
at home in' that world, 'understand' it and find significance in it. 

All this, it will be said, has doubtless some value as description of 
appearance. But how does that help if, in the end, these descriptions 
mean nothing that can be conceived, and if on reflection they are 
dismissed as nonsense? As popularly conceived one's own body is 
both a constituted and constituting object in relation to other objects. 
But if we are to know what we are talking about, we must choose 
and, in the last analysis, assign it to the sphere of the constituted 
object. I do, in fact, one of two things. Either I consider myself as 
within the world, inserted into it by my body which is beset by casual 
relations, in which case 'the senses' and 'the body' are material in- 
struments which have no knowledge of anything; the object throws 
an image on to the retinas, and the retinal image is duplicated in the 
optical centre by a second image, but all this consists of nothing but 
things to see and nobody who sees, so that we are thrown back in- 
definitely from one bodily stage to another, conjecturing within man 
a 'little man', and within him a smaller one, without ever reaching 
sight. Or else I try really to understand how sight comes about, in 
which case I must get away from the constituted, from what is in 
itself, and seize by reflection a being for whom the object can exist. 
Now, for the object to exist in the eyes of the subject, it is not enough 
for this 'subject' to fix his eyes on it or grasp it as my hand grasps 
this piece of wood, he must in addition know that he is seizing or 
watching it, he must know himself seizing or watching, his action 
must be entirely given to himself, and finally this subject must be 
nothing other than what he is conscious of being, otherwise we should 
have a seizure or a contemplation of the object for some third party, 
while the alleged subject, being unaware of himself, would be dis- 
persed through his act and unconscious of anything. For there to be 
any sight or tactile perception of the object, the senses will always 
lack that dimension of absence, that unreality through which the 
subject may be self-knowledge and the object may exist for him. The 
consciousness of the unified presupposes consciousness of the unify- 
ing agent and of his act of unification; consciousness of the object 
presupposes self-consciousness, or rather they are synonymous. In so 
far, then, as there is consciousness of something, it is because the subject 
is absolutely nothing and the 'sensations', the 'material' of knowledge 
are not phases or inhabitants of consciousness, they are part of the 
constituted world. Of what avail are our descriptions against these 
self-evident truths and how could they escape from this dilemma? 

237 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

Let us return to the perceptual experience. I perceive this table on 
which I am writing. This means, among other things, that my act of 
perception occupies me, and occupies me sufficiently for me to be 
unable, while I am actually perceiving the table, to perceive myself 
perceiving it. When I want to do this, I cease, so to speak, to use my 
gaze in order to plunge into ftie tabfe, I turn my back towards myself 
who am perceiving, and then realize that my perception must have 
gone through certain subjective appearances, and interpreted certain 
of my own 'sensations'; in short it takes its place in the perspective of 
my individual history. I start from unified experience and from there 
acquire, in a secondary way, consciousness of a unifying activity 
when, taking up an analytical attitude, I break up perception into 
qualities and sensations, and when, in order to recapture on the basis 
of these the object into which I was in the first place blindly thrown, 
I am obliged to suppose an act of synthesis which is merely the 
counterpart of my analysis. My act of perception, in its unsophis- 
ticated form, does not itself bring about this synthesis; it takes ad- 
vantage of work already done, of a general synthesis constituted once 
and for all, and this is what I mean when I say that I perceive with 
my body or my senses, since my body and my senses are precisely 
that familiarity with the world born of habit, that implicit or sedi- 
mentary body of knowledge. If my consciousness were at present 
constituting the world which it perceives, no distance would separate 
them and there would be no possible discrepancy between them; it 
would find its way into the world's hidden concatenations, inten- 
tionality would carry us to the heart of the object, and simultaneously 
the percept would lose the thickness conferred by the present, and 
consciousness would not be lost and become bogged down in it. But 
what we in fact have is consciousness of an inexhaustible object, and 
we are sucked into it because, between it and us, there is this latent 
knowledge which our gaze uses — the possibility of its rational de- 
velopment being a mere matter of presumption on our part — and 
which remains for ever anterior to our perception. If, as we have said, 
every perception has something anonymous in it, this is because it 
makes use of something which it takes for granted. The person who 
perceives is not spread out before himself as a consciousness must 
be; he has historical density, he takes up a perceptual tradition and 
is faced with a present. In perception we do not think the object and 
we do not think ourselves thinking it, we are given over to the object 
and we merge into this body which is better informed than we are 
about the world, and about the motives we have and the means at 
our disposal for synthesizing it. That is why we said with Herder that 
man is a sensorium commune. In this primary layer of sense experience 
which is discovered only provided that we really coincide with the 

238 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 

act of perception and break with the critical attitude, I have the living 
experience of the unity of the subject and the intersensory unity of the 
thing, and do not conceive them after the fashion of analytical reflec- 
tion and science. But what is the unified without unification, what is 
this object which is not yet an object for someone? Pyschological re- 
flection, which posits my act of perception as an event in my personal 
history, may well be a second order thing. But transcendental reflec- 
tion, which reveals me as the non-temporal thinker of the object, brings 
nothing to it which is not already there: it restricts itself to the formu- 
lation of what gives significance to 'the table' and 'the chair', what 
underlies their stable structure and makes my experience of objectivity 
possible. In short, what is living the unity of the object or the subject, 
if it is not making it? Even if it be supposed that this unity makes its 
appearance with the phenomenon of my body, must I not think of it 
in my body in order to find it there, and must 1 not effect the synthesis 
of this phenomenon in order to have the experience of it? We are 
not trying to derive the for itself from the in itself nor are we return- 
ing to some form of empiricism; the body to which we are entrusting 
the synthesis of the perceived world is not a pure datum, a thing 
passively received. For us the perceptual synthesis is a temporal 
synthesis, and subjectivity, at the level of perception, is nothing but 
temporality, and this is what enables us to leave to the subject of 
perception his opacity and historicity. I open my eyes on to my 
table, and my consciousness is flooded with colours and confused 
reflections; it is hardly distinguishable from what is offered to it; it 
spreads out, through its accompanying body, into the spectacle 
which so far is not a spectacle of anything. Suddenly, I start to focus 
my eyes on the table which is not yet there, I begin to look into the 
distance while there is as yet no depth, my body centres itself on an 
object which is still only potential, and so disposes its sensitive sur- 
faces as to make it a present reality. I can thus re-assign to its place 
in the world the something which was impinging upon me, because 
I can, by slipping into the future, throw into the immediate past the 
world's first attack upon my senses, and direct myself towards the 
determinate object as towards a near future. The act of looking is 
indivisibly prospective, since the object is the final stage of my 
process of focusing, and retrospective, since it will present itself as 
preceding its own appearance, as the 'stimulus', the motive or the 
prime mover of every process since its beginning. The spatial syn- 
thesis and the synthesis of the object arc based on this unfolding of 
time. In every focusing movement my body unites present, past and 
future, it secretes time, or rather it becomes that location in nature 
where, for the first time, events, instead of pushing each other into 
the realm of being, project round the present a double horizon of 

239 



THE WORLD AS FERCEIVED 

past and future and acquire a historical orientation. There is here 
indeed the summoning, but not the experience, of an eternal natura 
naturans. My body takes possession of time; it brings into existence 
a past and a future for a present; it is not a thing, but creates time 
instead of submitting to it. But every act of focusing must be re- 
newed, otherwise it falls into unconsciousness. The object remains 
clearly before me provided that I run my eyes over it, free-ranging 
scope being an essential property of the gaze. The hold which it gives 
us upon a segment of time, the synthesis which it effects are them- 
selves temporal phenomena which pass, and can be recaptured only 
in a fresh act which is itself temporal. The claim to objectivity laid 
by each perceptual act is remade by its successor, again disappointed 
and once more made. This ever-recurrent failure of perceptual con- 
sciousness was foreseeable from the start. If I cannot see the object 
except by distancing it in the past, this is because, like the first attack 
launched by the object upon my senses, the succeeding perception 
equally occupies and expunges my consciousness ; it is because this 
perception will in turn pass away, the subject of perception never 
being an absolute subjectivity, but being destined to become an 
object for an ulterior /. Perception is always in the mode of the im- 
personal 'One'. It is not a personal act enabling me to give a fresh 
significance to my life. The person who, in sensory exploration, gives 
a past to the present and directs it towards a future, is not myself as 
an autonomous subject, but myself in so far as I have a body and am 
able to 'look'. Rather than being a genuine history, perception ratifies 
and renews in us a 'prehistory'. And that again is of the essence of 
time: there would be no present, that is to say, no sensible world 
with its thickness and inexhaustible richness, if perception, in Hegel's 
words, did not retain a past in the depth of the present, and did not 
contract that past into that depth. It fails at this moment to realize the 
synthesis of its object, not because it is the passive recipient of it, as 
empiricists would have it, but because the unity of the object makes 
its appearance through the medium of time, and because time slips 
away as fast as it catches up with itself. It is true that I find, through 
time, later experiences interlocking with earlier ones and carrying 
them further, but nowhere do I enjoy absolute possession of myself 
by myself, since the hollow void of the future is for ever being refilled 
with a fresh present. There is no related object without relation and 
without subject, no unity without unification, but every synthesis is 
both exploded and rebuilt by time which, with one and the same 
process, calls it into question and confirms it because it produces a 
new present which retains the past. The duality of naturata and 
naturans is therefore converted into a dialectic of constituted and 
constituting time. If we are to solve the problem which we have set 

240 



SENSE EXPERIENCE 



ourselves— that of sensoriality, or finite subjectivity — it will be by 
thinking about time and showing how it exists only for a subjec- 
tivity, since without the latter, the past in itself being no longer and 
the future in itself being not yet, there would be no time — and how 
nevertheless this subject is time itself, and how we can say with Hegel 
that time is the existence of mind, or refer with Husserl to a self- 
constitution of time. 

For the moment, the preceding descriptions and those which are to 
follow serve to make us familiar with a new type of reflection from 
which we await the solution of our problems. For intellectualism, 
reflecting is distancing or objectifying sensation and confronting it 
with a subject without content capable of ranging over this diversity 
and for whom the latter can exist. In so far as intellectualism purifies 
consciousness by delivering it of all opacity, it makes a genuine thing 
out of the hyle, and the apprehension of any concrete contents, the 
coming together of this thing and the mind, becomes inconceivable. 
If it be objected that the material of knowledge is a result of analysis 
and should not be treated as a real element, it has to be recognized 
that in a corresponding way the synthetic unity of apperception is 
also a theoretical version of experience, that it should not be given 
any first-hand value and, in short, that the theory of knowledge has 
to be begun all over again. We agree that the matter and form of 
knowledge are results of analysis. I posit the stuff of knowledge 
when, breaking away from the primary faith inspired by perception, 
I adopt a critical attitude towards it and ask 'what I am really seeing'. 
The task of a radical reflection, the kind that aims at self-compre- 
hension, consists, paradoxically enough, in recovering the unre- 
flective experience of the world, and subsequently reassigning to it 
the verificatory attitude and reflective operations, and displaying re- 
flection as one possibility of my being. What have we then at the out- 
set? Not a given manifold with a synthetic apperception which 
ranges over it and completely penetrates it, but a certain perceptual 
field against the background of a world. Nothing here is thematized. 
Neither object nor subject is posited. In the primary field we have not 
a mosaic of qualities, but a total configuration which distributes 
functional values according to the demands of the whole; for ex- 
ample, as we have seen, a 'white' paper in the shade is not white in the 
sense of possessing an objective quality, but it counts as white. What 
is called sensation is only the most rudimentary of perceptions, and, 
as a modality of existence, it is no more separable than any other 
perception from a background which is in fact the world. Corre- 
spondingly each act of perception appears to itself to be picked out 
from some all-embracing adherence to the world. At the centre of 
this system lies the ability to suspend vital communication, or at least 

241 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

to limit it, by concentrating our gaze on a part of the spectacle and 
devoting the whole of the perceptual field to it. We must not, as we 
have seen, suppose that the determinate forms reached through the 
critical attitude are realized in the primordial experience, or, in con- 
sequence, talk about a synthesis which is present, so long as the mani- 
fold is as yet undissociated. Must we then reject the idea of synthesis 
and of a stuff of knowledge? Are we to say that perception reveals 
objects as a light illuminates them in the night, are we to adopt for 
our own purposes that realism which, according to Malebranche, 
leads us to imagine the soul issuing through the eyes and exploring 
objects in the world? That would not rid us of even the idea of syn- 
thesis since, in order to perceive a surface, for example, it is not 
enough to explore it, we must keep in mind the moments of our ex- 
ploratory journey and relate the points on the surface to each other. 
But we have seen that primary perception is a non-thetic,* pre- 
objective and pre-conscious experience. Let us therefore say pro- 
visionally that there is a merely possible stuff of knowledge. From 
every point of the primordial field intentions move outwards, vacant 
and yet determinate; in realizing these intentions, analysis will arrive 
at the object of science, at sensation as a private phenomenon, and 
at the pure subject which posits both. These three terminal concepts 
are no nearer than on the horizon of primordial experience. It is in 
the experience of the thing that the reflective ideal of positing thought 
will have its basis. Hence reflection does not itself grasp its full signi- 
ficance unless it refers to the unreflective fund of experience which it 
presupposes, upon which it draws, and which constitutes for it a 
kind of original past, a past which has never been a present. 

* I.e. non-positing (Translator's note). 



242 



2 

SPACE 



WE have just recognized that analysis has no justification for positing 
any stuff of knowledge as an ideally separable 'moment' and that this 
stuff, when brought into being by an act of reflection, already relates 
to the world. Reflection does not follow in the reverse direction a path 
already traced by the constitutive act, and the natural reference of the 
stuff to the world leads us to a new conception of intentionality, since 
the classical conception, 1 which treats the experience of the world as 
a pure act of constituting consciousness, manages to do so only in so 
far as it defines consciousness as absolute non-being, and corre- 
spondingly consigns its contents to a 'hyletic layer' which belongs to 
opaque being. We must now approach this new intentionality in a 
more direct way by examining the symmetrical notion of a form of 
perception, and in particular the notion of space. Kant tried to draw* 
^a strict demarcation line between space as the form of external ex- 
perience and the things given within that e:.perience. There is natur- 
ally no question of a relationship of container to content, since this ' 
relationship exists only between objects, nor even a relationship of 
logical inclusion, like the one existing between the individual and the 
class, since space is anterior to its alleged, parts, which are always 
.carved out of it. Space is not the setting (real .or logical) in which 
things are arranged, but the means whereby the positing of things 
becomes possible. This means that instead of imagining it as a sort of 
ether in which all things float, or conceiving it abstractly as a charac- 
teristic that they have in common, we must think of it as the uni- 
versal power enabling them to be connected. Therefore, either I do 
not reflect, but live among things and vaguely regard space at one 
moment as the setting for things, at another as their common attri- 
bute — or else I do reflect: I catch space at its source, and now think 

1 By this we understand either that of a Kantian like P. Lachieze-Rey (L" Ideal- 
isme kantien), or that of Husserl in the second period of his philosophy (the period 
of the Ideen). 

243 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



the relationships which underlie this word, realizing then that 
they live only through the medium of a subject who describes 
and sustains them; and pass from spatialized to spatializing space. 
In the first case, my body and things, their concrete relationships 
expressed in such terms as top and bottom, right and left, near and 
far, may appear to me as an irreducibly manifold variety, whereas 
in the second case I discover a single and indivisible ability to de- 
scribe space. In the first case, I am concerned with physical space, 
with its regions of varied quality; in the second with geometrical 
space having interchangeable dimensions, homogeneous and iso- 
tropic, and here I can at least think of a pure change of place which 
would leave the moving body unchanged, and consequently a pure 
position distinct from the situation of the object in its concrete con- 
text. We know how this distinction is blurred in modern conceptions 
of space, even at the level of scientific knowledge. Here we want 
to confront it, not with the technical instruments which modern 
physics has acquired, but with our experience of space, the ultimate 
court of appeal, according to Kant himself, of all knowledge con- 
nected with space. Is it true that we are faced with the alternative 
either of perceiving things in space, or (if we reflect and try to dis- 
cover the significance of our own experiences) of conceiving space 
as the indivisible system governing the acts of unification performed 
by a constituting mind? Does not the experience of space provide a 
basis for its unity by means of an entirely different kind of synthesis? 

Let us consider it before any theoretical elaboration has taken 
place. Take, for instance, our experience of 'top' and 'bottom'. We 
cannot catch it in the ordinary run of living, because it is then hidden 
under its own acquisitions. We must examine some exceptional case 
in which it disintegrates and re-forms before our eyes, for example, 
in cases of vision without retinal inversion. If a subject is made to 
wear glasses which correct the retinal images, the whole landscape at 
first appears unreal and upside down; on the second day of the ex- 
periment normal perception begins to reassert itself, except that the 
subject has the feeling that his own body is upside down. 1 In the 
course of a second set of experiments 2 lasting a week, objects at first 
appear inverted, but less unreal than the first time. On the second 
day the landscape is no longer inverted, but the body is felt to 
be in an abnormal position. From the third to the seventh day, 
the body progressively rights itself, and finally seems to occupy a 
normal position, particularly when the subject is active. When he is 
lying motionless on a couch, the body still presents itself against the 

1 Stratton, Some preliminary experiments on vision without inversion of the 
retinal image. 

1 Stratton, Vision without inversion of the retinal image. 

244 



SPACE 



background of the former space, and, as far as the unseen parts of 
the body are concerned, right and left preserve their former localiza- 
tion to the end of the experiment. External objects increasingly have 
a look of 'reality 1 From the fifth day, actions which were at first 
liable to be misled by the new mode of vision and had to be cor- 
rected in the light of the general visual upheaval, now go infallibly to 
their objective. The new visual appearances which, at the beginning, 
stood out against a background of previous space, develop round 
themselves, at first (third day) only through a great effort of will, later 
(seventh day) with no effort at all, a horizon with a general orienta- 
tion corresponding to their own. On the seventh day, the placing of 
sounds is correct so long as the sounding object is seen as well as 
heard. It remains unreliable, and with a double, or even inaccurate, 
representation, if the source of the sound does not appear in the 
visual field. At the end of the experiment, when the glasses are re- 
moved, objects appear not inverted, it is true, but 'queer', and 
motor reactions are reversed : the subject reaches out his right hand 
when it should be his left. The psychologist is at first tempted to say 1 
that after the glasses have been put on, the visual world is given to the 
subject exactly as if it had been turned through 180°, and conse- 
quently is upside down for him. As the illustrations in a book appear 
upside down to us if someone has played the trick of placing it *top 
to bottom' while we were looking away, the mass of sensations which 
make up the panorama has been turned round, and similarly placed 
'top to bottom'. That other mass of sensations which is the world of 
touch has meanwhile stayed 'the right way*; it can no longer coincide 
with the visual world so that the subject has two irreconcilable 
representations of his body, one given to him by his tactile sensa- 
tions and by those Visual images' which he has managed to retain 
from the period preceding the experiment; the other, that of his 
present vision which shows him his body 'head downwards'. This 
conflict of images can end only if one of the two contestants with- 
draws. Finding out how a normal situation is restored amounts then 
to finding out how the new image of the world and one's own 
body can cause the other to 'pale', 2 or 'displace' it. 3 It is notice- 
able that the normal situation is the more successfully achieved in 
proportion as the subject is more active; for example, as early as the 
second day when he washes his hands. 4 It would appear then that it 
is the experience of movement guided by sight which teaches the 
subject to harmonize the visual and tactile data: he becomes aware, 

1 This is, at least implicitly, Straiton's interpretation. 
a Stratton, Vision without inversion, p. 350. 
1 Some preliminary experiments, p. 617. 
4 Vision without inversion, p. 346. 

245 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

for instance, that the movement needed to reach his legs, hitherto 
a movement downwards', makes its appearance in the new visual 
spectacle as one which was previously 'upwards'. Observations of 
this kind enable inappropriate gestures to be corrected in the early 
stages by taking visual data as simply signs to be decoded and by 
translating them into the language of the former space. Once they 
have become 'habitual', 1 they set up between the old and the new 
directions, stable 'associations' 2 which do away with the former in 
favour of the latter, these being dominant by reason of their visual 
origin. The 'top' of the visual field, where the legs at first appear, 
having been frequently identified with what is 'down' for the touch, 
soon the subject has no further need of the mediation of calculated 
movements to pass from one system to the other; his legs settle down 
at what he used to call the 'top' of the visual field; not only does he 
'see' them there, he also 'feels' them there 3 and eventually 'what 
had previously been "the top" of the visual field begins to give an 
impression similar to that which belonged to the "bottom", and vice 
versa*.* As soon as the tactile body links up with the visual one, that 
region of the visual field in which the subject's feet appeared stops 
being described as 'the top'. This designation is transferred to the 
region in which the head appears, and that containing the feet once 
more becomes the bottom. 

But this interpretation is unintelligible. The inversion of the land- 
scape, followed by the return to normal vision, are explained by 
supposing that the top and bottom are turned topsyturvy and made 
variable with the apparent direction of head and feet as given in the 
image, that they are, so to speak, marked out in the sensory field by 
the actual distribution of sensations. But in no case — either at the 
beginning of the experiment, when the world is 'turned upside 
down', or at the end when it 'rights itself — can the orientation 
of the field be given by these contents of head and feet which 
appear in it. For these contents would themselves have to have a 
direction, in order to pass it on to the field. 'Inverted' or 'upright', in 
themselves, obviously have no meaning. The reply will run: after 
putting on the glasses the visual field appears inverted in relation 
to the tactile and bodily field, or the ordinary visual field, which, by 
nominal definition, we say are 'upright'. But the same question arises 
concerning these fields which we take as standard: their mere pres- 
ence is not enough to provide any direction whatsoever. Among 
things, two points are enough to establish a direction. But we are not 

1 Stratton, The Spatial Harmony of Touch and Sight, pp. 492-505. 

2 Ibid. 

3 Stralton, Some preliminary experiments, p. 614. 
* Stratton, Vision without inversion, p. 350. 

246 



SPACE 

among things, we have as yet only sensory fields which are not collec- 
tions of sensations placed before us, sometimes 'head to the top', 
sometimes 'head downwards', but systems of appearances varyingly 
orientated during the course of the experiment, even where no change 
occurs in the grouping of stimuli. So it is precisely a matter of finding 
out what happens when these floating appearances are suddenly 
anchored and take up a position in relation to 'up* and 'down', 
whether at the beginning of the experiment, when the tactile and 
bodily field seems 'upright* and the visual field 'inverted 1 , or sub- 
sequently when the first turns upside down while the second rights 
itself, or finally at the conclusion of the experiment when both are 
more or less 'straight'. One cannot take the world and orientated 
space as given along with the contents of sense experience or with the 
body in itself, since experience in fact shows that the same contents 
can oe successively orientated in one direction or another, and that 
objective relationships as registered on the retina through the posi- 
tion of the physical image do not govern our experience of 'up' and 
'down'. What we want to know is how an object can appear to us as 
'the right way up' or 'inverted', and what these words mean. 

The question is applicable not only to an empiricist psychology 
which treats the perception of space as the reception, within our- 
selves, of a real space, and the phenomenal orientation of objects as 
reflecting their orientation in the world. It is equally relevant to in- 
tellectualist psychology in which the 'upright' and the 'inverted' are 
relationships dependent upon the fixed points chosen. As the axis of 
co-ordinates selected, whatever it may be, is as yet situated in space 
only in relation to another guide-post, and so on, so the task of 
taking the world's bearings is indefinitely postponed. 'Up' and 'down' 
lose any specific meaning they might have, unless, by an impossible 
contradiction, we recognize certain contents as having the power to 
take up a position in space, which brings back empiricism and its 
difficulties. It is easy to show that there can be a direction only for a 
subject who describes it, and a constituting mind is eminently able to 
trace out all directions in space, but has at any moment no direction, 
and consequently no space, without an actual starting-point, an 
absolute 'here' which can gradually confer a significance on all 
spatial determinations. Intellectualism as well as empiricism re- 
mains anterior to the problem of orientated space, because it cannot 
even begin to ask the question. In the case of empiricism, the ques- 
tion was how the image of the world which, in itself, is inverted, can 
right itself for me. Intellectualism cannot even concede that the 
image of the world, after the glasses are put on, is inverted. For there 
is nothing, for a constituting mind, to distinguish the experience 
before from the experience after putting on the glasses, or even 

247 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

anything to make the visual experience of the 'inverted* body incom- 
patible with the tactile experience of the 'upright' body, since it does 
not view the spectacle from anywhere, and since all the objective re- 
lations between the body and its environment are preserved in the 
new spectacle. We can therefore see what'the question involves; em- 
piricism would willingly take the actual orientation of my bodily 
experience as the fixed point we need if we are to understand that 
there are directions for us, — but both experience and reflection 
demonstrate that no content is in itself orientated. Intellectualism 
starts from this relativity of up and down, but cannot stand outside 
it in order to account for an actual perception of space. We cannot 
understand, therefore, the experience of space either in terms of the 
consideration of contents or of that of some pure unifying activity; 
we arexx>nfronted with that third spatiality towards which we pointed 
a little while ago, which is neither that of things in space, nor that of 
spatializing space, and which, on this account, evades the Kantian 
analysis and is presupposed by it. We need an absolute within the 
sphere of the relative, a space which does not skate over appearances, 
which indeed takes root in them and is dependent upon them, yet 
which is nevertheless not given along with them in any realist way, 
and can, as Stratton's experiment shows, survive their complete dis- 
organization. We have to look for the first-hand experience of space 
on the hither side of the distinction between form and content. 

If we'so contrive it that a subject sees the room in which he is, only 
through a mirror which reflects it at an angle at 45° to the vertical, 
the subject at first sees the room 'slantwise'. A man walking about in 
it seems to lean to one side as he goes. A piece of cardboard falling 
down the door-frame looks to be falling obliquely. The general effect 
is 'queer'. After a few minutes a sudden change occurs: the walls, 
the man walking about the room, and the line in which the card- 
board falls become vertical. 1 This experiment, analogous to Stratton's, 
has the advantage of throwing into relief an instantaneous redistri- 
bution of high and low, without any motor exploration. We were 
already aware that it is meaningless to say that the oblique (or in- 
verted) image brings with it a repositioning of high and low which we 
come to identify by a motor exploration of the new spectacle. But 
now we see that this exploration is not even necessary, and that con- 
sequently bearings are taken by a comprehensive act on the part of 
the perceiving subject. Let us say that perception before the experi- 
ment recognizes a certain spatial level, in relation to which the 
spectacle provided in the experiment first of all appears oblique, and 
that during the experiment this spectacle induces another level in 
relation to which the whole of the visual field can once more seem 

1 Wcrtheimer, Experimentelle Studien iiber das Schen von Bewegung, p. 258. 

248 



SPACE 



straight. It is as if certain objects (walls, doors and the body of the 
man in the room), having been seen aslant in relation to a given level, 
then take it upon themselves to provide the cardinal directions, 
attracting to themselves the vertical, acting as 'anchoring points', 1 
and causing the previously established horizontal to tilt sideways. 
We are not falling here into the realistic mistake of using the visual 
spectacle as a source of directions in space, since the spectacle ex- 
perimentally provided is turned (obliquely) for us only in relation to 
a certain level, and since, therefore, it does not give us by itself the 
new up-and-down axis. It remains to be seen what precisely is this 
level which is always ahead of itself,, since every constitution of a 
level presupposes a different, pre-established level — how the 'anchor- 
ing points', working from within a certain space from which they 
derive their stability, suggest to us the constitution of a fresh one, 
what 'top' and 'bottom' really are, unless they are merely names 
applicable to an orientation in itself of the contents of sense experi- 
ence. We hold that the 'spatial level' is not confused with the orienta- 
tion of one's own body. In so far as consciousness of one's own body 
indubitably contributes to the constitution of level (a subject tilting 
his head on one side holds a stick obliquely, when he is asked to hold 
it vertically) 2 it is, in this function, in competition with the other 
sectors of experience, and the vertical tends to follow the direction 
of the head only if the visual field is empty, and if the 'anchoring 
points' are lacking, for example when one is working in the dark. 
As a mass of tactile, labyrinthine and kinaesthetic data, the body has 
no more definite orientation than the other contents of experience, 
and it too receives this orientation from the general level of experi- 
ence. Wertheimer's observation serves to show how the visual 
field can impose an orientation which is not that of the body. But 
although the body, as a mosaic of given sensations, has no specific 
direction, nevertheless, as an agent, it plays an essential part in the 
establishment of a leveL Variations in muscular tonicity, even with 
a full visual field, so modify the apparent vertical that the subject 
leans his head on one side in order to place it parallel to this deflected 
vertical. 3 One might be tempted to say that the vertical is the direc- 
tion represented by the symmetry axis of our body as a synergic 
system. My body can, however, move without drawing along with it 
the directions of upward and downward, as when I lie down on the 
ground, and Wertheimer's experiment shows that the objective direc- 
tion, of my body can form an appreciable angle with the apparent 
vertical of the spectacle. What counts for the orientation of the 

1 Wertheimer, Experimentelle Studien iiber das Sehen von Bewegung, p. 253. 
* Nagcl, quoted by Wertheimer, ibid., p. 257. 
5 La Structure du Comportement, p. 199. 

249 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

spectacle is not my body as it in fact is, as a thing in objective space, 
but as a system of possible actions, a virtual body with its pheno- 
menal 'place' defined by its task and situation. My body is wherever 
there is something to be done. As soon as Wertheimer's subject 
takes his place in the experimental situation prepared for him, the 
area of his possible actions — such as walking, opening a cupboard, 
using a table, sitting down — outlines in front of him, even if he has 
his eyes shut, a possible habitat. At first the mirror image presents 
him with a room differently canted, which means that the subject is 
not at home with the utensils it contains, he does not inhabit it, and 
does not share it with the man he sees walking to and fro. After a 
few minutes, provided that he does not strengthen his initial an- 
chorage by glancing away from the mirror, the reflected room 
miraculously calls up a subject capable of living in it. This virtual 
body ousts the real one to such an extent that the subject no longer 
has the feeling of being in the world where he actually is, and that 
instead of his real legs and arms, he feels that he has the legs and arms 
he would need to walk and act in the reflected room: he inhabits the 
spectacle. The spatial level tilts and takes up its new position. 
It is, then, a certain possession of the world by my body, a certain 
gearing of my body to the world. Being projected, in the absence 
of anchoring points, by the attitude of my body alone, as in 
Nagel's experiments — specified, when the body is inert, through the 
demands of the spectacle alone, as in Wertheimer's experiment — it 
normally makes its appearance where my motor intentions and my 
perceptual field join forces, when my actual body is at one with the 
virtual body required by the spectacle, and the actual spectacle 
with the setting which my body throws round it. It comes to rest 
when, between my body as the potentiality for certain movements, 
as the demand for certain preferential planes, and the spectacle per- 
ceived as an invitation to the same movements and the scene of the 
same actions, a pact is concluded which gives me the enjoyment of 
space and gives to things their direct power over ray body. The con- 
stitution of a spatial level is simply one means of constituting an 
integrated world : my body is geared onto the world when my percep- 
tion presents me with a spectacle as varied and as clearly articulated 
as possible, and when my motor intentions, as they unfold, receive 
the responses they expect from the world. This maximum sharpness 
of perception and action points clearly to a perceptual ground, a basis 
of my life, a general setting in which my body can co-exist with the 
world. With the notion of a spatial level, and of the body as the 
subject of space, we begin to understand the phenomena described 
by Stratton but left unexplained by him. If the 'correction' of the 
field were the outcome of a set of associations between the new 

250 



SPACE 



positions and the old, how could the operation convey the general 
effect of being systematic, and how could whole sections of the per- 
ceptual horizon suddenly fall into line with already 'corrected* ob- 
jects? If, on the other hand, the new orientation sprang from a pro- 
cess of thought, and consisted of a change of co-ordinates, how could 
the auditory or tactile field resist transposition? The constituting 
subject would, per impossibile, have to be cut off from himself and 
able to overlook in one place what he was doing in another. 1 In 
so far as the transposition is systematic, and yet piece-meal and pro- 
gressive, it is because I go from one system of positions to the other 
without having the key to each, and in the way that a man sings, in 
another key, a tune he has heard, though he has no knowledge of 
music. The possession of a body implies the ability to change levels 
and to 'understand' space, just as the possession of a voice implies 
the ability to change key. The perceptual field corrects itself and at 
the conclusion of the experiment I identify it without any concept 
because I live in it, because I am borne wholly into the new spectacle 
and, so to speak, transfer my centre of gravity into it. 2 At the be- 
ginning of the experiment, the visual field appears both inverted and 
unreal because the subject does not live in it and is not geared to it. 
In the course of the experiment, we notice an intermediate phase in 
which the tactile body seems to be inverted and the landscape up- 
right because, since I already live in the landscape, I see it accord- 
ingly as upright, the disturbance brought about by the experiment 
being concentrated in my own body, which thus becomes, not a mass 
of affective sensations, but the body which is needed to perceive a 
given spectacle. Everything throws us back on to the organic rela- 
tions between subject and space, to that gearing of the subject onto 
his world which is the origin of space. 

But one may wish to go further into the analysis. Why, it may be 
asked, are clear perception and assured action possible only in a 
phenomenal space which is orientated? This is obvious only if we 
suppose the subject of perception and action faced with a world 

1 Change of direction in acoustic phenomena is extremely difficult to bring 
about. If we arrange, with the aid of a pseudophone, for sounds coming from the 
left to reach the right ear before they strike the left, we get an inversion of the 
auditory field comparable to the inversion of the visual field in Stratton's experi- 
ment. Now even with long practice people do not manage to 'correct' the auditory 
field. The placing of sounds by hearing alone remains incorrect to the end. It is 
correct, and the sound seems to come from the object on the left only if the object 
is seen at the same time as it is heard. P. T. Young, Auditory localization with 
acoustical transposition of the ears. 

2 The subject can, in experiments on auditory inversion, produce the illusion of 
correct localization when he sees the source of sound, because he inhibits his 
auditory phenomena and 'lives' in the visual. P. T. Young, ibid. 

251 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

where there are already absolute directions, so that he has to adjust 
the dimensions of his behaviour to those of the world. But we are 
now placing ourselves inside perception, and we are puzzled to know 
precisely how it can come by absolute directions, and so we cannot 
suppose them to be given at the source of our spatial experience. The 
objection amounts to saying what we have been saying from the 
start : that the constitution of a level always presupposes another given 
level, that space always precedes itself. But this remark is not a 
mere admission of defeat. It enlightens us concerning the essence of 
space and the only method which enables us to understand it. It is of 
the essence of space to be always 'already constituted', and we shall 
never come to understand it by withdrawing into a worldless per- 
ception. Wc must not wonder why being is orientated, why existence 
is spatial, why, using the expression we used a little while ago, our 
body is not geared to the world in all its positions, and why its co- 
existence with the world magnetizes experience and induces a direc- 
tion in it. The question could be asked only if the facts were fortuitous 
happenings to a subject and an object indifferent to space, whereas 
perceptual experience shows that they are presupposed in our 
primordial encounter with being, and that being is synonymous with 
being situated. For the thinking subject a face seen 'the right way up' 
and the same face seen 'upside down' are indistinguishable. For the 
subject of perception the face seen 'upside down' is unrecognizable. 
If someone is lying on a bed, and I look at him from the head of the 
bed, the face is for a moment normal. It is true that the features are in 
a way disarranged, and I have some difficulty in realizing that the 
smile is a smile, but I feel that I could, if I wanted, walk round the 
bed, and I seem to see through the eyes of a spectator standing at the 
foot of the bed. If the spectacle is protracted, it suddenly changes its 
appearance: the face takes on an utterly unnatural aspect, its ex- 
pressions become terrifying, and the eyelashes and eyebrows assume 
an air of materiality such as I have never seen in them. For the first 
time I really see the inverted face as if this were its 'natural' position: 
in front of me I have a pointed, hairless head with a red, teeth-filled 
orifice in the forehead and, where the mouth ought to be, two moving 
orbs edged with glistening hairs and underlined with stiff brushes. 
It will probably be said that the face seen the 'right way up' is, among 
all the possible aspects of a face, the one which is most frequently 
given to me, and that the inverted face startles me because I see it 
only rarely. But faces are not often presented in a strictly vertical 
position, the 'upright' face enjoys no statistical preponderance, and 
the question is why, this being the case, it is given to me more often 
than any other. If it be conceded that my perception makes it a 
standard and refers to it as to a norm for reasons of symmetry, the 

252 



SPACE 

question arises why, beyond a certain angle, the Correction' does not 
operate. We must conclude that my gaze which moves over the face, 
and in doing so favours certain directions, does not recognize the 
face unless it comes up against its details in a certain irreversible 
order, and that the very significance of the object — here the face and 
its expressions — must be linked to its orientation, as indeed is in- 
dicated by the double usage of the French word sens.* To invert an 
object is to deprive it of its significance. Its being as an object is, 
therefore, not a being-for-the-thinking subject, but a being-for-the- 
gaze which meets it at a certain angle, and otherwise fails to recog- 
nize it. This is why each object has its 'top' and its 'bottom' which 
indicate, for a given level, its 'natural' position, the one which it 
'should' occupy. To see a face is not to conceive the idea of a certain 
law of constitution to which the object invariably conforms through- 
out all its possible orientations, it is to take a certain hold upon it, 
to be able to follow on its surface a certain perceptual route with its 
ups and downs, and one just as unrecognizable taken in reverse as 
the mountain up which I was so recently toiling, and down which 
I am now striding my way. Generally speaking, our perception would 
not comprise either outlines, figures, backgrounds or objects, and 
would consequently not be perception of anything, or indeed exist at 
all, if the subject of perception were not this gaze which takes a grip 
upon things only in so far as they have a general direction; and this 
general direction in space is not a contingent characteristic of the 
object, it is the means whereby I recognize it and am conscious of it 
as of an object. It is true that I can be conscious of the same object 
variously orientated, and, as we have said, I can even recognize an 
inverted face. But it is always provided that mentally we take up 
position in front of it, and sometimes we even do so physically, as 
when we tilt our head to look at a photograph held in front of him 
by a person at our side. Thus, since every conceivable being is related 
either directly or indirectly to the perceived world, and since the per- 
ceived world is grasped only in terms of direction, we cannot dis- 
sociate being from orientated being, and there is no occasion to 'find 
a basis for space or to ask what is the level of all levels. The primor- 
dial level is on the horizon of all our perceptions, but it is a horizon 
which cannot in principle ever be reached and thematized in our 
express perception. Each of the levels in which we successively live 
makes its appearance when we cast anchor in some letting' which 
is offered to us. This setting itself is spatially particularized only for a 
previously given level. Thus each of the whole succession of our ex- 
periences, including the first, passes on an already acquired spatiality. 
The condition of our first perception's being spatial is that it should 
* 'sense, significance, direction' (Translator's note). 
253 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



have referred to some orientation which preceded it. It must, then, 
have found us already at work in a world. Yet this cannot be a 
certain world, a certain spectacle, since we have put ourselves at the 
origin of all of them. The first spatial level cannot find its anchorage 
anywhere, since this anchorage would need a level anterior to the 
first level in order to be particularized in space. And since it cannot be 
orientated 'in itself', my first perception and my first hold upon the 
world must appear to me as action in accordance with an earlier 
agreement reached between x and the world in general, my history 
must be the continuation of a prehistory and must utilize the latter's 
acquired results. My personal existence must be the resumption of a 
prepersonal tradition. There is, therefore, another subject beneath 
me, for whom a world exists before I am here, and who marks out 
my place in it. This captive or natural spirit is my body, not that 
momentary body which is the instrument of my personal choices and 
which fastens upon this or that world, but the system of anonymous 
'functions' which draw every particular focus into a general project. 
Nor does this blind adherence to the world, this prejudice in favour 
of being, occur only at the beginning of my life. It endows every sub- 
sequent perception, of space with its meaning, and it is resumed at 
every instant. Space and perception generally represent, at the core 
of the subject, the fact of his birth, the perpetual contribution of his 
bodily being, a communication with the world more ancient than 
thought. That is why they saturate consciousness and are impene- 
trable to reflection. The instability of levels produces not only the 
intellectual experience of disorder, but the vital experience of 
giddiness and nausea, 1 which is the awareness of our contingency, 
and the horror with which it fills us. The positing of a level means 
losing sight of this contingency; space has its basis in our facticity. 
It is neither an object, nor an act of unification on the subject's part; 
it can neither be observed, since it is presupposed in every observa- 
tion, nor seen to emerge from a constituting operation, since it is of 
its essence that it be already constituted, for thus it can, by its magic, 
confer its own spatial particularizations upon the landscape without 
ever appearing itself. 

Traditional ideas of perception arc at one in denying that depth is 
visible. Berkeley shows that it could not be given to sight in the 
absence of any means of recording it, since our retinas receive only 

1 Stratlon, Vision without Inversion, first day of the experiment. Werlheimer 
talks about a 'visual vertigo' (Expen'mentelle Studien, pp. 257-9). We remain 
physically upright not through the mechanism of the skeleton or even through the 
nervous regulation of muscular tone, but because we arc caught up in a world. 
If this involvement is seriously weakened, the body collapses and becomes once 
more an object. 

254 



SPACE 



a manifestly flat projection of the spectacle. If one retorted that after 
the criticism of the 'constancy hypothesis' we cannot judge what we 
see by what is pictured on our retinas, Berkeley would probably 
reply that, whatever may be true of the retinal image, depth cannot 
be seen because it is not spread out before our eyes, but appears to 
them only in foreshortened form. In analytical reflection, it is for 
theoretical reasons that depth is to be judged invisible: even if it 
could be registered by our eyes, the sensory impression would present 
only a multiplicity in itself, which would have to be ranged over, so 
that distance, like all other spatial relations, exists only for a subject 
who synthesizes it and embraces it in thought. Though diametrically 
opposed to each other, the two doctrines presuppose the same re- 
pression of our affective experience. In both cases depth is tacitly 
equated with breadth seen from the side, and this is what makes it 
invisible. Berkeley's argument, made quite explicit, runs roughly like 
this. What I call depth is in reality a juxtaposition of points, making 
it comparable to breadth. I am simply badly placed to see it. I should 
see it if I were in the position of a spectator looking on from the side, 
who can take in at a glance the series of objects spread out in front 
of me, whereas for me they conceal each other — or see the distance 
from my body to the first object, whereas for me this distance is 
compressed into a point. What makes depth invisible for me is 
precisely what makes it visible for the spectator as breadth: the juxta- 
position of simultaneous points in one direction which is that of my 
gaze. The depth which is declared invisible is, therefore, a depth 
already identified with breadth and, this being the case, the argu- 
ment would lack even a semblance of consistency. In the same way, 
intellectualism can bring to light, in the experience of depth, a think- 
ing subject who synthesizes that experience, only because it reflects 
on the basis of a depth already in existence, on a juxtaposition of 
simultaneous points which is not depth as it is presented to me, but 
as it is presented to a spectator standing at the side, in short as 
breadth. 1 By assimilating one to the other from the very outset, the 
two philosophies take for granted the result of a constitutive process 
the stages of which we must, in fact, trace back. In order to treat 
depth as breadth viewed in profile, in order to arrive at a uniform 
space, the subject must leave his place, abandon his point of view on 
the world, and think himself into a sort of ubiquity. For God, who 
is everywhere, breadth is immediately equivalent to depth. Intellec- 
tualism and empiricism do not give us any account of the human ex- 
perience of the world; they tell us what God might think about it. 

1 The distinction between the depth of things in relation to me, and the distance 
between two objects, is made by Paliard, V Illusion de Sinnsteden et le probleme de 
V implication perceptive, p. 400, and by E. Straus, Vom Sinn der Sinne, pp. 267-9. 

255 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

And indeed it is the world itself which suggests to us that we sub- 
stitute one dimension for another and conceive it from no point of 
view. All men accept without any speculation the equivalence of 
depth and breadth; this equivalence is part and parcel of the self- 
evidence of an intersubjective world, which is what makes philo- 
sophers as forgetful as anyone else* of the originality of depth. But 
prior to this we know nothing of the world and of space as objective, 
we are trying to describe the phenomenon of the world, that is, its 
birth for us in that field into which each perception sets us back, 
where we are as yet still alone, where other people will appear only at a 
later stage, in which knowledge and particularly science have not so 
far ironed out and levelled down the individual perspective. It is 
through this birth that we are destined to graduate to a world, and 
we must therefore describe it. More directly than the other dimen- 
sions of space, depth forces us to reject the preconceived notion of 
the world and rediscover the primordial experience from which it 
springs: it is, so to speak, the most *existentiaF of all dimensions, 
because (and here Berkeley's argument is right) it is not impressed 
upon the object itself, it quite clearly belongs to the perspective and 
not to things. Therefore it cannot either be extracted from, or even put 
into that perspective by consciousness. It announces a certain in- 
dissoluble link between things and myself by which I am placed in 
front of them, whereas breadth can, at first sight, be taken as a re- 
lationship between things themselves, in which the perceiving sub- 
ject is not implied. By rediscovering the vision of depth, that is to 
say, of a depth which is not yet objectified and made up of mutually 
external points, we shall once more outrun the traditional alterna- 
tives and elucidate the relation between subject and object. 

Here is my table, farther away is the piano or the wall, or again a 
car which is standing in front of me is started and drives away. What 
do these words mean? In order to resuscitate the perceptual experi- 
ence, let us take as our starting point the superficial account given by a 
thought obsessed by the world and the object. These words, it is 
maintained, mean that between the table and myself there is an in- 
terval, between the car and myself an increasing interval that I cannot 
see from where I am, but which reveals itself to me by the apparent 
size of the object. It is the apparent size of the table, the piano and 
the wall which, relative to their real size, assigns to them their place 
in space. When the car slowly climbs up towards the horizon, all the 
while decreasing in size, I account for this appearance by construct- 
ing a displacement in terms of breadth such as I should perceive if I 
were observing the scene from an aeroplane, and which, in the last 
analysis, is the whole meaning of depth. But I have also other signs of 
distance to go on. As an object approaches mc, my eyes, as long as they 

256 



SPACE 



are focused on it, converge. The distance is the height of a triangle 
with its base and base angles given to me 1 and, when I say that I am 
seeing something at a distance, I mean that the height of the triangle 
is determined by its relations to these given sizes. The experience of 
depth, according to traditional views, consists in interpreting certain 
given facts — the convergence of the eyes, the apparent size of the 
image, for example — by placing them in the context of objective rela- 
tions which explain them. But my ability to go back from the apparent 
size to its significance is conditioned by my knowledge that there 
is a world of undistortable objects, that my body is standing in front 
of this world like a mirror and that, like the image in the mirror, the 
one which is formed on the body screen is exactly proportionate to the 
interval which separates it from the object. My ability to understand 
convergence as a sign of distance is conditioned by my visualizing my 
gaze as the blind man's two sticks, which run more sharply together 
in proportion as the object is brought nearer; 2 in other words, by my 
inclusion of my eyes, body and the external world into one and the 
same objective space. The 'signs' which, ex hypothesi, ought to 
acquaint us with the experience of space can, therefore, convey the 
idea of space only if they are already involved in it, and if it is already 
known. Since perception is initiation into the world, and since, as 
has been said with insight, 'there is nothing anterior to it which is 
mind', 3 we cannot put into it objective relationships which are not 
yet constituted at its level. That is why the Cartesians spoke of a 
'natural geometry*. The significance of apparent size and convergence, 
that is distance, cannot yet be set forth and thematized. Apparent size 
and convergence themselves cannot be given as elements in a system 
of objective relationships. 'Natural geometry' or 'natural judgement' 
are myths in the Platonic sense, intended to represent the envelop- 
ment or 'implication' of a significance in signs, neither signs nor 
significance being yet posited and explicitly contained in thought, 
and this is what we must elucidate by returning to perceptual ex- 
perience. We must describe apparent size and convergence, not as 
scientific knowledge sees them, but as we grasp them from within. 
Gestalt pyschologists 4 have observed that they are not explicitly 
known in perception itself — I am not expressly aware of the conver- 
gence of my eyes or of apparent size when I perceive at a distance, 
they do not confront me as perceived facts do — and that they never- 
theless enter into the perception of distance, as the stereoscope 

1 Malebranche, Recherche de la verite, Book I, Chap. IX. 2 Ibid. 

3 Paliard, V Illusion de Sinnsteden et le probleme de V implication perceptive > 
p. 383. 

4 Koffka, Some problems of space perception. Guillaume, Trail e de Psychologies 
Chap. IX. 

257 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

and illusions of perspective amply prove. Psychologists conclude 
from this that they are not signs, but conditions or causes of depth. 
We observe that organization in depth appears when a certain size 
of retinal image or a certain degree of convergence is objectively 
produced in the body; this is a law comparable to the laws of physics, 
and it has only to be recorded without more ado. But here the 
psychologist is evading his task: when he recognizes that apparent 
size and convergence are not present in perception itself as objective 
facts, he is requiring us to return to the pure description of pheno- 
mena prior to the objective world, and giving us a glimpse of 'lived' 
depth, independently of any kind of geometry. And then he inter- 
rupts the description in order to put himself back in the world and 
derive organization in depth from a chain of observed facts. Can one 
thus limit description and, once having recognized the phenomenal 
order as an original order, re-assign the production of phenomenal 
depth to some cerebral alchemy only the result of which is recorded 
by experience? We must choose between the behaviourist course of 
refusing all meaning to the word 'experience', and trying to build up 
perception as a product of the world and of science, or else we must 
concede that experience, too, gives us access to being, in which case 
it cannot be treated as a by-product of being. Either experience is 
nothing or it must be total. 

Let us try to envisage what an organization in depth produced by 
cerebral physiology might be. For any given apparent size and con- 
vergence, there would appear somewhere in the brain a functional 
structure homologous with the organization in depth. But this is in 
any case only a given depth, a factual depth, and we still have to 
become aware of it. To experience a structure is not to receive it into 
oneself passively: it is to live it, to take it up, assume it and discover 
its immanent significance. Thus an experience can never bear the 
relation to certain factual conditions that it would bear to its cause 1 
and, even if consciousness of distance is produced for a certain value 
of convergence and a certain size of retinal image, it can depend on 
these factors only in so far as they figure in it. Since we have no 
express experience of it, we must conclude that we have a non- 
th~tic* experience of it. Convergence and apparent size are neither 
signs nor causes of depth: they are present in the experience of depth 
in the way that a motive, even when it is not articulate and separately 
posited,- is present in a decision. What do we understand by a motive, 

1 In other words: an act of consciousness can have no cause. But we prefer not 
to introduce the concept of consciousness, which Gestalt psychology might chal- 
lenge and which we for our part do not unreservedly accept. We shall stick to the 
unexceptionable notion of experience. 

* I.e. not explicitly posited (Translator's note). 

258 



SPACE 



and what do we mean when we say, for example, that a journey is 
motivated? We mean thereby that it has its origin in certain given 
facts, not in so far as these facts by themselves have the physical 
power to bring it about, but in that they provide reasons for under- 
taking it. The motive is an antecedent which acts only through its 
significance, and it must be added that it is the decision which 
affirms the validity of this significance and gives it its force and 
efficacy. Motive and decision are two elements of a situation: the 
former is the situation as a fact, the second the situation undertaken. 
Thus a death motivates my journey because it is a situation in which 
my presence is required, whether to console a bereaved family or to 
'pay one's last respects' to the deceased, and, by deciding to make the 
journey, I validate this motive which puts itself forward, and I take 
up the situation. The relation between motivating factor and moti- 
vated act is thus reciprocal. Now a similar relationship exists between 
the experience of convergence, or of apparent size, and that of depth. 
They do not act miraculously as 'causes' in producing the appearance 
of organization in depth, they tacitly motivate it in so far as they 
already contain it in their significance, and in so far as they are bath 
already a certain way of looking at a distance. We have already seen 
that the convergence of the eyes is not the cause of depth, and that 
it itself presupposes an orientation towards the object placed at a 
distance. Let us now concentrate on the notion of apparent size. If 
we look for a long time at an illuminated object which will leave 
behind it a following image, and if we focus subsequently on screens 
placed at varying distances, the after-image is thrown upon them 
with a diameter greater in proportion as the screen is farther away. 1 
The enlarged moon on the horizon has long been explained by the 
large number of objects interposed which emphasize the distance and 
consequently increase the apparent diameter. It follows that the 
phenomenon of 'apparent size' and the phenomenon of distance are 
two phases * of a comprehensive organization of the field, that the 
first stands to the second neither in the relation of sign to meaning, 
nor in that of cause to effect, but that, like the motivating factor to 
the motivated act, they communicate through their significance. 
Apparent size as experienced, instead of being the sign or indication 
of a depth invisible in itself, is nothing other than a way of expressing 
our vision of depth. Gestalt psychology has indeed contributed to 
showing that the apparent size of a retreating object does not vary 
proportionately to the retinal image, and that the apparent shape of 
a disc turning round one of its diameters does not vary as one would 

1 Quercy, Etudes sur V hallucination, II, La clinique, pp. 1 54 and flF. 

* 'moments' (Translator's, note). 
259' 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

expect according to the geometrical perspective. The object moving 
away grows smaller, and the object approaching grows larger, less 
quickly for my perception than the physical image on my retina. 
That is why the train coming towards us, at the cinema, increases in 
size much more than it would in reality. It is also why a hill which 
seemed high becomes insignificant in a photograph. And finally it is 
why a disc placed obliquely to our face resists geometrical perspec- 
tive, as Cezanne and other painters have shown by depicting a 
soup plate seen from the side with the inside still visible. It has been 
rightly said that, if perspective distortions were expressly given to 
us, we should not have to learn perspective. But Gestalt psychologists 
talk as if the distortion of the oblique plate were a compromise 
between the shape of the plate seen from above and the geometrical 
perspective, and as if the apparent size of the retreating object were 
a compromise between its apparent size when within reach and the 
much smaller one which geometrical perspective would attribute to 
it. They talk, in fact, as if constancy of shape or size were a real con- 
stancy, as if there were, besides the physical image of the object on 
the retina, a 'mental image' of the same object which remained rela- 
tively constant while the first varied. In reality, the 'mental image' of 
this ash-tray is neither larger nor smaller than the physical image of 
the same object on my retina: there is no mental image that can be 
compared, as if it were a thing, with the physical image, no mental 
image which has a determinate size relative to the physical and which 
stands like a screen between me and the thing. My perception does 
not bear upon a content of consciousness; it bears upon the ash-tray 
itself. The apparent size of the perceived ash-tray is not a measurable 
size. When I am asked what diameter I see it as having, I cannot 
reply to the question as long as I keep both eyes open. Spontane- 
ously, I shut one eye, I take a measuring instrument, a pencil held at 
arm's length, for example, and I mark on the pencil the size 
reached by the ash-tray. In doing this, I must avoid merely saying 
that I have reduced the perceived perspective to the geometrical, that 
I have altered "the proportions of the spectacle, and that I have con- 
tracted the object if it is at a distance or that I have expanded it if it is 
near at hand — I must rather say that by breaking up the perceptual 
field and isolating the ash-tray, by positing it for itself, I have caused 
size to appear where hitherto it had no place. The constancy of 
apparent size in a retreating object is not the actual permanence of 
some mental image of the object capable of resisting the distortions 
of perspective as a fnm object resists pressure. The constancy of 
circular shape in a plate is not the resistance of the circle to the 
flattening of perspective, and this is why the painter who can repre- 
sent it only by a real outline on a real canvas surprises the viewer, 

260 



SPACE 



although he is trying to render perspective as experienced. When I 
look at a road which sweeps before me towards the horizon, I must 
not say either that the sides of the road are given to me as convergent 
or that they are given to me as parallel: they are parallel in depth. 
The perspective appearance is not posited, but neither is the parallel- 
ism. / am engrossed in the road itself, and I cling to it through its 
virtual distortion, and depth is this intention itself which posits 
neither the perspective projection of the road, nor the 'real' road. 
And yet is not a man smaller at two hundred yards than at five yards 
away? He becomes so if I isolate him from the perceived context and 
measure his apparent size. Otherwise he is neither smaller nor indeed 
equal in size: he is anterior to equality and inequality; he is the same 
man seen from farther away. One can only say that the man two 
hundred yards away is a much less distinguishable figure, that he 
presents fewer and less identifiable points on which my eyes can 
fasten, that he is less strictly geared to my powers of exploration. 
Again one can say that he less completely occupies my visual field, 
provided that one remembers that the visual field itself is not a 
measurable area. To say that an object takes up only a small part of 
my visual field is to say in effect that it does not offer a sufficiently 
rich configuration to absorb completely my power of clear vision. 
My visual field has no definite capacity, and it can contain more or 
fewer things according as I see 'at a distance' or 'near'. Apparent 
size is, therefore, not definable independently of distance; it is im- 
plied by distance and it also implies distance. Convergence, apparent 
size and distance are read off from each other, naturally symbolize 
or signify each other, are the abstract elements of a situation and are, 
within it, mutually synonymous, not because the subject of percep- 
tion posits objective relations between them, but on the contrary 
because he does not posit them separately and therefore has no 
need to unify them expressly. Taking the various 'apparent sizes' of 
the retreating object, it is not necessary to link them in a synthesis if 
none of them has been specifically posited. We 'have' the retreating 
object, we never cease to 'hold' it and to have a grip on it, and the 
increasing distance is not, as breadth appears to be, an augmenting 
externality: it expresses merely that the thing is beginning to slip 
away from the grip of our gaze and is less closely allied to it. Distance 
is what distinguishes this loose and approximate grip from the com- 
plete grip which is proximity. We shall define it then as we defined 
'straight' and 'oblique' above: in terms of the situation of the object 
in relation to our power of grasping it. 

It is principally illusions relating to depth which have made us 
accustomed to considering it as a construction of the understanding. 
We can produce them by imposing upon the eyes a certain degree of 

261 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

convergence, as at the stereoscope, or by setting before the subject 
a perspective drawing. Since in this case I imagine that I see depth 
when there is none, is this not because misleading signs have given 
rise to a hypothesis, and because generally the alleged vision of dis- 
tance is always an interpretation of signs? But the postulate is clear; 
we suppose that it is not possible to see what is not there, we there- 
fore define vision in terms of sensory impression, missing the original 
relationship of motivation and replacing it by one of significance. 
We have seen that the disparity between the retinal images, which 
stimulates convergence, does not exist in itself; there is disparity 
only for a subject who tries to fuse monocular phenomena similar in 
structure and who tends towards synergy. The unity of binocular 
vision, and with it the depth without which it cannot come about is, 
therefore, there from the very moment at which the monocular 
images are presented as 'disparate'. When I look in the stereoscope, 
a totality presents itself in which already the possible order takes 
shape and the situation is foreshadowed. My motor response takes 
up this situation. Cezanne said that the painter in the face of his 
'motif is about 'to join the aimless hands of nature'. 1 The act of 
focusing at the stereoscope is equally a response to the question put 
by the data, and this response is contained in the question. It is the 
field itself which is moving towards the most perfect possible sym- 
metry, and depth is merely a stage * in arriving at a perceptual faith 
in one single thing. The perspective drawing is not first of all 
perceived as a drawing on a plane surface, and then organized in 
depth. The lines which sweep towards the horizon are not first given 
as oblique, and then thought of as horizontal. The whole of the 
drawing strives towards its equilibrium by delving in depth. The 
poplar on the road which is drawn smaller than a man, succeeds in 
becoming really and truly a tree only by retreating towards the 
horizon. It is the drawing itself which tends towards depth as a stone 
falls downwards. If symmetry, plenitude and determinacy can be 
achieved in several ways, the organization will not be stable, as can 
be seen in ambiguous drawings. 

Thus Fig. 1 below can be seen either as a cube seen from below 
with the face ABCD in the foreground, or as a cube seen from above 
with the face EFGH in the foreground, or as a mosaic pattern of ten 
triangles and a square. Fig. 2 on the other hand will almost inevitably 
be seen as a cube, because that is the only organization which gives it 
perfect symmetry. 2 Depth is born beneath my gaze because the latter 
tries to see something. But what is this perceptual genius at work in 

1 J. Gasquct, Cezanne, p. 81. 

2 KofTka, Some problems of space perception, pp. 164 and if. 

* 'moment* (Translator's note). 
262 



SPACE 



our visual field, tending always towards the most determinate form? 
Are we not now going back to realism? Let us take an example. 
Organization in depth is destroyed if I add to the ambiguous drawing 
not simply any lines (Fig. 3 stubbornly remains a cube) but lines 
which disunite the elements of one and the same plane and join up 
those of different planes (Fig. I). 1 What do we mean when we say 
that these lines themselves bring about the destruction of depth? Are 
we not talking the language of associationism? We do not mean that 
the line EH (Fig. 1), acting as a cause, disorganizes the cube into 
which it is introduced, but that it induces a general grasp which is not 
the grasp in depth. It is understood that the line EH itself possesses 




an individuality only if I grasp it in that light, if I run over it and trace 
it out myself. But this grasp and this delineation are not arbitrary. 
They are indicated or recommended by phenomena. The demand here 
is not an overriding one, simply because it is a question of an am- 
biguous figure, but, in a normal visual field, the segregation of planes 
and outlines is irresistible; for example, when I walk along an avenue, 
I cannot bring myself to see the spaces between the trees as things and 
the trees themselves as a background. It is certainly I who have the 
experience of the landscape, but in this experience I am conscious of 
taking up a factual situation, of bringing together a significance dis- 
persed among phenomena, and of saying what they of their own ac- 
cord mean. Even in cases where the organization is ambiguous and 
where I can vary it, I do not directly succeed in doing so: one of the 
faces of the cube moves into the foreground only if I first look at it 
and if my gaze makes it its starting point from which to follow the 
oblique lines to the second face, which shows up as an indeterminate 
background. If I see Fig. 1 as a mosaic pattern, it is on condition that 
I first of all concentrate my gaze on the centre, and then distribute it 
equally and simultaneously over the whole figure. As Bergson waits 
for the lump of sugar to dissolve, I sometimes have to wait for the 

1 Koffka, Some problems of space perception, pp. 164 and fF. 
263 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

organization to come about. All the more is it the case that in normal 
perception the significance of what is perceived appears to me as 
built into it and not constituted by me, and the gaze as a sort of 
knowledge machine, which takes things as they need to be taken in 
order to become a spectacle, or which divides them up in accordance 
with their natural articulations. It is true that the straight line EH 
counts as straight only if I run my eye along it, but it is not a matter 
of a mental inspection, but of an inspection by the gaze, which means 
that my act is not primary or constituting, but called forth or 
motivated. Every focus is always a focus on something which pre- 
sents itself as to be focused upon. When I focus upon the face ABCD 
of the cube, that does not only mean that I bring it to the state of 
being clearly visible, but also that I make it count as a figure and as 
nearer to me than the other face; in a word I organize the cube, and 
the gaze is that perceptual genius underlying the thinking subject 
which can give to things the precise reply that they are awaiting in 
order to exist before us. 

What, then, to sum up, is seeing a cube? It is, say empiricists, as- 
sociating, with the actual aspect of the drawing presented, a set of 
other appearances, those which it would present at closer quarters, 
from the side, from various angles. But, when I see a cube, I do not 
find any of these images in myself; they are the small change of a 
perception of depth which makes them possible, but which does not 
result from them. What, then, is this single act whereby I grasp the 
possibility of all these appearances? It is, according to intellectual- 
ism, the thought of the cube as a solid made up of six equal faces and 
twelve equal lines at right angles to each other — and depth is nothing 
but the co-existence of the faces and the equal lines. But here again 
we are being given as a definition of depth what is no more than a 
consequence of it. The six faces and twelve equal lines are not the 
whole significance of depth, and yet this definition has no meaning 
without depth. The six faces and twelve lines can both co-exist and 
remain equal for me only if they are arranged in depth. The act 
which corrects the appearances, giving to the acute or obtuse angles 
the value of right angles, to the distorted sides the value of a square, 
is not the idea of the geometrical relations of equality, and the geo- 
metrical mode of being to which they belong — it is the investing of 
the object by my gaze which penetrates and animates it, and shows up 
immediately the lateral faces as 'squares seen askew', to the extent 
that we do not even sec them in their diamond-shaped, perspective 
aspect. This being simultaneously present in experiences which are 
nevertheless mutually exclusive, this implication of one in the other, 
this contraction into one perceptual act of a whole possible process, 
constitute the originality of depth. It is the dimension in which 

264 



SPACE 



things or elements of things envelop each other, whereas breadth and 
height are the dimensions in which they are juxtaposed. 

One cannot, therefore, speak of a synthesis of depth, since a syn- 
thesis presupposes, or at least, like the Kantian synthesis, posits dis- 
crete terms, and since depth does not posit the multiplicity of per- 
spective appearances to be made explicit by analysis, but sees that 
multiplicity only against the background of the stable thing. This 
quasi-synthesis is elucidated if we understand it as temporal. When I 
say that I see an object at a distance, I mean that I already hold it, or 
that I still hold it, it is in the future or in the past as well as being in 
space. 1 It will perhaps be said that it is there only for me: in itself the 
lamp which I perceive exists at the same time as I do, that distance is 
between simultaneous objects, and that this simultaneity is contained 
in the very meaning of perception. No doubt. But co-existence, which 
in fact defines space, is not alien to time, but is the fact of two pheno- 
mena belonging to the same temporal wave. As for the relationship 
of the perceived object to my perception, it does not unite them in 
space and outside time: they are contemporary. The 'order of co- 
existents' is inseparable from the 'order of sequences', or rather time 
is not only the consciousness of a sequence. Perception provides me 
with a 'field of presence' 2 in the broad sense, extending in two dimen- 
sions: the here-there dimension and the past-present-future dimen- 
sion. The second elucidates the first. I 'hold', I 'have' the distant 
object without any explicit positing of the spatial perspective (ap- 
parent size and shape) as I still 'have in hand' 3 the immediate past 
without any distortion and without any interposed 'recollection'. If 
we want to talk about synthesis, it will be, as Husserl says, a 'transi- 
tional synthesis', which does not link disparate perspectives, but 
brings about the 'passage' from one to the other. Psychology has in- 
volved itself in endless difficulties by trying to base memory on the 
possession of certain contents or recollections, the present traces (in 
the body or the unconscious) of the abolished past, for from these 
traces we can never come to understand the recognition of the past 
as past. In the same way we shall never come to understand the per- 
ception of distance if we start from contents presented, so to speak, 
all equidistant, a flat projection of the world, as recollections are a 
projection of the past in the present. And just as memory can be 
understood only as a direct possession of the past with no interposed 
contents, so the perception of distance can be understood only as a 
being in the distance which links up with being where it appears. 

1 The idea of depth as a spatio-temporal dimension is indicated by Straus: 
Vom Sinn der Sinne, pp. 302 and 306. 

2 Husserl, Prusenzfeld. It is defined in Zeitbewusstsein, pp. 32-5. 

3 Ibid. 

265 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

Memory is built out of the progressive and continuous passing of one 
instant into another, and the interlocking of each one, with its whole 
horizon, in the thickness of its successor. The same continuous transi- 
tion implies the object as it is out there, with, in short, its 'real' size 
as I should see it if I were beside it, in the perception that I have of it 
from here. Just as there is no possibility of engaging in any discussion 
of the 'conservation of recollections', but only of a certain way of 
seeing time which brings out the past as an inalienable dimension of 
consciousness, there is no problem of distance, distance being im- 
mediately visible provided that we can find the living present in 
which it is constituted. 

As we pointed out at the beginning, we have to rediscover beneath 
depth as a relation between things or even between planes, which is 
objectified depth detached from experience and transformed into 
breadth, a primordial depth, which confers upon the other its signifi- 
cance, and which is the thickness of a medium devoid of any thing. 
At those times when we allow ourselves simply to be in the world 
without actively assuming it, or in cases of illness favouring this 
passive attitude, different planes are no longer distinguishable, and 
colours are no longer condensed into superficial colours, but are 
diffused round about objects and become atmospheric colours. For 
example, the patient who writes on a sheet of paper has to penetrate a 
certain thickness of whiteness with his pen before reaching the paper. 
This voluminosity varies with the colour in question, and is, as it 
were, the expression of its qualitative essence. 1 There is, then, a depth 
which does not yet operate between objects, which, a fortiori, does 
not yet assess the distance between them, and which is simply the 
opening of perception upon some ghost thing as yet scarcely quali- 
fied. Even in normal perception depth is not initially applicable to 
things. Just as top and bottom, right and left are not given to the 
subject with the perceived contents, and are at each moment consti- 
tuted with a spatial level in relation to which things arrange them- 
selves — in the same way depth and size come to things in virtue of 
their being situated in relation to a level of distances and sizes, 2 
which defines the far and the near, the great and the small, before any 
object arises to provide us with a standard for comparison. When we 
say that an object is huge or tiny, nearby or far away, it is often with- 
out any comparison, even implicit, with any other object, or even with 
the size and objective position of our own body, but merely in rela- 
tion to a certain 'scope' of our gestures, a certain 'hold' of the pheno- 
menal body on its surroundings. If wc refused to recognize this 

1 Gclb and Goldslcin, Ober den Wcgfall dcr Wahrnehmung von Obcr/Itichen- 
farben. 

2 Wcrthcimcr, Cxpcrinicnrclle Siudivn, Anhang, pp. 259 61. 

266 



SPACE 



rootedness of sizes and distances, we should be sent from one Stan- 
dard' object to another and fail ever to understand how sizes or dis- 
tances can exist for us. The pathological experience of micropsy or 
macropsy, altering as it does the apparent size of all the objects in the 
field, leaves no standard in relation to which objects can appear 
either larger or smaller than usual, and is to be understood only 
by reference to a pre-objective standard of distances and sizes. 
Thus depth cannot be understood as belonging to the thought of 
an acosmic subject, but as a possibility of a subject involved in the 
world. 

This analysis of depth links up with the one which we have tried to 
make of height and breadth. If, in this section, we first of all set depth 
over against the other dimensions, this was merely because they ap- 
pear, at first sight, to be concerned with the relationships of things 
among themselves, whereas depth immediately reveals the link be- 
tween the subject and space. But we saw above that in reality the 
vertical and horizontal too are ultimately to be defined jis the best 
hold our body can take upon the world. Breadth and height, as rela- 
tions between objects, are derivative, and, viewed in their primary 
significance, they too are 'existential' dimensions. We cannot be con- 
tent to say with Lagneau and Alain that height and breadth pre- 
suppose depth because a spectacle on a single plane supposes the 
equidistance of all its parts from the plane of my face: this analysis 
concerns only breadth, height and depth already objectified, and not 
the experience which opens these dimensions to us. The vertical and 
the horizontal, the near and the far are abstract designations for one 
single form of being in a situation, and they presuppose the same 
setting face to face of subject and world. 

Movement is a displacement or change of position, even if it can- 
not be defined as such. As we initially encountered an idea of posi- 
tion which defines it in terms of relationships in objective space, so 
there is an objective conception of movement which defines it in 
terms of relations within the world, taking the experience of the 
world for granted. And just as we had to trace back the origin of 
the positing of space to the pre-objective situation or locality of the 
subject fastening himself on to his environment, so we shall have to 
rediscover, beneath the objective idea of movement, a pre-objective 
experience from which it borrows its significance, and in which move- 
ment, still linked to the person perceiving it, is a variation of the 
subject's hold on his world. When we try to think of movement, and 
arrive at a philosophy of movement, we immediately place ourselves 
in a critical or verificatory attitude, we ask ourselves what precisely 
is given to us in movement, we make ready to reject appearances in 

267 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

order to reach the truth concerning movement, and wc remain un- 
aware that it is precisely this attitude which reduces the phenomenon 
and must prevent us from coming to grips with it, because it intro- 
duces, with the notion of truth in itself, assumptions liable to conceal 
from me the genesis of movement for me. Suppose that I throw a 
stone. It hurtles across the garden. For a moment it becomes an in- 
distinct meteor-like object, and then a stone again when it falls to the 
ground some distance away. If I want to think 'clearly' about the 
phenomenon, it has to be decomposed. The stone itself, I shall say, 
is in reality not modified by movement. It is the same stone that I 
held in my hand, and that I now find again on the ground at the end 
of its flight, and therefore it is the same stone that moved through the 
air. Movement is merely an accidental attribute of the moving body, 
and it is not, so to speak, seen in the stone. It can be only a change in 
the relations between the stone and its surroundings. We can speak 
of movement only so long as it is the same stone which persists 
through the different relations with those surroundings. If, on the 
other hand, I suppose that the stone is abolished on arriving at point 
P, and that another identical stone arises out of nothingness at point 
P' which is as close as we like to make it to the first, we no longer have 
one single movement, but two. There is, then, no movement without 
a moving body which bears it uninterruptedly from start to finish. 
Since it is in no way inherent in the moving body, and consists wholly 
in its relations with its surroundings, movement cannot dispense with 
an external landmark, and indeed there is no way of attributing it 
strictly to the 'body in motion' rather than to the landmark. Once 
the distinction has been established between the body in motion and 
movement, there is no movement without a moving body, no move- 
ment without an objective landmark, and no absolute movement. 
Nevertheless this idea of movement is in fact a negation of move- 
ment: to distinguish strictly between movement and the moving 
object is to say that strictly speaking the 'moving body* docs not move. 
If the stone-in-motion is not in some way different from the stone at 
rest, it is never in motion (nor for that matter at rest). As soon as we 
bring in the idea of a moving body which remains the same through- 
out its motion, Zeno's arguments become valid once more. It is, then, 
useless to object that we must not regard motion as a scries of dis- 
continuous positions successively occupied in a series of discon- 
tinuous instants, and that space and time are not made up from a 
collection of discrete elements. For even if we consider two ultimate 
instants and two ultimate points, the difference between them in each 
case being smaller than any given quantity, and their differentiation 
being at an incipient stage, the idea of a moving body identical 
throughout the phases of motion excludes, as a mere appearance, the 

268 



SPACE 



phenomenon of 'shift', and implies the idea of a spatial and temporal 
position always identifiable in itself, even if it is not so for us, and 
therefore that of a stone which always is and never changes. Even if 
we invent a mathematical instrument which allows account to be 
taken of an indefinite multiplicity of positions and instants, it is im- 
possible to conceive in one and the same moving body the very act 
of transition which always occurs between two instants and two posi- 
tions, in whatever proximity to each other we choose them. So that, 
in thinking clearly about movement, I do not understand how it can 
ever begin for me, and be given to me as a phenomenon. 

And yet I walk, I have the experience of movement in spite of the 
demands and dilemmas of clear thought, which means, in defiance of 
all reason, that I perceive movements without any 
identical moving object, without any external land- r 
mark and without any relativity. If we present to C/> 
a subject alternately two lines of light A and B, A 
the subject sees a continuous movement from A 
to B, then from B to A, then again from A to B I 1 — 1 
and so on, even though no intermediate position ^ 
or indeed the extreme positions be given for them- Fig. 1 

selves ; we have one single line ceaselessly moving 
back and forth. It is, however, possible to bring out distinctly the 
extreme positions by quickening up or slowing down the speed of 
presentation. The stroboscopic movement then tends to be broken 
up : the line appears first of all held in position A, theri suddenly frees 
itself and jumps to position B. If we go on accelerating or slowing 
down the rhythm, the stroboscopic movement comes to an end and 
we are left with two simultaneous lines or two successive ones. 1 The 
perception of positions, therefore, varies inversely as that of move- 
ment. It is even possible to show that movement is never the successive 
occupation, by a moving body, of every position between two ex- 
tremes. If, for the stroboscopic movement, we use white or coloured 
figures on a black background, the space through which the move- 
ment extends is at no time illuminated or coloured by it. If, between 
the extreme positions A and B, we interpose a short rod C, the rod is 
at no time completed by the passing movement (Fig. 1). We have 
not a 'passage of the line', but a pure 'passage'. If we work with a 
tachistoscope, the subject often perceives a movement without being 
able to say what it is that moves. When it is a question of real move- 
ments, the situation is no different : if I watch workmen unloading a 
lorry and throwing bricks from one to another, I see the man's arm in 
its initial and then in its final position, yet, although I do not see it in 
any intermediate position, I have a vivid perception of its movement. 
1 Wertheimer, Experiment elk Studien, pp. 212-14. 
269 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



If I quickly move a pencil across a sheet of paper on which I have 
marked a point, at no instant am I conscious of the pencil's being over 
the point; I see none of the intermediate positions and yet I am aware 
of movement. Conversely, if I slow down the movement and succeed 
in not losing sight of the pencil, at that very moment the impression 
of motion disappears. 1 The movement disappears at the very moment 
when it conforms most closely with the definition which objective 
thought gives of it. Thus one can obtain phenomena in which the mov- 
ing object appears only as caught up in movement. For such an object 
moving is not passing successively through an indefinite series of 
positions, it is given only as beginning, pursuing or completing its 
movement. Consequently, even in cases where the moving object is 
visible, movement does not bear to it the relation of an extrinsic 
entity, a relation between it and the outside, and we shall be able to 
have movement without any fixed mark. Indeed, if we project the 
consecutive image of a movement on to a homogeneous field contain- 
ing no object and having no outline, the movement takes possession 
of the whole space, and what is shifting is the whole visual field, as 
in the Haunted House at the fair. If we project on to the screen the 
post-image of a spiral revolving round its centre, in the absence of any 
fixed framework, space itself vibrates and dilates from the centre to 
the periphery. 2 Finally, since motion is no longer a system of relations 
external to the object in motion, nothing now prevents us from recog- 
nizing absolute movements, such as perception actually presents to 
us constantly. 

But to this description the objection can always be raised that it is 
meaningless. The psychologist rejects the rational analysis of motion, 
and when it is pointed out to him that all movement, in order to be 
movement, must be movement of something, he replies that 'that has 
no basis in psychological description'. 3 But if what the psychologist 
describes is a movement, it must be related to some one identical 
thing which moves. If I place my watch on the table of my room, and 
it suddenly disappears only to reappear a few seconds later on the 
table in the next room, I do not say that there has been motion; 4 
there is motion only if the intermediate positions have been actually 
occupied by the watch. Even though the psychologist may show that 
stroboscopic motion is produced without any intermediate stimulus 
between the extreme positions, and even that the luminous line A does 
not travel through the space which separates it from B, that no light 
is perceived between A and B during stroboscopic motion, and, in 

1 Wertheimer, Experimcntelle Studien, pp. 221-33. 

2 Ibid., pp. 254-5. 3 Ibid., p. 245. 

4 Linkc, Phanomenologie unci Experiment in cler R age tier Bewegungsauffassung, 
p. 653. 

270 



SPACE 



fact, that I do not sec the pencil or the workman's arm between the 
two extreme positions, the fact remains that in some way or other the 
moving body must have been present at each point of the journey for 
movement to be apparent, and though it is not perceptibly present in 
all these places, it is thought of as there. What is true of movement is 
true of change: when I say that the fakir changes an egg into a hand- 
kerchief, or that the magician changes himseif into a bird on the roof 
of his palace 1 1 do not mean merely that, an object or a being has dis- 
appeared and been immediately replaced by another. There must be 
some internal relationship between what is abolished and what comes 
into being; both must be two manifestations or two appearances, or 
two stages of one and the same something which is presented succes- 
sively in two forms. 2 In the same way the arrival of movement at a 
point must be one with its departure from the 'adjacent' point, and 
this takes place only if there is an object in motion which simul- 
taneously leaves one place and occupies another. 'A something which 
is apprehended as a circle would cease to count for us as a circle the 
moment "roundness" or the identity of all the diameters, which is 
essential, to the circle, ceased to be present in it. Whether the circle 
be perceived or visualized, is a matter of indifference; a common 
specificness needs to be present which forces us in either case to 
characterize as a circle the thing presented to us, and to distinguish 
it from any other phenomenon.' 3 Similarly when we speak of a sensa- 
tion of movement, or of a consciousness sui generis of movement, or, 
like the Gestalt psychologists, of a global movement, a phenomenon 
$ in which no moving object and no particular position of a moving 
object is given, this is merely verbiage unless we say how 'what is 
given in this sensation or this phenomenon, or what is grasped 
through them, is immediately conveyed (dokumentiert) as move- 
ment'. 4 Perception of movement can be perception of movement and 
recognition of it as such, only if it is apprehension of it with its signi- 
ficance as movement, and with all the instants which constitute it, 
and in particular with the identity of the object in motion. Move- 
ment, the psychologist replies, is 'one of those "psychic phenomena" 
which, like given sense contents such as colour and form, are related 
to the object, appearing as objective and not subjective, but which, 
unlike other mental data, are not of a static but of a dynamic nature. 
For example, the characteristic and specific "passing effect" is the 
flesh and blood of movement which cannot be composed from ordi- 
nary visual contents'. 5 Indeed it is not possible to build motion out 

1 Linke, Phanomenologie und Experiment in der Frage dcr Bewegungsauffassung, 
po. 656-7. 

2 Ibid. 3 Ibid., p. 660. 4 Ibid., p. 661. 
5 Wertheimer, op. cit., p. 227. 

271 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

of static perceptions. But we arc not concerned with this, and there 
is no question of trying to reduce movement to a state of rest. The 
object at rest also needs identification. It cannot be said to be at rest 
if it is constantly annihilated and recreated, and if it does not survive 
through its different instantaneous presentations. The identity to 
which we refer is, therefore, anterior to the distinction between move- 
ment and rest. Motion is nothing without a body in motion which 
describes and provides it with unity. Here the metaphor of the dyna- 
mic phenomenon leads the psychologist astray: it seems to us that a 
force itself ensures its unity, but this is because we always suppose 
that someone is there to identify it in the development of its effects. 
'Dynamic phenomena' take their unity from me who live through 
them, and who effect their synthesis. Thus we pass from an idea of 
movement which is destructive of it to an experience of movement 
which tries to provide it with a basis, but also from this experience to 
an idea without which, strictly speaking, the experience is meaning- 
less. 

We cannot, then, regard either the psychologist or the logician as 
vindicated, or rather both must be considered vindicated and we must 
find a means of recognizing thesis and antithesis as both true. The 
logician is right when he demands some constitution of the 'dynamic 
phenomenon' itself, and a description of movement in terms of the 
moving object which we follow through its course — but he is wrong 
when he presents the identity of the object in motion as an express 
identity, and this he is forced to recognize himself. The psychologist, 
on the other hand, when describing phenomena as faithfully as pos- 
sible, is led in spite of himself to put a moving body into movement, 
but he recovers the advantage through the concrete way in which he 
conceives this body. In the discussion which we have just followed, 
and which serves to illustrate the everlasting debate between psycho- 
logy and logic, what, in the last resort, does Wertheimer mean? He 
means that the perception of movement is not secondary to the per- 
ception of the moving object, that we have not a perception of the 
latter here, then there, followed by an identification linking these posi- 
tions in a succession, 1 that their diversity is not subsumed under any 
transcendent unity, and that in short the identity of the object in 
motion flows directly from 'experience'. 2 In other words, when the 
psychologist speaks of movement as a phenomenon which embraces 

1 The identity of the moving object, says Wertheimer, is not the fruit of a con- 
jecture: 'Here and there this must be the same object' (p. 187). 

2 U is true that Wcrlhcimcr docs not say in so many words that the perception 
of motion embraces this immediate identity. He says so only implicitly, when he 
accuses an inlellcctualisl conception, which relates movement to a judgement, of 
giving us an identity which *flicsst nicht direkt aus dem Erlebnis' (p. 187). 

272 



SPACE 

starting point A and arrival point B (AB), he does not mean that there 
is no subject of movement, but that in no case is the subject of move- 
ment an object A initially given as present and static in its place: in 
so far as there is movement, the moving object is caught up in that 
movement. The psychologist would no doubt allow that there is, in 
every movement, if not an object in motion, at least a mobile entity, 
provided that this mobile entity is not confused with any of the static 
figures which can be extracted by halting the movement at any point 
on its course. And here he has the advantage over the logician. For, 
through not having gone back to the experience of movement in- 
dependently of any preconceived notion about the world, the logician 
is talking only about movement in itself, and expressing the problem 
of movement in terms of being, which makes it insoluble in the last 
resort. If we take, he says, different appearances (Erscheinungen) of 
movement at different points on its course, they will be appearances 
of one and the same movement only if they are appearances of one 
and the same object in motion, of one and the same Erscheinende, of 
one and the same something which presents itself (darstellt) through 
them all. But the moving object needs to be posited as a being apart 
only if its appearances at different points have themselves been 
brought into being as discrete perspectives. The logician knows, on 
principle, only positing* consciousness, and it is this postulate, this 
supposition of a wholly determinate world, of pure being, which be- 
devils his conception of multiplicity and consequently of synthesis. 
The moving object or rather, as we have called it, the mobile entity, 
is not identical beneath the phases of movement, it is identical in > 
them. It is not because I find the same stone on the ground that I 
believe in its identity throughout its movement. It is, on the contrary, 
because 1 perceived it as identical during that movement — with an 
implicit identity which remains to be described — that I go to pick it 
up and recover it. We shall not find in the stone-in-movement every- 
thing that we know in other ways about the stone. If what I perceive 
is a circle, says the logician, all its diameters are equal. But, on this 
basis, we should equally have to put into the perceived circle all the 
properties which the geometer has been able and will be able to dis- 
cover in it. Now it is the circle as a thing in the world which possesses 
in advance and in itself all the properties which analysis is destined 
to discover in it. The circular trunks of trees had already, before 
Euclid, the properties that'Euclid discovered in them. But in the 
circle as a phenomenon, as it appeared to the Greeks before Euclid, 
the square of the tangent was not equal to the product of the whole 
chord and its exterior portion: the square and the product did not 
appear in the phenomenon, nor necessarily did the equal radii. The 
* 'thetic' (Translator's note). 
273 



"i hi: world as perceived 

moving object, as object of an indefinite series of explicit and con- 
cordant perceptions, has properties, the mobile entity has only a 
style. What is impossible is that the perceived circle should have un- 
equal diameters or that movement should exist without any mobile 
entity. But for all that, the perceived circle docs not have equal dia- 
meters because it has no diameter at all: it is conveyed to me, and is 
recognizable and distinguishable from any other figure by its circular 
physiognomy, and not by any of the 'properties' which positing* 
thought may subsequently discover in it. Similarly movement does 
not necessarily presuppose a moving object, that is, an object defined 
in terms of a collection of determinate properties; it is sufficient that 
it should include 'something that moves', or at the most 'something 
coloured' or 'luminous' without any actual colour or light. The logi- 
cian excludes this middle term: the radii of the circle must be cither 
equal or unequal, motion must either have or not have a moving 
body. But he can do so only by taking the circle as a thing or by tak- 
ing movement in itself. Now we have seen that this amounts to 
making motion impossible. The logician would have nothing to 
conceive, not even an appearance of movement, if there were not a 
movement anterior to the objective world which is the source of all 
our assertions about movement, if there were not phenomena anterior 
to being, which one can recognize, identify, and talk about, in a word, 
which have a significance, even though they arc not yet thematized. J 
It is to this phenomenal layer that the psychologist leads us back. We 
do not say that it is irrational or anti-logical. This would be so only 
of the positing of a movement without an object in motion. Only the 
explicit denial of the moving object would be contrary to the principle 
of the excluded middle. We need to say merely that the phenomenal 
layer is literally prclogical and will always remain so. Our image of 

* 'Miotic' (Translator's note). 

1 Linkc eventually concedes (op. cit., pp. 664-5) that the subject of movement 
can be indeterminate (as when we sec, in stroboscopic presentation, a triangle 
moving towards a circle and being transformed into it), that the object in motion 
has no need to be posited by an act of explicit perception, that it is merely a 'co- 
target' or 'co-apprchension 1 in the perception of movement, that it is seen only 
as the backs of objects or the space hehind me arc seen, and that finally the 
idc.ntity of the moving object, like the unity of the thing perceived, is apprehended 
through a categorial perception (I lusscrl) in which the category is operative with- 
out being conceived for itself. Rut the notion of categorial perception once more 
calls the whole of the preceding analysis into question. For it amounts to intro- 
ducing non-thctic consciousness into the perception of movement, that is, as we 
have shown, it amounts to rejecting not only the a priori as essential necessity, 
but also the Kantian notion of synthesis. Linkc's work belongs to, and is typical 
of, the second period of Husserlian phenomenology, which marks a transition 
from the cidelic method or logicism of the earlier stage to the existentialism of 
lh^ last period. 

274 



SPACE 

the world can be made up only in part of actual being, and we must 
find a place in it for the phenomenal realm which surrounds being on 
all sides. We are not asking the logician to take into consideration 
experiences which, in the light of reason, are nonsensical or contra- 
dictory, we merely want to push back the boundaries of what makes 
sense for us, and reset the narrow zone of thematic significance within 
that of non-thematic significance which embraces it. The thematiza- 
tion of movement ends with the identical object in motion and with 
the relativity of movement, which means that it destroys movement. 
If we want to take the phenomenon of movement seriously, we shall 
need to conceive a world which is not made up only of things, but 
which has in it also pure transitions. The something in transit which 
we have recognized as necessary to the constitution of a change is to 
be defined only in terms of the particular manner of its 'passing'. For 
example, the bird which flies across my garden is, during the time that 
it is moving, merely a greyish power of flight and, generally speaking, 
we shall see that things arc defined primarily in terms of their 'be- 
haviour' and not in terms of their static 'properties'. It is not I who 
recognize, in each of the points and instants passed through, the same 
bird defined by explicit characteristics, it is the bird in flight which 
constitutes the unity of its movement, which changes its place, it is 
this flurry of plumage still here, which is already there in a kind of 
ubiquity, like the comet with its tail. Pre-objective being, the non- 
thematized mobile entity sets merely the problem of implied space 
and time which we have already discussed. We said that the parts of 
space seen as breadth, height or depth, are not juxtaposed, but that 
they co-exist because they are all drawn into the hold that our body 
takes upon the world. This relation was already elucidated when we 
showed that it is temporal before being spatial. Tilings co-exist in 
space because they are present to the same perceiving subject and 
enveloped in one and the same temporal wave. But the unity and 
individuality of each temporal wave is possible only if it is wedged in 
between the preceding and the following one, and if the same tem- 
poral pulsation which produces it still retains its predecessor and 
anticipates its successor. It is objective time which is made up of suc- 
cessive moments. The lived present holds a past and a future within 
its thickness. The phenomenon of movement merely displays spatial 
and temporal implications in a more striking way. We know of move- 
ment and a moving entity without being in any way aware of objec- 
tive positions, as we know of an object at a distance and of its true 
size without any interpretation, and as we know every moment the 
place of an event in the thickness of our past without any express 
recollection. Motion is a modulation of an already familiar setting, 
and once more it leads us back to our central problem, which is how 

275 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



this setting, which acts as a background to every act of consciousness, 
comes to be constituted. 1 

The positing of an identical mobile object led to the relativity of 
movement. Now that we have reintroduced movement into the object 

1 This problem cannot be posed without already outrunning realism and, for 
example, the celebrated descriptions of Bergson. Bergson's alternative to the 
multiplicity of things externally juxtaposed is the 'multiplicity of fusion and inter- 
penetration' of consciousness. He proceeds by way of dilution, speaking of con- 
sciousness as if it were a liquid in which instants and positions dissolve. In it he 
looks for an element in which their dispersal is really abolished. The indivisible 
action of my arm as I move it gives me that movement which I cannot find in 
external space, because my movement, when put back into my internal life, re- 
discovers there the unity of inextension. The lived-through which Bergson sets 
over against the thought-about is for him an experience, an immediate 'datum'. 
But this is to seek a solution in ambiguity. Space, motion and time cannot be 
elucidated by discovering an 'inner' layer of experience in which their multiplicity 
is erased and really abolished. For if this happens, neither space, nor movement, 
nor time remains. The consciousness of my gesture, if it is truly a state of un- 
divided consciousness, is no longer consciousness of movement at all, but an 
incommunicable quality which can tell us nothing about movement. As Kant 
said, external experience is necessary to internal experience, which is indeed in- 
communicable, but incommunicable because meaningless. If, in virtue of the 
principle of continuity, the past still belongs to the present and the present already 
to the past, there is no longer any past or present. If consciousness snowballs upon 
itself, it is, like the snowball and everything else, wholly in the present. If the 
phases of movement gradually merge into one another, nothing is anywhere in 
motion. The unity of time, space and movement cannot come about through any 
coalescence, and cannot be understood cither by any real operation. If conscious- 
ness is multiplicity, who is to gather together this multiplicity in order to experi- 
ence it as such, and if consciousness is fusion, how shall it come to know the 
multiplicity of the moments which it fuses together? Against Bergson's realism, 
the Kantian idea of synthesis is seen to be valid, and consciousness as an agent of 
this synthesis cannot be confused with any thing at all, even a fluid one. What is 
for us primary and immediate, is a flux which does spread outwards like a liquid, 
but which, in an active sense, bears itself along, which it cannot do without know- 
ing that it does so, and without drawing itself together in the same act whereby 
it bears itself along — it is that 'time which docs not pass' of which Kant some- 
where speaks. For us, then, the unity of movement is not a real unity. But neither 
is multiplicity real, and what we object to in the idea of synthesis in Kant, as in 
certain Kantian texts of Husserl, is precisely that it presupposes, at least theoretic- 
ally, a real multiplicity which consciousness has to surmount. What for us is 
primary consciousness is not a transcendental Ego freely positing before itself a 
multiplicity in itself, and constituting it throughout from start to finish, it is an / 
which dominates diversity only with the help of time, and for whom freedom itself 
is a destiny, so that I am never conscious of being the absolute creator of time, 
of composing the movement through which I live, 1 have the impression that it is 
the mobile entity itself which changes its position, and which effects the passage 
from one instant or one position to another. This relative and prcpcrsonal / who 
provides the basis for the phenomenon of movement, and in general the phe- 
nomenon of the real, clearly demands someelucidation. Let us say for the moment 
that we prefer, to the notion of synthesis, that of synopsis, which does not yet 
point to an cxplic.t positing of diversity. 

276 



SPACE 

in motion, this is to be interpreted in one sense only: it is in the mov- 
ing object that it begins, and from there spreads into the field. I can- 
not force myself to see the stone as motionless, and the garden and 
myself as in motion. Motion is not a hypothesis, the probability of 
which is measured as in physical theory by the number of facts 
which it co-ordinates. That would give only possible movement, 
whereas movement is a fact. The stone is not conceived, but seen, in 
motion. For the hypothesis: 'It is the stone which is moving' would 
have no distinctive meaning, and would be indistinguishable from 
the hypothesis: Tt is the garden which is moving', if motion both in 
fact and for reflection amounted to a mere change of relationships. 
It therefore inhabits the stone. And yet are we to recognize the psy- 
chologist's realism as fully justified? Are we going to put motion into 
the stone as a quality? It does not presuppose any relationship to an 
expressly perceived object,' and remains possible in a perfectly homo- 
geneous field. The fact remains that every object in motion is given 
in a field. Just as we need a mobile entity in movement, we need a 
basis for movement. It has been wrongly asserted that the edges of the 
visual field always furnish an objectively stable point. 1 Once again, 
the edge of the visual field is not a real line. Our visual field is not 
neatly cut out of our objective world, and is not a fragment with 
sharp edges like the landscape framed by the window. We see as far 
as our hold on things extends, far beyond the zone of clear vision, 
and even behind us. When we reach the limits of the visual field, we 
do not pass from vision to non-vision: the gramophone playing in 
the next room, and not expressly seen by me, still counts in my visual 
field. Conversely, what we see is always in certain respects not seen: 
there must be hidden sides of things, and things 'behind us', if there 
is to be a 'front' of things, and things 'in front of us, in short, percep- 
tion. The limits of the visual field are a necessary stage in the or- 
ganization of the world, and not an objective outline. But it is never- 
theless true that an object crosses our visual field, and changes its 
place in it, and that movement has no meaning outside this relation- 
ship. According as we give to a certain part of the field the value of 
figure or background, it appears to us to be moving or at rest. If we 
are on a ship sailing along the coast, it is true, as Leibnitz said, that 
we can watch the coast flowing by in front of us, or take it as a fixed 
point and feel the boat in motion. Do we then concede the logician 
his case? Not at all, for to say that motion is a structural pheno- 
menon is not to say that it is 'relative'. The very peculiar relationship 
which constitutes movement does not exist between objects, and is 
one which the psychologist, far from overlooking it, describes better 
than the logician. It is the coast which slips by if we keep our eyes 
1 Wertheimer, op. cit., pp. 255-6. 
277 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

fixed on the rail, and the boat which glides along if we look at the 
coast. Of two points of light seen in the dark, one static and the other 
moving, it is the one which one is looking at which appears to be in 
motion. 1 The cloud floats over the steeple and the river flows under 
the bridge, if it is the cloud and the, river that we are looking at. The 
steeple falls across the sky and the bridge slides over a static river if 
we are looking at the steeple or the bridge. 

What makes part of the field count as an object in motion, and an- 
other as the background, is the way in which we establish our rela- 
tions with them by the act of looking. The stone flies through the air. 
What do these words mean, other than that our gaze, lodged anc} 
anchored in the garden, is attracted by the stone and, so to speak, 
drags at its anchors? The relation between the moving object and its 
background passes through our body. How is this bodily mediation 
to be conceived ? How does it come about that the relations of objects 
to it can differentiate them as in motion or at rest? Is not our body an 
object, and does it not itself need to be determinate in relation to 
rest and movement? It is often said that when we move our eyes, 
objects remain static for us because we take account of the shift of 
the eyes and that, finding it exactly proportionate to the change of 
appearances, we conclude in favour of the immobility of objects. In 
fact, if we are not conscious of any movement of the eye, as in the 
case of a passive shift of the gaze, the object seems to move. If, in 
paresis of the oculo-motor muscles, we have the illusion of a move- 
ment of the eye, without any apparent change in the relation of ob- 
jects to the eye, we think we see a movement of the object. It seems 
at first as if, the relation of the object to our eye, as it is imprinted on 
the retina, being given to consciousness, the state of rest or degree of 
movement of objects is arrived at by a process of subtraction, in 
which we take into account the shift or immobility of our eye. In 
fact, this analysis is entirely artificial, and such as to conceal from us 
the real relationship between our body and the spectacle. When I 
transfer my gaze from one object to another, I am unaware of my 
eye as an object, as a globe set in an orbit, of its movement or state of 
rest in objective space, or of what these throw upon the retina. The 
figures for the alleged calculation are not given to me. The immobility 
of the thing is not inferred from the act of looking, it is strictly simul- 
taneous with it, and the two phenomena envelop each other: what 
we have is not two terms of an algebraic expression, but two 
'moments' in an organization which embraces them both. My eye for 

1 The laws governing the phenomenon would seem, then, to need more precise 
statement: what is certain is that there are laws, and that the perception of move- 
ment, even when it is ambiguous, is not arbitrary and depends on the static point. 
Cf. Duncker, (Jber induzierte Bewegung. 

278 



SPACE 

me is a certain power of making contact with things, and not a screen 
on which they are projected. The relation of my eye to the object is 
not given to me in the form of a geometrical projection of the object 
in the eye, but as it were a hold taken by my eye upon the object, in- 
distinct in marginal vision, but closer and more definite when I focus 
upon the object. What I lack when my eye moves passively, is not the 
objective representation of its shift in the orbit, which in any case is 
not given to me, but the exact gearing of my gaze to objects, without 
which they are incapable of fixity, or indeed of genuine movement: 
for when I press on my eyeball, I do not perceive a true movement, 
the things themselves are not moving, but only a thin film on their 
surface. In short, in cases of oculo-motor paresis, I do not explain the 
constancy of the retinal image in terms of movement on the part of 
the object, but I experience that the grip of my gaze on the object 
does not relax, my gaze carries it and displaces it along with itself. 
Thus my eye is never in the perception of an object. If we can ever 
speak of movement without an object in motion, it is pre-eminently 
in the case of our own body. The movement of my eye towards the 
thing upon which it is about to focus is not the displacement of an 
object in relation to another object, but progress towards reality. My 
eye is in motion or at rest in relation to a thing which it is approach- 
ing or from which it is receding. In so far as the body provides the 
perception of movement with the ground or basis which it needs in 
order to become established, it is as a power of perception, rooted in 
a certain domain and geared to a world. Rest and movement appear 
between an object which, in itself, is not determinate in relation to 
either, and my body of which, as an object, the same is true when my 
body anchors itself in certain objects. Like top and bottom, motion is 
a phenomenon of levels, every movement presupposing a certain 
anchorage which is variable. So much can validly be said when we 
talk obscurely about the relativity of movement. Now what precisely 
is the anchorage and how docs it constitute a background at rest? It 
is not an explicit perception. The points of anchorage, when we focus 
on them, are not objects. The steeple begins to move only when I 
leave the sky in the margin of vision. It is essential to the alleged fixed 
points underlying motion that they should not be posited in present 
knowledge and that they should always be 'already there'. They do 
not present themselves directly to perception, they circumvent it and 
encompass it by a preconscious process, the results of which strike us 
as ready made. Cases of ambiguous perception in which we can at 
will choose our anchorage are those in which our perception is arti- 
ficially cut off from its context and its past, in which we do not per- 
ceive with our whole being, in which we play a game with our body 
and with that generality which enables it at any time to break with 

279 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



any historical commitment and to function on its own account. But 
although we can break with a human world, we cannot help focusing 
our eyes — which means that as long as we live we remain committed, 
if not in a human setting, at least in a physical one — and for any given 
focus of the gaze, perception is not arbitrary. Still less is it arbitrary 
when the life of the body is integrated to our concrete existence.^ I 
can at will see my own train or the train next to it in motion whether 
on the one hand I do nothing or on the other consider the illusions of 
motion. But 'when I am playing at cards in my compartment, I see 
the neighbouring train move off, even if it is really mine which is 
starting; when I look at the other train and try to pick out someone, 
then it is my own train which is set in motion'. 1 The compartment 
which we happen to occupy is 'at rest', its walls are 'vertical' and the 
landscape slips by before our eyes, and on a hill the firs seen through 
the window appear to us to slope. If we stand at the window, we 
return to the great world beyond our small one, the firs straighten 
themselves and remain stationary, and the train leans with the slope 
and speeds through the countryside. The relativity of motion reduces 
itself to the power which we have of changing our domain within the 
great world. Once involved in a setting, we see motion appear before 
us as an absolute. Provided that we take into account, not only acts 
of explicit knowledge, cogitationes, but also that more occult act, 
always in the past, by which we gave ourselves a world, provided that 
we recognize a non-thetic * consciousness, we can allow what the psy- 
chologist calls absolute movement without falling into the difficulties 
of realism, and understand the phenomenon of movement without 
allowing our logic to destroy it. 

We have so far considered, as do traditional philosophy and psy- 
chology, only the perception of space, that is, the knowledge that a 
disinterested subject might acquire of the spatial relationships be- 
tween objects and their geometrical characteristics. And yet, even in 
analysing this abstract function, which is far from covering the whole 
of our experience of space, we have been led to bring out, as the 
condition of spatiality, the establishment of the subject in a setting, 
and finally his inherence in a world. In other words, we have been 
forced to recognize that spatial perception is a structural pheno- 
menon and is comprehensible only within a perceptual field which 
contributes in its entirety to motivating the spatial perception by 
suggesting to the subject a possible anchorage. The traditional prob- 
lem of the perception of space and perception generally must be 

1 KofTka, Perception, p. 578. 

* I.e., non-posiiing (Translaloi \ nole). 
2S0 



SPACE 



reintegrated into a vaster problem. To ask how one can, in an ex- 
plicit act, determine spatial relationships and objects with their pro- 
perties', is to ask a second order question, to give as primary an act 
which appears only against the background of an already familiar 
world, to admit that one has not yet become conscious of the ex- 
perience of the world. In the natural attitude, I do not have percep- 
tions, I do not posit this object as beside that one, along with their 
objective relationships, I have a flow of experiences which imply and 
explain each other both simultaneously and successively. Paris for 
me is not an object of many facets, a collection of perceptions, nor is 
it the law governing all these perceptions. Just as a person gives evi- 
dence of the same emotional essence in his gestures with his hands, in 
his way of walking and in the sound of his voice, each express percep- 
tion occurring in my journey through Paris — the cafes, people's 
faces, the poplars along the quays, the bends of the Seine — stands 
out against the city's whole being, and merely confirms that there is a 
certain style or a certain significance which Paris possesses. And when 
I arrived there for the first time, the first roads that I saw as I left the 
station were, like the first words spoken by a stranger, simply mani- 
festations of a still ambiguous essence, but one already unlike any 
other. Just as we do not see the eyes of a familiar face, but simply its 
look and its expression, so we perceive hardly any object. There is 
present a latent significance, diffused throughout the landscape or 
the city, which we find in something specific and self-evident which 
we feel no need to define. Only the ambiguous perceptions emerge as 
explicit acts: perceptions, that is, to which we ourselves give a 
significance through the attitude which we take up, or which answer 
questions which we put to ourselves. They cannot be of any use in 
the analysis of the perceptual field, since they are extracted from it at 
the very outset, since they presuppose it and since we come by them 
by making use of precisely those set groupings with which we have 
become familiar in dealing with the world. 

An initial perception independent of any background is inconceiv- 
able. Every perception presupposes, on the perceiving subject's part, 
a certain past, and the abstract function of perception, as a coming 
together of objects, implies some more occult act by which we elabor- 
ate our environment. Under mescalin it happens that approaching 
objects appear to grow smaller. A limb or other part of the body, the 
hand, mouth or tongue seems enormous, and the rest of the body is 
felt as a mere appendage to it. 1 The walls of the room are 150 yards 
apart, and beyond the walls is merely an empty vastness. The 
stretched-out hand is as high as the wall, and external space and 

1 Mayer-Gross and Stein, Vber einige Abanderungen der Sinnestdtigkeit im 
Meskalinrausch, p. 375. 

281 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

bodily space are divorced from each other to the extent that the 
subject has the impression of eating 'from one dimension to the 
other'. 1 Sometimes motion is no longer seen, and people seem to be 
transported magically from one place to another. 2 The subject is alone 
and forlorn in empty space, 'he complains that all he can see clearly 
is the space between things, and that this space is empty. Objects are 
in a way still there, but not as one would expect. . . .' 3 Men are like 
puppets and their movements are performed in a dreamlike slow- 
motion. The leaves on the trees lose their armature and organization: 
every point on the leaf has the same value as every other. 4 One 
schizophrenic says: 'A bird is twittering in the garden. I can hear the 
bird and I know that it is twittering, but that it is a bird and that it is 
twittering, the two things seem so remote from each other. . . . There 
is a gulf between them, as if the bird and the twittering had nothing 
to do with each other/ 5 Another schizophrenic can no longer manage 
to 'understand' the clock, that is, in the first place the movement of 
the hands from one position to another, and especially the connec- 
tion of this movement with the drive of the mechanism, the 'working* 
of the clock. 6 These disturbances do not affect perception as know- 
ledge of the world: the oversized parts of the body, the too small 
objects near at hand are not posited as such; for the patient the walls 
of the room are not far from each other as are the two ends of a 
football field for a normal person. The subject is well aware that 
his food and his own body reside in the same space, since he takes 
food with his hand. Space is 'empty', and yet all the objects of per- 
ception are there. The disturbance does not affect the information 
which may be derived from perception, but discloses beneath 'per- 
ception' a deeper life of consciousness. Even where there is failure to 
perceive, as with regard to movement, the perceptual deficiency ap- 
pears as no more than an extreme case of a more general disturbance 
of the process of relating phenomena to each other. There is a bird 
and there is twittering, but the bird no longer twitters. There is a 
movement of the clock hands, and a spring, but the clock no longer 
'goes'. In the same way certain parts of the body are enlarged out of 
all proportion, and adjacent objects made too small because the 
whole picture no longer forms a system. Now, if the world is atom- 
ized or dislocated, this is because one's own body has ceased to be a 

1 Mayer-Gross and Stein, Vber einigc Abiindenntgen dcr Sinnvstutigkeit im 
Meskalinrausch, p. 377. 

2 Ibid., p. 381. 

3 Fischer, Zeitstruktur unci Schizophrenic, p. 572. 

4 Mayer-Gross and Stein, op. cit., p. 380. 

* Fischer, op. cit., pp. 558-9. 

* Fischer, Raum-Zeitstruktur unci Denkstbrung in cicr Schizophrenic, pp. 247 
and IT. 

282 



SPACE 



knowing body, and has ceased to draw together ail objects in its one 
grip; and this debasement of the body into an organism must itself 
be attributed to the collapse of time, which no longer rises towards a 
future but falls back on itself. 'Once I was a man, with a soul and a 
living body (Leib) and now I am no more than a being (IVesen). . . . 
Now there remains merely the organism (Korper) and the soul is 
dead. ... I hear and see, but no longer know anything, and living is 
now a problem for me. ... I now live on in eternity. . . . The 
branches sway on the trees, other people come and go in the room, 
but for me time no longer passes. . . . Thinking has changed, and 
there is no longer any style. . . . What is the future? It can no longer 
be reached. . . . Everything is in suspense. . . . Everything is mono- 
tonous, morning, noon, evening, past, present and future. Everything 
is constantly beginning all over again.' 1 The perception of space is 
not a particular class of 'states of consciousness' or acts. Its modali- 
ties are always an expression of the total life of the subject, the energy 
with which he tends towards a future through his body and his world. 2 
We thus find ourselves led to a broadening of our investigation. 
Once the experience of spatiality is related to our implantation in the 
world, there will always be a primary spatiality for each modality of 
this implantation. When, for example, the world of clear and arti- 
culate objects is abolished, our perceptual being, cut off from its 
world, evolves a spatiality without things. This is what happens in 
the night. Night is not an object before me; it enwraps me and infil- 
trates through all my senses, stifling my recollections and almost de- 
stroying my personal identity. I am no longer withdrawn into my 
perceptual look-out from which I watch the outlines of objects mov- 
ing by at a distance. Night has no outlines; it is itself in contact with 
me and its unity is the mystical unity of the mana. Even shouts or a 
distant light people it only vaguely, and then it comes to life in its 
entirety; it is pure depth without foreground or background, without 
surfaces and without any distance separating it from me. 3 All space 
for the reflecting mind is sustained by thinking which relates its parts 
to each other, but in this case the thinking starts from nowhere. On 
the contrary, it is from the heart of nocturnal space that I become 
united with it. The distress felt by neuropaths in the night is caused 
by the fact that it brings home to us our contingency, the uncaused 
and tireless impulse which drives us to seek an anchorage and to sur- 
mount ourselves in things, without any guarantee that we shall always 

1 Fischer, Zeitstruktur unci Schizophrenic, p. 560. 

2 'The schizophrenic symptom is never anything but a path towards the schizo- 
phrenic person.' Kronfeld, quoted by Fischer, Zur Klinik unci Psychologie cles 
Raumlebens y p. 61. 

3 Minkowski, Le Temps vecu, p. 394. 

283 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

find them. But there is a still more striking experience of unreality 
than night provides: I can at night retain the general setting of the 
daytime, as when I grope about in my flat, and in any case night is 
included in the general framework of nature, and there is something 
reassuring and earthly even in pitch black space. During sleep, on the 
other hand, I hold the world present to me only in order to keep it at 
a distance, and I revert to the subjective sources of my existence. The 
phantasms of dreams reveal still more effectively that general spa- 
tiality within which clear space and observable objects are embedded. 
Let us consider, for example, the themes of rising and falling so fre- 
quently met in dreams, as indeed in mythology and poetry. It is well 
known that the appearance of these themes in dreams can be related 
to concomitant respiratory states or sexual drives, and it is a first 
step to recognize the vital and sexual significance of up and down. 
But these explanations do not get us very far, for dreamed-of eleva- 
tion or falling are not to be found in visible space, as are the waking 
perceptions associated with desire and the movement of breathing. 
We must understand why at a given moment the dreamer lends him- 
self wholly to the physical facts of respiration and desire, and thus 
fills them with a general and symbolic significance to the extent of 
seeing them appear in the dream simply as an image — for example, 
the image of a great bird hovering, which, hit by a shot, falls and is 
reduced to a small heap of charred paper. We must understand how 
respiratory or sexual events, which have a place in objective space, 
are drawn away from it in the dream state, and settle in a different 
theatre. But we shall not succeed in doing so unless we endow the 
body, even in the waking state, with an emblematic value. Between 
our emotions, desires and bodily attitudes, there is not only a con- 
tingent connection or even an analogical relationship: if I say that in 
disappointment I am downcast, it is not only because it is accom- 
panied by gestures expressing prostration in virtue of the laws govern- 
ing nervous mechanisms, or because I discover between the objects 
of my desire and my desire itself the same relationship as exists be- 
tween an object placed high above me and my gesture towards it. 
The movement upwards as a direction in physical space, and that of 
desire towards its objective are mutually symbolical, because they 
both express the same essential structure of our being, being situated 
in relation to an environment, of which we have already stated that 
this structure alone gives significance to the directions up and down 
in the physical world. When we speak of an elevated or a low mora- 
lity, we are not extending to the mental a relationship the full signifi- 
cance of which is to be found only in the physical world, we are 
making use of 'a direction of significance which, so to speak, runs 
through the various regional spheres and receives a particular signifi- 

284 



spact: 

cance (spatial, auditory, spiritual, mental, etc.) in each one'. 1 The 
phantasms of dreaming, of mythology, the favourite images of each 
man or indeed poetic imagery, are not linked to their meaning by a 
relation of sign to significance, like the one existing between a tele- 
phone number and the name of the subscriber; they really contain 
their meaning, which is not a notional meaning, but a direction of our 
existence. When I dream that I am flying or falling, the whole sig- 
nificance of the dream is contained in the flight or the fall, as long as 
1 do not reduce them to their physical appearance in the waking 
world, and so long as I take them with all their existential implica- 
tions. The bird which hovers, falls and becomes a handful of ash, does 
not hover and fall in physical space; it rises and falls with the existen- 
tial tide running through it, or again it is the pulse of my existence, 
its systole and diastole. The level of this tide at each moment con- 
ditions a space peopled with phantasms, just as, in waking life, our 
dealings with the world which is offered to us condition a space 
peopled with realities. There is a determining of up and down, and 
in general of place, which precedes 'perception'. Life and sexuality 
haunt their world and their space. Primitive peoples, in so far as they 
live in a world of myth, do not overstep this existential space, and 
this is why for them dreams count just as much as perceptions. There 
is a mythical space in which directions and positions are determined 
by the residence in it of great affective entities. For primitive man, 
knowing the whereabouts of the tribal encampment does not consist 
in locating it in relation to some object serving as a landmark: for it 
is the landmark of all landmarks — it is to tend towards it as towards 
the natural abode of a certain peace or a certain joyfulness, just as, for 
me, to know where my hand is is to link up with that agile power 
which is for the moment dormant, but which I can take up and re- 
discover as my own. For the augur, right and left are the sources of 
the lawful and the forbidden, just as for me my right hand and my 
left are respectively the incarnations of my skill and my awkwardness. 
In dreaming as in myth we learn where the phenomenon is to be 
found, by feeling that towards which our desire goes out, what our 
hearts dreads, on what our life depends. Even in waking life things 
are no different. I arrive in a village for my holidays, happy to leave 
my work and my everyday surroundings. I settle in the village, and 
it becomes the centre of my life. The low level of the river, gathering 
in the maize crop or nutting are events for me. But if a friend comes 
to see me bringing news from Paris, or if the press and radio tell me 
that war threatens, I feel an exile in the village, shut off from real life, 
pushed far away from everything. Our body and our perception 
always summon us to take as the centre of the world that environment 
1 L. Binswanger, Traum unci Exist enz, p. 674. 
285 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



with which they present us. But this environment is not neces- 
sarily that of our own life. I can 'be somewhere else' while staying 
here, and if I am kept far away from what I love, I feel out of touch 
with real life. The Bovary mentality and certain forms of home-sick- 
ness are examples of life which has become decentred. The maniac, 
on the other hand, is centred wherever he is: 'his mental space is 
broad and luminous, and his thought, sensitive to all objects which 
present themselves, flies from one to the other and is caught up in 
their movement'. 1 Besides the physical and geometrical distance 
which stands between myself and all things, a 'lived' distance binds 
me to things which count and exist for me, and links them to each 
other. This distance measures the 'scope' of my life at every moment. 2 
Sometimes between myself and the events there is a certain amount of 
play {Spielraum), which ensures that my freedom is preserved while 
the events do not cease to concern me. Sometimes, on the other 
hand, the lived distance is both too small and too great: the majority 
of the events cease to count for me, while the nearest ones obsess me. 
They enshroud me like night and rob me of my individuality and 
freedom. I can literally no longer breathe; I am possessed. 3 At the 
same time events conglomerate among themselves. One patient feels 
icy blasts of wind, a smell of chestnuts and the coolness of rain. Per- 
haps, he says, 'at that very moment a person undergoing suggestions, 
as I was, was walking in the rain past a roast chestnut stall'. 4 A 
schizophrenic, who is under the care of both Minkowski and a village 
priest, thinks that they have met to discuss him. 5 An old schizophre- 
nic woman thinks that someone who is very like someone else has 
known her. 6 The shrinkage of lived space, which leaves no margin to 
the patient, leaves no room for chance. Like space, causality, before 
being a relation between objects, is based on my relation to things. 
The 'short-circuits' 7 of delirious causality, no less than the long 
causal chains of methodical thought, express ways of existing: 8 'the 

1 Binswanger, Vber ldeenflucht y pp. 78 and fT. 

* Minkowski, Les Notions de distance ve'eue et d'ampleur dc la vie et leur applica- 
tion en psychopathologie. Cf. Le Temps vecu, Chap. VII. 

8 4 In the street, a kind of murmur completely envelops him; similarly he feels 
deprived of his freedom as if there were always people present round about him; 
at the cafe there seems to be something nebulous around him and he feels to be 
trembling; and when the voices are particularly frequent and numerous, the 
atmosphere round him is saturated with a kind of fire, and this produces a sort of 
oppression inside the heart and lungs and something in the nature of a mist round 
about his head.* Minkowski, Le Probldme des Hallucinations et le piobleme de 
VEspace, p. 69. 

4 Ibid. 8 Le Temps vecu, p. 376. 

* Ibid., p. 379. 7 Ibid., p. 381. 

* That is why one can say with Schcler (Idealismus-Realismus, p. 298) that 
Newton's space translates the 'emptiness of the heart'. 

286 



SPACE 



experience of space is interwoven . . . with all the other modes of 
experience and all the other psychic data.' 1 Clear space, that impar- 
tial space in which all objects are equally important and enjoy the 
same right to existence, is not only surrounded, but also thoroughly 
permeated by another spatiality thrown into relief by morbid devia- 
tions from the normal. A schizophrenic patient, in the mountains, 
stops before a landscape. After a short time he feels a threat hanging 
over him. There arises within him a special interest in everything 
surrounding him, as if a question were being put to him from outside 
to which he could find no answer. Suddenly the landscape is snatched 
away from him by some alien force. It is as if a second sky, black and 
boundless, were penetrating the blue sky of evening. This new sky is 
empty, 'subtle, invisible and terrifying'. Sometimes it moves in the 
autumn landscape and at other times the landscape too moves. 
Meanwhile, says the patient, 'a question is being constantly put to 
me; it is, as it were, an order either to rest or die, or else to push on 
further'. 2 This second space which cuts across visible space is the one 
which is ceaselessly composed by our own way of projecting the 
world, and the schizophrenic's trouble consists simply in the fact that 
the permanent project becomes dissociated from the objective world 
as the latter is presented to perception, and withdraws, so to speak, 
within itself. The schizophrenic no longer inhabits the common 
property world, but a private world, and no longer gets as far as 
geographical space: he dwells in 'the landscape space', 3 andlhe land- 
scape itself, once cut off from the common property world, is consider- 
ably impoverished. Hence the schizophrenic questioning: everything 
is amazing, absurd or unreal, because the impulse of existence towards 
things has lost its energy, because it appears to itself in all its con- 
tingency and because the world can no longer be taken for granted. 
In so far as the natural space talked about by traditional psychology 
is by contrast reassuring and self-evident, this is because existence 
rushes towards it, and being absorbed in it, is unaware of itself. 
The description of human space could be developed indefinitely. 4 

1 Fischer, Zur Klinik unci Psychologic des Raumerlebens, p. 70. 

2 Fischer, Raum-Zeitstruktur und Denkstorung in der Schizophrenic, p. 253. 

3 E. Straus, Vom Sinn der Sinne, p. 290. 

4 One might show, for example, that aesthetic perception too opens up a new 
spatiality, that the picture as a work of art is not in the space which it inhabits 
as a physical thing and as a coloured canvas. That the dance evolves in an aimless 
and unorientaled space, that it is a suspension of our history, that in the dance 
the subject and his world are no longer in opposition, no longer stand out one 
against the background of the other, that in consequence the parts of the body 
are no longer thrown into relief as in natural experience: ihe trunk is no longer 
the ground from which movements arise and to which they sink back once per- 
formed; it now governs the dance and the movements of the limbs are its 
auxiliaries. 



287 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

It is clear what fault objective thought will always find with it: have 
these descriptions any philosophical value? That is to say: do they 
teach us anything concerning the structure itself of consciousness, or 
do they present us merely with contents of human experience? Are 
the spaces belonging to dreams, myths and schizophrenia genuine 
spaces; can they exist and be thought of by themselves, or do they not 
rather presuppose, as the condition of their possibility, geometrical 
space and with it the pure constituting consciousness which deploys 
it? The left, the area associated in the primitive mind with misfortune 
and ill omen — or in my own body the side associated with awkward- 
ness — becomes specifically a direction only if I am first of all capable 
of conceiving its relation to the right, and it is this relation which 
ultimately gives a spatial significance to the terms between which it 
stands. It is not, so to speak, with his anguish or his joy that primitive 
man 'aims at' a certain space, as it is not with my pain that I know 
where my injured foot is: anguish, joy and pain experienced are re- 
lated to a locality in objective space in which their empirical condi- 
tions are to be found. But for this agile consciousness, free in relation 
to all contents and deploying them in space, those contents would 
never be anywhere at all. If we think about the mythical experience 
of space, and if we ask what it means, we shall necessarily find that 
it rests on the consciousness of a single objective space, for a space 
not objective and not unique would not be a space: is it not of the 
essence of space to be the absolute 'outside', correlative to, but also 
the negation of, subjectivity, and is it not of its essence to embrace 
every being that one can imagine, since anything that one might want 
to posit outside it would by that very fact be in relation to it, and 
therefore in it? The dreamer dreams, and that is why his respiratory 
movements and sexual drives are not taken, for what they are, why 
they break away from the moorings which tie them up with the world 
and float before him in the form of dreams. But what precisely does 
he in fact see? Are we to believe his account of it? If he is to know 
what he sees and to understand his dream himself, he will have to 
awaken. Immediately sexuality will repair to its genital retreat, 
anxiety and its attendant phantasms will become once more what they 
have always been: some respiratory obstruction at a point in the 
chest. The murky space which invades the schizophrenic's world can- 
not substantiate its claim to be a space without being related to clear 
space. If the patient maintains that there is a second space round 
about him, we must ask him: but where is it? In his efforts to locate 
this phantom, he will conjure it away as a phantom. And since, as he 
himself admits, objects are uninterruptedly present, he always re- 
tains, with clear space, the means of exorcising these spectres and 
returning to the everyday world. The phantoms arc fragments drawn 

288 



spach 

from the clear world and borrow from it such standing as they are 
capable of enjoying. In the same way, when we try to base geometri- 
cal space, along with its relationships within the world, on the pri- 
mary spatiality of existence, it will be objected that thought knows 
only itself or tilings, that a spatiality of the subject is inconceivable, 
and that consequently the case we are putting is strictly meaningless. 
It is true, we shall reply, that it has no thematic or explicit meaning, 
and that it dissolves under objective thought. But it has a non- 
thematic or implicit meaning, and this is not a lesser meaning, for 
objective thought itself draws on the non-reflective, and presents itself 
as an explicit expression of non-reflective consciousness, so that radi- 
cal reflection cannot consist in thematizing as parallel entities the 
w orld, or space, and the non-temporal subject which thinks of them, 
but must go further back and seize this thematizing act itself with the 
horizons of implication which give it its significance. If reflection 
consists in seeking the first-hand, or that by which the rest can exist 
and be thought about, it cannot confine itself within objective 
thought, but must think about those thematizing acts which posit 
objective thought, and must restore their context. In other words, 
objective thought rejects the alleged phenomena of dreams, myths 
and of existence generally, because it finds that it cannot think clearly 
about them, and that they mean nothing that can be thematized. It 
rejects the fact or the real in the name of the possible and the self- 
evident. But it fails to see that the self-evident itself is founded on a 
fact. Analytical reflection believes that it knows what the dreamer or 
the schizophrenic experience better than the dreamer or the schizo- 
phrenic himself. What is more, the philosopher believes that, in 
reflection, he has a better knowledge of what he perceives than he has 
in perception itself. And it is under these circumstances alone that he 
is able to reject human spaces as confused appearances of the one 
true, objective space. But by doubting the testimony of other people 
about themselves, or of one's own perception about itself, he de- 
prives himself of the right to declare absolutely true what he appre- 
hends as self-evident, even if, in this self-evidence, he is conscious of 
having a pre-eminent understanding of the dreamer, the madman or 
perception. We cannot have it both ways: either the person who ex- 
periences something knows at the time what he is experiencing, in 
which case the madman, the dreamer or the subject of perception 
must be taken at their word, and we merely need to confirm that their 
language in fact expresses what they are experiencing. Or else the 
person with the experience is no judge of what he experiences, and in 
that case the test of self-evidence may be an illusion. In order to divest 
the experience of dreams, myths or perception of all positive value, 
and in order to reintegrate these various spaces to geometrical space, 

289 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



we must to all intents and purposes deny that people ever dream, or 
that they ever go mad, or ever really and truly perceive anything. As 
long as we allow the existence of dreams, insanity or perception, at 
least as so many forms of absence of reflection — and how can we not 
do so if we want to leave some value to the testimony of conscious- 
ness, without which no truth is possible? — we have no right to level 
all experiences down to a single world, all modalities of existence 
down to a single consciousness. In order to do so, we should need a 
higher court of appeal to which to submit perceptual and phantasmal 
consciousness, a self more intimate with myself than the self which 
thinks up my dream or my perception when I confine myself to 
dreaming, or perceiving, which possesses the true substance of my 
dream and my perception when I have only the appearance of it. But 
the distinction itself between the appearance and the reality is made 
neither in the world of the myth, nor in the diseased or infantile one. 
The myth holds the essence within the appearance; the mythical phe- 
nomenon is not a representation, but a genuine presence. The daemon 
of rain is present in each drop which falls after the incantation, as the 
soul is present in each part of the body. Every 'apparition' (£r- 
scheimmg) is in this case an incarnation, 1 and each entity is defined 
not so much in terms of 'properties' as of physiognomic characteris- 
tics. So much is validly meant when we talk about infantile and 
primitive animism: not that the child and primitive man perceive 
objects which they try, as Comtc says, to explain by intentions or 
forms of consciousness — consciousness, like the object, belongs to 
positing thought — but because things are taken for the incarnation 
of what they express, and because their human significance is com- 
pressed into them and presents itself literally as what they mean. A 
shadow passing or the creaking of branches have each a meaning; 
everywhere there are warnings with no one who issues them. 2 Since 
mythical consciousness has not yet arrived at the notion of a thing or 
of objective truth, how can it undertake a critical examination of that 
which it thinks it experiences; where can it find a fixed point at which 
to stop and become aware of itself as pure consciousness, and per- 
ceive, beyond its phantasms, the real world? A schizophrenic feels 
that a brush placed near his window is coming nearer to him and 
entering his head, and yet he never ceases to be aware that the brush 
is over there. 3 If he looks towards the window, he still perceives it. 
The brush, as an identifiable term in an explicit perception, is not in 
the patient's head as a material mass. But the patient's head is for 
him not that object which everyone can see, and which he himself 

1 Cassirer, Philosophic dcr Svmbolischcn Formal, T. Ill, p. 80. 

2 Ibid., p. 82. 

3 L. Binswanger, Das Raumproblcm in tier Psycho pathologic, p. 630. 

290 



SPACE 



sees in a mirror: it is the listening and observing post which he feels 
at the top of his body, that power of joining up with all objects 
through sight and hearing. In the same way, the brush which presents 
itself to the senses is merely an envelope or a phantom. The true 
brush, the stiff, prickly entity which is incarnated in these appear- 
ances, is concentrated in the gaze; it has moved from the window, 
leaving there only its lifeless shell. No appeal to explicit perception 
can arouse the patient from this dream, since he has no quarrel with 
explicit perception, and holds only that it proves nothing against 
what he experiences. 'Can't you hear my voices T a patient asks the 
doctor; and she comes resignedly to the conclusion: 'I am the only 
one who hears them then.' 1 What protects the sane man against 
delirium or hallucination, is not his critical powers, but the structure 
of his space: objects remain before him, keeping their distance and, 
as Malebranche said speaking of Adam, touching him only with re- 
spect. What brings about both hallucinations and myths is a shrink- 
age in the space directly experienced, a rooting of things in our body, 
the overwhelming proximity of the object, the oneness of man and 
the world, which is, not indeed abolished, but repressed by everyday 
perception or by objective thought, and which philosophical con- 
sciousness rediscovers. It is true that if I reflect on the consciousness 
of positions and directions in myths, dreams and in perception, if I 
posit and establish them in accordance with the methods of objective 
thinking, 1 bring to light in them once more the relationships of geo- 
metrical space. The conclusion from this is not that they were there 
already, but on the contrary that genuine reflection is not of this 
kind. In order to realize what is the meaning of mythical or schizo- 
phrenic space, we have no means other than that of resuscitating in 
ourselves, in our present perception, the relationship of the subject 
and his world which analytical reflection does away with. We must 
recognize as anterior to 'sense-giving acts' (Bedeutungsgebende Ak- 
ten) of theoretical and positing thought, 'expressive experiences' 
(Ausdruckserlebnisse)\ as anterior to the sign significance (Zeichen- 
Sinri), the expressive significance (Ausdrucks-Sinn), and finally as 
anterior to any subsuming of content under form, the symbolical 
'pregnancy' 2 of form in content. 

Does this mean that psychologism is vindicated ? Since there are as 
many spaces as there are distinct spatial experiences, and since we do 
not allow ourselves to anticipate, in infantile, diseased or primitive 
experience, the forms of adult, normal and civilized experience, are 
we not imprisoning each type of subjectivity, and ultimately each 

1 Minkowski, Le Probleme des hallucinations et le probleme de Vespace y 
p. 64. 

2 Cassirer, op. cit., p. 80. 

291 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

consciousness, in its own private life? Have we not substituted for 
the rationalist cogito which discovers a universal constituting con- 
sciousness in myself, the psychologist's cogito, which remains incom- 
municable within the experience of its life? Are we not defining sub- 
jectivity as the identity of each person with that experience? Is it not 
the case that inquiry into the nature of space and, generally speaking, 
into nascent experience, prior to their objectification, and the decision 
to scrutinize experience itself for its significance, in short phenomeno- 
logy, ends with the negation of being and significance? Are not mere 
appearance and opinion being brought back under the name of the 
phenomenon? Is not the origin of precise knowledge being identified 
with a decision as unwarrantable as the one which shuts up the mad- 
man in his madness, and is not the last word of this wisdom to lead 
us back to the anguish of idle and solitary subjectivity? These are 
doubts which need to be dispelled. Mythical or dream-like conscious- 
ness, insanity and perception are not, in so far as they are different, 
hermetically sealed within themselves; they are not small islands of 
experience cut off from each other, and from which there is no 
escape. We have refused to make geometrical space immanent in 
mythical space, and generally, to subordinate all experience to an 
absolute consciousness of this experience, a consciousness which 
would assign to it its place in the general scheme of truth, because 
unity of experience thus understood makes its variety incomprehen- 
sible. But mythical consciousness does indeed open on to a horizon 
of possible objectifications. Primitive man lives his myths against a 
sufficiently articulate perceptual background for the activities of daily 
life, fishing, hunting and dealings with civilized people, to be possible. 
The myth itself, however diffuse, has an identifiable significance for 
primitive man, simply because it does form a world, that is, a whole 
in which each clement has meaningful relations with the rest. It is 
true that mythical consciousness is not a consciousness of any thing. 
That is to say that subjectively it is a flux, that it does not become 
static and thus does not know itself. Objectively, it does not posit 
before itself terms definable as a certain number of properties, which 
can be isolated from one another and which are in fact interlinked. 
But it is not borne away by each of its pulsations, otherwise it would 
not be conscious of anything at all., It does not stand back from its 
noemata, but on the other hand, if it passed away with each one of 
them, and if it did not tentatively suggest objectification, it would not 
crystallize itself in myths. We have tried to rescue mythical conscious- 
ness from those premature rationalizations which, as with Comte, 
for example, make the myth incomprehensible, because they look to 
it for an explanation of the world and an anticipation of science, 
whereas it is a projection of existence and an expression of the human 

292 



SPACE 



condition. But understanding myth is not believing in it, and if all 
myths are true, it is in so far as they can be set in a phenomenology 
of mind which shows their function in arriving at awareness, and 
which ultimately bases their own significance on the significance 
they have for the philosopher. 

In the same way, though it is indeed from the dreamer that I was 
last night that I require an account of the dream, the dreamer himself 
ofTers no account, and the person who does so is awake. Bereft of 
the waking state, dreams would be no more than instantaneous 
modulations, and so would not even exist for us. During the dream 
itself, we do not leave the world behind : the dream space is segregated 
from the space of clear thinking, but it uses all the latter's articula- 
tions; the world obsesses us even during sleep, and it is about the 
world that we dream. Similarly it is round about the world that in- 
sanity gravitates. Leaving aside those morb;d, dream-like or delirious 
states which endeavour to build a private domain out of fragments 
of the macrocosm, we can say that the most advanced states of melan- 
cholia, in which the patient settles in the realm of death and, so to 
speak, takes up his abode there, still make use of the structures of 
being in the world, and borrow from it an element of being indispens- 
able to its own denial. This link between subjectivity and objectivity, 
which already exists in mythical or childlike consciousness, and which 
still survives in sleep or insanity, is to be found, a fortiori, in normal 
experience. I never wholly live in varieties of human space, but am 
always ultimately rooted in a natural and non-human space. As I 
walk across the Place de la Concorde, and think of myself as totally 
caught up in the city of Paris, I can rest my eyes on one stone of the 
Tuileries wall, the Square disappears and there is then nothing but 
this stone entirely without history: I can, furthermore, allow my gaze 
to be absorbed by this yellowish, gritty surface, and then there is no 
longer even a stone there, but merely the play of light upon an indefi- 
nite substance. My total perception is not compounded of such 
analytical perceptions, but it is always capable of dissolving into 
them, and my body, which through my habits ensures my insertion 
into the human world, does so only by projecting me in the first 
place into a natural world which can always be discerned underlying 
the other, as the canvas underlies the picture and makes it appear 
unsubstantial. Even if there is perception of what is desired through 
desire, loved through love, hated through hate, it always forms round 
a sensible nucleus, however small, and it is in the sensible that its 
verification and its fullness are found. We have said that space is 
existential; we might just as well have said that existence is spatial, 
that is, that through an inner necessity it opens on to an 'outside', so 
that one can speak of a mental space and a 'world of meanings and 

293 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

objects of thought which are constituted in terms of those meanings'. 1 
Human spaces present themselves as built on the basis of natural 
space, and 'non-objectifying acts', to speak the language of Husserl, 
as based on 'objectifying acts'. 2 The novelty of phenomenology does 
not lie in denying the unity of experience, but in finding a different 
basis for it than does classical rationalism. For objectifying acts are 
not representations. Natural and primordial space is not geometrical 
space, nor, correspondingly, is the unity of experience guaranteed by 
any universal thinker arraying its contents before me and ensuring 
that I possess complete knowledge of, and exercise complete power 
over it. It is merely foreshadowed by the horizons of possible objecti- 
fication, and it frees me from every particular setting only because it 
ties me to the world of nature or the in-itself, which includes all of 
them. We must contrive to understand how, at a stroke, existence 
projects round itself worlds which hide objectivity from me, at the 
same time fastening upon it as the aim of the teleology of conscious- 
ness, by picking out these 'worlds' against the background of one 
single natural world. 

If myths, dreams and illusion are to be possible, the apparent and 
the real must remain ambiguous in the subject as in the object. It has 
often been said that consciousness, by definition, admits of no separa- 
tion of appearance and reality, and by this we are to understand that, 
in our knowledge of ourselves, appearance is reality: if I think I see 
or feel, I indubitably see or feel, whatever may be true of the external 
object. Here reality appears in its entirety, real being and appearance 
are one, and there is no reality other than the appearance. If this is 
true, there is no possibility that illusion and perception should have 
the same appearance, that my illusions should be perceptions with 
no object or my perceptions true hallucinations. The truth of percep- 
tion and the falsity of illusion must be implanted in them in the shape 
of some intrinsic characteristic, for otherwise the testimony of the 
other senses, of later experience, or of other people, which would re- 
main the only possible criterion, would then become unreliable, and 
we should never be aware of a perception or an illusion as such. If 
the whole being of my perception and the whole being of my illusion 
lies in the way they appear, then the truth which defines one and the 
falsity which defines the other must be equally apparent. There will 
be between them, therefore, a structural difference. True perception 
will simply be a true perception. Illusion will be no perception at all, 
and certainty will have to extend from the vision or sensation as 
conceived to perception as constitutive of an object. The transparency 
of consciousness implies the immanence and absolute certainty of the 

1 L. Binswanger, Das Raumprohkm in der Psychopafhologie, p. 617. 

2 Logische Untersuchungen, T. II, Vth Unfers., pp. 387 and fT. 

294 



SPACE 



object. Yet it is of the nature of illusion not to present itself as such, 
and it is necessary that I should be able, if not to perceive an unreal 
object, at least to lose sight of its unreality; it is necessary that there 
should be at least unawareness of failure to perceive, that the illusion 
should not be what it seems to be, and that for once the reality of an 
act of consciousness should be beyond its appearance. 

Are we then to separate appearance and reality within the subject? 
The difficulty is that once the break is made, it is irreparable: the 
clearest appearance can henceforth be misleading, and this time it is 
the phenomenon of truth which becomes impossible. We are not 
faced with a choice between a philosophy of immanence or a rational- 
ism which accounts only for perception and truth, and a philosophy 
of transcendence or absurdity which accounts only for illusion and 
error. We know that there are errors only because we possess truth, 
in the name of which we correct errors and recognize them as errors. 
In the same way the express recognition of a truth is much more than 
the mere existence within us of an unchallengeable idea, an immedi- 
ate faith in what is presented : it presupposes questioning, doubt, a 
break with the immediate, and is the correction of any possible error. 
Any rationalism admits of at least one absurdity, that of having to 
be formulated as a thesis. Any philosophy of the absurd recognizes 
some meaning at least in the affirmation of absurdity. I can remain in 
the realm of the absurd only if I suspend all affirmation, if, like 
Montaigne or the schizophrenic, I confine myself within an interroga- 
tion which I must not even formulate: for by formulating it I should 
ask a question which, like any determinate question, would entail a 
reply. If, in short, I face truth not with its negation, but with a state 
of non-truth or ambiguity, the actual opacity of my existence. In the 
same way, I can remain within the sphere of absolute self-evidence 
only if I refuse to make any affirmation, or to take anything for 
granted, if, as Husserl has it, I stand in wonder before the world, 1 and 
ceasing to be in league with it, I bring to light the flow of motivations 
which bear me along in it, making my life wholly aware of itself, and 
explicit. When I try to pass from this interrogative state to an affirma- 
tion, and a fortiori when I try to express myself, I crystallize an inde- 
finite collection of motives within an act of consciousness, I revert to 
the implicit, that is, to the equivocal and to the world's free play. 2 My 
absolute contact with myself, the identity of being and appearance 
cannot be posited, but only lived as anterior to any affirmation. In 
both cases, therefore, we have the same silence and the same void. 
The experience of absurdity and that of absolute self-evidence are 

1 Fink, Die phanomenologische Philosophie Husserls in der gegemvartigen 
Kritik, p. 350. 

2 The problem of expression is referred to by Fink, op. cit., p. 382. 

295 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

mutually implicatory, and even indistinguishable. The world appears 
absurd, only if a demand for absolute consciousness ceaselessly dis- 
sociates from each other the meanings with, which it swarms, and 
conversely this demand is motivated by the conflict between those 
meanings. Absolute self-evidence and the absurd are equivalent, not 
merely as philosophical affirmations, but also as experiences. 
Rationalism and scepticism draw their sustenance from an actual life 
of consciousness which they both hypocritically take for granted, 
without which they can be neither conceived nor even experienced, 
and in which it is impossible to say that everything has a significance, 
or that everything is nonsense, but only that there is significance. As 
Pascal says, doctrines have only to be pressed a little to abound with 
contradictions, and yet they give a first impression of clarity, and 
have an initial significance. A truth seen against a background of 
absurdity, and an absurdity which the teleology of consciousness 
presumes to be able to convert into truth, such is the primary pheno- 
menon. To say that, in consciousness, appearance and reality are one, 
or that they are separate, is to rule out consciousness of anything 
whatsoever, even as appearance. Now — such is the true cogito — there 
is consciousness of something, something shows itself, there is such 
a thing as a phenomenon. Consciousness is neither the positing of 
oneself, nor ignorance of oneself, it is not concealed from itself, 
which means that there is nothing in it which does not in some way 
announce itself to it, although it does not need to know this explicitly. 
In consciousness, appearance is not being, but the phenomenon. 
This new cogito, because it is anterior to revealed truth and error, 
makes both possible. The lived is certainly lived by me, nor am I 
ignorant of the feelings which I repress, and in this sense there is no 
unconscious. But I can experience more things than I represent to 
myself, and my being is not reducible to what expressly appears to 
me concerning myself. That which is merely lived is ambivalent; there 
are feelings in me which I do not name, and also spurious states of 
well-being to which I am not fully given over. The difference between 
illusion and perception is intrinsic, and the truth of perception can be 
read offonly from perception itself. If, on a sunken path, I think I can 
see, some distance away, a broad, fiat stone on the ground, which is 
in reality a patch of sunlight, I cannot say that I ever see the flat stone 
in the sense in which I am to see, as I draw nearer, the patch of sun- 
light. The flat stone, like all things at a distance, appears only in a 
field of confused structure in which connections are not yet clearly 
articulated. In this sense, the illusion, like the image, is not observ- 
able, which means that my body has no grip on it, and that I cannot 
unfold it before me by any exploratory action. And yet, 1 am capable 
of omitting this distinction and of falling into illusion. It is untrue 

296 



SPACE 

that, if I confine myself to what I really see, I am never mistaken and 
that sensation at least leaves no room for doubt. Every sensation is 
already pregnant with a meaning, inserted into a configuration which 
is either obscure or clear, and there is no sense-datum which remains 
unchanged when I pass from the illusory stone to the real patch of 
sunlight. The infallibility of sensation entails that of perception, and 
would rule out illusion. I see the illusory stone in the sense that my 
whole perceptual and motor field endows the bright spot with the 
significance 'stone on the path'. And already I prepare to feel under 
my foot this smooth, firm surface. The fact is that correct and illusory 
vision are not distinguishable in the way that adequate and inade- 
quate thought are: as thought, that is, which is respectively consum- 
mate and lacunary. I say that I perceive correctly when my body has 
a precise hold on the spectacle, but that does not mean that my hold 
is ever all-embracing; it would be so only if I had succeeded in reduc- 
ing to a state of articulate perception all the inner and outer horizons 
of the object, which is in the nature of things impossible. In experienc- 
ing a perceived truth, I assume that the concordance so far experi- 
enced would hold for a more detailed observation; I place my con- 
fidence in the world. Perceiving is pinning one's faith, at a stroke, in 
a whole future of experiences, and doing so in a present which never 
strictly guarantees the future; it is placing one's belief in a world. It 
is this opening upon a world which makes possible perceptual truth 
and the actual effecting of a Wahr-Nehmung, thus enabling us to 
'cross out' the previous illusion and regard it as null and void. Seeing, 
some distance away in the margin of my visual field, a large moving 
shadow, I look in that direction and the phantasm shrinks and takes 
up its due place; it was simply a fly near my eye. / was conscious of 
seeing a shadow and now I am conscious of having seen nothing more 
than a fly. My adherence to the world enables me to allow for the 
variations in the cogito, to favour one cogito at the expense of another 
and to catch up with the truth of my thinking beyond its appearances. 
In the very moment of illusion this possibility of correction was pre- 
sented to me, because illusion too makes use of this belief in the world 
and is dependent upon it while contracting into a solid appearance, 
and because in this way, always being open upon a horizon of pos- 
sible verifications, it does not cut me off from truth. But, for the same 
reason, I am not immune from error, since the world which I seek to 
achieve through each appearance, and which endows that appearance, 
rightly or wrongly, with the weight of truth, never necessarily requires 
this particular appearance. There is the absolute certainty of the 
world in general, but not of any one thing in particular. Conscious- 
ness is removed from being, and from its own being, and at the same 
time united with them, by the thickness of the world. The true cogito 

297 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

is not the intimate communing of thought with the thought of that 
thought: they meet only on passing through the world. The con- 
sciousness of the world is not based on self-consciousness: they are 
strictly contemporary. There is a world for me because I am not un- 
aware of myself; and I am not concealed from myself because I have 
a world. This pre-conscious possession of the world remains to be 
analysed in the pre-reflective cogito. 



298 



3 



THE THING 
NATURAL 



AND THE 



WORLD 



A THING has 'characteristics' or 'properties' which are stable, even 
if they do not entirely serve to define it, and we propose to approach 
the phenomenon of reality by studying perceptual constants. A thing 
has in the first place its size and its shape throughout variations of 
perspective which are merely apparent. We do not attribute these 
appearances to the object itself, but regard them as an accidental 
feature of our relations with it, and not as being of it. What do we 
mean by this, and on what basis do we judge that form or size are 
the form and size of the object 1 

What is presented to us in the case of each object, the psychologist 
will assert, are sizes and shapes which always vary with the perspec- 
tive, and it is conventional to regard as true the size which the object 
has when within reach, or the shape which it assumes when it is in a 
plane parallel to the frontal elevation. These are no truer than any 
other, but since this distance and this aspect are both typical, and 
evolved with the help of our body, which is an ever-present guide for 
this purpose, we can always recognize them, and so they themselves 
provide us with a standard for fixing and distinguishing between 
fleeting appearances; for constructing objectivity, in short. The 
square viewed obliquely, as something roughly diamond-shaped, is 
distinguished from a real diamond shape only if we keep the orienta- 
tion in mind, if, for example, we settle on the frontal aspect as the 
crucial appearance, and relate any given appearance to what it would 
become in this context. But this psychological reconstitution of ob- 
jective size or shape takes for granted what has to be explained, 
namely a gamut of determinate sizes and shapes from which it is 
sufficient to select one as the real size or shape. We have already stated 
that in respect of one and the same retreating or revolving object 1 
do not have a set of 'mental images' which progressively diminish in 



299 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

size, or become more and more distorted, and between which I make 
a conventional choice. In so far as I account for my perception in 
these terms, to that extent I am already introducing the world with 
its objective shapes and sizes. The question is not only how one size 
or shape, among all apparent sizes or shapes, is regarded as a con- 
stant ; it is a much more searching one. It is a matter of understanding 
how a determinate shape or size — true or even apparent — can 
come to light before me, become crystallized in the flux of my ex- 
perience and, in short, be given to me. Or, more concisely still, how 
can there be objectivity? 

There would seem, at least at first glance, to be a way of evading 
the question, namely by conceding that it is in fact never the case that 
size and shape are perceived as attributes of a single object, and that 
they are simply names for the relations between the parts of the phe- 
nomenal field. In this case the constancy of the real size or shape 
which is maintained through the varying perspectives is merely the 
constancy in the relations between the phenomenon and the con- 
ditions accompanying its presentation. For example, the true size of 
my fountain-pen is not, as it were, a quality inherent in any of my 
perceptions of the pen; it is not given or noted in a perception, like 
red, warmth or sweetness. The fact that it remains constant is not 
explained by my remembering any former experience in which I 
observed it. It is the constant, or the law governing the variations of 
the visual appearance in relation to the apparent distance. Reality is 
not a crucial appearance underlying the rest, it is the framework of 
relations with which all appearances tally. If I hold my pen near my 
eyes so that it shuts out almost the whole scene before me, its real 
size remains small, because the pen which hides everything is also a 
pen seen at close quarters, and because this condition, which is 
always conveyed to me in my perception, reduces the appearance 
once more to modest proportions. The square which is presented to 
me obliquely remains a square, not because this apparent diamond 
shape brings to mind the familiar form of the square seen directly in 
front of me, but because the diamond-shaped appearance in an ob- 
lique presentation is immediately identical to the square appearance 
in a frontal presentation, because, along with each of these configura- 
tions, I am given that orientation of the object which makes it pos- 
sible, and because these shapes are presented in a context of relations 
which, a priori, equate the various perspective presentations with each 
other. The cube with its sides distorted by perspective nevertheless 
remains a cube, not because I imagine the successive aspects of the 
six faces if I turned the cube round. in my hand, but because the 
perspective distortions arc not raw data, any more than is the per- 
fectly symmetrical shape which faces me. Each element of the cube, 

300 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

if we unfold from it all the perceived significance, acquaints us with 
the present point of view taken of it by the observer. A merely ap- 
parent shape or size is one with as yet no place in the tightly knit 
system formed by phenomena and my body together. As soon as it 
finds its place in that system, it finds its truth, and perspective distor- 
tion is no longer passively endured, but understood. The appearance 
is misleading and in the literal sense an appearance only when it is 
indeterminate. The question how there come to be true shapes or 
sizes, or objective or real ones, amounts to asking how there are, for 
us, determinate shapes. And there are determinate shapes like 4 a 
square' or 'a diamond shape', or any actual spatial configuration, 
because our body as a point of view upon things, and things as ab- 
stract elements of one single world, form a system in which each 
moment is immediately expressive of every other. A certain way of 
directing my gaze in relation to the object signifies a certain appear- 
ance of the object and of neighbouring objects. In all its appearances 
the object retains invariable characteristics, remains itself invariable 
and is an object because all the possible values in relation to size and 
shape which it can assume are bound up in advance in the formula of 
its relations with the context. What we are affirming in the specific 
being of the object, is in reality a fades totius universi which remains 
unchanged, and in it is grounded the equivalence of all its appear- 
ances and the identity of its being. In following out the logic of ob- 
jective size and shape, we should, with Kant, see that it refers to the 
positing of a world as a rigorously interrelated system, that we are 
never enclosed within appearance, and that, in short, the object alone 
is able fully to appear. 

Thus we place ourselves directly within the object, we overlook the 
psychologist's problems, but have we really left them behind ? When 
it is said that the true size or shape are no more than the constant law 
according to which the appearance, the distance and the orientation 
vary, it is assumed that they can be treated as variables or measurable 
sizes, and therefore that they are already determinate, when what we 
are concerned with is precisely how they become so. Kant is right in 
saying that perception is, by its nature, polarized towards the object. 
But what is incomprehensible in his account is appearance as appear- 
ance. Since the perspective views of the object are directly and im- 
mediately set into the objective system of the world, the subject thinks 
rather than perceives his perception and its truth. Perceptual con- 
sciousness does not give us perception as a body of organized know- 
ledge, or the size and shape of the object as laws; the numerical speci- 
fications of science retrace the outline of a constitution of the world 
which is already realized before shape and size come into being. Like 
the scientist, Kant takes the results of this pre-scientific experience for 

301 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

granted, and is enabled to ignore them only because he makes use of 
them. When I contemplate before me the furniture in my room, the 
table with its shape and size is for me not a law or rule governing the 
parade of phenomena, and an invariable relationship: it is because I 
perceive the table with its definite shape and size that I presume, for 
every change of distance or orientation, a corresponding change of 
shape and size, and not the reverse. Far from its being the case that 
the thing is reducible to constant relationships, it is in the self-evi- 
dence of the thing that this constancy of relationships has its basis. 
For science and objective thought, an apparently small object seen 
a hundred yards away is indistinguishable from the same object seen 
ten yards away at a greater angle, and the object is nothing but the 
constant product of the distance multiplied by the apparent size. But 
for me the perceiver, the object a hundred yards away is not real and 
present in the sense in which it is at ten yards, and I identify the 
object in all its positions, at all distances, in all appearances, in so 
far as all the perspectives converge towards the perception which I 
obtain at a certain distance and with a certain typical orientation. 
This privileged perception ensures the unity of the perceptual process 
and draws into it all other appearances. For each object, as for each 
picture in an art gallery, there is an optimum distance from which it 
requires to be seen, a direction viewed from which it vouchsafes 
most of itself: at a shorter or greater distance we have merely a per- 
ception blurred through excess or deficiency. We therefore tend to- 
wards the maximum of visibility, and seek a better focus as with a 
microscope. 1 This is obtained through a certain balance between the 
inner and outer horizon: a living body, seen at too close quarters, 
and divorced from any background against which it can stand out, 
is no longer a living body, but a mass of matter as outlandish as a 
lunar landscape, as can be appreciated by inspecting a segment of 
skin through a magnifying glass. Again, seen from too great a dis- 
tance, the body loses its living value, and is seen simply as a puppet 
or automaton. The living body itself appears when its microstructure 
is neither excessively nor insufficiently visible, and this moment 
equally determines its real size and shape. The distance from me to 
the object is not a size which increases or decreases, but a tension 
which fluctuates round a norm. An oblique position of the object in 
relation to me is not measured by the angle which it forms with the 
plane of my face, but felt as a lack of balance, as an unequal distribu- 
tion of its influences upon me. The variations in appearance are not 
so many increases or decreases in size, or real distortions. It is simply 
that sometimes the parts mingle and become confused, at others they 
link up into a clearly articulated whole, and reveal their wealth of 
1 Schapp, Beitrage zur Phiinomenologie der H'ahrnehmung, pp. 59 and flf. 

302 



THE THING AND THC NATURAL WORLD 

detail. There is one culminating point of my perception which simul- 
taneously satisfies these three norms, and towards which the whole 
perceptual process tends. If I draw the object closer to me or turn it 
round in my fingers in order 'to see it better', this is because each atti- 
tude of my body is for me, immediately, the power of achieving a 
certain spectacle, and because each spectacle is what it is for me in a 
certain kinaesthetic situation. Jn other words, because my body is 
permanently stationed before things in order to perceive them and, 
conversely, appearances are always enveloped for me in a certain 
bodily attitude. In so far, therefore, as I know the relation of appear- 
ances to the kinaesthetic situation, this is not in virtue of any law or 
in terms of any formula, but to the extent that 1 have a body, and that 
through that body I am at grips with the world. And just as perceptual 
attitudes are not known to me singly, but implicitly given as stages in 
the act which leads to the optimum attitude, correspondingly the 
correlative perspectives are not posited before me successively, but 
present themselves only as so many steps towards the thing itself with 
its size and shape. Kant saw clearly that the problem is not how deter- 
minate shapes and sizes make their appearance in my experience, 
since without them there would be no experience, and since any inter- 
nal experience is possible only against the background of external 
experience. But Kant's conclusion from this was that I am a con- 
sciousness which embraces and constitutes the world, and this reflec- 
tive action caused him to overlook the phenomenon of the body and 
that of the thing. 

The fact is that if we want to describe it, we must say that my ex- » 
perience breaks forth into things and transcends itself in them, be- 
cause it always comes into being within the framework of a certain 
setting in relation to the world which is the definition of my body. 
Sizes and shapes merely provide a modality for this comprehensive 
hold on the world. The thing is big if my gaze cannot fully take it in, 
small if it does so easily, and intermediate sizes are distinguishable 
according as, when placed at an equal distance from me, they cause a 
smaller or greater dilation of my eye, or an equal dilation at different 
distances. The object is circular if, all its sides being equally near to 
me, it imposes no deviation upon the regular curvature of my gaze, or 
if those deviations which are imposed are attributable to the oblique 
presentation, according to the knowledge of the world which is given 
to me with my body. 1 It is, therefore, quite true that any perception of 

1 The constancy of forms and sizes in perception is therefore not an intellectual 
function, but an existential one, which means lhat it has to be related to the pre- 
logical act by which the subject takes up his place in the world. When a human 
subject is placed at the centre of a sphere on which discs of equal diameler arc 
fixed, it is noticed that constancy is much more perfect in the horizonlal than in 

303 



TIIC WORLD AS PFRCHIVFD 



a thing, a shape or a size as real, any perceptual constancy refers back 
to the positing of a world and of a system of experience in which my 
body is inescapably linked with phenomena. But the system of ex- 
perience is not arrayed before me as if I were God, it is lived by me 
from a certain point of view; I am not the spectator, I am involved, 
and it is my involvement in a point of view which makes possible 
both the finiteness of my perception and its opening out upon the 
complete world as a horizon of every perception. In so far as I know 
that a tree on the horizon remains what it is for closer perception, and 
retains its real shape and size, it is simply that this horizon is the 
horizon of my immediate environment, and that the gradual percep- 
tual possession of the things which it contains is guaranteed to me. 
In other words, perceptual experiences hang together, are mutually 
motivating and implicatory; the perception of the world is simply an 
expansion of my field of presence without any outrunning of the 
latter's essential structures, and the body remains in it but at no time 
becomes an object in it. The world is an open and indefinite unity in 
which I have my place, as Kant shows in the Transcendental Dialec- 
tic, but as he seems to forget in the Analytic. 

The qualities of the thing, its colour for example, or its hardness 
or weight, teach us much more about it than its geometrical proper- 
ties. The table is, and remains, brown throughout the varied play of 
natural or artificial lighting. Now what, to begin with, is this real 
colour, and how have we access to it? We shall be tempted to reply 
that it is the colour which I most often see as belonging to the table, 
the one which it assumes in daylight, a short distance away, under 
'normal* conditions, which means those which occur most frequently. 
When the distance is too great or when the light has a colour of its 
own, as at sunset or under electric lighting, I substitute for the actual 
colour a remembered one, 1 which predominates because it is im- 
printed within me by numerous experiences. In this case the con- 
stancy of colour is a real constancy. But we have here no more than 
an artificial reconstruction of the phenomenon. For, with regard to 
perception itself, it cannot be said that the brown of the table pre- 
sents itself in all kinds of light as the same brown, the same quality 
actually given by memory. A piece of white paper seen in shadow and 
recognized for what it is, is not purely and simply white, it 'does not 



the vertical plane. The huge moon on the horizon contrasted with the very small 
one at the zenith is merely a particular case of the same law. For apes, on the 
other hand, vertical movement in trees is as natural as is horizontal movement 
on the ground for us, with the result that vertical constancy is faultless. KofFka, 
Principles of Gestalt Psychology, pp. 94 and ff. 
1 Gedachtnisfarbe of Hering. 

304 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

allow itself to be placed satisfactorily in the white-black series'. 1 
Given a white wall in the shade and a grey piece of paper in the light, 
it cannot be said that the v/all remains white and the paper grey; the 
paper makes a greater impact on the eye, 2 it is lighter and clearer, 
whereas the wall is darker and duller, and what remains beneath the 
variations of lighting is, so to speak, only the Substance of the 
colour'. 3 The alleged constancy of colours does not prevent 'an in- 
dubitable modification during which we continue to receive in our 
vision the fundamental quality and, so to speak, that which is sub- 
stantial in it'. 4 This same reason will prevent us from treating the 
constancy of colours as an ideal constancy attributable to the judge- 
ment. For a judgement capable of distinguishing within a given ap- 
pearance that element which is to be accounted for by the particular 
lighting must lead ultimately to an identification of the object's own 
true colour, and we have seen that this does not in fact remain identi- 
cal. The weakness of both empiricism and intellectualism lies in their 
refusing to recognize any colours other than those fixed qualities 
which make their appearance in a reflective attitude, whereas colour 
in living perception is a way into the thing. We must rid ourselves of 
the illusion, encouraged by physics, that the perceived world is made 
up of colour qualities. As painters have observed, there are few 
colours in nature. The perception of colours is developed late in 
children, and in any case follows upon the constitution of a world. 
The Maoris have 3,000 names of colours, not because they perceive 
a great many, but, on the contrary, because they fail to identify them 
when they belong to objects structurally different from each other. 5 
As Scheler puts it, perception goes straight to the thing and by-passes 
the colour, just as it is able to fasten upon the expression of a gaze 
without noting the colour of the eyes. We shall not succeed in under- 
standing perception unless we take into account a colour function 
which may remain even when the qualitative appearance is modified. 
I say that my fountain-pen is black, and I see it as black under the 
sun's rays. But this blackness is less the sensible quality of blackness 
than a sombre power which radiates from the object, even when it is 
overlaid with reflected light, and it is visible only in the sense in which 
moral blackness is visible. The real colour persists beneath appear- 
ances as the background persists beneath the figure, that is, not as a 
seen or thought-of quality, but through a non-sensory presence. 
Physics and also psychology give an arbitrary definition of colour, 

1 Gelb, Die Farbenkonstanz der Sehdinge, p. 613. 

2 It is eindringlicher. 

3 Stumpf, quoted by Gelb, p. 598. 

4 Gelb, op. cit., p. 671. 

1 Katz, Der Aufbau der Farbwelt, pp. 4-5. 

305 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

which in reality fits only one of its modes of appearance and has for 
long obscured the rest. Hering requires that in the study and com- 
parison of colours we concern ourselves with only the pure colour, 
leaving aside all external circumstances. We must work 'not on the 
colours which belong to a determinate object, but on a quale, whether 
plane or pervading the whole of space, which subsists for itself with 
no determinate vehicle'. 1 The colours of the spectrum roughly fulfil 
these conditions. But these coloured areas (Flachenfarberi) are in 
reality only one of the possible structures of colour, and already the 
colour of a piece of paper or a surface colour (Oberflachenfarbe) no 
longer obeys the same laws. The differential thresholds are lower in 
the case of surface colours than in coloured areas. 2 Coloured areas 
are indeed located at a distance, though vaguely; they have a spongy 
appearance, whereas surface colours are dense and hold the gaze 
upon their surface. Coloured areas, moreover, are always parallel to 
the frontal plane, whereas surface colours may show any orientation. 
Finally coloured areas are always more or less flat, and cannot, with- 
out losing their distinctive quality as such, assume a particular form 
and appear curved or spread out over a surface. 3 Yet both these 
modes of appearance are to be found in psychologists' experiments, 
where, moreover, they are often confused. But there are many others 
about which psychologists have for long remained silent: the colour 
of transparent bodies, which occupies the three dimensions of space 
(Raionfarbe); gloss (Glanz); glow (Gluhen) ; brightness (Leuchten) and 
generally the colour of lighting, which is so far from running into 
that of the source of light that the painter can represent the former by 
the distribution of light and shade on objects and omit the latter 
altogether. 4 We are predisposed to believe that we have here different 
arrangements of a perception of colour which is in itself invariable, 
different forms conferred upon one and the same sensible material. 
In fact, we have different colour-functions in which the alleged 
material disappears completely, since the act of patterning is effected 
through a change in the sensible properties themselves. It is particu- 
larly true that the distinction between the lighting and the object's 
own colour is not the outcome of any intellectual analysis, or the 
conferment of notional meanings on a sensible material, but a certain 
organization of colour itself, the arrival at a structure lighting-thing 

1 Quoted by Katz, Farbwelt, p. 67. 

2 Ackermann, Farbschwelle unci Feldstruktur. 

3 Katz, Farbwclt, pp. 8-21. 

4 Ibid., 47-8. Lighting is a phenomenal datum as immediate as surface colour. 
The child sees it as a line of force running through the visual field, and that is 
why the shadow behind objects and corresponding to it is immediately set in a 
living relation to it: the child says that the shadow 'is running away from the 
light*. J. Piagct, La Causalite physique chez V enfant* Chap. VIII, p. 21. 

306 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

lighted, which wc need to describe in greater detail, if wc are to 
understand the constancy of a thing's 'own' colour. 1 

In gaslight a blue paper looks blue. And yet if we look at it with the 
photometer wc are surprised to see that it sends the same mixture of 
rays to the eye as does a brown paper in daylight. 2 A feebly lighted 
white wall which, with the reservations already stated, appears white 
to the unhampered vision, appears a bluish-grey if we look at it 
through the window of a screen which hides the source of light. The * 
painter achieves the same result without a screen and manages to see 
colours as they are determined by the quantity and quality of re- 
flected light, provided that he isolates them from their surrounding, 
by half-closing his eyes, for example. This changed appearance is in- 
separable from a change of structure in the colour: by the act of inter- 
posing the screen between our eye and the spectacle, and half-closing 
our eyes, we free the colours from the objectivity they acquire on the 
surfaces of bodies and restore to them the simple state of areas of 
light. We no longer see real bodies, such as the wall or the paper, 
with a determinate colour and having their place in the world, but 
coloured patches which are all situated on one and the same 'fictional' 
plane. 3 How precisely does the screen work? We shall understand 
this better if we observe the same phenomenon under different condi- 
tions. If we look successively through the eye-holes of two large 
boxes painted respectively black and white on the inside, and one 
illuminated faintly, the other powerfully, so that the quantity of light 
received by the eye in each case is the same, and if we contrive that 
inside the boxes there shall be no shadow or lack of uniformity in the 
painting, they then become indistinguishable, and in each case we see 
only an empty space permeated by grey. The whole effect is altered if 
a piece of white paper is placed in the black box, or a piece of black 
paper in the white one. Immediately the former appears as black and 
strongly illuminated, the latter as white and faintly lit. Hence, for the 
structure lighting-object lighted to be presented, at least two surfaces 
of different reflecting power are needed. 4 If we so arrange it that the 
beam of an arc lamp falls exactly upon a black disc, and if the latter is 

1 Indeed it has been shown (Gelb and Goldstein, Psychologische Analysen 
Hirnpathologischer Falle, Ober den Wegfall der Wahrnehmung von Oberflachen- 
farberi) that constancy of colours may be found in subjects who have lost the 
power to receive either surface colour or lighting. It would appear that constancy 
is a much more rudimentary phenomenon. It is met wlTh in animals with varieties 
of sensory apparatus simpler than the eye. The structure lighting-object lighted 
is, therefore, a special and highly organized type of Constance. But it remains 
necessary for a precise and objective constancy, and for a perception of things. 
(Gelb, Die Farbenkonstanz der Sehdinge, p. 677.) 

2 The experiment is already reported by Hering, Grundziige der Lehrc von Licht- 
sinn, p. 15. 

3 Gelb, Farbenkonstanz, p. 600. 4 Ibid., p. 673. 

307 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

set in motion to eliminate the influence of the roughness which is 
always present on its surface — the disc appears, like the rest of the 
room, faintly lighted, and the beam of light is a whitish solid with the 
disc as its base. If we then place a piece of white paper in front of the 
disc, 'immediately we see the disc "black", the paper "white", and 
both under a strong light.' 1 The transformation is so complete that 
one has the impression of seeing a fresh disc. These experiments in 
which the screen plays no part elucidate those in which it does: the 
decisive factor in the phenomenon of constancy, which the screen 
eliminates, and which may operate in free vision, is the articulation 
of the totality of the field, the wealth and subtlety of its structures. 
When he looks through the window of a screen, the subject can no 
longer 'dominate' (uberschauen) the relationships introduced by 
lighting, perceive, that is, in visible space, subordinated wholes, each 
with its own distinctness, standing out one against the background of 
another. 2 When the painter half-closes his eyes, he does away with 
the field's organization in depth and with it, the precise contrasts of 
lighting, so that there are no longer any determinate things with their 
own colours. If the experiment with the white paper in the shadow 
and the grey paper illuminated is repeated, and if the negative after- 
images of the two perceptions are projected on to a screen, it is ob- 
served that the phenomenon of constancy is not preserved, as if con- 
stancy and the structure lighting-lighted object could occur only in 
things and not in the diffuse space of after-images. 3 By admitting that 
these structures depend on the organization of the field we im- 
mediately arrive at an understanding of all the empirical laws 
governing the phenomenon of constancy. 4 Firstly, that it is pro- 
portional to the size of the retinal area on to which the spectacle is 
thrown, and the more pronounced in proportion as, in the relevant 
retinal space, a more extensive and more richly articulated fragment 
of the world is projected. That it is less perfect in peripheral than in 
central vision, in monocular than in binocular vision, in brief than in 
prolonged vision; that it is attenuated at a great distance; that it 
varies with individuals according to the richness of their perceptual 
world, and finally that it is less perfect in coloured lighting, which 
cancels out the superficial structure of objects, and brings the re- 
flecting potentialities of different surfaces to a common level, than in 
colourless lighting which leaves these structural differenced intact. 5 
The connection between the phenomenon of constancy, the articula- 
tion of the field and the phenomenon of lighting can therefore be 
regarded as an established fact. 

1 Gclb, Farbenkonstanz, p. 674. a Ibid., p. 675. 8 Ibid., p. 677. 
4 These are the laws set out by Katz in Farbwelt. 
ft Gelb, Farbenkonstanz, p. 677. 

308 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

But this functional relation has so far failed to make clear either 
the terms which it links, or consequently their concrete connection, 
and the greatest benefit of the discovery would be lost if we were 
content merely to establish a correlative variation between the three 
terms taken in their ordinary sense. In what sense are we to say that 
the colour of the object remains constant? What is the organization 
of the spectacle and the field in which it is organized? What finally is 
lighting! Psychological induction remains blind as long as we fail to 
draw together in one single phenomenon the three variables which it 
connotes, and as long as it does not lead us by the hand to some 
intuition in which the alleged 'causes* or 'conditions* of the pheno- 
menon of constancy shall appear as 'moments* of that phenomenon 
and in an essential relation to it. 1 Let us then consider the phenomena 
which have just been revealed to us, and try to see how they motivate 
each other in total perception. Let us look first at that peculiar mode ^ 
of the appearance of light or of colours which we call lighting. What 
is peculiar about it? What occurs when a certain patch of light is 
taken as lighting instead of in its own right? Only after centuries of 
painting did artists perceive that reflection on the eye without 
which the eye remains dull and sightless as in the paintings of the 
early masters. 2 The reflection is not seen as such, since it was in fact 
able to remain unnoticed for so long, and yet it has its function in 
perception, since its mere absence deprives objects and faces of all 
life and expression. The reflection is seen only incidentally. It is not 
presented to our perception as an objective, but as an auxiliary or 
mediating element. It is not seen itself, but causes us to see the rest. 
Reflections and lighting in photography are often badly reproduced 
because they are transformed into things, and if, in a film for example, 
a person goes into a cellar holding a lamp, we do not see the beam of 
light as an immaterial entity exploring the darkness and picking out 
objects, because it becomes solidified and can no longer display to us 
the object at its far end. Light moving over a wall produces only pools 
of dazzling brightness which are localized not on the wall, but on the 

1 In fact the psychologist, however positivistic he tries to remain, certainly feels 
himself that the whole value of inductive research is to lead us to a view of phe- 
nomena, and he never quite resists the temptation to hint, at least, at this new 
coming to awareness. Thus P. Guillaume (Traite de Psychologie, p. 175), when 
setting forth the laws governing the constancy of colours, writes that the eye 
'takes the lighting into account'. Our researches merely, in a sense, amplify this 
concise statement. It means nothing in the context of a strictly positive approach. 
The eye is not the mind, but a material organ. How could it ever take anything 
*into account'? It can do so only if we introduce the phenomenal body beside the 
objective one, if we make a knowing-body of it, and if, in short, we substitute for 
consciousness, as the subject of perception, existence, or being in the world 
through a body. 

f Schapp, Beiirdge zur Phcinomenologie der Wahrnehmung % p. 91. 

309 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



surface of the screen. Lighting and reflection, then, play their part 
only if they remain in the background as discreet intermediaries, and 
lead our gaze instead of arresting it. 1 But what are we to understand 
by that? When I am led through a strange apartment towards its 
owner, there is someone who knows on my behalf, for whom the 
unfolding of the visual spectacle has a meaning, and who moves 
towards a goal, and I entrust or lend myself to this knowledge which 
I do not possess. When some detail in a landscape, which I have been 
unable to distinguish alone, is pointed out to me, there is someone 
who has already seen it, who already knows where to stand and where 
to look in order to see it. The lighting directs my gaze and causes me 
to see the object, so that in a sense it knows and sees the object. If I 
imagine a theatre with no audience in which the curtain rises upon 
illuminated scenery, I have the impression that the spectacle is in 
itself visible or ready to be seen, and that the light which probes the 
back and foreground, accentuating the shadows and permeating the 
scene through and through, in a way anticipates our vision. Con- 
versely our own vision merely takes up on its own account and 
carries through the encompassing of the scene by those paths traced 
out for it by the lighting, just as, when we hear a sentence, we are 
surprised to discover the track of an alien thought. We perceive in 
conformity with the light, as we think in conformity with other 
people in verbal communication. And just as communication pre- 
supposes (even while outstripping and enriching it in the case of new 
and authentic expression) a certain linguistic setting through which a 
meaning resides in the words, so perception presupposes in us an 
apparatus capable of responding to the promptings of light in 
accordance with their sense* (that is, in accordance both with their 
direction and their significance, which amount to one thing), of con- 
centrating diffuse visibility and completing what is merely fore- 
shadowed in the spectacle. This apparatus is the gaze, in other words 
the natural correlation between appearances and our kinaesthetic un- 
foldings, something not known through a law, but experienced as the 
involvement of our body in the typical structures of a world. Lighting 
and the constancy of the thing illuminated, which is its correlative, 
are directly dependent on our bodily situation. If, in a brightly lit 
room, we observe a white disc placed in a shady corner, the con- 
stancy of the white is imperfect. It improves when wc approach the 
shady zone containing the disc. It becomes perfect when we actually 

1 In order to describe the essential function of lighting, Katz borrows from 
painters the term Lichtfiihrung {Farbwelt, pp. 379-81). 

* The French word 'sens* may be equivalent to either 'direction' or 'meaning' 
in English (Translator's note). 

310 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 



enter it. 1 The shade does not become really a shade (and corres- 
pondingly the disc does not count as white) until it has ceased to be in 
front of us as something to be seen, but surrounds us, becoming our 
environment in which we establish ourselves. This phenomenon be- 
comes comprehensible only if the spectacle, far from being a collec- 
tion of objects, a mosaic of qualities arrayed before an acosmic 
subject, steals round the subject and offers to come to terms with him. 
The lighting is not on the side of the object, it is what we assume, 
what we take as the norm, whereas the object lighted stands out be- 
fore us and confronts us. The lighting is neither colour nor, in itself, 
even light, it is anterior to the distinction between colours and 
luminosities. This is why it always tends to become 'neutral' for us. 
The penumbra in which we are becomes so natural that it is no longer 
even perceived as penumbra. Electric lighting, which appears yellow 
immediately upon leaving the daylight, soon ceases to have any 
definite colour for us, and, if some remnant of daylight finds its way 
into the room it is this 'objectively neutral' light which seems to have 
a blue tint about it. 2 We must not say that, since the yellow electric 
lighting is perceived as yellow, we take account of it in the apprecia- 
tion of appearances and thus theoretically discover the actual colour 
of objects. Nor must we say that as the yellow light becomes all- 
embracing it is seen as daylight, and that in this way the colour of 
other objects remains really constant. We must say that the yellow 
light, in assuming the function of lighting, tends to become anterior 
to any colour, tends towards absence of colour, and that corres- 
pondingly objects distribute the colours of the spectrum among 
themselves according to the degree and mode of their resistance 
to this new atmosphere. Every colour as a quale is therefore mediated 
by a colour-function, and becomes determinate in relation to a level 
which is variable. The level is laid down, and with it all the colour 
values dependent upon it, as soon as we begin to live in the prevailing 
atmosphere and re-allot to objects the colours of the spectrum in 
accordance with the requirements of this basic convention. Taking up 
our abode in a certain setting of colour, with the transposition which 
it entails, is a bodily operation, and I cannot effect it otherwise than 
by entering into the new atmosphere, because my body is my general 
power of inhabiting all the environments which the world contains, 
the key to all those transpositions and equivalences which keep it 
constant. Thus lighting is merely one element of a complex structure, 
the others being the organization of the field as our body contrives it 
and the thing illuminated in its constancy. The functional correlations 

1 Gelb, Farbenkonstanz, p. 633. 

2 KofTka, Principles of Gestalt Psychology, pp. 255 and ff. See La Structure du 
Comportement, pp. 108 and ft'. 

311 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



which can be discovered between these three phenomena are merely 
manifestations of their 'essential co-existence'. 1 

This can be brought out more clearly by scrutinizing the two latter. 
What are v/e to understand by the organization of the field ? We have 
seen that, if we insert a white paper into the beam of light thrown by 
an arc lamp, the beam having hitherto been fused with the disc on to 
which it falls, and perceived as a solid cone — immediately the beam 
and the disc are dissociated and the lighting takes on the quality of 
lighting. The introduction of the paper into the beam, by forcing us 
clearly to recognize the 'non-solidity' of the cone of light, alters its 
significance in relation to the disc supporting it and brings out its 
quality as lighting. It is as if there were an incompatibility, vividly 
experienced, between the sight of the illuminated paper and that of a 
solid cone, and as if the significance of part of the spectacle induced a 
reassessment of the significance of the whole. In the same way we 
have seen that in the various parts of the visual field taken separately, 
the distinctive colour of the object on the one hand and the lighting 
on the other are indistinguishable, but that, in the visual field taken 
as a whole and through a kind of reciprocal action in which each part 
benefits from the configuration of the rest, a general effect of lighting 
emerges and endows each local colour with its 'true' value. Here 
again, it is as if the parts of the spectacle, being unable singly to 
summon up the vision of lighting, made this possible by their union, 
and also as if, into the colour values spread through the field, some- 
one read the possibility of a systematic transformation. When a 
painter wants to depict some striking object, he does so less by apply- 
ing a bright colour to that object than by a suitable distribution of 
light and shade on surrounding ones. 2 If we manage momentarily to 
glimpse a hollowed motif as one in relief, a seal for example, we 
suddenly have the impression of a magic lighting emanating from the 
interior of the object. This is because the light and shade relationships 
on the seal are then the opposite of what they should be by reason of 
the lighting at the time. If we move a lamp round a bust at a constant 
distance from it, even when the lamp itself is invisible we see the 
rotation of the source of light in the complex of changing light and 
colour which is all that is given. 3 

There is, then, a 'logic of lighting' 4 or again a 'synthesis of light- 
ing', 5 a compossibility of the parts of the visual field, which may well 
be specified in disjunctive propositions, as when the painter tries to 
justify his work to an art critic, but which is primarily experienced as 
the consistency of the picture or the reality of -the spectacle. What is 

1 WesenskoexisteriZy Gclb, Farbenkonstanz, p. 671. 

2 Katz, Farbwelt, p. 36. 3 Ibid., pp. 379-81. 
* Ibid., p. 213. i Ibid., p. 456. 

312 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

more, there is a total logic of the picture or the spectacle, a felt 
coherence of the colours, spatial forms and significance of the object. 
A picture in an art gallery, when seen at an appropriate distance, has 
its internal lighting which confers upon each patch of colours not only 
its colour value, but also a certain representative value. Seen at too 
close quarters it falls under the prevailing lighting of the art gallery, 
and the colours 'then no longer act in a representative manner, and 
no longer present us with the image of certain objects, but act as so 
much daubing on a canvas'. 1 If, on looking at a mountain scene, we 
adopt a critical attitude and isolate part of the field, then the colour 
itself changes, and this green, which was meadow green, when taken 
out of its context, loses its thickness and its colour as well as its 
representative value. 2 A colour is never merely a colour, but the 
colour of a certain object, and the blue of a carpet would never be the 
same blue were it not a woolly blue. The colours of the visual field, as 
we earlier saw, form an ordered system round a dominant which is 
the lighting taken as a level. We now begin to see a deeper meaning in 
the organization of a field : it is not only colours, but also geometrical 
forms, all sense-data and the significance of objects which go to form 
a system. Our perception in its entirety is animated by a logic which 
assigns to each object its determinate features in virtue of those of the 
rest, and which 'cancel out* as unreal all stray data; it is entirely 
sustained by the certainty of the world. In this way we finally see the , 
true significance of perceptual constancies. The constancy of colour 
is only an abstract component of the constancy of things, which in 
turn is grounded in the primordial constancy of the world as the 
horizon of all our experiences. It is not, then, because I perceive 
constant colours beneath the variety of lightings that I believe in the 
existence of things, nor is the thing a collection of constant charac- 
teristics. It is, on the contrary, in so far as my perception is in itself 
open upon a world and on things that I discover constant colours. 

The phenomenon of constancy is a general one. It has been found 
possible to speak of a constancy of sounds, 3 temperatures, weights, 4 
and indeed data which are in the strict sense tactile, a constancy itself 
mediated by certain structures, certain 'modes of appearance' of 
phenomena in each of these sensory fields. The perception of weights 
remains the same whatever the muscles called into play, and whatever 
their initial position. When an object is lifted with the eyes closed, its 
weight is no different, whether or not the hand carries an extra weight 
(and whether this weight exerts pressure on the back of the hand or a 

1 Katz, Farbwelt, p. 382. 2 Ibid., p. 261. 

3 Von Hornbostel, Das Raumliche Horen. 

4 Werner, Grundfragen der Intensitatspsychologie, pp. 68 and flf. Fischel, Trans- 
formationserscheinungen bei Gewichtshebungen, pp. 342 and ff. 

313 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

pull on the palm) — whether the hand is free or is fastened in such a 
way that the fingers work alone — whether one or more fingers per- 
form the task — whether the object be raised with the hand or the 
head, foot or teeth — and finally whether the object is lifted in the air 
or in water. Thus the tactile impression is 'interpreted' in the light of 
the nature and number of the parts of the body brought into play, 
and even of the physical circumstances under which it appears; thus 
do impressions, in themselves highly variable, such as pressure on the 
skin of the forehead and on the hand, mediate the same perception of 
weight. It is impossible here to suppose that the interpretation rests 
on any explicit induction, and that, in the previous experiment, the 
subject was able to measure the incidence of these different variables 
on the actual weight of the object. He has probably never had occa- 
sion to interpret frontal pressure in terms of weight or, in order to 
find the ordinary scale of weights, to add to the local impression of 
the fingers the weight of the arm reduced through immersion in 
water. Even if it be conceded that, through the use of his body, the 
subject has gradually evolved a scale of weight-equivalences, and 
learned that a certain impression furnished through the muscles of 
the fingers is equivalent to another derived from the whole hand, 
such inductions, since they are applied to parts of the body which 
have never been used for the lifting of weights, must at all events be 
made within the framework of a global bodily knowledge which 
systematically embraces all its parts. The constancy of weight is not a 
real constancy, or the permanence within us of some 'impression of 
weight', gained through those parts of the body most often usea, 
and reached by association in the remaining cases. Is the weight of 
the object, then, to be regarded as a theoretical invariant, and the 
perception of weight a judgement by means of which, the impression 
and the bodily and physical circumstances in which it occurs being in 
each case brought into relation with each other, we discern by a kind 
of natural physics a constant relationship between these two vari- 
ables? But this can be so only in a manner of speaking: we do not 
know our body and the power, weight and scope of our organs as an 
engineer knows the machine which he has assembled part by part. 
And when we compare the work of our hand with that of our fingers, 
it is against the background of a comprehensive potentiality of our 
limb as hitherto known that they are distinguished or identified, and 
in the unity of an 'I can' that the operations of difTerent parts of the 
body appear equivalent. Correspondingly the 'impressions' provided 
by each one of them are not really distinct and related to each other 
merely by an explicit interpretation, but present themselves im- 
mediately as dilfcrent manifestations of the 'real' weight, and the ~>re- 
objective unity of the thing is correlative to the pre-objective unity of 

314 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

the body. Thus the weight appears as the identifiable property of a 
tiling against the background of our body as a system of equivalent 
gestures. This analysis of the perception of weight elucidates the 
whole of tactile perception: the movement of one's own body is to 
touch what lighting is to vision. 1 All tactile perception, while opening 
itself to an objective 'property', includes a bodily component; the 
tactile localization of an object, for example, assigns to it its place in 
relation to the cardinal points of the body image. This property 
which, at first sight, draws an absolute distinction between touch and 
vision, in fact makes it possible to draw them together. It is true that 
the visible object is in front of us and not on our eye, but we have 
seen that in the last resort the visible position, size or shape are 
determined by the direction, scope and hold which our gaze has upon 
them. It is true that passive touch (for example touch inside the ear or 
nose, and generally in all parts of the body ordinarily covered) tells 
us hardly anything but the state of our own body and almost nothing 
about the object. Even on the most sensitive parts of our tactile 
surface, pressure without movement produces a scarcely identifiable 
phenomenon. 2 But there is also passive vision, with no gaze specific- 
ally directed, as in the case of a dazzling light, which does not unfold 
an objective space before us, and in which the light ceases to be light 
and becomes something painful which invades cur eye itself. And like 
the exploratory gaze of true vision, the 'knowing touch' 3 projects us 
outside our body through movement. When one of my hands touches 
the other, the hand that moves functions as subject and the other as 
object. 4 There are tactile phenomena, alleged tactile qualities, like 
roughness and smoothness, which disappear completely if the ex- 
ploratory movement is eliminated. Movement and time are not only 
an objective condition of knowing touch, but a phenomenal com- 
ponent of tactile data. They bring about the patterning of tactile 
phenomena, just as light shows up the configuration of a visible 
surface. 5 Smoothness is not a collection of similar pressures, but the 
way in which a surface utilizes the time occupied by our tactile ex- 
ploration or modulates the movement of our hand. The style of these 
modulations particularizes so many modes of appearance of the 
tactile phenomenon, which are not reducible to each other and can- 
not be deduced from an elementary tactile sensation. There are 
'surface tactile phenomena' {Oberflachentastungeri) in which a two- 
dimensional tactile object is presented to the touch and more or less 
firmly resists penetration, three-dimensional tactile environments, 
comparable to areas of colour, for example a flow of air or water 
which we allow to run over our hand — and there is also tactile 

1 Sec Katz, Der Aufbau cler Tastwelt, p. 58. 2 Ibid., p. 62. 
3 Ibid., p. 20. 4 Ibid. 5 Ibid., p. 58. 

315 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

transparency {Durchtastete Fldchen). Dampness, oiliness and sticki- 
ness belong to a more complex layer of structures. 1 On touching a 
piece of carved wood, we immediately distinguish the grain of the 
wood, which is its natural structure, from the artificial structure 
which has been conferred upon it by the wood carver, just as the ear 
picks out a note from a set of noises. 2 There are here various struc- 
tures of the exploratory movement, and the corresponding pheno- 
mena cannot be treated as a collection of elementary tactile impres- 
sions, since the alleged component impressions are not even given to 
the subject: if I touch a piece of linen material or a brush, between 
the bristles of the brush and the threads of the linen, there does not 
lie a tactile nothingness, but a tactile space devoid of matter, a tactile 
background. 3 Not being really dissectable, the complex tactile pheno- 
menon is, for the same reasons, not theoretically so either, and if we 
tried to define hardness or softness, roughness or smoothness, sand 
or honey as so many laws or rules governing the development of 
tactile experience, it would still be necessary to include in the latter 
knowledge of the elements which the law co-ordinates. The person 
who touches and who recognizes the rough and the smooth does not 
posit either their elements or the relations between those elements, 
nor does he think of them in any thoroughgoing way. It is not con- 
sciousness which touches or feels, but the hand, and the hand is, as 
Kant says, 'an outer brain of man'. 4 In visual experience, which 
pushes objectification further than does tactile experience, we can, at 
least at first sight, flatter ourselves that we constitute the world, be- 
cause it presents us with a spectacle spread out before us at a distance, 
and gives us the illusion of being immediately present everywhere and 
being situated nowhere. Tactile experience, on the other hand, ad- 
heres to the surface of our body; we cannot unfold it before us, and it 
never quite becomes an object. Correspondingly, as the subject of 
touch, I cannot flatter myself that I am everywhere and nowhere; I 
cannot forget in this case that it is through my body that I go to the 
v world, and tactile experience occurs 'ahead' of me, and is not centred 
in me. It is not I who touch, it is my body; when I touch I do not 
think of diversity, but my hands rediscover a certain style which is 
part of their motor potentiality, and this is what we mean when we 
speak of a perceptual field. I am able to touch effectively only if the 
phenomenon finds an echo within me, if it accords with a certain 
nature of my consciousness, and if the organ which goes out to meet 
it- is synchronized with it. The unity and identity of the tactile 
phenomenon do not come about through any synthesis of recognition 

1 Cf. Katz, Der Aufbau der Tastwelt, pp. 24-35. 

2 Ibid., pp. 38-9. 3 Ibid., p. 42. 
4 Quoted without reference by Katz, ibid., p. 4. 

316 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

in the concept, they are founded upon the unity and identity of the 
body as a synergic totality. 'On the day the child uses its hand as a 
unique instrument of prehension, it becomes equally a unique instru- 
ment of touch'. 1 Not only do I use my fingers and my whole body as a 
single organ, but also, thanks to this unity of the body, the tactile 
perceptions gained through an organ are immediately translated into 
the language of the rest ; for example, the contact of our back or chest 
with linen or wool remains in the memory in the form of a manual 
contact, 2 and it may be said in more general terms that we can, in 
recollection, touch an object with parts of our body which have never 
actually been in contact with it. 3 Each contact of an object with part 
of our objective body is, therefore, in reality a contact with the whole 
of the present or possible phenomenal body. That is how tb.e con- / 
stancy of a tactile object may come about through its various mani- 
festations. It is a constancy-for-my-body, an invariant of its total 
behaviour. The body is borne towards tactile experience by all its 
surfaces and all its organs simultaneously, and carries with it a certain 
typical structure of the tactile 'world'. 

We are now in a position to approach the analysis of the thing as 
an inter-sensory entity. The thing as presented to sight (the moon's 
pale disc) or to touch (my skull as I can feel it when I touch it), and 
which stays the same for us through a series of experiences, is neither 
a quale genuinely subsisting, nor the notion or consciousness of such 
an objective property, but what is discovered or taken up by our gaze 
or our movement, a question to which these things provide a fully 
appropriate reply. The object which presents itself to the gaze or the 
touch arouses a certain motor intention which aims not at the move- 
ments of one's own body, but at the thing itself from which they are, 
as it v/ere, suspended. And in so far as my hand knows hardness and 
softness, and my gaze knows the % moon's light, it is as a certain way of 
linking up with the phenomenon and communicating with it. Hard- 
ness and softness, roughness and smoothness, moonlight and sun- 
light, present themselves in our recollection, not pre-eminently as 
sensory contents, but as certain kinds of symbiosis, certain ways the 
outside has of invading us and certain ways we have of meeting this 
invasion, and memory here merely frees the framework of the per- 
ception from the place where it originates. If the constants of each 
sense are thus understood, the question of defining the inter-sensory 
thing into which they unite as a collection of stable attributes or as 
the notion of this collection, will not arise. The sensory 'properties' of 
a thing together constitute one and the same thing, just as my gaze, 

1 Cf. Katz, Der Aufbau der Tastwelt, p. 160. 

2 Ibid., p. 46. 3 Ibid., p. 51. 

317 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



my touch and all my other senses are together the powers of one and 
the same body integrated into one and the same action. The surface 
which I am about to recognize as the surface of the table, when 
vaguely looked at, already summons me to focus upon it, and de- 
mands those movements of convergence which will endow it with its 
'true' aspect. Similarly any object presented to one sense calls upon 
itself the concordant operation of all the others. I see a surface colour 
because I have a visual field, and because the arrangement of the field 
leads my gaze to that surface — I perceive a thing because I have a 
field of existence and because each phenomenon, on its appearance, 
attracts towards that field the whole of my body as a system of per- 
ceptual powers. I run through appearances and reach the real colour 
or the real shape when my experience is at its maximum of clarity, in 
spite of the fact that Berkeley may retort that a fly would see the same 
object differently or that a stronger microscope would transform it: 
these different appearances are for me appearances of a certain true 
spectacle, that in which the perceived configuration, for a sufficient 
degree of clarity, reaches its maximum richness. 1 1 have visual objects 
because I have a visual field in which richness and clarity are in in- 
verse proportion to each other, and because these two demands, either 
of which taken separately might be carried to infinity, when brought 
together, produce a certain culmination and optimum balance in the 
perceptual process. In the same way, what I call experience of the 
thing or of reality — not merely of a reality-for-sight or for-touch, but 
of an absolute reality— is my full co-existence with the phenomenon, 
at the moment when it is in every way at its maximum articulation, 
and the 'data of the different senses' arc directed towards this one 
pole, as my 'aims' as I look through a microscope vacillate about one 
predominant 'target'. I do not propose to bestow the term 'visual 
thing' upon a phenomenon which, like areas of colour, presents no 
maximum visibility through the various experiences which I have of 
it, or which, like the sky, remote and thin on the horizon, unlocalized 
and diffuse at the zenith, allows itself to be contaminated by the 
structures closest to it without setting over against them any con- 
figuration of its own. If a phenomenon — for example, a reflection or a 
light gust of wind — strikes only one of my senses, it is a mere phan- 
tom, and it will come near to real existence only if, by some chance, 
it becomes capable of speaking to my other senses, as does the wind 
when, for example, it blows strongly and can be seen in the tumult it 
causes in the surrounding countryside. Cezanne declared that a 
picture contains within itself even the smell of the landscape. 2 He 
meant that the arrangement of colour on the thing (and in the work of 

1 Schapp, Beitrage zur Phanomenologie der Wahrnehmung, pp. 59 and AT. 

2 J. Gasquct, Cezanne, p. 81. 

318 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

art, if it catches the thing in its entirety) signifies by itself all the 
responses which would be elicited through an examination by the re- 
maining senses; that a thing would not have this colour had it not 
also this shape, these tactile properties, this resonance, this odour, 
and that the thing is the absolute fullness which my undivided 
existence projects before itself. The unity of the thing beyond all its 
fixed properties is not a substratum, a vacant X, an inherent subject, 
but that unique accent which is to be found in each one of them, that 
unique manner of existing of which they are a second order expres- 
sion. For exar pie, the brittleness, hardness, transparency and 
crystal ring of a glass all translate a single manner of being. If a sick 
man sees the devil, he sees at the same time his smell, his flames and 
smoke, because the significant unity 'devil' is precisely that acrid, 
fire-and-brimstone essence. There is a symbolism in the thing which 
links each sensible quality to the rest. Heat enters experience as a kind 
of vibration of the thing; with colour on the other hand it is as if the 
thing is thrust outside itself, and it is a priori necessary that an ex- 
tremely hot object should redden, for it is its excess of vibration 
which causes it to blaze forth. 1 The passing of sensory givens before 
our eyes or under our hands is, as it were, a language which teaches 
itself, and in which the meaning is secreted by the very structure of 
the signs, and this is why it can literally be said that our senses 
question things and that things reply to them. 4 The sensible appear- 
ance is what reveals (Kundgibt), and expresses as such what it is not 
itself. 2 We understand the thing as we understand a new kind of 
behaviour, not, that is, through any intellectual operation of sub- 
sumption, but by taking up on our own account the mode of existence 
which the observable signs adumbrate before us. A form of behaviour 
outlines a certain manner of treating the world. In the same way, in 
the interaction of things, each one is characterized by a kind of a 
priori to which it remains faithful in all its encounters with the outside 
world. The significance of a thing inhabits that thing as the soul in- 
habits the body: it is not behind appearances. The significance of the 
ash-tray (at least its total and individual significance, as this is given 
in perception) is not a certain idea of the ash-tray which co-ordinates 
its sensory aspects and is accessible to the understanding alone, it 

1 This unity of the sensory experiences rests on their integration in a single life 
of which they thus become the visible witness and emblem. The perceived world 
is not only a system of symbols of each sense in terms of the other senses, but also 
a set of symbols of human life, as is proved by the fames' of passion, the 'light' 
of the spirit and so many other metaphors and myths. H. Conrad-Martius, 
Realontologie, p. 302. 

2 H. Conrad-Martius, ibid., p. 196. The same author (Zur Ontologie und 
Erscheinungslehre der realen Aussenwelt) speaks of a Selbstkundgabe of the 
object (p. 371). 

319 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

animates the ash-tray, and is self-evidently embodied in it. That is 
why we say that in perception the thing is given to us 'in person', or 
'in the flesh*. Prior to and independently of other people, the thing 
achieves that miracle of expression: an inner reality which reveals 
itself externally, a significance which descends into the world and 
begins its existence there, and which can be fully understood only 
when the eyes seek it in its own location. Thus the thing is correlative 
to my body and, in more general terms, to my existence, of which my 
body is merely the stabilized structure. It is constituted in the hold 
which my body takes upon it; it is not first of all a meaning for the 
understanding, but a structure accessible to inspection by the body, 
and if we try to describe the real as it appears to us in perceptual ex- 
perience, we find it overlaid with anthropological predicates. 

The relations between things or aspects of things having always our 
body as their vehicle, the whole of nature is the setting of our own 
life, or our interlocutor in a sort of dialogue. That is why in the last 
analysis we cannot conceive anything which is not perceived or per- 
ceptible. As Berkeley says, even an unexplored desert has at least one 
person to observe it, namely myself when I think of it, that is, when I 
perceive it in purely mental experience. The thing is inseparable from 
a person perceiving it, and can never be actually in itself because its 
articulations are those of our very existence, and because it stands at 
the other end of our gaze or at the terminus of a sensory exploration 
wh)<h invests it with humanity. To this extent, every perception is a 
communication or a communion, the taking up or completion by us 
of some extraneous intention or, on the other hand, the complete 
expression outside ourselves of our perceptual powers and a coition, 
so to speak, of our body with things. The fact that this may not have 
been realized earlier is explained by the fact that any coming to 
awareness of the perceptual world was hampered by the prejudices 
arising from objective thinking. The function of the latter is to reduce 
all phenomena which bear witness to the union of subject and world, 
putting in their place the clear idea of the object as in itself and of the 
subject as pure consciousness. It therefore severs the links which unite 
the thing and the embodied subject, leaving only sensible qualities to 
make up our world (to the exclusion of the modes of appearance 
which we have described), and preferably visual qualities, because 
these give the impression of being autonomous, and because they are 
less directly linked to our body and present us with an object rather 
than introducing us into an atmosphere. But in reality all things are 
concretions of a setting, and any explicit perception of a thing sur- 
vives in virtue of a previous communication with a certain at- 
mosphere. We are not *a collection of eyes, ears and organs of touch 
with their cerebral projections. . . . Just as all literary works ... are 

320 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

only particular cases of the possible permutations of the sounds 
which make up language and of their literal signs, so qualities or 
sensations represent the elements from which the great poetry of our 
world (Umwelt) is made up. But just as surely as someone knowing 
only sounds and letters would have no understanding of literature, 
and would miss not only its ultimate nature but everything about 
it, so the world is not given and things are not accessible to those 
for whom "sensations" are the given/ 1 The perceived is not neces- 
sarily an object present before me as a piece of knowledge to be 
acquired, it may be a 'unity of value* which is present to me only 
practically. If a picture has been removed from a living room, we may 
perceive that a change has taken place without being able to say what. 
I perceive everything that is part of my environment, and my en- 
vironment includes 'everything of which the existence or non- 
existence, the nature or modification counts in practice for me' : 2 the 
storm which has not yet broken, whose signs I could not even list and 
which I cannot even forecast, but* for which I am 'worked up' and 
prepared — the periphery of the visual field which the hysterical sub- 
ject does not expressly grasp, but which nevertheless co-determines 
his movements and orientation — the respect of other men, or that 
loyal friendship which I take for granted, but which are none the less 
there for me, since they leave me morally speaking in mid-air when I 
am deprived of them. 3 Love is in the flowers prepared by Felix de 
Vandenesse for Madame de Mortsauf, just as unmistakeably as in a 
caress : 'I thought that the colours and the foliage had a harmony and 
a poetry which emerges into the understanding by delighting the gaze, 
just as musical phrases awaken countless memories in ljearts that love 
and are loved. If colour is organized light, must it not have a meaning, 
as different combinations of air have theirs. . . Love has its heraldry 
and the countess secretly deciphered it. She gave me one of those 
sharp looks that seem like the cry of a sick man touched on his 
wound: she was both embarrassed and delighted/ The flowers are 
self-evidently a love bouquet, and yet it is impossible to say what in 
them signifies love, and that is even the reason why Mme de Mortsauf 
can accept them without breaking her vows. There is no way of 
understanding them other than by looking at them, but to the be- 
holder they say what they mean. Their significance is the track of an 
existence, legible and comprehensible for another existence. Natural 
perception is not a science, it does not posit the things with which 
science deals, it does not held them at arm's length in order to ob- 
serve them, but lives with them; it is the 'opinion' or the 'primary 
faith' which binds us to a world as to our native land, and the being of 

1 Scheler, Der Formalismus in der Ethik unddie materiale Wertethik, pp. 149-51 . 
8 Ibid., p. 140. s Ibid. 

321 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

what is perceived is the antepredicative being towards which our 
whole existence is polarized. 

However, we have not exhausted the meaning of 'the thing' by 
defining it as the correlative of our body and our life. After all, we 
grasp the unity of our body only in that of the thing, and it is by taking 
things as our starting point that our hands, eyes and all our sense- 
organs appear to us as so many interchangeable instruments. The 
body by itself, the body at rest is merely an obscure mass, and we per- 
ceive it as a precise and identifiable being when it moves towards a 
thing, and in so far as it is intentionally projected outwards, and even 
then this perception is never more than incidental and marginal to 
consciousness, the centre of which is occupied with things and the 
world. One cannot, as we have said, conceive any perceived thing 
without someone to perceive it. But the fact remains that the thing 
presents itself to the person who perceives it as a thing in itself, and 
thus poses the problem of a genuine in-itself-fof-us. Ordinarily we do 
not notice this because our perception, in the context of our everyday 
concerns, alights on things sufficiently attentively to discover in them 
their familiar presence, but not sufficiently so to disclose the non- 
human element which lies hidden in them. But the tiling holds itself 
aloof from us and remains self-sufficient. This will become clear if wc 
suspend our ordinary preoccupations and pay a metaphysical and 
disinterested attention to it. It is then hostile and alien, no longer an 
interlocutor, but a resolutely silent Other, a Self which evades us no 
less than does intimacy with an outside consciousness. The thing and 
the world, we have already said, are offered to perceptual com- 
munication as is a familiar face with an expression which is im- 
mediately understood. But then a face expresses something only 
through the arrangements of the colours and lights which make it up, 
the meaning of the gaze being not behind the eyes, but in them, and a 
touch of colour more or less is all the painter needs in order to 
transform the facial expression of a portrait. In the work of his earlier 
years, Cezanne tried to paint the expression first and foremost, and 
that is why he never caught it. He gradually learned that expression is 
the language of the thing itself and springs from its configuration. 
His painting is an attempt to recapture the physiognomy of things 
and faces by the integral reproduction of their sensible configuration. 
This is what nature constantly and effortlessly achieves, and it is why 
the paintings of Cezanne are 'those of a prc-world in which as yet no 
men existed'. 1 The thing appeared to us above as the goal of a bodily 
teleology, the norm of our psycho-physiological setting. But that was 
merely a psychological definition which does not make the full 

1 F. Novotny, Das Problem des Menschcn Ce'zanne im Verhaltnis zu seiner 
Kunst, p. 275. 

322 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

meaning of the tiling defined explicit, and which reduces the thing to 
those experiences in which we encounter it. We now discover the core 
of reality: a thing is a thing because, whatever it imparts to us, is 
imparted through the very organization of its sensible aspects. The 
'real' is thai environment in which each moment is not only in- 
separable from the rest, but in some way synonymous with them, in 
which the 'aspects' are mutually significatory and absolutely equiva- 
lent. This is perfect fulness: it is impossible completely to describe the 
colour of the carpet without saying that it is a carpet, made of wool, 
and without implying in this colour a certain tactile value, a certain 
weight and a certain resistance to sound. The thing is an entity of a 
kind such that the complete definition of one of its attributes demands 
that of the subject in its entirety: an entity, consequently, the sig- 
nificance of which is indistinguishable from its total appearance. 
Cezanne again said: The outline and the colour are no longer 
distinct; in proportion as one paints, one outlines, and the more the 
colour is harmonized, the more definite the outline becomes . . . 
when the colour is at its richest, the form is at its most complete'. 1 
With the structure lighting-lighted, background and foreground are 
possible. With the appearance of the thing, there can at last be uni- 
vocal forms and positions. The system of appearances, the pre- 
spatial fields acquire an anchorage and ultimately become a space. 
But it is not the case that geometrical features alone are merged with 
colour. The very significance of the thing is built up before our eyes, 
a significance which no verbal analysis can exhaust, and which merges 
with the exhibiting of the tiling in its self-evidence. Every touch of 
colour applied by Cezanne must, as E. Bernard says, 'contain the 
atmosphere, the light, the object, the relief, the character, the outline 
and the style'. 2 Each fragment of a visible spectacle satisfies an in- 
finite number of conditions, and it is of the nature of the real to 
compress into each of its instants an infinity of relations. Like the 
thing, the picture has to be seen and not defined, nevertheless, though 
it is a small world which reveals itself within the larger one, it cannot 
lay claim to the same substantiality. We feel that it is put together by 
design, that in it significance precedes existence and clothes itself in 
only the minimum of matter necessary for its communication. The 
miracle of the real world, on the other hand, is that in it significance 
and existence are one, and that we see the latter lodge itself in no un- 
certain fashion in the former. In the realm of imagination, I have no 
sooner formed the intention of seeing than I already believe that I 
have seen. The imaginary has no depth, and does not respond to our 
efforts to vary our points of view; it does not lend itself to our 

1 Gasquet, Cezanne, p. 123. 

2 E. Bernard' La Meihode de Cezanne, p. 298. 

323 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

observation. 1 We never have a hold upon it. In every perception, on 
the other hand, it is the material itself which assumes significance and 
form. If I wait for someone at a door in a poorly lit street, each person 
who comes out has an indistinct appearance. Someone is coming out, 
and I do not yet know whether I can recognize him as the person I am 
waiting for. The familiar figure will emerge from this nebulous back- 
ground as the earth does from a ground mist. The real is distinguish- 
able from our fictions because in reality the significance encircles and 
permeates matter. Once a picture is torn up, we have in our hands 
nothing but pieces of daubed canvas. But if we break up a stone and 
then further break up the fragments, the pieces remaining are still 
pieces of stone. The real lends itself to unending exploration; it is in- 
exhaustible. This is why objects belonging to man, tools, seem to be 
placed on the world, whereas things are rooted in a background of 
nature which is alien to man. For our human existence, the thing is 
much less a pole which attracts than one which repels. We do not 
begin by knowing the perspective aspects of the thing; it is not 
mediated by our senses, our sensations or our perspectives; we go 
straight to it, and it is only in a secondary way that we become aware 
of the limits of our knowledge and of ourselves as knowing. Here is a 
die; let us consider it as it is presented, in the natural attitude, to a 
subject who has never wondered about perception, and who lives 
among things. The die is there, lying in the world. When the subject 
moves round it, there appear, not signs, but sides of the die. He does 
not perceive projections or even profiles of the die, but he sees the die 
itself at one time from this side, at another from that, and those 
appearances which are not yet firmly fixed intercommunicate, run 
into each other, and all radiate from a central Wurfelhaftigkeit 2 
which is the mystical link between them. 

A set of reductions makes its appearance from the moment we take 
the perceiving subject into account. In the first place I notice that this 
die is for me only. Perhaps after all people nearby do not see it, and 
this alone deprives it of some element of its reality; it ceases to be in 
itself in order to become the pole of a personal history. Then I ob- 
serve that the die is, strictly speaking, presented to me only through 
sight, and immediately I am left with nothing but the outer surface of 
the whole die; it loses its materiality, empties itself, and is reduced to 
a visual structure of form, colour, light and shade. But the form, 
colour, light and shade are not in a void, for they still retain a point 
of support, namely the visual thing. Furthermore the visual thing has 
still a spatial structure which endows its qualitative properties with a 
particular value: if I learn that the die is merely an illusory one, its 

1 J. P. Sartre, U Imaginaire, p. 19. 

2 Scheie r, Der Formalismus in der Ethik, p. 52. 

324 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

colour changes straight away, and it no longer has the same manner 
of modulating space. All the spatial relations to be found in the die 
and which are capable of being made explicit, for example the dis- 
tance from its nearer to its farther face, the 'real' size of the angles, 
the 'real' direction of its sides, are indivisible in its being as a visible 
die. It is by way of a third reduction that we pass from the visual 
thing to the perspective aspect: I observe that the faces of the die 
cannot all fall beneath my gaze, and that certain of them undergo 
distortions. Through a final reduction, I arrive ultimately at the 
sensation which is no longer a property of the thing, or even of the 
perspective aspect, but a modification of my body. 1 The experience of 
the thing does not go through all these mediations, and consequently 
the thing is not presented to a mind which seizes each constituent 
layer as representative of a higher layer, building it up from start to 
finish. It exists primarily in its self-evidence, and any attempt to 
define the thing either as a pole of my bodily life, or as a permanent 
possibility of sensations, or as a synthesis of appearances, puts in 
place of the thing itself in its primordial being an imperfect recon- 
struction of the thing with the aid of bits and pieces of subjective 
provenance. How are we to understand both that the thing is the 
correlative of my knowing body, and that it rejects that body? 

What is given is not the thing on its own, but the experience of the 
thing, or something transcendent standing in the wake of one's sub- 
jectivity, some kind of natural entity of which a glimpse is afforded 
through a personal history. If one tried, according to the realistic 
approach, to make perception into some coincidence with the thing, 
it would no longer be possible to understand what the perceptual 
event was, how the subject managed to assimilate the thing, how after 
coinciding with the thing he was able to consign it to his own history, 
since ex kypothesi he would have nothing of it in his possession. In 
order to perceive things, we need to live them. Yet we reject the 
idealism involved in the synthetic view, because it too distorts our 
lived-through relationship to things. In so far as the perceiving sub- 
ject synthesizes the percept, he has to dominate and grasp in thought 
a material of perception, to organize and himself link together, from 
the inside, all the aspects of the thing, which means that perception 
ceases to be inherent in an individual subject and a point of view, and 
that the thing loses its transcendence and opacity. To 'live' a thing is 
not to coincide with it, nor fully to embrace it in thought. Our 
problem, therefore, becomes clear. The perceiving subject must, 
without relinquishing his place and his point of view, and in the 
opacity of sensation, reach out towards things to which he has, in 
advance, no key, and for which he nevertheless carries within himself 
1 Scheler, Der Formalismus in dtv Ethik, pp. 51-4. 
325 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



the project, and open himself to an absolute Other which he is making 
ready in the depths of his being. The thing is not all of a piece, for 
though the perspective aspects, and the ever-changing flow of appear- 
ances, are not explicitly posited, all are at least ready to be perceived 
and given in non-positing consciousness, to precisely the extent 
necessary for me to be able to escape from them into the thing. 
When I perceive a pebble, I am not expressly conscious of knowing it 
only through my eyes, of enjoying only certain perspective aspects of 
it, and yet an analysis in these terms, if I undertake it, does not sur- 
prise me. Beforehand I knew obscurely that my gaze was the medium 
and instrument of comprehensive perception, and the pebble ap- 
peared to me in the full light of day in opposition to the concentrated 
darkness of my bodily organs. I can imagine possible fissures in the 
solid mass of the thing if i take it into my head to close one eye or to 
think of the perspective. It is in this way that it is true to say that the 
thing is the outcome of a flow of subjective appearances. And yet I 
did not actually constitute it, in the sense that I did not actively and 
through a process of mental inspection posit the interrelations of the 
many aspects presented to the senses, and the relations of all of them 
to my different kinds of sensory apparatus. We have expressed this by 
saying that I perceive with my body. The visual thing appears when 
my gaze, following the indications offered by the spectacle, and draw- 
ing together the light and shade spread over it, ultimately settles on the 
lighted surface as upon that which the light reveals. My gaze 'knows' 
the significance of a certain patch of light in a certain context; it 
understands the logic of lighting. Expressed in more general terms, 
there is a logic of the world to which my body in its entirety con- 
forms, and through which things of intersensory significance become 
possible for us. In so far as it is capable of synergy, my body knows 
the significance, for the totality of my experience, of this or that 
colour added or subtracted, and the occurrence of any such change 
is immediately picked out from the object's presentation and general 
significance. To have senses, sight for example, is to possess that 
general apparatus, that cast of possible, visual relations with the 
help of which we are able to take up any given visual grouping. 
To have a body is to possess a universal setting, a schema of all 
types of perceptual unfolding and of all those inter-sensory cor- 
respondences which lie beyond the segment of the world which we 
are actually perceiving. A thing is, therefore, not actually given in 
perception, it is internally taken up by us, reconstituted and ex- 
perienced by us in so far as it is bound up with a world, the basic 
structures of which wc carry with us, and of which it is merely one of 
many possible concrete forms. Although a part of our living ex- 
perience, it is nevertheless transcendent in relation to our life because 

326 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

the human body, with its habits which weave round it a human en- 
vironment, has running through it a movement towards the world 
itself. Animal behaviour aims at an animal setting (Umwelt) and 
centres of resistance (Wider si and). If we try to subject it to natural 
stimuli devoid of concrete significance, we produce neuroses. 1 
Human behaviour opens upon a world (Welt) and upon an object 
(Gegenstand) beyond the tools which it makes for itself, and one may 
even treat one's own body as an object. Human life is defined in 
terms of this power which it has of denying itself in objective thought, 
a power which stems from its primordial attachment to the world 
itself. Human life 'understands' not only a certain definite environ- 
ment, but an infinite number of possible environments, and it under- 
stands itself because it is thrown into a natural world. 

What needs to be elucidated, then, is this primary comprehension 
of the world. The natural world, we said, is the schema of inter- 
sensory relations. We do not, following Kant, understand thereby 
a system of invariable relations to which every existent thing is 
subject in so far as it can be known. It is not like a crystal cube, all 
the aspects of which can be conceived in virtue of its geometrical 
structure, and which even reveals its hidden sides, since it is trans- 
parent. The world has its unity, although the mind may not have 
succeeded in inter-relating its facets and in integrating them into the 
conception of a flat projection. This unity is comparable with that of 
an individual whom I recognize because he is recognizable in an un- 
challengeably self-evident way, before I ever succeed in stating the 
formula governing his character, because he retains the same style in 
everything he says and does, even though he may change his place or 
his opinions. A style is a certain manner of dealing with situations, 
which I identify or understand in an individual or in a writer, by 
taking over that manner myself in a sort of imitative way, even 
though I may be quite unable to define it; and in any case a definition, 
correct though it may be, never provides an exact equivalent, and is 
never of interest to any but those who have already had the actual 
experience. I experience the unity of the world as I recognize a style. 
Yet even so the style of a person, or of a town, does not remain 
constant for me. After ten years of friendship, even independently of 
any changes brought about by age, I seem to be dealing with a 
different person, and after ten years of living in a district, it is as if I 
were in a different one. Yet it is only the knowledge of things which 
varies. Though almost unnoticed at first glance, it is transformed by 
the unfolding of perception. The world remains the same world 
throughout my life, because it is that permanent being within which I 
1 See La Structure du Comportement, pp. 72 and ff. 

327 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

make all corrections to my knowledge, a world which in its unity 
remains unaffected by those corrections, and the self-evidence of 
which attracts my activity towards the truth through appearance and 
error. It is marginal to the child's first perception as a presence as yet 
unrecognized but incontrovertible, which knowledge will subse- 
quently make determinate and complete. I may be mistaken, and 
need to rearrange my certainties, and reject the being to which my 
illusions give rise, but I do not for a moment doubt that in them- 
selves things have been compatible and compossible, because from 
the very start 1 am in communication with one being, and one only, a 
vast individual from which my own experiences are taken, and which 
persists on the horizon of my life as the distant roar of a great city 
provides the background to everything we do in it. It is said that 
sounds or colours belong to a sensory field, because sounds once 
perceived can be followed only by other sounds, or by silence, which 
is not an auditory nothingness, but the absence of sounds, and which, 
therefore, keeps us in contact with the being of sound. If, during the 
process of reflection, I cease to hear sounds, and then suddenly be- 
come receptive to them again, they appear to me to be already there, 
and I pick up a thread which I had dropped but which is unbroken. 
The field is a setting that I possess for a certain type of experiences, 
and which, once established, cannot be nullified. Our possession of 
the world is similar to this, except that it is possible to conceive a 
subject with no auditory field, but impossible to conceive a subject 
with no world. 1 Just as, in the hearing subject, the absence of sounds 
does not cut off all communication with the world of sounds, so in 
the case of a subject deaf and blind from birth, the absence of the 
visual and auditory worlds does not sever all communication with 
the world in general. There is always something confronting him, a 
being to be deciphered, an onmitudo realitatis, and the foundation of 
this possibility is permanently laid by the first sensory experience, 
however narrow or imperfect it may be. We have no other way of 
knowing what the world is than by actively accepting this affirmation 
which is made every instant within us; for any definition of the 
world would be merely a summary and schematic outline, conveying 
nothing to us, if we did not already have access to the determinate, if 
we did not in fact know it by virtue of the mere fact that we are. It is 
upon our experience of the world that all our logical operations con- 
cerned with significance must be based, and the world itself, there- 
fore, is not a certain significance common to all our experiences 
which we discern in them, some idea which breathes life into the 
matter of knowledge. The world does not hold for us a set of outlines 

1 E. Sic in, Beit luge :m phatiomenologischeti Hegi iitidimg ikr Psychologic unci der 
Geisteswissensehaflen, pp. 10 and IK. 

328 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

which some consciousness within us binds together into a unity. It is 
true that the world presents itself as outlines, in the first place 
spatially; here I can see only the south side of the street, whereas if I 
crossed over, I should see the north side; also I see nothing but Paris, 
and the countryside which I have just left behind me has relapsed into 
a kind of latent life. When we go further into it, spatial outlines are 
also temporal: elsewhere is always something we have seen or might 
see; and even if I do perceive it as simultaneous with the present, this 
is because it is part of the same wave of duration. The town to which 
I am drawing nearer, changes its aspects, as I realize when I turn my 
eyes away for a moment and then look back at it. But the outlines do 
not follow each other or stand side by side in front of me. My ex- 
perience at these different stages is bound up with itself in such a way 
that I do not get different perspective views linked to each other 
through the conception of an invariant. The perceiving body does not 
successively occupy different points of view beneath the gaze of some 
unlocated consciousness which is thinking about them. For it is re- 
flection which objectifies points of view or perspectives, whereas 
when I perceive, I belong, through my point of view, to the world as a 
whole, nor am I even aware of the limits of my visual field. The 
variety of points of view is hinted at only by an imperceptible shift, a 
certain 'blurred' effect in the appearance. If the successive outlines 
are really distinguished from each other, as in the case of my driving 
towards a town and looking at it only intermittently, there is no 
longer a perception of the town, for I find myself suddenly con- 
fronted by another object having no common measure with its pre- 
decessor. I finally pass the judgement: 'It is Chartres', and weld the 
two appearances together, but I am able to do so because they arc 
both extracted from one and the same perception of the world, which 
consequently cannot admit of the same discontinuity. We can no 
more construct perception of the thing and of the world from discrete 
aspects, than we can make up the binocular vision of an object from 
two monocular images. My experiences of the world are integrated 
into one single world as the double image merges into the one thing, 
when my finger stops pressing upon my eyeball. I do not have one 
perspective, then another, and between them a link brought about by 
the understanding, but each perspective merges into the other and, in 
so far as it is still possible to speak of a synthesis, we are concerned 
with a 'transitional synthesis'. It is particularly true that my present 
vision is not restricted to what my visual field actually presents to me, 
for the next room, the landscape behind that hill and the inside or the 
back of that object are not recalled or represented. My point of view 
is for me not so much a limitation of my experience as a way I have of 
infiltrating into the world in its entirety. When I see the horizon, it 

329 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

does not make me think of that other landscape which I should see if 
I were standing on it, nor does that other landscape make me think 
of a third one and so on; I do not visualize anything; all these land- 
scapes are already there in the harmonious sequence and infinite un- 
folding of their perspectives. When I see the bright green of one of 
Cezanne's vases, it does not make me think of pottery, it presents it 
to me. The pottery is there, with its thin, smooth outer surface and its 
porous inside, in the particular way in which the green varies in shade. 
In the inner and outer horizon of the thing or the landscape, there is 
a co-presence and co-existence of outlines which is brought into 
existence through space and time. The natural world is the horizon of 
all horizons, the style of all possible styles, which guarantees for my 
experiences a given, not a willed, unity underlying all the disruptions 
of my personal and historical life. Its counterpart within me is the 
given, general and pre-personal existence of my sensory functions in 
which we have discovered the definition of the body. 

But how is it possible for me to experience the world as a positively 
existing individual, since none of the perspective views of it which I 
enjoy exhausts it, since its horizons are always open, and since more- 
over no knowledge, even scientific knowledge, provides us with the 
invariable formula of a fades totius universil How can any thing 
ever really and truly present itself to us, since its synthesis is never a 
completed process, and since I can always expect to see it break down 
and fall to the status of a mere illusion? Yet there is something and 
not nothing. There is a determinate reality, at least at a certain degree 
of relativity. Even if in the last resort I have no absolute knowledge of 
this stone, and even if my knowledge regarding it takes me step by 
step along an infinite road and cannot ever be complete, the fact 
remains that the perceived stone is there, that I recognize it, that I 
have named it and that we agree on a certain number of statements 
about it. Thus it seems that we are led to a contradiction: belief in 
the thing and the world must entail the presumption of a completed 
synthesis — and yet this completion is made impossible by the very 
nature of the perspectives which have to be inter-related, since each 
one of them, by virtue of its horizons, refers to other perspectives, and 
so on indefinitely. There is, indeed, a contradiction, as long as we 
operate within being, but the contradiction disappears, or rather is 
generalized, being linked up with the ultimate conditions of our ex- 
perience and becoming one with the possibility of living and thinking, 
if we operate in time, and if we manage to understand time as the 
measure of being. The synthesis of horizons is essentially a temporal 
process, which means, not that it is subject to time, nor that it is 
passive in relation to time, nor that it has to prevail over time, but 
that it merges with the very movement whereby time passes. Through 

330 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

my perceptual field, with its spatial horizons, I am present to my 
surrounding, I co-exist with all the other landscapes which stretch out 
beyond it, and all these perspectives together form a single temporal 
wave, one of the world's instants. Through my perceptual field with 
its temporal horizons I am present to my present, to all the preceding 
past and to a future. And, at the same time, this ubiquity is not 
strictly real, but is clearly only intentional. Although the landscape 
before my eyes may well herald the features of the one which is 
hidden behind the hill, it does so only subject to a certain degree of 
indeterminacy: here there are meadows, over there perhaps woods, 
and, in any case, beyond the near horizon, I know only that there will 
be land or sea, beyond that either open sea or frozen sea, beyond that 
again either earth or sky and, as far as the limits of the earth's at- 
mosphere are concerned, I know only that there is, in the most 
general terms, something to be perceived, and of those remote 
regions I possess only the style, in the abstract. In the same way, 
although each past is progressively enclosed in its entirety in the 
more recent past which has followed it, in virtue of the interlocking 
of intentionalities, the past degenerates, and the earliest years of my 
life are lost in the general existence of my body, of which I now know 
merely that it was already, at that time, confronted by colours and 
sounds, and a nature similar to the one which I now see before me. 
I possess the remote past, as I do the future, therefore, only in 
principle, and my life is slipping away from me on all sides and is 
circumscribed by impersonal zones. The contradiction which we find 
between the reality of the world and its incompleteness is the con- 
tradiction between the omnipresence of consciousness and its in- 
volvement in a field of presence. But let us look more closely to see 
whether in fact we have here a contradiction and a dilemma. Though 
I may say that I am enclosed in my present, since after all we pass, by 
imperceptible transitions, from the present to the past, from the 
recent to the remote, and since it is impossible to separate strictly the 
present from what is merely presented in actuality, the transcendence 
of remote experiences encroaches upon my present and brings a 
suspicion of unreality even into those which I believe to be coincident 
with my present self. Though I am here and now, yet I am not here 
and now. In so far, on the other hand, as I consider my intentional 
relationships with the past and the 'elsewhere' as constitutive of the 
past and the elsewhere, and in so far as I try to free consciousness 
from any localization and temporal abode, in so far as I am every- 
where where my perception and memory lead me, I cannot live in 
any time, and thus, along with the uniquely compelling reality which 
defines my present here and now, vanishes the reality of my former or 
my possible presents. If the synthesis could be genuine and my 

331 



THE WORLD AS PERCTIVED 

experience formed a closed system, if the thing and the world could 
be defined once and for all, if the spatio-temporal horizons could, 
even theoretically, be made explicit and the world conceived from no 
point of view, then nothing would exist; I should hover above the 
world, so that all times and places, far from becoming simultaneously 
real, would become unreal, because I should live in none of them and 
would be involved nowhere. If I am at all times and everywhere, then 
I am at no time and nowhere. Thus no choice is offered between the 
incompleteness of the world and its existence, between the particular 
involvement and omnipresence of consciousness, between transcend- 
ence and immanence, since each of these terms when pronounced 
singly brings to mind its opposite. What needs to be understood is 
that for the same reason I am present here and now, and present else- 
where and always, and also absent from here and from now, and 
absent from every place and from every time. This ambiguity is not 
some imperfection of consciousness or existence, but the definition 
of them. Time in the widest sense, that is, the order of co-existences 
as well as that of successions, is a setting to wluch one can gain 
access and which one can understand only by occupying a situation 
in it, and by grasping it in its entirety through the horizons of that 
situation. The world, which is the nucleus of time, subsists only by 
virtue of that unique action which both separates and brings together 
the actually presented and the present; and consciousness, which is 
taken to be the seat of clear thinking, is on the contrary the very 
abode of ambiguity. Under these circumstances one may say, if one 
wishes, that nothing exists absolutely, and it would, indeed, be more 
accurate to say that nothing exists and that everything is 'temporal- 
ized\ But temporality is not some half-hearted existence. Objective 
being is not plenary existence. The model is provided for us by these 
things in front of us which at first glance seem entirely determinate: 
this stone is white, hard and cool, and it seems that the world is 
crystallized in it, that it has no need of time in order to exist, that it 
wholly unfolds itself in the instant, and that any additional existence 
would involve it in a fresh coming into being, so that we are tempted 
to think that the world, if it is anything at all, can be only a collection 
of things analogous to this stone, and time a collection of perfect 
instants. Such are the world and time of Descartes, and it is indeed a 
fact that this conception of being is almost inevitably arrived at, 
since I have a visual field with circumscribed objects, and a sensible 
present, and since every Elsewhere* is given as another here, every 
past and every future as a present gone by or still to come. The per- 
ception of one single thing lays for ever the foundation of the ideal of 
objective or explicit knowledge which classical logic develops. But as 
soon as we concentrate upon these certainties, and as soon as we set 

332 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

astir the intentional life which produces them, we become aware 
that objective being has its roots in the ambiguities of time. I cannot 
conceive the world as a sum of things, nor time as a sum of in- 
stantaneous 'present moments', since each thing can offer itself in its 
full determinacy only if other things recede into the vagueness of the 
remote distance, and each present can take on its reality only by 
excluding the simultaneous presence of earlier and later presents, and 
since thus a sum of things or of presents makes nonsense. Things and 
instants can link up with each other to form a world only through the 
medium of that ambiguous being known as a subjectivity, and can 
become present to each other only from a certain point of view and in 
intention. Objective time which flows and exists part by part would 
not be even suspected, were it not enveloped in a historical time which 
is projected from the living present towards a past and towards a 
future. The alleged plenitude of the object and of the instant springs 
forth only in face of the imperfection of the intentional being. A 
present without a future, or an eternal present, is precisely the defini- 
tion of death; the living present is torn between a past which it takes 
up and a future which it projects. It is thus of the'essence of the thing 
and of the world to present themselves as 'open', to send us beyond 
their determinate manifestations, to promise us always 'something 
else to see*. This is what is sometimes expressed by saying that the 
thing and the world are mysterious. They are indeed, when we do not 
limit ourselves to their objective aspect, but put them back into the 
setting of subjectivity. They are even an absolute mystery, not 
amenable to elucidation, and this through no provisional gap in our 
knowledge, for in that case it would fall back to the status of a mere 
problem, but because it is not of the order of objective thought in 
which there are solutions. There is nothing to be seen beyond our 
horizons, but other landscapes and still other horizons, and nothing 
inside the thing but other smaller things. The ideal of objective 
thought is both based upon and ruined by temporality. The world, in 
the full sense of the word, is not an object, for though it has an en- 
velope of objective and determinate attributes, it has also fissures and 
gaps into which subjectivities slip >and lodge themselves, or rather 
which are those subjectivities themselves. We now understand why 
things, which owe their meaning to it, are not meanings presented to 
the intelligence, but opaque structures, and why their ultimate 
significance remains confused. The thing and the world exist only in 
so far as they are experienced by me or by subjects like me, since they 
are both the concatenation of pur perspectives, yet they transcend all 
perspectives because this chain is temporal and incomplete. I have 
the impression that the world itself is a living, self-subsistent entity 
outside me, just as absent landscapes live on beyond my visual 

333 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



field, and as my past was formerly lived on the earlier side of my 
present. 

Hallucination causes the real to disintegrate before our eyes, and 
puts a quasi-reality in its place, and in both these respects this 
phenomenon brings us back to the pre-logical bases of our knowledge 
and confirms what has been said about the thing and the world. The 
all-important point is that the patients, most of the time, discriminate 
between their hallucinations and their perceptions. Schizophrenics 
who experience tactile hallucinations of pricking or of an 'electric 
current' jump when they feel an injection of ethyl chloride or a real 
electric shock: 'That time,' they say to the doctor, 'you were the 
cause of it, because you are going to operate/ Another schizophrenic, 
who said he could see a man standing in the garden under his window, 
and pointed to the spot, giving a description of the man's clothes and 
general bearing, was astonished when someone was actually placed in 
the garden at the spot in question, wearing the same clothes and in 
the same posture. He looked carefully, and exclaimed: 'Yes, there is 
someone there, but it's somebody else.' He would not admit to there 
being two men in the garden. A patient who has never entertained 
any doubts whatsoever about the voices which she hears, listens to 
similar ones played to her on the gramophone, interrupts her work, 
raises her head without turning round, and sees a white angel appear, 
as it does every time she hears her voices, but she does not count this 
experience among the day's 'voices': for this time it is not the same 
thing, but a 'direct' voice, perhaps the doctor's. An old woman 
afflicted with senile dementia, who complains of finding powder in 
her bed, is startled to find in reality a thin layer of toilet powder there: 
'What is this?' she asks, 'this powder is damp, the other is dry.' The 
subject who, in delirium tremens, takes the doctor's hand to be a 
guinea pig, is immediately aware of the fact when a real guinea pig is 
placed in his other hand. 1 The fact that patients so often say that 
someone is talking to them by telephone or radio, is to be taken pre- 
cisely as expressing that the morbid world is artificial, and that it 
lacks something needed to become a 'reality'. The voices are uncouth 
voices, or else voices 'of people pretending to be uncouth', or it may 
be a young man imitating an old man's voice, or 'as if a German 
were trying to talk Yiddish'. 2 'It is as when a person says something to 
someone, but without getting as far as uttering any sound.' 3 Do not 
such admissions put an end to all argument about hallucination? 
Since the hallucination is not a sensory content, there seems nothing 

1 Zuckcr, Experimcntellex iibcr Sitmestliuscliwigctu pp. 706-64. 

2 Minkowski, Le problem? des hallucinations el le probletne dc rexpacc, p. 66. 

3 Schroder, Das f/altuziniercn, p. 606. 

334 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

for it but to regard it as a judgement, an interpretation or a belief. 
But although these patients do not believe in their hallucinations in 
the sense in which one believes in perceived objects, an intellectualist 
theory of hallucination is equally impossible. Alain quotes Mon- 
taigne's words on madmen 'who believe they see what they do not 
really see'. 1 But in fact the insane do not believe they see, or, when 
questioned, they correct their statements on this point. A hallucina- 
tion is not a judgement or a rash belief, for the same reasons which 
prevent it from being a sensory content: the judgement or the belief 
could consist only in positing the hallucination as true, and this is 
precisely what the patients do not do. At the level of judgement they 
distinguish hallucination from perception, and in any case argue 
against their hallucinations: rats cannot come out of the mouth and 
go back into the stomach. 2 A doctor who hears voices climbs into a 
boat and rows towards the open sea to convince himself that no one 
is really talking to him. 3 When the hallucinatory attack supervenes, 
the rat and the voices are still there. 

Why do empiricism and intellectualism fail to understand hallu- 
cination, and by what other method is there some chance of succeed- 
ing? Empiricism tries to explain hallucination in the same way as it 
does perception: through the effect of certain physiological causes, 
the irritation, for example, of certain nervous centres, sense-data 
appear as they appear in perception through the action of physical 
stimuli on those same nerve centres. At first sight, there is nothing in 
common between these physiological hypotheses and the intellectual- 
ist conception. In fact there is, as we shall see, this much in common 
that the two doctrines presuppose the priority of objective thought, 
and having at their disposal only one mode of being, namely objec- 
tive being, try to force the phenomenon of hallucination into it. In 
this way they misconceive it, and overlook its own mode of certainty 
and its immanent significance since, according to the patient him- 
self, hallucination has no place in objective being. For empiricism, 
hallucination is an event in the chain of events running from the 
stimulus to the state of consciousness. In intellectualism, an effort 
is made to get rid of hallucination properly speaking, to construct it, 
and to deduce what it might be from a certain idea of consciousness. 
The cogito teaches us that the existence of consciousness is indis- 
tinguishable from the consciousness of existing, and that therefore 
there can be nothing in it of which it is unaware, and that conversely, 
everything that it knows with certainty it finds in itself; that 

1 Systeme des Beaux- Arts, p. 15. 

2 Specht, Zur Phanomenologie und Morphologie der pathologischen Wahrnehmr 
ungstauschungen, p. 15. 

3 Jaspers, Vber Trugwahrnehmungen, p. 471. 

335 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

consequently the truth or falsity of an experience must not reside in its 
relation to an external reality, but be capable of being read off from 
it as intrinsic denominations, without which they could never be 
recognized. Thus false perceptions are not genuine perceptions at all. 
The victim of hallucinations cannot hear or see in the genuine sense of 
these words. He judges and believes that he sees or hears, but he 
does not really see or hear. This conclusion does not leave even the 
cogito intact, for the. question remains how a subject can believe that 
he hears when actually he does not. If it be replied that this belief is 
simply assertive, that it is knowledge of the first kind, one of those 
vague appearances in which one does not believe in the full sense of 
the word, and which persist only in the absence of critical scrutiny, in 
short a mere de facto state of our knowledge, the question will then 
be how a consciousness can be in this state of deficiency without be- 
ing aware of it, or, if it is aware of it, how it can remain in it. 1 The 
intellectualist cogito leaves in front of itself only a pure cogitatum 
which it possesses and constitutes in its entirety. It is a hopeless task 
to try to understand how it can be mistaken about an object which 
it constitutes. It is therefore the reduction of our experience to so 
many objects, the primacy of objective thought, which, here as be- 
fore, causes us to lose sight of the phenomenon of hallucination. 
Between empiricist explanation and intellectualist reflection there is 
a fundamental kinship, which is their common ignorance of pheno- 
mena. Both construct the hallucinatory phenomenon instead of liv- 
ing it. Even the novelty and validity in intellectualism — the differ- 
ence of nature which it sets up between perception and hallucination 
— is impaired by the priority given to objective thought: if the 
hallucinated subject objectively knows or thinks of his hallucination 
as being what it is, how is hallucinatory deception possible? All the 
difficulties arise from the fact that objective thought, the reduction 
of things as experienced to objects, of subjectivity to the cogitatio, 
leaves no room for the equivocal adherence of the subject to pre- 
objcctive phenomena. The consequence is therefore clear. We must 
stop constructing hallucination, or indeed consciousness generally, 
according to a certain essence or idea of itself which compels us to 
define it in terms of some sort of absolute equivalence and makes its 
decreed development inconceivable. We learn to know conscious- 
ness as we learn to know anything else. When the victim of hallu- 

1 Hence Alain's hesitation: if consciousness always knows itself, it must imme- 
diately distinguish the percept from the figment of imagination, and we shall say 
that the imaginary is not visible. (Sysleme des Beaux-Arts, pp. 15 and AT.) But if 
there is hallucinatory deception, then the imaginary must be able to be taken 
for the percept, and we shall say that the judgement entails vision. (Quatre-vingt- 
un chapitres sur Vespril et les passions, p. 18.) 

336 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

cinations declares that he sees and hears, we must not believe him, 1 
since he also declares the opposite; what we must do is understand 
him. We must not be satisfied with the opinions of sane conscious- 
ness on the subject of hallucinatory consciousness, and regard our- 
selves as sole judges of the distinctive significance of the hallucination. 
To which it will doubtless be replied that I have no means of access 
to hallucination as it is for itself. The person who mentally experi- 
ences either the hallucination, or another person, or his own past, 
never coincides with the hallucination, or with the other person, or 
with his past as it was. Knowledge can never overstep this limit of 
facticity. This is true, but it must not be used to justify arbitrary 
constructions. It is true that we should never talk about anything 
if we were limited to talking about those experiences with which we 
coincide, since speech is already a separation. Moreover there is no 
experience without speech, as the purely lived-through has no part 
in the discursive life of man. The fact, remains, however, that the 
primary meaning of discourse is to be found in that text of experience 
which it is trying to communicate. What is being sought is not a 
fictitious coincidence of myself and others, of my present self with 
its past, of the doctor with the patient; we cannot take over another 
person's situation, relive the past in its reality, or illness as it is lived 
through by the patient. The consciousness of others, the past, or 
illness, can never be brought down in their existence to what I know 
of them. But neither can my own consciousness, in so far as it exists 
and is committed, be made to amount simply to what I know of it. 
If a philosopher produces hallucinations in himself by means of an 
insulin injection, either he yields to the hallucinatory impulse, in 
which case the hallucination is a living experience for him and not an 
object of knowledge, or else he retains something of his reflective 
power, and it will always be possible to challenge his testimony, 
which is not that of a deranged person 'committed' to his hallucina- 
tion. There is, then, no privileged self-knowledge, and other people 
are no more closed systems than I am myself. What is given is not 
myself as opposed to others, my present as opposed to my past, sane 
consciousness with its cogito as opposed to consciousness afflicted 
with hallucinations, the former being sole judge of the latter and 
limited, in relation to it, to its internal conjectures — it is the doctor 
with the patient, myself with others, my past on the horizon of my 
present. When I recall my past at the present time I distort it, but I 
can allow for these very distortions, for they are conveyed to me by 
the tension created between the extinct past at which I am aiming 
and my arbitrary interpretations. I misunderstood another person 
because I see him from my own point of view, but then I hear him 
1 As Alain accuses the psychologists of doing. 
337 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



expostulate, and finally come round to the idea of the other person 
as a centre of perspectives. Within my own situation that of the 
patient whom I am questioning makes its appearance and, in this bi- 
polar phenomenon. I learn to know both myself and others. We 
must put ourselves back in the actual situation in which hallucina- 
tions and 'reality' are presented to us, and grasp their concrete 
differentiation at the time that it operates in communication with 
the patient. I am sitting before my subject and chatting with him; 
he is trying to describe to me what he 'sees' and what he 'hears'; it is 
not a question either of taking him at his word, or of reducing his 
experiences to mine, or coinciding with him, or sticking to my own 
point of view, but of making explicit my experience, and also his 
experience as it is conveyed to me in my own, and his hallucinatory 
belief and my real belief, and to understand one through the 
other. 

The fact that I classify the voices and visions of my interlocutor as 
hallucinations means that I find nothing similar in my visual or 
auditory world. I am therefore aware of apprehending, through hear- 
ing and particularly through sight, a system of phenomena which 
makes up not only a private spectacle, but which is the only possible 
one for me and even for others, and this is what is called reality. The 
perceived world is not only my world, but the one in which I see the 
behaviour of other people take shape, for their behaviour equally 
aims at this world, which is the counterpart not only of my conscious- 
ness, but of any consciousness which I can possibly encounter. What I 
see with my eyes exhausts for me the possibilities of vision. It is true 
that I see what I do see only from a certain angle, and I concede that 
a spectator differently placed sees what I can only conjecture. But 
these other spectacles are implied in mine at this moment, just as the 
reverse or the underneath side of objects is perceived simultaneously 
with their visible aspect, or as the next room pre-exists in relation to 
the perception which I should actually have if I walked into it. The 
experiences of other people or those which await me if I change my 
position merely develop what is suggested by the horizons of my 
present experience, and add nothing to it. My perception brings into 
co-existence an indefinite number of perceptual chains which, if 
followed up, would confirm it in all respects and accord with it. My 
eyes and my hand know that any actual change of place would pro- 
duce a sensible response entirely according to my expectation, and I 
can feel swarming beneath my gaze the countless mass of more de- 
tailed perceptions that I anticipate, and upon which I already have a 
hold. I am, therefore, conscious of perceiving a setting which 
'tolerates' nothing more than is written or foreshadowed in my per- 
ception, and I am in present communication with a consummate 

338 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 



fullness. 1 The victim of hallucination enjoys no such belief: the 
hallucinatory phenomenon is no part of the world, that is to say, it is 
not accessible, there is no definite path leading from it to all the 
remaining experiences of the deluded subject, or to the experience of 
the sane. 'Can't you hear my voices?' asks the patient; 'then I must 
be the only one to hear them.' 2 Hallucinations are played out on a 
stage different from that of the perceived world, and art in a way 
superimposed: 'Do you know,' says one patient, 'while we are talk- 
ing, someone is saying one thing or another to me. Now where can 
it all come from?' 3 The fact that the hallucination does not take its 
place in the stable and intersubjective world means that it lacks the 
fullness, the inner articulation which makes the real thing reside 'in 
itself, and act and exist by itself. The hallucinatory thing is not, as is 
the real thing, packed with small perceptions which sustain it in 
existence. It is an implicit and inarticulate significance. Confronted by 
the real thing, our behaviour feels itself motivated by 'stimuli' which 
fill out and vindicate its intention. Where a phantasm is concerned, 
the initiative comes from us, and it has no external counterpart. 4 
The hallucinatory thing is not, like the real thing, a form of being 
with depth, which compresses within itself a thickness of duration; 
nor is hallucination, like perception, my concrete hold on time in a 
living present. It glides over time as it does over the surface of the 
world. The person who speaks to me in my dream has no sooner 
opened his mouth before his thought is conveyed miraculously to 
me; I know what the person is saying to me before he says anything 
at all. The hallucination is not in the world but 'before' it, because 
the patient's body no longer enjoys its insertion into the system of 
appearances. All hallucination bears initially on one's own body. 'It is 
as if I heard with my mouth.' 'The person speaking is on my lips,' 
say patients. 5 In 'feelings of bodily presence' (leibhaften Bewusst- 
heiteri) patients feel the presence of someone they never see close to 
them, or behind them, or on them, and they experience that presence 
as drawing closer or receding. One schizophrenic woman constantly 
has the impression that she is being seen naked from behind. George 
Sand has a double whom she has never seen, but who sees her the 
whole time and calls her by her name with her own voice. 6 Deper- 
sonalization and disturbance of the body image are immediately 

1 Minkowski, Le Probleme des hallucinations et le probleme de Vespace, p. 66. 

2 Ibid., p. 64. 3 Ibid., p. 66. 

4 That is why Palagyi could assert that perception is a 'direct phantasm', 
hallucination an 'inverse phantasm*. Schorsch, Zur Theorie der Halluzinalionen, 
p. 64. 

6 Schroder, Das Halluzinieren, p. 606. 

* Menninger-Lerchental, Das Truggebilde der Eigenen Gestalt, pp. 76 and ff. 

339 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

translated into an external phantasm, because it is one and the same 
thing for us to perceive our body and to perceive our situation in a 
certain physical and human setting, for our body is nothing but that 
very situation in so far as it is realized and actualized. In extra- 
campine* hallucination the patient believes that he sees a man be- 
hind him, that he sees simultaneously in all directions round about 
him, that he can look through a window situated behind his back. 1 
The illusion of seeing is, therefore, much less the presentation of an 
illusory object than the spread and, so to speak, running wild of a 
visual power which has lost any sensory counterpart. There are 
hallucinations because through the phenomenal body we are in 
constant relationship with an environment into which that body is 
projected, and because, when divorced from its actual environment, 
the body remains able to summon up, by means of its own settings, 
the pseudo-presence of that environment. To that extent, the thing in 
hallucination is never seen and is never visible. One subject, under 
mescalin, sees the screw of a piece of apparatus as a glass bulb or a 
protuberance on a rubber balloon. But what precisely does he see? 
*I perceive a world covered with swellings. ... It is as if my percep- 
tion suddenly changed key to become perception in intumescence, as 
one plays a piece of music in C or B flat. . . . Just then, my whole 
perception was transformed and, for an instant, I perceived a rubber 
bulb. Does that mean that I saw nothing else? No, but I had the 
feeling of being transferred to a setting such that I could perceive in 
no other way. The belief took possession of me that the world is 
thus. . . . Later another change took place. . . . Everything seemed 
at once clammy and scaly, like some of the large serpents I have seen 
uncoiling themselves at the Berlin Zoo. Then I was seized with the 
fear of being on a small island surrounded by serpents/ 2 Hallucina- 
tion does not present me with protuberances, or scales, or words like 
ponderous realities gradually revealing their meaning. It does no 
more than reproduce for me the way in which these realities strike 
me in my being of feeling and of language. When the patient refuses 
food because it is 'poisoned', we need to realize that for him the 
word has not the sense that it would have for a chemist: 3 the patient 
does not believe that the food possesses properties which are actu- 
ally poisonous to the objective body. The poison in this case is an 
afTective entity, a magic presence comparable to that of illness or 
misfortune. The majority of hallucinations are not tilings with 

* I.e. when the paiicnt believes he perceives outside the sensory Held presented 
to him (Translator's note). 

1 Mcnningcr-Lcrchental, Das Tmgf>ebih!e tier Eigcnen Gcstalt, p. 147. 

2 Unpublished self-observation of J. P. Sartre. 

3 Straus, Von) Sinn dcr Sinne, p. 290. 

340 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

different facets, but short-lived phenomena, such as pricking sensa- 
tions, jolts, explosions, draughts, waves of cold or heat, sparks, 
points of bright light, glowing lights or silhouetted shapes. 1 When it 
is a question of real things, a rat for example, these are represented 
only by their general style and physiognomy. These disjoined pheno- 
mena do not admit of precise causal connections among themselves. 
Their sole mutual relationship is one of co-existence — a co-existence 
which always has a significance for the patient, since awareness of 
contingency presupposes definite and distinct causal sequences, and 
since we are here among the odd remnants of a world in ruins. *A 
running nose becomes a specific flow, and the fact of dozing in an 
underground train acquires a strange and unique significance'. 2 
Hallucinations are associated with a certain sensory realm only in so 
far as each sensory field provides the distortion of existence with 
particular possibilities of expression. The schizophrenic's hallucina- 
tions are predominantly auditory and tactile, because the world of 
hearing and touch, in virtue of its natural structure, is better able to 
stand for an existence which is possessed, jeopardized and de- 
individualized. The heavy drinker experiences predominantly visual 
hallucinations because sight provides the disordered processes with 
a means of calling into being an opponent or a task which have to 
be faced. 3 The victim of hallucination does not see and hear in the 
normal sense, but makes use of his sensory fields and his natural 
insertion into a world in order to build up, out of the fragments of 
this world, an artificial world answering to the total intention of his 
being. 

But though hallucination is not a sensory process, still less is it a 
judgement. It is not given to the subject as a construction, and has 
no place in the 'geographical world', in the being, that is, which we 
know and judge, in the network of facts subject to laws, but in the 
individual 'landscape' 4 through which the world impinges upon us, 

1 Minkowski, Le Probleme des hallucinations et le probleme de Vespace, p. 67. 

2 Ibid., p. 68. 

3 Straus, op. cit., p. 288. 

4 Ibid. The patient 'lives within the horizon of his landscape, under the sway of 
univocal impressions which, lacking any motif or basis, are no longer made to fit 
into the universal order of the world of things, or into the universal sense-relation- 
ships of language. The things to which patients refer by familiar names have 
ceased to be the same things for them that they are for us. What they have re- 
tained and made into parts of their landscape are mere broken remnants of our 
world, and even these do not remain what they were as parts of the whole.' Things 
for the schizophrenic are frozen and inert, whereas those of delirium are com- 
municative and living to a greater degree than are ours. 'If the illness grows worse, 
the disintegration of thought and the disappearance of speech reveal the loss of 
geographical space, and the blunted feelings reveal the impoverishment of the 
landscape/ (Straus, op. cit., p. 291.) 

341 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



and by means of which we are in vital communication with it. A 
woman patient declares that someone looked at her at the market, 
and that she felt the gaze fall upon her like a blow, but could not say 
whence it came. She cannot bring herself to say that in common 
property space there stood a flesh and blood person who turned his 
eyes towards her — and it is because of this refusal that the arguments 
that we can bring against her leave her completely unmoved. For her 
it is not a matter of what happens in the objective world, but of what 
she encounters, what touches her or strikes her. The food refused 
by the victim of hallucinations is poisoned only for him, but to this 
extent it is poisoned irrefutably. The hallucination is not a percep- 
tion, but it has the value of reality, and it alone counts for the victim. 
The world has lost its expressive force, 1 and the hallucinatory system 
has usurped it. Although hallucination is not a perception, there is a 
hallucinatory deception, and this is what we shall never understand 
if we take hallucination to be an intellectual operation. However 
different it is from a perception, hallucination must be able to sup- 
plant it, and exist for the patient in a higher degree than his own 
perceptions. This can be so only so long as hallucination and per- 
ception are modalities of one single primordial function, through 
which we arrange round about us a setting of definite structure, 
through which we are enabled to place ourselves at one time fairly 
and squarely in the world, and at another marginally to it. The 
patient's existence is displaced from its centre, being no longer en- 
acted through dealings with a harsh, resistant and intractable world 
which has no knowledge of us, but expending its substance in isola- 
tion creating a fictitious setting for itself. But this fiction can have the 
value of reality only because in the normal subject reality itself suffers 
through an analogous process. In so far as he too has sensory fields 
and a body, the normal person is equally afflicted with this gaping 
wound through which illusion can make its way in. His representa- 
tion of the world is no less vulnerable. In so far as we believe what we 
see, we do so without any verification, and the mistake of the tradi- 
tional theories of perception is to introduce into perception itself 
intellectual operations and a critical examination of the evidence of 
the senses, to which we in fact resort only when direct perception 
founders in ambiguity. In the case of the normal subject private 
experience, independently of any express verification, links up with 
itself and with experiences of external origin, so that the landscape 
opens on to a geographical world and tends towards absolute pleni- 
tude. The normal person docs not find satisfaction in subjectivity, 

1 Hallucination, says Klagcs, supposes a 1 Verminderung des Ausdrucksgehaltes 
der ausseren Erscheinungswelt\ Quoted by Schorsch, Zur Thcorie dcr Halluzina- 
tionen % p. 71. 

342 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

he runs away from it, he is genuinely concerned with being in the 
world, and his hold on time is direct and unreflecting, whereas the 
sufferer from hallucinations simply exploits his being in the world in 
order to carve a private sector for himself out of the common pro- 
perty world, and constantly runs up against the transcendence of 
time. Underlying express acts which enable me to posit before my- 
self an object at its distance, standing in a definite relation to other 
objects, and having specific characteristics which can be observed, 
underlying perceptions properly understood, there is, then, sus- 
taining them, a deeper function without which perceived objects 
would lack the distinctive sign of reality, as they do for the schizo- 
phrenic, and through which they begin to count or be valid for us. 
It is the momentum which carries us beyond subjectivity, which gives 
us our place in the world prior to any science and any verification, 
through a kind of 'faith' or 'primary opinion' 1 — or which may, on 
the other hand, become bogged down in our private appearances. 
In this realm of primary opinion, hallucinatory illusion is possible 
even though hallucination is never perception, and though the true 
world is always suspected as there by the patient, even as he turns 
away from it, because we are still in the antepredicative world, and 
because the connection between appearance and total experience is 
merely implicit and presumptive, even in the case of true perception. 
The child attributes his dreams, no less than his perceptions, to the 
world; he believes that the dream is enacted in his room, at the foot 
of his bed, the sole difference from perception being that the dream 
is visible to sleepers alone. 2 The world is still the vague theatre of all 
experiences. It takes in without discrimination real objects on the 
one hand and individual and momentary phantasms on the other — 
because it is an individual which embraces everything and not a 
collection of objects linked by causal relations. To have hallucina- 
tions and more generally to imagine, is to exploit this tolerance on 
the part of the antepredicative world, and our bewildering proximity 
to the whole of being in syncretic experience. 

We succeed, therefore, in accounting for hallucinatory deception 
only by removing apodeictic certainty from perception and full self- 
possession from perceptual consciousness. The existence of the per- 
cept is never necessary, since perception entails a process of making 
explicit which could be pursued to infinity and which, moreover, 
could not gain in one direction without losing in another, and with- 
out being exposed to the risks of time. But it must not be concluded 
from this that the perceived is only possible or probable, and that 
it can be brought down, for instance, to a permanent possibility of 

1 Urdoxa or (Jrglaube, of Husserl. 

2 Piaget, La Representation du monde chez Venfant, pp. 69 and ff. 

343 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

perception. Possibility and probability presuppose the prior experience 
of error, and correspond to a state of doubt. The percept is and re- 
mains, despite all critical education, on the hither side of doubt and 
demonstration. The sun 'rises* for the scientist in the same way as it 
does for the uneducated person, and our scientific representations 
of the solar system remain matters of hearsay, like lunar landscapes, 
and we never believe in them in the sense in which we believe in the 
sunrise. The sunrise and the percept in general is 'real', and we spon- 
taneously identify them as part of the world. Each perception, though 
always capable of being 'cancelled* and relegated among illusions, 
disappears only to give place to another perception which rectifies it. 
Each thing can, after the event, appear uncertain, but what is at least 
certain for us is that there are things, that is to say, a world. To ask 
oneself whether the world is real is to fail to understand what one is 
asking, since the world is not a sum of things which might always be 
called into question, but the inexhaustible reservoir from which 
things are drawn. The percept taken in its entirety, with the world 
horizon which announces both its possible disjunction and its possible 
replacement by another perception, certainly does not mislead us. 
There could not possibly be error where there is not yet truth, but 
reality, and not yet necessity, but facticity. Correspondingly, we must 
refuse to attribute to perceptual consciousness the full possession of 
itself, and that immanence which would rule out any possible 
illusion. If hallucinations are to be possible, it is necessary that con- 
sciousness should, at some moment, cease to know what it is doing, 
otherwise it would be conscious of constituting an illusion, and 
would not stand by it, so there would no longer be any illusion at all. 
And if, as we have said, the illusory thing and the true thing do not 
have the same structure, for the patient to assent to the illusion, he 
must forget or repress the true world, and cease to refer back to it, 
and retain at least the ability to revert to the primitive confusion of 
the true and the false. Yet we do not cut consciousness off from itself, 
which would preclude all progress of knowledge beyond primary 
opinion, and especially the philosophic examination of primary 
opinion as the basis of all knowledge. All that is required is that the 
concidence of myself with myself, as it is achieved in the cogito, 
shall never be a real coincidence, but merely an intentional and 
presumptive one. In fact, between myself who have just thought this, 
and myself who am thinking that I have thought it, there is inter- 
posed already a thickness of duration, so that I may always doubt 
whether that thought which has already passed was indeed such as 
I now see it to have been. Since, furthermore, I have no other evi- 
dence of my past than present testimony and yet do have the idea of a 
past, I have no reason to set the unreflective, as an unknowable, over 

344 



THE THING AND THE NATURAL WORLD 

against the reflection which I bring to bear on it. But my confidence 
in reflection amounts in the last resort to my accepting and acting on 
the fact of temporality, and the fact of the world as the invariable 
framework of all illusion and all disillusion: I know myself only in 
so far as I am inherent in time and in the world, that is, I know 
myself only in my ambiguity. 



345 



4 

OTHER SELVES AND THE 
HUMAN WORLD 



I AM thrown into a nature, and that nature appears not only as 
outside me, in objects devoid of history, but it is also discernible at 
the centre of subjectivity. Theoretical and practical decisions of per- 
sonal life may well lay hold, from a distance, upon my past and my 
future, and bestow upon my past, with all its fortuitous events, a 
definite significance, by following it up with a future which will be 
seen after the event as foreshadowed by it, thus introducing his- 
toricity into my life. Yet these sequences have always something 
artificial about them. It is at the present time that I realize that the 
first twenty-five years of my life were a prolonged childhood, destined 
to be followed by a painful break leading eventually to independence. 
If I take myself back to those years as I actually lived them and as I 
carry them within me, my happiness at that time cannot be explained 
in terms of the sheltered atmosphere of the parental home; the world 
itself was more beautiful, things were more fascinating, and I can 
never be sure of reaching a fuller understanding of my past than it 
had of itself at the time I lived through it, nor of silencing its protest. 
The interpretation which I now give of it is bound up with my con- 
fidence in psychoanalysis. Tomorrow, with more experience and 
insight, I shall possibly understand it differently, and consequently 
reconstruct my past in a different way. In any case, I shall go on to 
interpret my present interpretations in their turn, revealing their latent 
content and, in order finally to assess their truth-value, I shall need 
to keep these discoveries in mind. My hold on the past and the future 
is precarious, and my possession of my own time is always postponed 
until a stage when I may fully understand it, yet this stage can never 
be reached, since it would be one more moment, bounded by the 
horizon of its future, and requiring in its turn further developments 
in order to be understood. My voluntary and rational life, therefore, 

346 



OTHER SELVES AND THE HUMAN WORLD 

knows that it merges into another power which stands in the way of 
its completion, and gives it a permanently tentative look. Natural 
time is always there. The transcendence of the instants of time is both 
the ground of, and the impediment to, the rationality of my personal 
history: the ground because it opens a totally new future to me in 
which I shall be able to reflect upon the element of opacity in my 
present, a source of danger in so far as I shall never manage to seize 
the present through which I live with apodeictic certainty, and since 
the lived is thus never entirely comprehensible, what I understand 
never quite tallies with my living experience, in short, I am never 
quite at one with myself. Such is the lot of a being who is born, that 
is, who once and for all has been given to himself as something to be 
understood. Since natural time remains at the centre of niy history, I 
see myself surrounded by it. The fact that my earliest years lie behind 
me like an unknown land is not attributable to any chance lapse of 
memory, or any failure to think back adequately: there is nothing to 
be known in these unexplored lands. For example, in pre-natal exis- 
tence, nothing was perceived, and therefore there is nothing to recall. 
There was nothing but the raw material and adumbration of a natural 
self and a natural time. This anonymous life is merely the extreme 
fonn. of that temporal dispersal which constantly threatens the his- 
torical present. In order to have some inkling of the nature of that 
amorphous existence which preceded my own history, and which will 
bring it to a close, I have only to look within me at that time which 
pursues its own independent course, and which my personal life 
utilizes but does not entirely overlay. Because I am borne into per- 
sonal existence by a time which I do not constitute, all my percep- 
tions stand out against a background of nature. While I perceive, 
and even without having any knowledge of the organic conditions of 
my perception, I am aware of drawing together somewhat absent- 
minded and dispersed "consciousnesses": sight, hearing and 
touch, with their fields, which are anterior, and remain alien, to my 
personal life. The natural object is the track left by this generalized 
existence. And every object will be, in the first place and in some re- 
spect, a natural object, made up of colours, tactile and auditory 
qualities, in so far as it is destined to enter my life. 

Just as nature finds its way to the core of my personal life and be- 
comes inextricably linked with it, so behaviour patterns settle into 
that nature, being deposited in the form of a cultural world. Not only 
have I a physical world, not only do I live in the midst of earth, air 
and water, I have around me roads, plantations, villages, streets, 
churches, implements, a bell, a spoon, a pipe. Each of these objects 
is moulded to the human action which it serves. Each one spreads 
round it an atmosphere of humanity which may be determinate in a 

347 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

low degree, in the case of a few footmarks in the sand, or on the 
other hand highly determinate, if I go into every room from top to 
bottom of a house recently evacuated. Now, although it may not be 
surprising that the sensory and perceptual functions should lay 
down a natural world in front of themselves, since they are preper- 
sonal, it may well seem strange that the spontaneous acts through 
which man has patterned his life should be deposited, like some sedi- 
ment, outside himself and lead an anonymous existence as things. 
The civilization in which I play my part exists for me in a self-evident 
way in the implements with which it provides itself. If it is a question 
of an unknown or alien civilization, then several manners of being or 
of living can find their place in the ruins or the broken instruments 
which I discover, or in the landscape through which I roam. The cul- 
tural world is then ambiguous, but it is already present. I have before 
me a society to be known. An Objective Spirit dwells in the remains 
and the scenery. How is this possible? In the cultural object, I feel 
the close presence of others beneath a veil of anonymity. Someone 
uses the pipe for smoking, the spoon for eating, the bell for summon- 
ing, and it is through the perception of a human act and another per- 
son that the perception of a cultural world could be verified. How 
can an action or a human thought be grasped in the mode of the 
'one' since, by its very nature, it is a first person operation, insepar- 
able from an /? It is easy to reply that the indefinite pronoun is here 
no more than a vague formula for referring to a multiplicity of Fs or 
even a general /. It will be said that I experience a certain cultural 
environment along with behaviour corresponding to it: faced with 
the remains of an extinct civilization, I conceive analogically the kind 
of man who lived in it. But the first need is to know how I experience 
my own cultural world, my own civilization. The reply will once more 
be that I see a certain use made by other men of the implements 
which surround me, that I interpret their behaviour by analogy with 
my own, and through my inner experience, which teaches me the 
significance and intention of perceived gestures. In the last resort, the 
actions of others are, according to this theory, always understood 
through my own; the 'one' or the *we' through the T. But this is pre- 
cisely the question: how can the word T be put into the plural, how 
can a genera! idea of the / be formed, how can I speak of an / other 
than my own, how can I know that there are other /'s, how can con- 
sciousness which, by its nature, and as self-knowledge, is in the mode 
of the /, be grasped in the mode of Thou, and through this, in the 
world of the 4 One'? The very first of all cultural objects, and the one 
by which all the rest exist, is the body of the other person as the 
vehicle of a form of behaviour. Whether it be a question of vestiges 
or the body of another person, wc need to know how an object in 

348 



OTHER SELVES AND THE HUMAN WORLD 

space can become the eloquent relic of an existence; how, conversely, 
an intention, a thought or a project can detach themselves from the 
personal subject and become visible outside him in the shape of his 
body, and in the environment which he builds for himself. The con- 
stitution of the other person does not fully elucidate that of society, 
which is not an existence involving two or even three people, but 
co-existence involving an indefinite number of consciousnesses. Yet 
the analysis of the perception of others runs up against a difficulty 
in principle raised by the cultural world, since it is called upon 
to solve the paradox of a consciousness seen from the outside, of a 
thought which has its abode in the external world, and which, there- 
fore, is already subjectless and anonymous compared with mine. 

What we have said about the body provides the beginning of a 
solution to this problem. The existence of other people is a difficulty 
and an outrage for objective thought. If the events of the world are, 
in Lachelier's words, a network of general properties standing at the 
point of intersection of functional relations which, in principle, en- 
able the analysis of the former to be carried through, and if the body 
is indeed a province of the world, if it is that object which the biolo- 
gist talks about, that conjunction of processes analysed in physio- 
logical treatises, that collection of organs shown in the plates of 
books on anatomy, then my experience can be nothing but the 
dialogue* between bare consciousness and the system of objective 
correlations which it conceives. The body of another, like my own, 
is not inhabited, but is an object standing before the consciousness 
which thinks about or constitutes it. Other men, and myself, seen 
as empirical beings, are merely pieces of mechanism worked by 
springs, but the true subject has no counterpart, for that conscious- 
ness which is hidden in so much flesh and blood is the least intelli- 
gible of occult qualities. My consciousness, being co-extensive with 
what can exist for me, and corresponding to the whole system of 
experience, cannot encounter, in that system, another consciousness 
capable of bringing immediately to light in the world the background, 
unknown to me, of its own phenomena. There are two modes of 
being, and two only: being in itself, which is that of objects arrayed 
in space, and being for itself, which is that of consciousness. Now, 
another person would seem to stand before me as an in-itself and yet 
to exist for himself, thus requiring of me, in order to be perceived, a 
contradictory operation, since I ought both to distinguish him from 
myself, and therefore place him in the world of objects, and think 
of him as a consciousness, that is, the sort of being with no outside 
and no parts, to which I have access merely because that being is my- 
self, and because the thinker and the thought about are amalgamated 
in him. There is thus no place for other people and a plurality of 

349 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

consciousnesses in objective thought. In so far as I constitute the 
world, I cannot conceive another consciousness, for it too would 
have to constitute the world and, at least as regards this other view 
of the world, I should not be the constituting agent. Even if I suc- 
ceeded in thinking of it as constituting the world, it would be I who 
would be constituting the consciousness as such, and once more I 
should be the sole constituting agent. 

But we have in fact learned to shed doubt upon objective thought, 
and have made contact, on the hither side of scientific representations 
of the world and the body, with an experience of the body and the 
world which these scientific approaches do not successfully embrace. 
My body and the world are no longer objects co-ordinated together 
by the kind of functional relationships that physics establishes. The 
system of experience in which they intercommunicate is not spread 
out before me and ranged over by a constituting consciousness. I have 
the world as an incomplete individual, through the agency of my 
body as the potentiality of this world, and I have the positing of 
objects through that of my body, or conversely the positing of my 
body through that of objects, not in any kind of logical implication, 
as we determine an unknown size through its objective relations to 
given sizes, but in a real implication, and because my body is a move- 
ment towards the world, and the world my body's point of support. 
The ideal of objective thought — the system of experience conceived 
as a cluster of physico-mathematical correlations— is grounded in 
my perception of the world as an individual concordant with itself, 
and when science tries to include my body among the relationships 
obtaining in the objective world, it is because it is trying, in its way, 
to translate the suturation of my phenomenal body on to the pri- 
mordial world. At the same lime as the body withdraws from the 
objective world, and forms between the pure subject and the object 
a third genus of being, the subject loses its purity and its trans- 
parency. Objects stand before me and throw on to my retina a cer- 
tain projection of themselves, and I perceive them. There can no 
longer be any question of isolating, in my physiological representation 
of the phenomenon, the retinal images and their cerebral counter- 
part from the total field, actual and possible, in which they appear. 
The physiological event is merely the abstract schema of the per- 
ceptual event. 1 Nor can one invoke, under the name of mental 
images, discontinuous, perspective views corresponding to the suc- 
cessive retinal images, or finally bring in an 'inspection of the mind* 
which restores the object beyond the distorting perspectives. We 
must conceive the perspectives and the point of view as our insertion 
into the workl-as-an-individual, and perception, no longer as a con- 

1 La Structure da Comportcnicnt, p. 125. 

350 



OTHER SELVES AND THE HUMAN WORLD 

stitution of the true object, but as our inherence in things. Con- 
sciousness reveals in itself, along with the sensory fields and with the 
world as the field of all fields, the opacity of a primary past. If I ex- 
perience this inhering of my consciousness in its body and its world, 
the perception of other people and the plurality of consciousnesses 
no longer present any difficulty. If, for myself who am reflecting on 
perception, the perceiving subject appears provided with a primor- 
dial setting in relation to the world, drawing in its train that bodily 
thing in the absence of which there would be no other things for it, 
then why should other bodies which I perceive not be similarly in- 
habited by consciousnesses? If my consciousness has a body, why 
should other bodies not 'have' consciousnesses? Clearly this in- 
volves a profound transformation of the notions of body and con- 
sciousness. As far as the body is concerned, even the body of another, 
we must learn to distinguish it from the objective body as set forth 
in works on physiology. This is not the body which is capable of 
being inhabited by a consciousness. We must restore to visible bodies 
those forms of behaviour which are outlined by them and which 
appear on them, but are not really contained in them. 1 How signi- 
ficance and intentionality could come to dwell in molecular edifices 
or masses of cells is a thing which can never be made comprehensible, 
and here Cartesianism is right. But there is, in any case, no question 
of any such absurd undertaking. It is simply a question of recogniz- 
ing that the body, as a chemical structure or an agglomeration of 
tissues, is formed, by a process of impoverishment, from a primordial 
phenomenon of the body-for-us, the body of human experience or 
the perceived body, round which objective thought works, but with- 
out being called upon to postulate its completed analysis. As for 
consciousness, it has to be conceived, no longer as a constituting 
consciousness and, as it were, a pure being-for-itself, but as a per- 
ceptual consciousness, as the subject of a pattern of behaviour, as 
being-in-the-world or existence, for only thus can another appear at 
the top of his phenomenal body, and be endowed with a sort of 
'locality*. Under theie conditions the antinomies of objective thought 
vanish. Through phenomenological reflection I discover vision, not 
as a 'thinking about seeing', to use Descartes' expression, but as a 
gaze at grips with a visible world, and that is why for me there can 
be another's gaze; that expressive instrument called a face can carry 
an existence, as my own existence is carried by my body, that know- 
ledge-acquiring apparatus. When I turn towards perception, and 
pass from direct perception to thinking about that perception, I re- 
enact it, and find at work in my organs of perception a thinking 

1 This task we have tried to perform elsewhere. (La Structure du Comportement, 
Chaps. I and 11.) 

351 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

older than myself of which those organs are merely the trace. In the 
same way I understand the existence of other people. Here again I 
have only the trace of a consciousness which evades me in its actual- 
ity and, when my gaze meets another gaze, I re-enact the alien exis- 
tence in a sort of reflection. There is nothing here resembling 
'reasoning by analogy'. As Scheler so rightly declares, reasoning by 
analogy presupposes what it is called on to explain. The other con- 
sciousness can be deduced only if the emotional expressions of others 
are compared and identified with mine, and precise correlations 
recognized between my physical behaviour and my 'psychic events'. 
Now the perception of others is anterior to, and the condition of, 
such observations, the observations do not constitute the perception. 
A baby of fifteen months opens its mouth if I playfully take one of 
its fingers between my teeth and pretend to bite it. And yet it. has 
scarcely looked at its face in a glass, and its teeth are not in any case 
like mine. The fact is that its own mouth and teeth, as it feels them 
from the inside, are immediately, 'for it, an apparatus to bite with, 
and my jaw, as the baby sees it from the outside, is immediately, 
for it, capable of the same intentions. 'Biting' has immediately, for 
it, an intersubjective significance. It perceives its intentions in its 
body, and my body with its own, and thereby my intentions in its 
own body. The observed correlations between my physical behaviour 
and that of others, my intentions and my pantomime, may well pro- 
vide me with a clue in the methodical attempt to know others and 
on occasions when direct perception fails, but they do not teach me 
the existence of other people. Between my consciousness and my 
body as I experience it, between this phenomenal body of mine and 
that of another as I see it from the outside, there exists an internal 
relation which causes the other to appear as the completion of the 
system. The possibility of another person's being self-evident is owed 
to the fact that I am not transparent for myself, and that my sub- 
jectivity draws its body in its wake. We said earlier: in so far as the 
other person resides in the world, is visible there, and forms a part 
of my field, he is never an Ego in the sense in which I am one for 
myself. In order to think of him as a genuine /, I ought to think of 
myself as a mere object for him, which I am prevented from doing by 
the knowledge which I have of myself. But if another's body is not 
an object for me, nor mine an object for him, if both are manifesta- 
tions of behaviour, the positing of the other does not reduce me to the 
status of an object in his field, nor does my perception of the other 
reduce him to the status of an object in mine. The other person is 
never quite a personal being, if I myself am totally one, and if I grasp 
myself as apodeictically self-evident. But if I find in myself, through 
reflection, along with the perceiving subject, a pre-personal subject 

352 



OTHER SELVES AND THE HUMAN WORLD 

given to itself, and if my perceptions are centred outside me as sources 
of initiative and judgement, if the perceived world remains in a state 
of neutrality, being neither verified as an object nor recognized as a 
dream, then it is not the case that everything that appears in the 
world is arrayed before me, and so the behaviour of other people can 
have its place there. This world may remain undivided between my 
perception and his, the self which perceives is in no particularly 
privileged position which rules out a perceived self; both are, not 
cogitationes shut up in their own immanence, but beings which are 
outrun by their world, and which consequently may well be outrun 
by each other. The affirmation of an alien consciousness standing 
over against mine would immediately make my experience into a 
private spectacle, since it would no longer be co-extensive with being. 
The cogito of another person strips my own cogito of all value, and 
causes me to lose the assurance which I enjoyed in my solitude of 
having access to the only being conceivable for me, being, that is, as 
it is ajined at and constituted by me. But we have learned in indivi- 
dual perception not to conceive our perspective views as independent 
of each other; we know that they slip into each other and are brought 
together finally in the thing. In the same way we must learn to find 
the communication between one consciousness and another in one 
and the same world. In reality, other people are not included in my 
perspective of the world because this perspective itself has no de- 
finite limits, because it slips spontaneously into the other person's, 
and because both are brought together in the one single world in 
which we all participate as anonymous subjects of perception. 

In so far as I have sensory functions, a visual, auditory and tactile 
field, I am already in communication with others taken as similar 
psycho-physical subjects. No sooner has my gaze fallen upon a living 
body in process of acting than the objects surrounding it immediately 
take on a fresh layer of significance: they are no longer simply what 
I myself could make of them, they are what this other pattern of be- 
haviour is about to make of them. Round about the perceived body 
a vortex forms, towards which my world is drawn and, so to speak, 
sucked in: to this extent, it is no longer merely mine, and no longer 
merely present, it is present to x, to that other manifestation of be- 
haviour which begins to take shape in it. Already the other body has 
ceased to be a mere fragment of the world, and become the theatre 
of a certain process of elaboration, and, as it were, a certain 'view' 
of the world. There is taking place over there a certain manipulation 
of things hitherto my property. Someone is making use of my 
familiar objects. But who can it be? I say that it is another person, a 
second self, and this I know in the first place because this living body 
has the same structure as mine. I experience my own body as the 

353 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



power of adopting certain forms of behaviour and a certain world, 
and I am given to myself merely as a certain hold upon the world: 
now, it is precisely my body which perceives the body of another 
person, and discovers in that other body a miraculous prolongation 
of my own intentions, a familiar way of dealing with the world. 
Henceforth, as the parts of my body together comprise a system, so 
my body and the other person's are one whole, two sides of one and 
the same phenomenon, and the anonymous existence of which my 
body is the ever-renewed trace henceforth inhabits both bodies 
simultaneously. 1 All of which makes another living being, but not 
yet another man. But this alien life, like mine with which it is in com- 
munication, is an open life. It is not entirely accounted for by a cer- 
tain number of biological or sensory functions. It annexes . x .ural 
objects by diverting them from their immediate significance, it makes 
tools for itself, and projects itself into the environment in the shape 
of cultural objects. The child finds them around him at birth like 
meteorites from another planet. He appropriates them and learns to 
use them as others do, because the body image ensures the immedi- 
ate correspondence of what he sees done and what he himself does, 
and because in that way the implement is fixed in his mind as a de- 
terminate manipulandum, and other people as centres of human 
action. There is one particular cultural object which is destined to 
play a crucial role in the perception of other people: language. In 
the experience of dialogue, there is constituted between the other 
person and myself a common ground; my thought and his are inter- 
woven into a single fabric, my words and those of my interlocutor 
are called forth by the state of the discussion, and they arc inserted 
into a shared operation of which neither of us is the creator. We have 
here a dual being, where the other is for me no longer a mere bit of 
behaviour in my transcendental field, nor I in his; we are collabora- 
tors for each 'other in consummate reciprocity. Our perspectives 
merge into each other, and we co-exist through a common world. In 
the present dialogue, I am freed from myself, for the other person's 
thoughts are certainly his; they are not of my making, though I do 
grasp them the moment they come into being, or even anticipate 
them. And indeed, the objection which my interlocutor raises to 
what I say draws from me thoughts which I had no idea I possessed, 
so that at the same time that 1 lend him thoughts, he reciprocates by 
making me think too. It is only retrospectively, when I have with- 
drawn from the dialogue and am recalling it that I am able to reinte- 
grate it into my life and make of it an episode in my private history, 

1 That is why disturbances affecting a subject's body image can be unearthed 
by requiring him to point out on the doctor's body the part of his own which is 
being touched. 



354 



OTHER SELVES AND THE HUMAN WORLD 



and that the other recedes into his absence, or, in so far as he re- 
mains present for me, is felt as a threat. The perception of other 
people and the intersubjective world are problematical only for 
adults. The child lives in a world which he unhesitatingly believes 
accessible to all around him. He has no awareness of himself or of 
others as private subjectivities, nor does he suspect that all of us, 
himself included, are limited to one certain point of view of the 
world. That is why he subjects neither his thoughts, in which he be- 
lieves as they present themselves, without attempting to link them to 
each other, nor our words, to any sort of criticism. He has no know- 
ledge of points of vievA For him men are empty heads turned towards 
one single, self-evident world where everything takes place, even 
dreams, which are, he thinks, in his room, and even thinking, since it 
is not distinct from words. Others are for him so many gazes which 
inspect things, and have an almost material existence, so much so 
that the child wonders how these gazes avoid being broken as they 
meet. 1 At about twelve years old, says Piaget, the child achieves the 
cogito and reaches the truths of rationalism. At this stage, it is held, 
he discovers himself both as a point of view on the world and also 
as called upon to transcend that point of view, and to construct an 
objectivity at the level of judgement. Piaget brings the child to a 
mature outlook as if the thoughts of the adult were self-sufficient and 
disposed of all contradictions. But, in reality, it must be the case that 
the child's outlook is in some way vindicated against the adult's and 
against Piaget, and that the unsophisticated thinking of our earliest 
years remains as an indispensable acquisition underlying that of 
maturity, if there is to be for the adult one single intersubjective 
world. My awareness of constructing an objective truth would never 
provide me with anything more than an objective truth for me, and 
my greatest attempt at impartiality would never enable me to prevail 
over my subjectivity (as Descartes so well expresses it by the hypo- 
thesis of the malignant demon), if I had not, underlying my judge- 
ments, the primordial certainty of being in contact with being itself, 
if, before any voluntary adoption of a position I were not already 
situated in an intersubjective world, and if science too were not up- 
held by this basic So£a. With the cogito begins that struggle between 
consciousnesses, each one of which, as Hegel says, seeks the death of 
the other. For the struggle ever to begin, and for each consciousness 
to be capable of suspecting the alien presences which it negates, 
all must necessarily have some common ground and be mindful of 
their peaceful co-existence in the world of childhood. 

But is it indeed other people that we arrive at in this way? What 
we do in effect is to iron out the I and the Thou in an experience 
1 Piaget, La Representation du monde chez r enfant, p. 21. 
355 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 



shared by a plurality, thus introducing the impersonal into the heart 
of subjectivity and eliminating the individuality of perspectives. But 
have we not, in this general confusion, done away with the alter Egb 
as well as the Ego? We said earlier that they are mutually exclusive. 
But this is only because they both lay the same claims, and because 
the alter Ego follows all the variations of the Ego: if the perceiving / 
is genuinely an /, it cannot perceive a different one; if the perceiving 
subject is anonymous, the other which it perceives is equally so; so 
when, within this collective consciousness, we try to bring out the 
plurality of consciousnesses, we shall find ourselves back with the 
difficulties which we thought we had left behind. I perceive the other 
person as a piece of behaviour, for example, I perceive the grief or 
the anger of the other in his conduct, in his face or his hands, without 
recourse to any 'inner' experience of suffering or anger, and because 
grief and anger are variations of belonging to the world, undivided 
between the body and consciousness, and equally applicable to the 
other person's conduct, visible in his phenomenal body, as in my 
own conduct as it is presented to me. But then, the behaviour of 
another person, and even his words, are not that other person. The 
grief and the anger of another have never quite the same significance 
for him as they have for me. For him these situations are lived 
through, for me they are displayed. Or in so far as I can, by some 
friendly gesture, become part of that grief or that anger, they still 
remain the grief and anger of my friend Paul: Paul suffers because 
he has lost his wife, or is angry because his watch has been stolen, 
whereas I suffer because Paul is grieved, or I am angry because he is 
angry, and our situations cannot be superimposed on each other. If, 
moreover, we undertake some project in common, this common 
project is not one single project, it does not appear in the selfsame 
light to both of us, we are not both equally enthusiastic about it, or 
at any rate not in quite the same way, simply because Paul is Paul and 
I am myself. Although his consciousness and mine, working through 
our respective situations, may contrive to produce a common situa- 
tion in which they can communcate, it is nevertheless from the sub- 
jectivity of each of us that each one projects this 'one and only' 
world. The difficulties inherent in considering the perception of other 
people did not all stem from objective thought, nor do they all dis- 
solve with the discovery of behaviour, or rather objective thought 
and the uniqueness of the cogito which flows from it are not fictions, 
but firmly grounded phenomena of which wc shall have to seek the 
basis. The conflict between myself and the other does not begin only 
when we try to think ourselves into the other and does not vanish if 
we reintegrate thought into non-positing consciousness and unre- 
flective living; it is already there if I try to live another's experiences, 

356 



OTHER SELVES AND THE HUMAN WORLD 



for example in the blindness of sacrifice. I enter into a pact with the 
other person, having resolved to live in an interworld in which I 
accord as much place to others as to myself. But this interworld is 
still a project of mine, and it would be hypocritical to pretend that I 
seek the welfare of another as if it were mine, since this very attach- 
ment to another's interest still has its source in me. 

In the absence of reciprocity there is no alter Ego, since the world 
of the one then takes in completely that of the other, so that one feels 
disinherited in favour of the other. This is what happens in the case 
of a couple where there is more love felt on one side than on the 
other: one throws himself, and his whole life, into his love, the other 
remains free, finding in this love a merely contingent manner of liv- 
ing. The former feels his being and substance flowing away into that 
freedom which confronts him, whole and unqualified. And even if 
the second partner, through fidelity to his vows or through generos- 
ity, tries to reciprocate by reducing himself, or herself, to the status 
of a mere phenomenon in the other's world, and to see himself 
through the other's eyes, he can succeed only by an expansion of his 
own life, so that he denies by necessity the equivalence of himself 
with the other that he is trying to posit. Co-existence must in all cases 
be experienced on both sides. If neither of us is a constituting con- 
sciousness at the moment when we are about to communicate and 
discover a common world, the question then is: who communicates, 
and for whom does this world exist? And if someone does communi- 
cate with someone else, if the interworld is not an inconceivable in- 
itself and must exist for both of us, then again communication breaks 
down, and each of us operates ia his own private world like two 
players playing on two chessboards a hundred miles apart. But here 
the players can still make known their moves to each other by tele- 
phone or correspondence, which means that they are in fact parti- 
cipants in the same world. I, on the other hand, share no common 
ground with another person, for the positing of the other with his 
world, and the positing of myself with mine are mutually exclusive. 
Once the other is posited, once the other's gaze fixed upon me has, 
by inserting me into his field, stripped me of part of my being, it will 
readily be understood that I can recover it only by establishing rela- 
tions with him, by bringing about his clear recognition of me, and 
that my freedom requires the same freedom for others. But first we 
need to know how it has been possible for me to posit the other. In 
so far as I am born into the world, and have a body and a natural 
world, I can find in that world other patterns of behaviour with 
which my own interweave, as we have explained above. But also in 
so far as I am born and my existence is already at work and is aware 
that it is given to itself, it always remains on the hither side of the 

357 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

acts in which it tries to become engaged and which are for ever mere 
modalities of its own, and particular cases of its insurmountable 
generality. It is this ground of given existence that is disclosed by 
the cogito: every assertion, every commitment, and even every nega- 
tion and doubt takes its place in a field open in advance, and testifies 
to a self contiguous with itself before those particular acts in which it 
loses contact with itself. This self, a witness to any actual communi- 
cation, and without which the latter would be ignorant of itself, and 
would not, therefore, be communication at all, would seem to pre- 
clude any solution of the problem of other people. There is here a 
solipsism rooted in living experience and quite insurmountable. It is 
true that I do not feel that I am the constituting agent either of the 
natural or of the cultural world: into each perception and into each 
judgement I bring either sensory functions or cultural settings which 
are not actually mine. Yet although I am outrun on all sides by my 
own acts, and submerged in generality, the fact remains that I am 
the one by whom they are experienced, and with my first perception 
there was launched an insatiable being who appropriates everything 
that he meets, to whom nothing can be purely and simply given 
because he has inherited his share of the world, and hence carries 
within him the project of all possible being, because it has been once 
and for all imprinted in his field of experiences. The generality of the 
body will never make it clear how the indeclinable / can estrange it- 
self in favour of another, since this generality is exactly compensated 
by the other generality of my inalienable subjectivity. How should I 
find elsewhere, in my perceptual field, such a presence of self to self? 
Are we to say that the existence of the other person is for me a simple 
fact? It is in any case a fact for me, and it must necessarily be among 
my own possibilities, and understood or in some way experienced by 
me in order to be valid as a fact. 

After this failure to set limits to solipsism from the outside, are 
we then to try to outrun it inwardly? It is true that I can recognize 
only one Ego, but as universal subject I cease to be a finite self, and 
become an impartial spectator before whom the other person and 
myself, each as an empirical being, are on a footing of equality, with- 
out my enjoying any particular privilege. Of the consciousness which 
I discover by reflection and before which everything is an object, it 
cannot be said that it is myself : my self is arrayed before me like any 
other thing, and my consciousness constitutes it and is not enclosed 
within it, so that it can without difficulty constitute other (my)selves. 
In God I can be conscious of others as of myself, and love others as 
myself. But the subjectivity that we have run up against does not 
admit of being called God. if reflection reveals- myself to me as an 
infinite subject, we must recognize, at least at the level of appearance, 

358 



OTHER SELVES AND THE HUMAN WORLD 

my ignorance of this self which is even more myself than I. 1 knew it, 
the reply will be, because I perceived both the other and myself, and 
because this perception is possible only through him. But if 1 did 
already know it, then all books of philosophy are useless. In fact, the 
truth needs to be revealed. It was, therefore, this finite and ignorant 
self which recognized God in itself, while God, beyond phenomena, 
thought about himself since the beginning of time. It is through this 
shadow that unavailing light manages to be shed on at least some- 
thing, and thus it is ultimately impossible to bring the shadow into 
the light; I can never recognize myself as God without necessarily 
denying what I am trying in fact to assert. I might love others as my- 
self in God, but even then my love of God would have to come not 
from me, and would have to be truly, as Spinoza said, the love which 
God has for himself through me. So that finally nowhere would there 
be love of others or indeed others, but one single self-love linked to 
itself beyond our own lives, and nowise relevant, indeed inaccessible, 
to us. The act of reflection and love leading to God places the God 
sought outside the realm of possibility. 

We are thus brought back to solipsism, and the problem now 
appears in all its difficulty. I am not God, but merely lay claim to 
divinity. I escape from every involvement and transcend others in so 
far as every situation and every other person must be experienced by 
me in order to exist in my eyes. And yet other people have for me at 
least an initial significance. As with the gods of polytheism, I have 
to reckon with other gods, or again, as with Aristotle's God, I 
polarize a world which I do not create. Consciousnesses present v 
themselves with the absurdity of a multiple solipsism, such is the 
situation which has to be understood. Since we live through this 
situation, there must be some way of making it explicit. Solitude 
and communication cannot be the two horns of a dilemma, but two 
'moments' of one phenomenon, since in fact other people do exist 
for me. We must say of experience of others what we have said 
elsewhere about reflection: that its object cannot escape it entirely, 
since we have a notion of the object only through that experience. 
Reflection must in some way present the unreflected, otherwise we 
should have nothing to set over against it, and it would not become 
a problem for us. Similarly my experience must in some way present 
me with other people, since otherwise I should have no occasion to 
speak of solitude, and could not begin to pronounce other people 
inaccessible. What is given and initially true, is a reflection open to 
the unreflective, the reflective assumption of the unreflective — and 
similarly there is given the tension of my experience towards another 
whose existence on the horizon of my life is beyond doubt, even 
when my knowledge of him is imperfect. There is more than a vague 

359 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

analogy between the two problems, for in both cases it is a matter of 
finding out how to steal a march on myself and experience the un- 
reflective as such. How, then, can I who perceive, and who, ipso 
facto, assert myself as universal subject, perceive another who im- 
mediately deprives me of this universality? The central phenomenon, 
at the root of both my subjectivity and my transcendence towards 
others, consists in my being given to myself. / am given, that is, I 
find myself already situated and involved in a physical and social 
world — I am given to myself, which means that this situation is never 
hidden from me, it is never round about me as an alien necessity, and 
I am never in effect enclosed in it like an object in a box. My free- 
dom, the fundamental power which I enjoy of being the subject of 
all my experiences, is not distinct from my insertion into the world. 
It is a fate for me to be free, to be unable to reduce myself to any- 
thing that I experience, to maintain in relation to any factual situa- 
tion a faculty of withdrawal, and this fate was sealed the moment my 
transcendental field was thrown open, when I was born as vision 
and knowledge, when I was thrown into the world. Against the social 
world I can always avail myself of my sensible nature, close my eyes, 
stop up my ears, live as a stranger in society, treat others, ceremonies 
and institutions as mere arrangements of colour and light, and strip 
them of all their human significance. Against the natural world I 
can always have recourse to the thinking nature and entertain doubts 
about each perception taken on its own. The truth of solipsism is 
there. Every experience will always appear to me as a particular in- 
stance which does not exhaust the generality of my being, and I have 
always, as Malebranche said, movement left wherewith to go further. 
But I can fly from being only into being; for example, I escape from 
society into nature, or from the real world into an imaginary one 
made of the broken fragments of reality. The physical and social 
world always functions as a stimulus to my reactions, whether these 
be positive or negative. I call such and such a perception into ques- 
tion only in the name of a truer one capable of correcting it ; in so far 
as I can deny each thing, it is always by asserting that there is some- 
thing in general, and this is why we say that thought is a thinking 
nature, an assertion of being over and above the negation of beings. 
I can evolve a solipsist philosophy but, in doing so, I assume the 
existence of a community of men endowed with speech, and I address 
myself to it. Even the 'indefinite refusal to be anything at all* 1 as- 
sumes something which is refused and in relation to which the sub- 
ject holds himself apart. I must choose between others and myself, it 
is said. But we choose one against the other, and thus assert both. 
The other person transforms me into an object and denies me, I 
1 Valcry, Introduction d la mtthode cie Leonard dc Vinci, VarU H } 4, p. 200. 

360 



OTHER SELVES AND THE HUMAN WORLD 

transform him into an object and deny him, it is asserted. In fact the 
other's gaze transforms me into an object, and mine him, only if 
both of us withdraw into the core of our thinking nature, if wc both 
make ourselves into an inhuman gaze, if each of us feels his actions 
to be not taken up and understood, but observed as if they were an 
insect's. This is what happens, for instance, when I fall under the 
gaze of a stranger. But even then, the objectification of each by the 
other's gaze is felt as unbearable only because it takes the place of 
possible communication. A dog's gaze directed towards me causes 
me no embarrassment. The refusal to communicate, however, is still 
a form of communication. Manifold freedom, the thinking nature, 
the inalienable core, existence without qualification, which in me 
and in others mark the bounds of sympathy, do call a halt to com- 
munication, but do not abolish it. If I am dealing with a stranger who 
has as yet not uttered a word, I may wel I believe that he is an inhabitant 
of another world in which my own thoughts and actions are unworthy 
of a place. But let him utter a word, or even make a gesture of im- 
patience, and already he ceases to transcend me: that, then, is his 
voice, those are his thoughts and that is the realm that I thought 
inaccessible. Each existence finally transcends the others only when 
it remains inactive and rests upon its natural difference. Even that 
universal meditation which cuts the philosopher off from his nation, 
his friendships, his prejudices, his empirical being, the world in 
short, and which seems to leave him in complete isolation, is in 
reality an act, the spoken word, and consequently dialogue. Solips- 
ism would be strictly true only of someone who managed to be 
tacitly aware of his existence without being or doing anything, which 
is impossible, since existing is being in and of the world. The philo- 
sopher cannot fail to draw others with him into his reflective retreat, 
because in the uncertainty of the world, he has for ever learned to 
treat them as associates, and because all his knowledge is built on 
this datum of opinion. Transcendental subjectivity is a revealed 
subjectivity, revealed to itself and to others, and is for that reason 
an intersubjectivity. As soon as existence collects itself together and 
commits itself in some line of conduct, it falls beneath perception. Like 
every other perception, this one asserts more things than it grasps: 
when 1 say that I see the ash-tray over there, I suppose as completed 
an unfolding of experience which could go on ad infinitum, and I 
commit a whole perceptual future. Similarly, when I say that I know 
and like someone, I aim, beyond his qualities, at an inexhaustible 
core which may one day shatter the image that I have formed of 
him. It is subject to this condition that there are things and 'other 
people' for us, not as the result of some illusion, but as the result of a 
violent act which is perception itself. 

361 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

We must therefore rediscover, after the natural world, the social 
world, not as an object or sum of objects, but as a permanent field or 
dimension of existence: I may well turn away from it, but not cease 
to be situated relatively to it. Our relationship to the social is, like 
our relationship to the world, deeper than any express perception or 
any judgement. It is as false to place ourselves in society as an object 
among other objects, as it is to place society within ourselves as an 
object of thought, and in both cases the mistake lies in treating the 
social as an object. We must return to the social with which we are 
in contact by the mere fact of existing, and which we carry about 
inseparably with us before any objectification. Objective and scienti- 
fic consciousness of the past and of civilizations would be impossible 
had I not, through the intermediary of my society, my cultural world 
and their horizons, at least a possible communication with them, and 
if the place of the Athenian Republic or the Roman Empire were 
not somewhere marked out on the borders of my own history, and if 
they were not there as so many individuals to be known, indetermin- 
ate but pre-existing, and if I did not find in my own life the basic 
structures of history. The social is already there when we come to 
know or judge it. An individualistic or sociological philosophy is a 
certain perception of co-existence systematized and made explicit. 
Prior to the process of becoming aware, the social exists obscurely 
and as a summons. At the end of Notre Patrie P£guy finds once 
again a buried voice which had never ceased to speak, much as we 
realize on waking that objects have not, during the night, ceased to 
be, or that someone has been knocking for some time at our door. 
Despite cultural, moral, occupational and ideological differences, the 
Russian peasants of 1917 joined the workers of Petrograd and Mos- 
cow in the struggle, because they felt that they shared the same fate; 
class was experienced in concrete terms before becoming the object 
of a deliberate volition. Primarily the social does not exist as a third 
person object. It is the mistake of the investigator, the 'great man' 
and the historian to try to treat it as an object. Fabrice would have 
liked to see the Battle of Waterloo as one sees a landscape, but found 
nothing but confused episodes. Does the Emperor really see it on his 
map? It reduces itself in his eyes to a general plan by no means free 
from gaps; why is this regiment not making headway; why don't 
the reserves come up? The historian who is not engaged in the battle 
and who sees it from all angles, who brings together a mass of evi- 
dence, and who knows what the result was, thinks he has grasped 
it in its essential truth. But what he gives us is no more than a repre- 
sentation; he docs not bring before us the battle itself since the issue 
was, at the time, contingent, and is no longer so when the historian 
recounts it, since the deeper causes of defeat and the fortuitous inci- 

362 



OTHER SELVES AND THE HUMAN WORLD 

dents which brought them into play were, in that singular event 
called Waterloo, equally determining factors, and since the historian 
assigns to the said singular event its place in the general process of 
decline of the Empire. The true Waterloo resides neither in what 
Fabrice, nor the Emperor, nor the historian sees, it is not a determin- 
able object, it is what comes about on the fringes of all perspectives, 
and on which they are all erected. 1 The historian and the philosopher 
are in search of an objective definition of class or nation: is the 
nation based on common language or on conceptions of life; is class 
based on income statistics or on its place in the process of pro- 
duction? It is well known that none of these criteria enables us to 
decide whether an individual belongs to a nation or a class. In all 
revolutions there are members of the privileged class who make 
common cause with the revolutionaries, and members of the op- 
pressed class who remain faithful to the privileged. And every nation 
has its traitors. This is because the nation and class are neither ver- 
sions of fate which hold the individual in subjection from the outside 
nor values which he posits from within. They are modes of co-exis- 
tence which are a call upon him. Under conditions of calm, the 
nation and the class are there as stimuli to which I respond only 
absent-mindedly or confusedly; they are merely latent. A revolu- 
tionary situation, or one of national danger, transforms those pre- 
conscious relationships with class and nation, hitherto merely lived 
through, into the definite taking of a stand; the tacit commitment 
becomes explicit. But it appears to itself as anterior to decision. 

The problem of the existential modality of the social is here at one 
with all problems of transcendence. Whether we are concerned with 
my body, the natural world, the past, birth or death, the question is 
always how I can be open to phenomena which transcend me, and 
which nevertheless exist only to the extent that I take them up and 
live them ; how the presence to myself (Urprasenz) which establishes my 
own limits and conditions every alien presence is at the same time de- 
presentation (Entgegenwartigung) 2 and throws me outside myself. Both 

1 It would therefore seem that history should be written in the present tense. 
It is what Jules Romains, for example, did in Verdun. Naturally, from the fact 
that objective thought is incapable of retailing down to the last detail a present 
historical situation, we must not conclude that we should live through our history 
with our eyes closed, as if it were an individual adventure, reject every attempt to 
put it into perspective, and throw ourselves into action with no guiding principle. 
Fabrice misses Waterloo, but the reporter is already nearer to the event, for the 
spirit of adventure leads us astray even more than objective thought. There is a 
way of thinking, in contact with the event, which seeks its concrete structure. 
A revolution which is really moving with the march of history can be thought as 
well as lived. 

2 Husserl, Die Kris is der europaischen Wissenschaften und die iranszendentale 
Phanomenologie, III (unpublished). 

363 



THE WORLD AS PERCEIVED 

idealism and realism, the former by making the external world im- 
manent in me, the latter by subjecting me to a causal action, falsify 
the motivational relations existing between the external and internal 
worlds, and make this relationship unintelligible. Our individual 
past, for example, cannot be given to us either on the one hand by 
the actual survival of states of consciousness or paths traced in the 
brain, or on the other by a consciousness of the past which consti- 
tutes it and immediately arrives at it: in either case we should lack 
any sense of the past, for the past would, strictly speaking, be pre- 
sent. If anything of the past is to exist for us, it can be only in an 
ambiguous presence, anterior to any express evocation, like a field 
upon which we have an opening. It must exist for us even though we 
may not be thinking of it, and all our recollections must have their 
substance in and be drawn from this opaque mass. Similarly, if the 
world were to me merely a collection of things, and the thing merely 
a collection of properties, I should have no certainties, but merely 
probabilities, no unchallengeable reality, but merely conditional 
truths. If the past and the world exist, they must be theoretically 
immanent — they can be only what I see behind and around me — 
and factually transcendent — they exist in my life before appearing 
as objects of my explicit acts. Similarly, moreover, my birth and death 
cannot be objects of thought for me. Being established in my life, 
buttressed by my thinking nature, fastened down in this transcen- 
dental field which was opened for me by my first perception, and in 
v/hich all absence is merely the obverse of a presence, all silence a 
modality of the being of sound, I enjoy a sort of ubiquity and theore- 
tical eternity, 1 feel destined to move in a flow of endless life, 
neither the beginning nor the end of which I can experience in 
thought, since it is my living self who think of them, and since thus 
my life always forestalls and survives itself. Yet this same thinking 
nature which produces in me a superabundance of being opens the 
world to me through a perspective, along with which there comes to 
me the feeling of my contingency, the dread of being outstripped, 
so that, although I do not manage to encompass my death in thought, 
I nevertheless live in an atmosphere of death in general, and there is 
a kind of essence of death always on the horizon of my thinking. In 
short, just as the instant of my death is a future to which 1 have not 
access, so 1 am necessarily destined never to experience the presence 
of another person to himself. And yet each other person does exist 
for me as an unchallengeable style or setting of co-existence, and 
my life has a social atmosphere just as it has a flavour of mor- 
tality. 

Wc have discovered, with the natural and social worlds, the truly 
transcendental, which is not the totality of constituting operations 

364 



OTHER SELVES AND THE HUMAN WORLD 



whereby a transparent world, free from obscurity and impenetrable 
solidity, is spread out before an impartial spectator, but that am- 
biguous life in which |he forms of transcendence have their Ursprung, 
and which, through a fundamental contradiction, puts me in com- 
munication with them, and on this basis makes knowledge pos- 
sible. 1 It will perhaps be maintained that a philosophy cannot be 
centred round a contradiction, and that all our descriptions, since 
they ultimately defy thought, are quite meaningless. The objection 
would be valid if we were content to lay bare, under the term pheno- 
menon or phenomenal field, a layer of prelogical or magical experi- 
ences. For in that case we should have to choose between believing 
the descriptions and abandoning thought, or knowing what we are 
talking about and abandoning our descriptions. These descriptions 
must become an opportunity for defining a variety of comprehen- 
sion and reflection altogether more radical than objective thought. 
To phenomenology understood as direct description needs to be 
added a phenomenology of phenomenology. We must return to the 
cogito, in search of a more fundamental Logos than that of objective 
thought, one which endows the latter with its relative validity, and 
at the same time assigns to it its place. At the level of being it will 
never be intelligible that the subject should be both naturans and 
naturatus, infinite and finite. But if we rediscover time beneath the 
subject, and if we relate to the paradox of time those of the body, the 
world, the thing, and other people, we shall understand that beyond 
these there is nothing to understand. 

1 Husserl in his last period concedes that all reflection should in the first place 
return to the description of the world of living experience (Lebenswelt). But he 
adds that, by means of a second 'reduction*, the structures of the world of experi- 
ence must be reinstated in the transcendental flow of a universal constitution in 
which all the world's obscurities are elucidated. It is clear, however, that we are 
faced with a dilemma: either the constitution makes the world transparent, in 
which case it is not obvious why reflection needs to pass through the world of 
experience, or else it retains something of that world, and never rids it of its 
opacity. HusserFs thought moves increasingly in this second direction, despite 
many throwbacks to the logicist period — as is seen when he makes a problem of 
rationality, when he allows significances which are in the last resort 'fluid' (Erfahr- 
wig und Urieil, p. 428), when he bases knowledge on a basic 8o£<x. 



365 



PART THREE 



Being -for-Itself and Being-in- the- World 



I 

THE COGITO 



I AM thinking of the Cartesian cogito, wanting to finish this work, 
feeling the coolness of the paper under ray hand, and perceiving the 
trees of the boulevard through the window. My life is constantly 
thrown headlong into transcendent things, and passes wholly out- 
side me. The cogilo is either this thought which took shape three 
centuries ago in the mind of Descartes, or the meaning of the books 
he has left for us, or else an eternal truth which emerges from them, 
but in any case is a cultural being of which it is true to say that my 
thought strains towards it rather than that it embraces it, as my 
body, in a familiar surrounding, finds its orientation and makes its 
way among objects without my needing to have them expressly in 
mind. This book, once begun, is not a certain set of ideas; it con- 
stitutes for me an open situation, for which I could not possibly 
provide any complex formula, and in which I struggle blindly on 
until, miraculously, thoughts and words become organized by them- 
selves. A fortiori the sensible forms of being which lie around me, the 
paper under my hand, the trees before my eyes, do not yield their 
secret to me, rather is it that my consciousness takes flight from itself 
and, in them L is unaware of itself. Such is the initial situation that 
realism tries to account for by asserting an actual transcendence and 
the existence in itself of the world and ideas. 

There is, however, no question of justifying realism, and there is 
an element of final truth in the Cartesian return of things or ideas 
to the self. The very experience of transcendent things is possible 
only provided that their project is borne, and discovered, within 
myself. When I say that things are transcendent, this means that I do 
not possess them, that I do not circumambulate them; they are trans- 
cendent to the extent that I am ignorant of what they are, and blindly 
assert their bare existence. Now what meaning can there be in assert- 
ing the existence of one knows not what? If there can be any truth 
at all in this assertion, it is in'so far as I catch a glimpse of the nature 

369 



BEING -FOR- ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE-WORLD 

or essence to which it refers, in so far, for instance, as my vision of 
the tree as a mute ek-stase into an individual thing already envelops 
a certain thought about seeing and a certain thought about the tree. 
It is, in short, in so far as I do not merely encounter the tree, am not 
simply confronted with it, but discover in this existent before me a 
certain nature, the notion of which I actively evolve. In so far as I 
find things round about me, this cannot be because they are actually 
there, for, ex hypothesr, I can know nothing of this factual existence. 
The fact that I am capable of recognizing it is attributable to my 
actual contact with the thing, which awakens within me a primordial 
knowledge of all things, and to my finite and determinate perceptions' 
being partial manifestations of a power of knowing which is co- 
extensive with the world and unfolds it in its full extent and depth. 
If we imagine a space in itself with which the perceiving subject 
contrives to coincide, for example, if I imagine that my hand perceives 
the distance between two points as it spans it, how could the angle 
formed by my fingers, and indicative of that distance, come to be 
judged, unless it were so to speak measured out by the inner opera- 
tion of some power residing in neither object, a power which, ipso 
facto, becomes able to know, or rather effect, the relation existing 
between them? If it be insisted that the 'sensation in my thumb* and 
that in my first finger are at any rate 'signs' of the distance, how could 
these sensations come to have in themselves any means of signifying 
the relationship between points in space, unless they were already 
situated on a path running from one to the other, and unless this 
path in its turn were not only traversed by my fingers as they open, 
but also 'aimed at' by my thought pursuing its intelligible purpose? 
'How could the mind know the significance of a sign which it has 
not itself constituted as a sign?' 1 For the picture of knowledge at 
which we arrived in describing the subject situated in his world, we 
must, it seems, substitute a second, according to which it constructs 
or constitutes this world itself, and this one is more authentic than 
the first, since the transactions between the subject and the things 
round about it are possible only provided that the subject first of all 
causes them to exist for itself, actually arranges them round about 
itself, and extracts them Yrom its own core. The same applies with 
greater force in acts of spontaneous thought. The Cartesian cogito, 
which is the theme of my reflection, is always beyond what I bring 
to mind at the moment. It has a horizon of significance made up of 
a great number of thoughts which occurred to me as I was reading 
Descartes and which are not now present, along with others which 
I feel stirring within me, which I might have, but never have de- 
veloped. But the fact that it is enough to utter these three syllables in 
1 P. Lachi£ze-Rcy, Reflexions sur Vactivite spirituelle const ituante, p. 134. 

370 



THE COGITO 



my presence for me to be immediately directed towards a certain 
set of ideas, shows that in some way all possible developments and 
clarifications are at once present to me. 'Whoever tries to limit the 
spiritual light to what is at present before the mind always runs up 
against the Socratic problem. "How will you set about looking for 
that thing, the nature of which is totally unknown to you? Which, 
among the things you do not know, is the one which you propose to 
look for? And if by chance you should stumble upon it, how will you 
know that it is indeed that thing, since you are in ignorance of it?" 
(Meno y 80D.) 1 , A thought really transcended by its objects would 
find them proliferating in its path without ever being able to grasp 
their relationships to each other, or finding its way through to their 
truth. It is I who reconstitute the historical cogito, I who read Des- 
cartes* text, I who recognize in it an undying truth, so that finally 
the Cartesian cogito acquires its significance only through my own 
cogitOy and I should have no thought of it, had I not within myself 
all that is needed to invent it. It is I who assign to my thought the 
objective of resuming the action of the cogito, and I who constantly 
verify my thought's orientation towards this objective, therefore my 
thought must forestall itself in the pursuit of this aim, and must al- 
ready have found what it seeks, otherwise it would not seek it. We 
must define thought in terms of that strange power which it possesses 
of being ahead of itself, of launching itself and being at home every- 
where, in a word, in terms of its autonomy. Unless thought itself had 
put into things what it subsequently finds in them, it would have no 
hold upon things, would not think of them, and would be an 'illusion 
of thought'. 2 A sensible perception or a piece of reasoning cannot 
be facts which come about in me and of which I take note. When I 
consider them after the event, they are dispersed and distributed each 
to its due place. But all this is merely what is left in the wake of 
reasoning and perception which, seen contemporaneously, must 
necessarily, on pain of ceasing to hang together, take in simul- 
taneously everything necessary to their realization, and consequently 
be present to themselves with no intervening distance, in one in- 
divisible intention. All thought of something is at the same time self- — 
consciousness, failing which it could have no object. At the root of 
all our experiences and all our reflections, we find, then, a being 
which immediately recognizes itself, because it is its knowledge both 
of itself and of all things, and which knows its own existence, not by 
observation and as a given fact, nor by inference from any idea of 
itself, but through direct contact with that existence. Self-conscious- 
ness is the very being of mind in action. The act whereby I am con- 
scious of something must itself be apprehended at the very moment 
1 P. Lachieze-Rey, VIdealisme kantien, pp. 17-18. 2 Ibid., p. 25. 

371 



BriNC.-roR-iTsn r and BriNc,-iN-Tiir-woRLD 



at which it is carried out, otherwise it would collapse. Therefore it is 
inconceivable that it should be triggered ofT or brought about by 
anything whatsoever; it must be causa sui} To revert with Descartes 
from things to thought about things is to take one of two courses: 
it is either to reduce experience to a collection of psychological 
events, of which the / is merely the overall name or the hypothetical 
cause, in which case it is not clear how my existence is more certain 
than that of any thing, since it is no longer immediate, save at a fleet- 
ing instant; or else it is to recognize as anterior to events a field and 
a system of thoughts which is subject neither to time nor to any other 
limitation, a mode of existence owing nothing to the event and 
which is existence as consciousness, a spiritual act which grasps at a 
distance and compresses into itself everything at which it aims, an 
k I think' which is, by itself and without any adjunct, an 'I am*. 2 The 
Cartesian doctrine of the cogito was therefore bound to lead logically 
to the assertion of the timelessness of mind, and to the acceptance 
of a consciousness of the eternal: experimur nos aetenws esse' 3 
Accordingly eternity, understood as the power to embrace and anti- 
cipate temporal developments in a single intention, becomes the very 
definition of subjectivity. 4 

Before questioning this interpretation of the cogito in terms of eter- 
nity, let us carefully observe what follows from it, as this will show 
the need of some rectification. If the cogito reveals to me a new mode 
of existence owing nothing to time, and if I discover myself as the 
universal constituent of all being accessible to me, and as a trans- 
cendental field with no hidden corners and no outside, it is not enough 
to say that my mind, 'when it is a question of the form of all the 
objects of sense ... is the God of Spinoza', 5 for the distinction be- 
tween form and matter can no longer be given any ultimate value, 
therefore it is not clear how the mind, reflecting on itself, could in 
the last analysis find any meaning in the notion of receptivity, or 
think of itself in any valid way as undergoing modification : for if it is 
the mind itself which thinks of itself as affected, it does not think of 
itself thus, since it affirms its activity afresh simultaneously with ap- 
pearing to restrict it: in so far, on the other hand, as it is the mind 
which places itself in the world, it is not there, and the self-positing 
-is an illusion. It must then be said, with no qualification, that my 
mind is God. How can M. Lachieze-Rey, for example, have avoided 
this consequence? Mf, having suspended thinking, I resume it again, 

1 P. Lachie/c-Rcy, V hlcalismc ka*\t'\en % p. 55. 

2 Ibid., p. 184. 3 Ibid., pp. 17-18. 

1 P. I.nthiC7C-Rcy ( Le Moi, le Monde et Dicu, p. 68. 

L Kan i. Cbcrgang, Adickes, p. 756, quoted by Lachiezc-Rcy, Vldealisme 
kunticn. p. 4f>4. 

372 



THF COGITO 

I return to life, I reconstitute, in its indivisibility, and by putting 
myself back at the source whence it flows, the movement which 1 
carry on. . . . Thus, whenever he thinks, the subject makes himself 
his point of support, and takes his place, beyond and behind his 
various representations, in that unity which, being the principle of 
all recognition, is not there to be recognized, and he becomes once 
more the absolute because that is what he eternally is.' 1 But how 
could there be several absolutes? How in the first place could I ever 
recognize other (my)selves? If the sole experience of the subject is 
the one which I gain by coinciding with it, if the mind, by definition, 
eludes 'the outside spectator' and can be recognized only from within, 
my cogito is necessarily unique, and cannot be 'shared in* by another. 
Perhaps we can say that it is 'transferable' to others. 2 But then how 
could such a transfer ever be brought about? What spectacle can 
ever validly induce me to posit outside myself that mode of existence 
the whole significance of which demands that it be grasped from 
within? Unless I learn within myself to recognize the junction of the 
for itself and the in itself none cf those mechanisms called other 
bodies will ever be able to come to life; unless I have an exterior 
others have no interior. The plurality of consciousness is impossible 
if I have an absolute consciousness of myself. Behind the absolute of 
my thought, it is even impossible to conjecture a divine absolute. If it 
is perfect, the contact of my thought with itself seals me within my- 
self, and prevents me from ever feeling that anything eludes my 
grasp; there is no opening, no 'aspiration' 3 towards an Other for this 
self of mine, which constructs the totality of being and its own pres- 
ence in the world, which is defined in terms of 'self-possession', 4 and 
which never finds anything outside itself but what it has put there. 
This hermetically sealed self is no longer a finite self. 'There is . . . 
a consciousness of the universe only through the previous conscious- 
ness of organization in the active sense of the word, and conse- 
quently, in the last analysis, only through an inner communion with 
the very working of godhead.' 5 It is ultimately with God that the 
cogito brings me into coincidence. While the intelligible and identi- 
fiable structure of my experience, when recognized by me in the 
cogito y draws me out of the event and establishes me in eternity, it 
frees me simultaneously from all limiting attributes and, in fact, from 
that fundamental event which is my private existence. Hence the 
same reasoning which necessarily leads from the event to the act, from 
thoughts to the /, equally necessarily leads from the multiplicity 

1 P. Lachieze-Rey, Reflexions sur Vactivite spirituelle const it uante, p. 145. 

2 Id., VIdealisme kantien y p. 477. 

8 Ibid., p. 477. Le Moi, le Monde et Dieu, p. 83. 

4 VIdealisme kantien, p. 472. 6 Le Moi, le Monde el Diet/, p. 33. 

373 



nniNG-rOR-ITSELF AND BEING -I N-THE- WORLD 

of /'s to one sole constituting consciousness, and prevents me 
from entertaining any vain hope of salvaging the finiteness of the 
subject by defining it as a 'monad*. 1 The constituting consciousness 
is necessarily unique and universal. If we try to maintain that what it 
constitutes in each one of us is merely a microcosm, if we keep, for 
the cogito, the meaning of 'existential experience 1 , 2 and if it reveals 
to me, not the absolute transparency of thought wholly in possession 
of itself, but the blind act by which I take up my destiny as a think- 
ing nature and follow it out, then we are introducing another philo- 
sophy, which does not take us out o/time. What is brought home to 
us here is the need to find a middle course between eternity and the 
atomistic time of empiricism, in order to resume the interpretation 
of the cogito and of time. We have seen once and for all that our 
relations with things cannot be eternal ones, nor our consciousness of 
ourself the mere recording of psychic events. We perceive a world 
only provided that, before being facts of which we take cognizance, 
that world and that perception are thoughts of our own. What re- 
mains to be understood precisely is the way the world comes to 
belong to the subject and the subject to himself, which is that 
cogitatio which makes experience possible; our hold on things and 
on our 'states of consciousness'. We shall see that this does not leave 
the event and time out of account, but that it is indeed the funda- 
mental mode of the event and Geschichte, from which objective and 
impersonal events are derived forms, and finally that any recourse 
we have to eternity is necessitated solely by an objective conception 
of time. 

There can therefore be no doubt at all that I think. I am not sure 
that there is over there an ash-tray or a pipe, but I am sure that I 
think I see an ash-tray or a pipe. Now is it in fact as easy as is gener- 
ally thought to dissociate these two assertions and hold, indepen- 
dently of any judgement concerning the thing seen, the evident cer- 
tainty of my 'thought about seeing'? On the contrary, it is impos- 
sible^JPerception is precisely that kind of act in which there can be no 
question of setting the act itself apart from the end to which it is 
directed.1 Perception and the perceived necessarily have the same 
existential modality, since perception is inseparable from the con- 
sciousness which it has, or rather is, of reaching the thing itself. Any 
contention that the perception is indubitable, whereas the thing per- 
ceived is not, must be ruled out. If I see an ash-tray, in the full sense 
of the word see, there must be an ash-tray there, and I cannot forego 
this assertion. To see is to see something. To see red, is to see red 
actively in existence. Vision can be reduced to the mere presumption of 

1 As does M. Lachieze-Rey, Le Moi> le Monde et Dieu y pp. 69-70. 

2 Ibid., p. 72. 

374 



THE COG1TO 

seeing only if it is represented as the contemplation of a shifting and 
anchorless quale. But if, as we have shown above, the very quality 
itself, in its specific texture, is the suggestion of a certain way of exist- 
ing put to us, and responded to by us, in so far as we have sensory 
fields; and if the perception of a colour, endowed with a definite 
structure (in the way of superficial colour or area of colour), at a 
place or distance away either definite or vague, presupposes our 
opening on to a reality or a world, how can we possibly dissociate 
the certainty of our perceptual existence from that of its external 
counterpart? It is of the essence of my vision to refer not only to an 
alleged visible entity, but also to a being actually seen. Similarly, if I 
feel doubts about the presence of the thing, this doubt attaches to 
vision itself, and if there is no red or blue there, I say that I have not 
really seen these colours, and concede that at no time has there been 
created that parity between my visual intentions and the visible 
which constitutes the genuine act of seeing. We are therefore faced 
with a choice: either I enjoy no certainty with regard to things them- 
selves, in which case neither can I be certain about my own percep- 
tion, taken as a mere thought, since, taken even in this way, it in- 
volves the assertion of a thing. Or else I grasp my thought with cer- 
tainty, which involves the simultaneous assumption of the existence 
towards which it is projected. When Descartes tells us that the exis- 
tence of visible things is doubtful, but that our vision, when con- 
sidered as a mere thought of seeing is not in doubt, he takes up an 
untenable position. For thought about seeing can have two meanings. 
It can in the first place be understood in the restricted sense of alleged 
vision, or 'the impression of seeing', in which case it offers only the 
certainty of a possibility or a probability, and the 'thought of seeing' 
implies that we have had, in certain cases, the experience of genuine 
or actual vision to which the idea of seeing bears a resemblance and 
in which the certainty of the thing was, on those occasions, involved. 
The certainty of a possibility is no more than the possibility of a 
certainty, the thought of seeing is no more than seeing mentally, and 
we could not have any such thought unless we had on other oc- 
casions really seen. Now we may understand 'thought about seeing' 
as the consciousness we have of our constituting power. Whatever be 
the case with our empirical perceptions, which may be true or false, 
these perceptions are possible only if they are inhabited by a mind 
able to recognize, identify and sustain before us their intentional 
object. But if this constituting power is not a myth, if perception 
is really the mere extension of an inner dynamic power with which I 
can coincide, my certainty concerning the transcendental premises of 
the world must extend to the world itself, and, my vision being in its 
entirety thought about seeing, then the thing seen is in itself what I 

375 



BEING -FOR- ITS ELF AND BEING -IN -THE-WORLD 

think about it, so that transcendental idealism becomes absolute 
realism. It would be contradictory to assert 1 both that the world is 
constituted by me and that, out of this constitutive operation, I can 
grasp no more than the outline and the essential structures; I must 
see the existing world appear at the end of the constituting process, 
and not only the world as an idea, otherwise I shall have no more 
than an abstract construction, and not a concrete consciousness, of 
the world. Thus, in whatever sense we take 'thought about seeing*, it 
is certain only so long as actual sight is equally so. When Descartes 
tells us that sensation reduced to itself is always true, and that error 
creeps in through the transcendent interpretation of it thatsjudge- 
ment provides, he makes an unreal distinction: it is no less difficult 
for me to know whether or not I have felt something than it is to 
know whether there is really something there, for the victim of 
hysteria feels yet does not know what it is that he feels, as he per- 
ceives external objects without being aware of that perception. When, 
on the other hand, I am sure of having felt, the certainty of some 
external thing is involved in the very way in which the sensation is 
articulated ajid unfolded before me: it is a pain in the leg, or it is red, 
and this may be an opaque red on one plane, or a reddish three- 
dimensional atmosphere. The 'interpretation' of my sensations which 
I give must necessarily be motivated, and be so only in terms of the 
structure of those sensations, so that it can be said with equal validity 
either that there is no transcendent interpretation and no judgement 
which does not spring from the very configuration of the phenomena 
— or that there is no sphere of immanence, no realm in which my 
consciousness is fully at home and secure against all risk of error. 
The acts of the / are of such a nature that they outstrip themselves 
leaving no interiority of consciousness. Consciousness is transcen- 
dence through and through, not transcendence undergone — we have 
already said that such a transcendence would bring consciousness to 
a stop — but active transcendence. The consciousness I have of seeing 
or feeling is no passive noting of some psychic event hermetically 
sealed upon itself, an event leaving me in doubt about the reality of 
the thing seen or felt. Nor is it the activation of some constituting 
power superlatively and eternally inclusive of every possible sight or 
sensation, and linking up with the object without ever having to be 
drawn away from itself. It is the actual effecting of vision. I reassure 

1 As Husserl, for example, does when he concedes that any transcendental re- 
duction is at the same time an eidetic one. The necessity of proceeding by essences, 
and the stubborn opacity of existences, cannot be taken for granted as facts, but 
contribute to determining the significance of the cogiio and of ultimate subjec- 
tivity. I am not a constituting thought, and my 4 I think' is not an 'I am', unless 
by thought I can equal the world's concrete richness, and re-absorb facticity 
into it. 

376 



THE COG1TO 

myself that I see by seeing this or that, or at least by bringing to life 
around me a visual surrounding, a visible world which is ultimately 
vouched for only by the sight of a particular thing. Vision is an 
action, not, that is, an eternal operation (which is a contradiction in 
terms) but an operation which fulfils more than it promises, which 
constantly outruns its premises and is inwardly prepared only by my 
primordial opening upon a field of transcendence, that is, once again, 
by an ek-stase. Sight is achieved and fulfils itself in the thing seen. 
It is of its essence to take a hold upon itself, and indeed if it did not 
do so it would not be the sight of anything, but it is none the less of 
its essence to take a hold upon itself in a kind of ambiguous and 
obscure way, since it is not in possession of itself and indeed escapes 
from itself into the thing seen. What I discover and recognize 
through the cogito is not psychological immanence, the inherence of 
all phenomena in 'private states of consciousness', the blind contact 
of sensation with itself. It is not even transcendental immanence, 
the belonging of all phenomena to a constituting consciousness, the 
possession of clear thought by itself. It is the depp-seated momentum 
of transcendence which is my very being, the simultaneous contact 
with my own being and with the world's being. 

And yet is not the case of perception a special one? It throws me 
open to a world, but can do so only by outrunning both me and it- 
self. Thus the perceptual 'synthesis' has to be incomplete; it cannot 
present me with a 'reality' otherwise than by running the risk of 
error. It is absolutely necessarily the case that the thing, if it is to be 
a thing, should have sides of itself hidden from me, which is why the 
distinction between appearance and reality straightway has its place 
in the perceptual 'synthesis'. It would seem, on the other hand, that 
consciousness comes back into its rights and into full possession of 
itself, if I consider my awareness of 'psychic facts'. For example, love 
and will are inner operations; they forge their own objects, and it is 
clear that in doing so they may be sidetracked from reality and, in 
that sense, mislead us; but it seems impossible that they should mis- 
lead us about themselves. From the moment I feel love, joy or sad- 
ness, it is the case that I love, that I am joyful or sad, even when the 
object does not in fact (that is, for others or for myself at other times) 
have the value that I now attribute to it. Appearance is, within me, 
reality, and the being of consciousness consists in appearing to itself. 
What is willing, if it is not being conscious of an object as valid (or as 
valid precisely in so far as it is invalid, in the case of perverse will), 
and what is loving other than being conscious of an object as lov- 
able? And since the consciousness of an object necessarily involves a 
knowledge of itself, without which it would escape from itself and 
fail even to grasp its object, to will and to know that one wills, to 

377 



BEING -FOR- ITSELF AND BEING -I N-THE- WORLD 

love and know one loves are one and the same act; love is conscious- 
ness of loving, will is consciousness of willing. A love or a will un- 
aware of itself would be an unloving love, or an unwilling will, as an 
unconscious thought would be an unthinking one. Will or love 
would seem to be the same whether their object be artificial or real 
and, considered independently of the object to which they actually 
refer, they would appear to constitute a sphere of absolute certainty 
in which truth cannot elude us. Everything is, then, truth within con- 
sciousness. There can never be illusion other than with regard to the 
external object. A feeling, considered in itself, is always true once it is 
felt. Let us, however, look at the matter more closely. 

It is, in the first place, quite clear that we are able to discriminate, 
within ourselves, between 'true' and 'false' feelings, that everything 
felt by us as within ourselves is not ipso facto placed on a single foot- 
ing of existence, or true in the same way, and that there are degrees of 
reality within us as there are, outside of us, 'reflections', 'phantoms' 
and 'things'. Besides true love, there is false or illusory love. This last 
case must be distinguished from misinterpretations, and those errors 
in which I have deceitfully given the name of love to emotions un- 
worthy of it. For in such cases there was never even a semblance of 
love, and never for a moment did I believe that my life was com- 
mitted to that feeling. I conspired with myself to avoid asking the 
question in order to avoid receiving the reply which was already 
known to me; my 'love'-making was an attempt to do what was ex- 
pected of me, or merely deception. In mistaken or illusory love, on 
the other hand, I was willingly united to the loved one, she was for a 
time truly the vehicle of my relationships with the world. When 1 told 
her that I loved her, I was not 'interpreting', for my life was in truth 
committed to a form which, like a melody, demanded to be carried 
on. It is true that, following upon disillusionment (the revelation of 
my illusion about myself), and when I try to understand what has 
happened to me, I shall find beneath this supposed love something 
other than love: the likeness of the 'loved' woman to another, or 
boredom, or force of habit, or a community of interests or of con- 
victions, and it is just this which will justify me in talking about 
illusion. I loved only qualities (that smile that is so like another smile, 
that beauty which asserts itself like a fact, that youthfulness of ges- 
ture and behaviour) and not the individual manner of being which 
is that person herself. And, correspondingly, I was not myself wholly 
in thrall, for areas of my past and future life escaped the invasion, 
and I maintained within me corners set aside for other things. In that 
case, it will be objected, I was either unaware of this, in which case it 
is not a question of illusory love, but of a true love which is dying — 
or else I did know, in which case there was never any love at all, even 

378 



THE COGITO 

'mistaken'. But neither is the case. It cannot be said that this love, 
while it lasted, was indistinguishable from true love, and that it be- 
came 'mistaken love' when I repudiated it. Nor can it be said that a 
mystical crisis at fifteen is without significance, and that it becomes, 
when independently evaluated in later life, an incident of puberty 
or the first signs of a religious vocation. Even if I reconstruct my 
whole life on the basis of some incident of puberty, that incident does 
not lose its contingent character, so that it is my whole life which is 
'mistaken'. In the mystical crisis itself as I experienced it, there must 
be discoverable in it some characteristic which distinguishes vocation 
from incident: in the first case the mystical attitude insinuates itself 
into my basic relationship to the world and other people; in the 
second case, it is within the subject as an impersonal form of be- 
haviour, devoid of inner necessity: 'puberty'. In the same way, true 
love summons all the subject's resources and concerns him in his 
entire being, whereas mistaken love touches on only one persona: 
'the man of forty' in the case of late love, 'the traveller' in the case of 
exotic appeal, 'the widower' if the misguided love is sustained by a 
memory, 'the child' where the mother is recalled. True love ends 
when I change, or when the object of affection changes; misguided 
love is revealed as such when I return to my own self. The difference 
is intrinsic. But as it concerns the place of feeling in my total being-in- 
the-world, and as mistaken love is bound up with the person I believe 
I am at the time I feel it, and also as, in order to discern its mistaken 
nature I require a knowledge of myself which I can gain only through 
disillusionment, ambiguity remains, which is why illusion is possible. 

Let us return to the example of the hysterical subject. It is easy to 
treat him as a dissembler, but his deception is primarily self-decep- 
tion* and this instability once more poses the problem we are trying 
to dispose of : how can the victim of hysteria not feel what he feels, 
and feel what he does not feel? He does not feign pain, sadness or 
anger, yet his fits of 'pain', 'sadness' or 'rage' are distinguishable from 
'real' cases of these afflictions, because he is not wholly given over 
to them; at his core there is left a zone of tranquillity. Illusory or 
imaginary feelings are genuinely experienced, but experienced, so 
to speak, on the outer fringes of ourselves. 1 Children and many 
grown people are under the sway of 'situational values', which con- 
ceal from them their actual feelings — they are pleased because they 
have been given a present, sad because they are at a funeral, gay or 
sad according to the countryside around them, and, on the hither 
side of any such emotions, indifferent and neutral. 'We experience 
the feeling itself keenly, but inauthentically. It is, as it were, the 
shadow of an authentic sentiment.' Out natural attitude is not to 
1 Scheler, Idole der Selbsterkenntis, pp. 63 and ff. 
379 



BEING- FOR-ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE-WORLD 

experience our own feelings or to adhere to our own pleasures, but to 
live in accordance with the emotional categories of the environment. 
The girl who is loved does not project her emotions like an Isolde 
or a Juliet, but feels the feelings of these poetic phantoms and infuses 
them into her own life. It is at a later date, perhaps, that a personal 
and authentic feeling breaks the web of her sentimental phantasies/ 1 
But until this feeling makes its appearance, the girl has no means of 
discovering the illusory and literary element in her love. It is the 
truth of her future feelings which is destined to reveal the mis- 
guidedness of her present ones, which are genuinely experienced. The 
girl loses her reality' 2 in them as does the actor in the part he plays, 
so that we are faced, not with representations or ideas which give 
rise to real emotions, but artificial emotions and imaginary senti- 
ments. Thus we are not perpetually in possession of ourselves in our 
whole reality, and we are justified in speaking of an inner perception, 
of an inward sense, an 'analyser' working from us to ourselves which, 
ceaselessly, goes some, but not all, the way in providing knowledge of 
our life and our being. What remains on the hither side of inner per- 
ception and makes no impression on the inward sense is not an un- 
conscious. 'My life', my 'total being' are not dubious constructs, 
like the 'deep-seated self of Bergson, but phenomena which are in- 
dubitably revealed to reflection. It is simply a question of what we are 
doing. I make the discovery that I am in love. It may be that none of 
those facts, which I now recognize as proof of my love, passed un- 
noticed by me; neither the quickened drive of my present towards my 
future, nor that emotion which left me speechless, nor my impatience 
for the arrival of the day we were to meet. Nevertheless I had not seen 
the thing as a whole, or, if I had, I did not realize that it was a matter of 
so important a feeling, for I now discover that I can no longer con- 
ceive my life without this love. Going back over the preceding days 
and months, I am made aware that my thoughts and actions were 
polarized, I pick out the course of a process of organization, a syn- 
thesis in the making. Yet it is impossible to pretend that I always 
knew what I now know, and to see as existing, during the months 
which have elapsed, a self-knowledge which I have only just come 
by. Quite generally, it is impossible to deny that I have much to learn 
about myself, as it is to posit ahead of time, in the very heart of me, a 
knowledge of myself containing in advance all that I am later destined 
to know of myself, after having read books and had experiences at 
present unsuspected by me. The idea of a form of consciousness which 
is transparent to itself, its existence being identifiable with its aware- 
ness of existing, is not so very different from the notion of the uncon- 

1 Scheler, /dole der Selbsterkenntis, pp. 89-95. 

2 J. P. Sartre, L" Imaginaire, p. 243. 

380 



THE COGITO 

scious: in both cases we have the same retrospective illusion, since 
there is, introduced into me as an explicit object, everything that I 
am later to learn concerning myself. The love which worked out its 
dialectic through me, and of which I have just become aware, was 
not, from the start, a thing hidden in my unconscious, nor was it an 
object before my consciousness, but the impulse carrying me towards 
someone, the transmutation of my thoughts and behaviour — I 
was not unaware of it since it was I who endured the hours of 
boredom preceding a meeting, and who felt elation when she 
approached — it was lived, not known, from start to finish. The 
lover is not unlike the dreamer. The 'latent content' and the 'sexual 
significance' of the dream are undoubtedly present to the dreamer 
since it is he who dreams his dream. But, precisely because sexuality 
is the general atmosphere of the dream, these elements are not the- 
matized as sexual, for want of any non-sexual background against 
which they may stand out. When we ask ourselves whether or not the 
dreamer is conscious of the sexual content of his dream, we are really 
asking the wrong question. If sexuality, as we have explained above, 
is indeed one of our ways of entering into a relationship with the 
world, then whenever our meta-sexual being is overshadowed, as 
happens in dreams, sexuality is everywhere and nowhere; it is, in the 
nature of the case, ambiguous and cannot emerge clearly as itself. The 
fire which figures in the dream is not, for the dreamer, a way of dis- 
guising the sexual drive beneath an acceptable symbol, since it is only 
in the waking state that it appears as a symbol; in the language of 
dreams, fire is the symbol of the sexual drive because the dreamer, 
being removed from the physical world and the inflexible context of 
waking life, uses imagery only in proportion as it has affective value. 
The sexual significance of the dream is neither unconscious nor 'con- 
scious', because the dream does not 'signify', as does waking life, by 
relating one order of facts to another, and it is as great a mistake to 
see sexuality as crystallized in 'unconscious representations' as it is to 
see lodged in the depths of the dreamer a consciousness which calls 
it by its true name. Similarly, for the lover whose experience it is, love 
is nameless; it is not a thing capable of being circumscribed and de- 
signated, nor is it the love spoken of in books and newspapers, be- 
cause it is the way in which he establishes his relations with the 
world; it is an existential signification. The criminal fails to see his 
crime, and the traitor his betrayal for what they are, not because they 
exist deeply embedded within him as unconscious representations 
or tendencies, but because they are so many relatively closed worlds, 
so many situations. If we are in a situation, we are surrounded and 
cannot be transparent to ourselves, so that our contact with our- 
selves is necessarily achieved only in the sphere of ambiguity. 

381 



BEING -FOR- ITSELF AND BEING-1N-THE-WORLD 

But have we not overshot our mark? If illusion is possible in con- 
sciousness on some occasions, will it not be possible on all occasions? 
We said that there are imaginary sentiments to which we are com- 
mitted sufficiently for them to be experienced, but insufficiently for 
them to be authentic. But are there any absolute commitments? Is it 
not of the essence of commitment to leave unimpaired the autonomy 
of the person who commits himself, in the sense that it is never com- 
plete, and does it not therefore follow that we have no longer any 
means of describing certain feelings as authentic? To define the sub- 
ject in terms of existence, that is to say, in terms of a process in which 
he transcends himself, is surely by that very act to condemn him to 
illusion, since he will never be able to be anything. Through refrain- 
ing, in consciousness, from defining reality in terms of appearance, 
have we not severed the links binding us to ourselves, and reduced 
consciousness to the status of a mere appearance of some intangible 
reality? Are we not faced with the dilemma of an absolute conscious- 
ness on the one hand and endless doubt on the other? And have we 
not by our rejection of the first solution, made the cogito impossible? 
This objection brings us to the crucial point. It is true neither that 
my existence is in full possession of itself, nor that it is entirely 
estranged from itself, because it is actidn or doing, and because 
action is, by definition, the violent transition from what I have to 
what I aim to have, from what I am to what I intend to be. I can 
effect the cogito. and be assured of genuinely willing, loving or believ- 
ing, provided that in the first place I actually do will, love or believe, 
and thus fulfil my own existence. If this were not so, an ineradicable 
doubt would spread over the world, and equally over my own 
thoughts. I should be for ever wondering whether my Wastes', 
Volitions', 'desires' and 'ventures' were really mine, for they would 
always seem artificial, unreal and unfulfilled. But then this doubt, not 
being an actual doubt, could no longer even manage to confer the 
absolute certainty of doubting. 1 The only way out, and into 'sin- 
cerity', is by forestalling such scruples and taking a blind plunge 
into 'doing'. Hence it is not because I think I am that I am certain 
of my existence; on the contrary the certainty I enjoy concerning 
my thoughts stems from their genuine existence. My love, hatred 
and will are not certain as mere thoughts about loving, hating and 
willing; on the contrary the whole certainty of these thoughts is 
owed to that of the acts of love, hatred or will of which I am quite 

1 \ . . in which case, that too, that cynical distaste at her own persona, was 
deliberately put on! And that scorn for the distaste which she was busy con- 
triving, was so much play-acting too! And her doubt about her scorn ... it was 
maddening. Once you started being sincere, was there no end to it?' S. de Beau- 
voir, L Invitee, p. 232. 

382 



THE COGITO 

sure because I perform them. All inner perception is inadequate be- 
cause I am not an object that can be perceived, because I make my 
reality and find myself only in the act. 'I doubt': there is no way of 
silencing all doubt concerning this proposition other than by actually 
doubting, involving oneself in the experience of doubting, and thus 
bringing this doubt into existence as the certainty of doubting. To 
doubt is always to doubt something, even if one 'doubts everything'. 
I am certain of doubting precisely because I take this or that thing, or 
even every thing and my own existence too, as doubtful. It is through 
my relation to 'things' that I know myself; inner perception follows 
afterwards, and would not be possible had I not already made con- 
tact with my doubt in its very object. What has been said of external 
can equally be said of internal perception: that it involves infinity, 
that it is a never-ending synthesis which, though always incomplete, 
is nevertheless self-affirming. If I try to verify my perception of the 
ash-tray, my task will be endless, for this perception takes for granted 
more than I can know in an explicit way. Similarly, if I try to verify 
the reality of my doubt, I shall again be launched into an infinite re- 
gress, for I shall need to call into question my thought about doubt- 
ing, then the thought about that thought, and so on. The certainty 
derives from the doubt itself as an act, and not from these thoughts, 
just as the certainty of the thing and of the world precedes any 
thetic knowledge of their properties. It is indeed true, as has been 
said, that to know is to know that one knows, not because this second 
order of knowing guarantees knowledge itself, but the reverse. I can- 
not reconstruct the thing, and yet there are perceived things. In the 
same way I can never coincide with my life which is for ever fleeing 
from itself, in spite of which there are inner perceptions. For the same 
reason I am open to both illusion and truth about myself: that is, 
there are acts in which I collect myself together in order to surpass 
myself. The cogito is the recognition of this fundamental fact. In the 
proposition: 4 I think, I am', the two assertions are to be equated 
with each other, otherwise there would be no cogito. Nevertheless 
we must be clear about the meaning of this equivalence : it is not the 
'I am' which is pre-eminently contained in the 'I think,' not my exis- 
tence which is brought down to the consciousness which I have of it, 
but conversely the 4 I think,' which is re-integrated into the transcend- 
ing process of the 'I am', and consciousness into existence. 

It is true that it seems necessary to concede my absolute coinci- 
dence with myself, if not in the case of will and feeling, at least in 
acts of 'pure thought'. If this were the case, all that we have said 
would appear to be challenged, so that, far from appearing as a mere 
manner of existence, thought would truly monopolize us. We must 
now, therefore, consider the understanding. I think of the triangle, 

383 



BEING -FOR- ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THF- WORLD 



the .three-dimensional space to which it is supposed to belong, the 
extension of one of its sides, and the line that can be drawn through 
its apex parallel to the opposite side, and I perceive that this line, 
with the apex, forms three angles the sum of which is equal to the 
sum of the angles of the triangle, and equal, moreover, to two right 
angles. I am sure of the result which I regard as proved; which 
means that my diagrammatic construction is not, as are the strokes 
arbitrarily added by the child to his drawing, each one of which com- 
pletely transforms its meaning ('it's a house; no, it's a boat; no, 
it's a man'), a collection of lines fortuitously drawn by my hand. 
The process from start to finish has a triangle in view. The genesis of 
the figure is not only a real genesis, but an intelligible one; I make 
my construction according to rules, and cause properties to make 
their appearance in the figure — properties which are relations belong- 
ing to the essence of the triangle. I do not, like the child, reproduce 
those suggested by the ill-defined figure which is actually there on the 
paper. I am aware of presenting a proof, because I perceive a neces- 
sary link between the collection of data which constitute the hypo- 
thesis and the conclusion which I draw from them. It is this necessity 
which ensures that I shall be able to repeat the operation with an 
indefinite number of empirical figures, and the necessity itself stems 
from the fact that at each step in my demonstration, and each time 
I introduced new relationships, I remained conscious of the triangle 
as a stable structure conditioned, and left intact, by them. This is 
why we can say, if we want, that the proof consists in bringing the 
sum of the angles constructed into two different groupings, and see- 
ing that sum alternately as equal to the sum of the angles of the tri- 
angle, and equal to two right angles, 1 but it must be added 2 that here 
we have not merely two successive configurations, the first of which 
eliminates the second (as is the case with the child sketching dreamily) ; 
the first survives for me while the second is in process of establishing 
itself, the sum of angles which I equate with two right angles is the 
same as I elsewhere equate with the sum of the angles of the triangle, 
all of which is possible only provided that I go beyond the order of 
phenomena or appearances and gain access to that of the eidos or of 
being. Truth would seem to be impossible unless one enjoys an ab- 
solute self-possession in active thought, failing which it would be 
unable to unfold in a set of successive operations, and to produce a 
permanently valid result. 
There would be neither thought nor truth but for an act whereby I 

1 Wertheimer, Drei Abhandlungen zur Gestalttheorie: die Schluszprozesse im 
prociuktiven Denken. 

2 A. Gurwitsch, Quelques aspects et quelques de'veloppements de la the'orie de la 
Forme, p. 460. 

384 



TUT COGITO 

prevail over the temporal dispersal of the phases of thought, and the 
mere de facto existence of my mental events. The important thing, 
however, is fully to understand the nature of this act. The necessity 
of the proof is not an analytic necessity: the construction which en- 
ables the conclusion to be reached is not really contained in the 
essence of the triangle, but merely possible when that essence serves 
as a starting point. There is no definition of a triangle which includes 
in advance the properties subsequently to be demonstrated and the 
intermediate steps leading to that demonstration. Extending one side, 
drawing through the apex a line parallel to the opposite side, intro- 
ducing the theorem relating to parallels and their secant, these steps 
are possible only if I consider the triangle itself as it is drawn on the 
paper, on the blackboard or in the imagination, with its physiognomy, 
the concrete arrangement of its lines, in short its Gestalt. Is not pre- 
cisely this the essence or the idea of a triangle? Let us, at the outset, 
reject any idea of a formal essence of the triangle. Whatever one's 
opinion of attempts at formalization, it is in any case quite certain 
that they lay no claim to provide a logic of invention, and that no 
logical definition of a triangle could equal in fecundity the vision 
of the figure, or enable us to reach, through a series of formal 
operations, conclusions not already established by the aid of in- 
tuition. This, it will perhaps be objected, touches only on the 
psychological circumstances of discovery, so that in so far as, after 
the event, it is possible to establish, between the hypothesis and the 
conclusion, a link owing nothing to intuition, it is because intuition is 
not the inevitable mediator of thought and has no place in logic. But 
the fact that formalization is always retrospective proves that it is 
never otherwise than apparently complete, and that formal thought 
feeds on intuitive thought. It reveals those unformulated axioms on 
which reason is said to rest, and seems to bring to reason a certain 
added rigour and to uncover the very foundations of our certainty; 
but in reality the place in which certainty arises and in which a truth 
makes its appearance is always intuitive thought, even though, or 
rather precisely because, the principles are tacitly assumed there. 
There would be no experience of truth, and nothing would quench 
our 'mental volubility' if we thought viformae, and if formal rela- 
tions were not first presented to us crystallized in some particular 
thing. We should not even be able to settle on a hypothesis from 
which to deduce the consequences, if we did not first hold it to be true. 
A hypothesis is what is presumed to be true, so that hypothetical 
thinking presupposes some experience of de facto truth. The con- 
struction relates, then, to the configuration of the triangle, to the 
way in which it occupies space, to the relations expressed by the 
words 'on', 4 by\ 'apex' and 'extend'. Do these relations constitute a 

385 



BEING -F0R-1TSELF AND BEING -I N-THE- WORLD 

kind of material essence of the triangle? If the words 'on\ 'through', 
etc., are to retain any meaning, it is in virtue of my working on a per- 
ceptible or imaginary triangle, that is to say, one which is at least 
potentially situated in my perceptual field, orientated in relation to 
'up' and 'down', 'right' and 'left', or again, as we pointed out earlier, 
implied in my general grip upon the world. The construction makes 
explicit the possibilities of the triangle, considered not in the light of 
its definition and as a pure idea, but as a configuration and as the 
pole towards which my movements are directed. The conclusion 
follows of necessity from the hypothesis because, in the act of con- 
structing, the geometer has already experienced the possibility of the 
transition. Let us try to give a better description of this act. We have 
seen that what occurs is clearly not a purely manual operation, the 
actual movement of my hand and pen over the paper, for in that case 
there would be no difference between a construction and any arbi- 
trary set of strokes, and no demonstration would accrue. The con- 
struction is a gesture, which means that the actual lines drawn are the 
outward expression of an intention. But then what is this intention? 
I 'consider' the triangle, which is for me a set of lines with a certain 
orientation, and if words such as 'angle' or 'direction' have any 
meaning for me, it is in so far as I place myself at a point, and from 
it tend towards another point, in so far as the system of spatial posi- 
tions provides me with a field of possible movements. Thus do I grasp 
the concrete essence of the triangle, which is not a collection of ob- 
jective 'characteristics', but the formula of an attitude, a certain 
modality of my hold on the world, a structure, in short. When I con- 
struct, I commit the first structure to a second one, the 'parallels 
and secant' structure. How is that possible? It is because my per- 
ception of the triangle was not, so to speak, fixed and dead, for the 
drawing of the triangle on the paper was merely its outer covering; 
it was traversed by lines of force, and everywhere in it new directions 
not traced out yet possible came to light. In so far as the triangle 
was implicated in my hold on the world, it was bursting with indefinite 
possibilities of which the construction actually drawn was merely one. 
The construction possesses a demonstrative value because I cause it 
to emerge from the dynamic formula of the triangle. It expresses my 
power to make apparent the sensible symbols of a certain hold on 
things, which is my perception of the triangle's structure. It is an act 
of the productive imagination and not a return to the eternal idea of 
the triangle. Just as the localization of objects in space, according to 
Kant himself, is not merely a mental operation, but one which utilizes 
the body's motility, 1 movement conferring sensations at the particular 

1 P. Lachi6ze-Rey, Utilisation possible du sche'matisme kantien pour une theorie 
de la perception and Reflexions sur Vactivite spirit uelle const it uante. 

386 



THE COGITO 

point on its trajectory at which those sensations are produced, so the 
geometer, who, generally speaking, studies the objective laws of 
location, knows the relationships with which he is concerned only 
by describing them, at least potentially, with his body. The subject 
of geometry is a motor subject. This means in the first place that our 
body is not an object, nor is its movement a mere change of place in 
objective space, otherwise the problem would be merely shifted, and 
the movement of one's own body would shed no light on the prob- 
lem of the location of things, since it would be itself nothing but a 
thing. There must be, as Kant conceded, a 'motion which generates 
space' 1 which is our intentional motion, distinct from 'motion in 
space', which is that of things and of our passive body. But there is 
more to be said : if motion is productive of space, we must rule out the 
possibility that the body's motility is a mere 'instrument' 2 for the 
constituting consciousness. If there is a constituting consciousness, 
then bodily movement is movement only in so far as that conscious- 
ness thinks of it in that light; 3 the constructive power rediscovers in 
it only what it has put there, and the body is not even an instrument 
in this respect: i/ is an object among objects. There is no psychology 
in a philosophy of constituting consciousness. Or at least there can 
be nothing valid for such a psychology to say, for it can do nothing 
but apply the results of analytical reflection to each particular con- 
tent, while nevertheless distorting them, since it deprives them of their 
transcendental significance. The body's motion can play a part in the 
perception of the world only if it is itself an original intentionality, a 
manner of relating itself to the distinct object of knowledge. The 
world around us must be, not a system of objects which we synthesize, 
but a totality of things, open to us, towards which we project our- 
selves. The 'motion which generates space' does not deploy the tra- 
jectory from some metaphysical point with no position in the real 
world, but from a certain here towards a certain yonder, which are 
necessarily interchangeable. The project towards motion is an act, 
which means that it traces out the spatio-temporal distance by actu- 
ally covering it. The geometer's thought, in so far as it is necessarily 
sustained by this act, does not, therefore, coincide with itself: it is 
purely and simply transcendence. In so far as, by adding a construc- 
tion, I can bring to light the properties of a triangle, and yet find that 
the figure thus transformed does not cease to be the same figure as I 
began with, and in so far, moreover, as I am able to effect a synthesis 
retaining the character of necessity, this is not because my construction 

1 Lachieze-Rey, Reflexions sur V activity spirit uelle const it uante, p. 132. 

2 Lachieze-Rey, Utilisation possible . . ., p. 7. 

3 'It must disclose intrinsically the immanence of a spatial trajectory, which 
alone can enable it to be thought of as motion'. Lachieze-Rey, ibid., p. 6. 

387 



BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND BEING -1N-THE-WORLD 

is upheld by a concept of the triangle in which all its properties 
are included, or because, starting from perceptual consciousness, I 
arrive at the eidos: it is because I perform the synthesis of the new 
property by means of my body, which immediately implants me in 
space, while its autonomous motion enables me, through a series of 
definite procedures, to arrive once more at an all-inclusive view of 
space. Far from its being the case that geometrical thinking trans- 
cends perceptual consciousness, it is from the world of perception 
that I borrow the notion of essence. I believe that the triangle has 
always had, and always will have, angles the sum of which equals 
two right angles, as well as all the other less obvious properties which 
geometry attributes to it, because I have had the experience of a 
real triangle, and because, as a physical thing, it necessarily has 
within itself everything that it has ever been able, or ever will be able, 
to display. Unless the perceived thing has for good and ever implanted 
within us the ideal notion of a being which is what it is, there would be 
no phenomenon of being, and mathematical thought would appear 
to us in the light of a creative activity. What I call the essence of the 
triangle is nothing but this presumption of a completed synthesis, in 
terms of which we have defined the thing. 

Our body, to the extent that it moves itself about, that is, to the ex- 
tent that it is inseparable from a view of the world and is that view 
itself brought into existence, is the condition of possibility, not only 
of the geometrical synthesis, but of all expressive operations and all 
acquired views which constitute the cultural world. When we say 
that thought is spontaneous, this does not mean that it coincides 
with itself; on the contrary it means that it outruns itself, and speech 
is precisely that act through which it immortalizes itself as truth. It is, 
indeed, obvious that speech cannot be regarded as a mere clothing 
for thought, or expression as the translation, into an arbitrary system 
of symbols, of a meaning already clear to itself. It is said again and 
again that sounds and phonemes have no meaning in themselves, and 
that all our consciousness can find in language is what it has put there. 
But it would follow from this that language can teach us nothing, and 
that it can at the most arouse in us new combinations of those mean- 
ings already possessed by us. But this is just what the experience of 
language refutes. It is true that communication presupposes a system 
of correspondences such as the dictionary provides, but it goes beyond 
these, and what gives its meaning to each word is the sentence. It is 
because it has been used in various contexts that the word gradually 
accumulates a significance which it is impossible to establish abso- 
lutely. A telling utterance or a good book impose their meaning upon 
us. Thus they carry it within them in a certain way. As for the speaking 
subject, he too must be enabled to outrun what he thought before, 

388 



TUT COC.ITO 



and to find in his own words more than the thought he was putting 
into them, otherwise we should not see thought, even solitary thought, 
seeking expression with such perseverance. Speech is, therefore, that 
paradoxical operation through which, by using words of a given 
sense, and already available meanings, we try to follow up an inten- 
tion which necessarily outstrips, modifies, and itself, in the last 
analysis, stabilizes the meanings of the words which translate it. 
Constituted language plays the same limited role in the work of ex- 
pression as do colours in painting: had we not eyes, or more gener- 
ally senses, there would be no painting at all for us, yet the picture 
"tells* us more than the mere use of our senses can ever do. The pic- 
ture over and above the sense-data, speech over and above linguistic 
data must, therefore, in themselves possess a signifying virtue, inde- 
pendently of any meaning that exists for itself, in the mind of the 
spectator or listener. 'By using words as the painter uses colours and 
the musician notes, we are trying to constitute, out of a spectacle or 
an emotion, or even an abstract idea, a kind of equivalent or specie 
soluble in the mind. Here the expression becomes the principal 
thing. We mould and animate the reader, we cause him to participate 
in our creative or poetic action, putting into the hidden mouth of his 
mind the message of a certain object or of a certain feeling.' 1 In the 
painter or the speaking subject, picture and utterance respectively do 
not illustrate a ready-made thought, but make that thought their 
own. This is why we have been led to distinguish between a secon- 
dary speech which renders a thought already acquired, and an 
originating speech which brings it into existence, in the first place 
for ourselves, and then for others. Now all words which have become 
mere signs for a univocal thought have been able to do so only be- 
cause they have first of all functioned as originating words, and we 
can still remember with what richness they appeared to be endowed, 
and how they were like a landscape new to us, while we were engaged 
in 'acquiring* them, and while they still fulfilled the primordial 
function of expression. Thus self-possession and coincidence with 
the self do not serve to define thought, which is, on the contrary, an 
outcome of expression and always an illusion, in so far as the clarity 
of what is acquired rests upon the fundamentally obscure operation 
which has enabled us to immortalize within ourselves a moment of 
fleeting life. We are invited to discern beneath thinking which basks 
in its acquisitions, and offers merely a brief resting-place in the un- 
ending process of expression, another thought which is struggling to 
establish itself, and succeeds only by bending the resources of con- 
stituted language to some fresh usage. This operation must be con- 
sidered as an ultimate fact, since any explanation of it — whether 
1 Claudel, Reflexions sur le vers francois, Positions et propositions, pp. 11-12. 

389 



BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE-WORLD 

empiricist, reducing new meanings to given ones; or idealist, positing 
an absolute knowledge immanent in the most primitive forms of 
knowledge — would amount to a denial of it. Language outruns us, 
not merely because the use of speech always presupposes a great 
number of thoughts which are not present in the mind and which are 
covered by each word, but also for another reason, and a more pro- 
found one: namely, that these thoughts themselves, when present, 
were not at any time *pure' thoughts either, for already in them there 
was a surplus of the signified over the signifying, the same effort of 
thought already thought to equal thinking thought, the same pro- 
visional amalgam of both which gives rise to the whole mystery of 
expression. That which is called an idea is necessarily linked to an act 
of expression, and owes to it its appearance of autonomy. It is a 
cultural object, like the church, the street, the pencil or the Ninth 
Symphony. It may be said in reply that the church can be burnt down, 
the street and pencil destroyed, and that, if all the scores of the Ninth 
Symphony and all musical instruments were reduced to ashes, it 
would survive only for a few brief years in the memory of those who 
had heard it, whereas on the other hand the idea of the triangle and 
its properties are imperishable. In fact, the idea of the triangle with 
its propertiesrand of the quadratic equation, have their historical 
and geographical area, and if the tradition in which they have been 
handed down to us, and the cultural instruments which bear them 
on, were to be destroyed, fresh acts of creative expression would be 
needed to revive them in the world. What is true, however, is that, 
once they have made their first appearance, subsequent 'appearances', 
if successful, add nothing and if unsuccessful, subtract nothing, from 
the quadratic equation, which remains an inexhaustible possession 
among us. But the same may be said of the Ninth Symphony, which 
lives on in its intelligible abode, as Proust has said, whether it is 
played well or badly; or rather which continues its existence in a 
more occult time than natural time. The time of ideas is not be 
confused with that in which books appear and disappear, and musi- 
cal works are printed or lost: a book which has always been reprinted 
one day ceases to be read, a musical work of which there were only 
a few copies extant is suddenly much sought after. The existence of 
the idea must not be confused with the empirical existence of the 
means of expression, for ideas endure or fall into oblivion, and the 
intelligible sky subtly changes colour. We have already drawn a dis- 
tinction between empirical speech— the word as a phenomenon of 
sound, the fact that a certain word is uttered at a certain moment by 
a certain person, which may happen independently of thought — and 
transcendental or authentic speech, that by which an idea begins to 
exist. But if there had been no mankind with phonatory or articula- 

390 



THE COGITO 

tory organs, and a respiratory apparatus — or at least with a body 
and the ability to move himself, there would have been no speech and 
no ideas. What remains true is that in speech, to a greater extent 
than in music or painting, thought seems able to detach itself from 
its material instruments and acquire an eternal value. There is a 
sense in which all triangles which will ever exist through the workings 
of physical causality will always have angles the sum of which equals 
two right angles, even if a time comes when men have forgotten their 
geometry, and there is not a single person left who knows any. But 
in this case it is because speech is applied to nature, whereas music, 
and painting, like poetry, create their own object, and as soon as they 
become sufficiently aware of themselves, deliberately confine them- 
selves within the cultural world. Prosaic, and particularly scientific, 
utterance is a cultural entity which at the same time lays claim to 
translate a truth relating to nature in itself. Now we know that this is 
not the case, for modern criticism of the sciences has clearly shown 
the constructive element in them. 'Real', i.e. perceived, triangles, do 
not necessarily have, for all eternity, angles the sum of which equals 
two right angles, if it is true that the space in which we live is no less 
amenable to non-Euclidean than to Euclidean geometry. Thus there 
is no fundamental difference between the various modes of expres- 
sion, and no privileged position can be accorded to any of them on 
the alleged ground that it expresses a truth in itself. Speech is as 
dumb as music, music as eloquent as speech. Expression is every- 
where creative, and what is expressed is always inseparable from it. 
There is no analysis capable of making language crystal clear and 
arraying it before us as if it were an object. The act of speech is clear 
only for the person who is actually speaking or listening; it becomes 
obscure as soon as we try to bring explicitly to light those reasons 
which have led us to understand thus and not otherwise. We can say 
of it what we have said of perception, and what Pascal says about 
opinions: in all three cases we have the same miracle of an im- 
mediately apprehended clarity, which vanishes as soon as we try 
to break it down to what we believe to be its component elements. I 
speak, and I understand myself and am understood quite unam- 
biguously; I take a new grip on my life, and others take a new grip 
on it too. I may say that I have been waiting for a long time', or 
that someone 'is dead', and I think I know what I am saying. Yet if 
I question myself on time or the experience of death, which were 
implied in my words, there is nothing clear in my mind. This is 
because I have tried to speak about speech, to re-enact the act of 
expression which gave significance to the words 'dead' and *time\ 
to extend the brief hold on my experience which they ensure for me. 
These second or third order acts of expression, like the rest, have 

391 



BEING -FOP.-ITSELF AND BEING-1N-THE- WORLD 

indeed in each case their convincing clarity, without, however, ever 
enabling me to dispel the fundamental obscurity of what is expressed, 
or to eliminate the distance separating my thought from itself. Must 
we conclude from this 1 that, born and developed in obscurity, yet 
capable of clarity, language is nothing but the obverse of an infinite 
Thought, and the message of that Thought as communicated to us? 
This would mean losing contact with the analysis which we have just 
carried out, and reaching a conclusion in conflict with what has been 
established as we have gone along. Language transcends us and yet 
we speak. If we are led to conclude from this that there exists a trans- 
cendent thought spelt out by our words, we are supposing that an 
attempt at expression is brought to completion, after saying that it 
can never be so, and invoking an absolute thought, when we have just 
shown that any such thought is beyond our conception. Such is the 
principle of Pascal's apologetics ; but the more it is shown that man 
is without absolute power, the more any assertion of an absolute is 
made, not probable, but on the contrary suspect. In fact analysis de- 
monstrates, not that there is behind language a transcendent thought, 
but that language transcends itself in speech, that speech itself brings 
about that concordance between me and myself, and between myself 
and others, on which an attempt is being made to base that thought. 
The phenomenon of language, in the double sense of primary fact 
and remarkable occurrence, is not explained, but eliminated, if we 
duplicate it with some transcendent thought, since it consists in this: 
that an act of thought, once expressed, has the power to outlive it- 
self. It is not, as is often held, that the verbal formula serves us as a 
mnemonic means: merely committed to writing or to memory, it 
would be useless had we not acquired once and for all the inner 
power of interpreting it. To give expression is not to substitute, for 
new thought, a system of stable signs to which unchangeable thoughts 
are linked, it is to ensure, by the use of words already used, that the 
new intention carries on the heritage of the past, it is at a stroke to 
incorporate the past into the present, and weld that present to a 
future, to open a whole temporal cycle in which the 'acquired' 
thought will remain present as a dimension, without our needing 
henceforth to summon it up or reproduce it. What is known as the 
non-temporal in thought is what, having thus carried forward the 
past and committed the future, is presumptively of all time and is 
therefore anything but transcendent in relation to time. The non- 
temporal is the acquired. 

Time itself presents us with the prime model of this permanent 
acquisition. If time is the dimension in accordance with which events 

1 As does B. Parain, Recherches sur la nature ei les fonctions da langage, Chap. 
XI. 

392 



THE COG1TO 

drive each other successively from the scene, it is also that in accord- 
ance with which each one of them wins its unchallengeable place. To 
say that an event takes place is to say that it will always be true that 
it has taken place. Each moment of time, in virtue of its very essence, 
posits an existence against which the other moments of time are 
powerless. After the construction is drawn, the geometrical relation 
is acquired; even if I then forget the details of the proof, the mathe- 
matical gesture establishes a tradition. Van Gogh's paintings have 
their place in me for all time, a step is taken from which I cannot 
retreat, and, even though I retain no clear recollection of the pictures 
which I have seen, my whole subsequent aesthetic experience will be 
that of someone who has become acquainted with the painting of 
Van Gogh, exactly as a middle class man turned workman always 
remains, even in his manner of being a workman, a middle-class- 
man-turned-workman, or as an act confers a certain quality upon 
us for ever, even though we may afterwards repudiate it and change 
our beliefs. Existence always carries forward its past, whether it be 
by accepting or disclaiming it. We are, as Proust declared, perched 
on a pyramid of past life, and if we do not see this, it is because we 
are obsessed by objective thought. We believe that our past, for our- 
selves, is reducible to the express memories which we are able to con- 
template. We sever our existence from the past itself, and allow it to 
pick up only those threads of the past which are present. But how 
are these threads to be recognized as threads of the past unless we 
enjoy in some other way a direct opening upon that past? Acquisition 
must be accepted as an irreducible phenomenon. What we have ex- 
perienced is, and remains, permanently ours; and in old age a man 
is still in contact with his youth. Every present as it arises is driven 
into time like a wedge and stakes its claim to eternity. Eternity is not 
another order of time, but the atmosphere of time. It is true that a 
false thought, no less than a true one, possesses this sort of eternity: 
if I am mistaken at this moment, it is for ever true that I am mistaken. 
It would seem necessary, therefore, that there should be, in true 
thought, a different fertility, and that it should remain true not only 
as a past actually lived through, but also as a perpetual present for 
ever carried forward in time's succession. This, however, does net 
secure any essential difference between truths of fact and truths of 
reason. For there is not one of my actions, not one of even my falla- 
cious thoughts, once it is adhered to, which has not been directed 
towards a value or a truth, and which, in consequence, does not 
retain its permanent relevance in the subsequent course of my life, not 
only as an indelible fact, but also as a necessary stage on the road to 
the more complete truths or values which I have since recognized. My 
truths have been built out of these errors, and carry them along in 

393 



BEING- FOR-ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE- WORLD 

their eternity. Conversely, there is not one truth of reason which 
does not retain its coefficient of facticity: the alleged transparency of 
Euclidean geometry is one day revealed as operative for a certain 
period in the history of the human mind, and signifies simply that, 
for a time, men were able to take a homogeneous three-dimensional 
space as the 'ground' of their thoughts, and to assume unquestion- 
ingly what generalized science will come to consider as a contingent 
account of space. Thus every truth of fact is a truth of reason, and 
vice versa. The relation of reason to fact, or eternity to time,, like that 
of reflection to the unreflective, of thought to language or of thought 
to perception is this two-way relationship that phenomenology has 
called Fundierung: the founding term, or originator — time, the un- 
reflective, the fact, language, perception — is primary in the sense that 
the originated is presented as a determinate or explicit form of the 
originator, which prevents the latter from reabsorbing the former, 
and yet the originator is not primary in the empiricist sense and the 
originated is not simply derived from it, since it is through the origin- 
ated that the originator is made manifest. It is for this reason that it is 
a matter of indifference whether we say that the present foreshadows 
eternity or that the eternity of truth is merely a sublimation of the 
present. This ambiguity cannot be resolved, but it can be understood 
as ultimate, if we recapture the intuition of real time which preserves 
everything, and which is at the core of both proof and expression. 
'Reflection on the creative power of the mind,' says Brunschvicg, 1 
'implies, in every certainty of experience, the feeling that, in any de- 
terminate truth that one may have managed to demonstrate, there 
exists a soul of truth which outruns it and frees itself from it, a soul 
which can detach itself from the particular expression of that truth 
in order to adumbrate a deeper and more comprehensive expression, 
although this drive forward in no way impairs the eternity of the 
true.' What is this eternally true that no one possesses? What is this 
thing expressed which lies beyond all expression, and, if we have the 
right to posit it, why is it our constant concern to arrive at a more 
precise expression? What is this One round which minds and truths 
are disposed, as if they tended towards it, while it is maintained at 
the same time that they tend towards no pre-established term? The 
idea of a transcendent Being had at least the advantage of not stulti- 
fying the actions through which, in an ever difficult process of carry- 
ing forward, each consciousness and intersubjectivity themselves 
forge their own unity. It is true that, if these actions belong to that 
most intimate part of ourselves accessible to us, the positing of God 
contributes nothing to the elucidation of our life. We experience, not 
a genuine eternity and a participation in the One, but concrete acts 
1 Les Prog res de la Conscience dans la Philosophie occidental, p. 794. 

394 



THE COGITO 

of taking up and carrying forward by which, through time's acci- 
dents, we are linked in relationships with ourselves and others. In 
short, we experience a participation in the world, and *being-in- 
truth' is indistinguishable from being in the world. 

We are now in a position to make up our minds about the question 
of evidence, and to describe the experience of truth. There are 
truths just as there are perceptions: not that we can ever array before 
ourselves in their entirety the reasons for any assertion — there are 
merely motives, we have merely a hold on time and not full 
possession of it — but because it is of the essence of time to take 
itself up as it leaves itself behind, and to draw itself together into 
visible things, into firsthand evidence. Ail consciousness is, in 
some measure, perceptual consciousness. If it were possible to lay 
bare and unfold all the presuppositions in what I call my reason or 
my ideas at each moment, we should always find experiences which 
have not been made explicit, large-scale contributions from past and 
present, a whole 'sedimentary history' 1 which is not only relevant to 
the, genesis of my thought, but which determines its significance. For 
an absolute evidence, free from any presupposition, to be possible, 
and for my thought to be able to pierce through to itself, catch 
itself in action, and arrive at a pure 'assent of the self to the self, it 
would, to speak the language of the Kantians, have to cease to be an 
event and become an act through and through: in the language of 
the Schoolmen, its formal reality would have to be included in its 
objective reality; in the language of Malebranche, it would have to 
cease to be 'perception', 'sentiment' or 'contact' with truth, to be- 
come pure 'idea* and 'vision' of the truth. It would be necessary, in 
other words, that instead of being myself, I should become purely 
and simply one who knows myself, and that the world should have 
ceased to exist around me in order to become purely and simply an 
object before me. In relation to what we are by reason of our acquisi- 
tions and this pre-existent world, we have a power of placing in 
abeyance, and that suffices to ensure our freedom from determinism. 
I may well close my eyes, and stop up my ears, I shall nevertheless 
not cease to see, if it is only the blackness before my eyes, or to hear, 
if only silence, and in the same way I can 'bracket' my opinions or 
the beliefs I have acquired, but, whatever I think or decide, it is 
always against the background of what I have previously believed or 
done. Habemus ideam veram, we possess a truth, but this experience of 
truth would be absolute knowledge only if we could thematize every 
motive, that is, if we ceased to be in a situation. The actual possession 
of the true idea does not, therefore, entitle us to predicate an intel- 
ligible abode of adequate thought and absolute productivity, it 
1 Husserl, Formale und transzendentale Logik, p. 221. 
395 



BniNG-FOR-ITSHLF AND BEING-IN-THE- WORLD 

establishes merely a 'teleology' 1 of consciousness which, from this 
first instrument, will forge more perfect ones, and these in turn more 
perfect ones still, and so on endlessly. 'Only through an eidetic in- 
tuition can the essence of eidetic intuition be elucidated,' says Hus- 
serl. 2 The intuition of some particular essence necessarily precedes, 
in our experience, the essence of intuition. The only way to think 
of thought is in the first place to think of something, and it is there- 
fore essential to that thought not to take itself as an object. To think 
of thought is to adopt in relation to it an attitude that we have. initi- 
ally learned in relation to 'things'; it is never to eliminate, but merely 
to push further back the opacity that thought presents to itself. 
Every halt in the forward movement of consciousness, every focus 
on the object, every appearance of a 'something' or of an idea pre- 
supposes a subject who has suspended self-questioning at least in 
that particular respect. Which is why, as Descartes maintained, it is 
true both that certain ideas are presented to me as irresistibly self- 
evident de facto, and that this fact is never valid de jure, and that it 
never does away with the possibility of doubt arising as soon as we 
are no longer in the presence of the idea. It is no accident that self- 
evidence itself may be called into question, because certainty is 
doubt, being the carrying forward of a tradition of thought which 
cannot be condensed into an evident 'truth' without my giving up all 
attempts to make it explicit. It is for the same reasons that a self- 
evident truth is irresistible in fact, yet always questionable, which 
amounts to two ways of saying the same thing: namely, that it is 
irresistible because I take for granted a certain acquisition of experi- 
ence, a certain field of thought, and precisely for this reason it ap- 
pears to me as self-evident for a certain thinking nature, the one 
which I enjoy and perpetuate, but which remains contingent and 
given to itself. The consistency of a thing perceived, of a geometrical 
relationship or of an idea, is arrived at only provided that I give up 
trying by every means to make it more explicit, and instead allow 
myself to come to rest in it. Once launched, and committed to a cer- 
tain set of thoughts, Euclidean space, for example, or the conditions 
governing the existence of a certain society, I discover evident truths; 
but these are not unchallengeable, since perhaps this space or this 
society are not the only ones possible. It is therefore of the essence 
of certainty to be established only with reservations; there is an 
opinion which is not a provisional form of knowledge destined to give 
way later to an absolute form, but on the contrary, both the oldest or 
most rudimentary, and the most conscious or mature form of know- 
ledge — an opinion which is primary in the double sense of 'original' 

1 This notion recurs frequently 'n the later writings of Husserl. 

2 For male und iranszendentale ^ogik, p. 220. 

396 



THE COGITO 



and fundamental'. This is what calls up before us something in 
general, to which positing* thought — doubt or demonstration — can 
subsequently relate in affirmation or denial. There is significance, 
something and not nothing, there is an indefinite train of concordant 
experiences, to which this ash-tray in its permanence testifies, or the 
truth which I hit upon yesterday and to which I think I can revert 
today. 

This evidentness of the phenomenon, or again of the 'world', is 
no less misunderstood when we try to reach being without contact 
with the phenomenon, that is, when we make being necessary, as 
when we cut the phenomenon off from being, when we degrade it to 
the status of mere appearance or possibility. The first conception is 
Spinoza's. Primary opinion is here subordinated to absolute self- 
evidence, and the notion, 'there is something' which is an amalgam 
of being and nothingness, to the notion 'Being exists'. One rejects as 
meaningless any questioning of being: it is impossible to ask why 
there is something rather than nothing, and why this world rather 
than a different one, since the shape of this world and the very exis- 
tence of a world are merely consequences of necessary being. The 
second conception reduces self-evidence to appearance: all my truths 
are after all self-evident only for me, and for a thought fashioned 
like mine; they are bound up with my psycho-physiological con- 
stitution and the existence of this world. Other forms of thought 
functioning in accordance with other rules, and other possible worlds, 
can be conceived as having the same claim to reality as this one. 
And here the question why there is something rather than nothing 
seems apposite, and why this particular world has come into being, 
but the reply is necessarily out of our reach, since we are imprisoned 
in our psycho-physiological make-up, which is a simple fact like the 
shape of our face or the number of our teeth. This second conception 
is not so different from the first as it might appear: it implies a tacit 
reference to an absolute knowledge and an absolute being in relation 
to which our factual self-evidences, or synthetic truths, are con- 
sidered inadequate. According to the phenomenological conception, 
this dogmatism on the one hand and scepticism on the other are both 
left behind. The laws of our thought and our self-evident truths are 
certainly facts, but they are not detachable from us, they are implied 
in any conception that we may form of being and the possible. It is 
not a question of confining ourselves to phenomena, of imprisoning 
consciousness in its own states, while retaining the possibility of 
another being beyond apparent being, nor of treating our thought as 
one fact among many, but of defining being as that which appears, 
and consciousness as a universal fact. I think, and this or that thought 
* I.e. *thetic* (Translator's note). 
397 



BEING -FOR-ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE-WORLD 

appears to me as true; I am well aware that it is not unconditionally 
true, and that the process of making it totally explicit would be an 
endless task; but the fact remains that at the moment I think, I think 
something, and that any other truth, in the name of which I might 
wish to discount this one, must, if it is to be called a truth for me, 
square with the 'true' thought of which I have experience. If I try 
to imagine Martians, or angels, or some divine thought outside the 
realm of my logic, this Martian, angelic or divine thought must figure 
in my universe without completely disrupting it. 1 My thought, my 
self-evident truth is not one fact among others, but a value-fact 
which envelops and conditions every other possible one. There is no 
other world possible in the sense in which mine is, not because mine 
is necessary as Spinoza thought, but because any 'other world* that I 
might try to conceive would set limits to this one, would be found on 
its boundaries, and would consequently merely fuse with it. Con- 
sciousness, if it is not absolute truth or d-Ae0eia, at least rules out all 
absolute falsity. Our mistakes, illusions and questions are indeed 
mistakes, illusions and questions. Error is not consciousness of 
error; it even excludes such consciousness. Our questions do not 
always admit of answers, and to say with Marx that man poses for 
himself only problems that he can solve is to revive a theological 
optimism and postulate the consummation of the world. Our errors 
become truths only once they are recognized, and there remains a 
difference between their revealed and their latent content of truth, 
between their alleged and their actual significance. The truth is that 
neither error nor doubt ever cut us ofT from the truth, because they 
are surrounded by a world horizon in which the teleology of con- 
sciousness summons us to an effort at resolving them. Finally, the 
contingency of the world must not be understood as a deficiency in 
being, a break in the stuff of necessary being, a threat to rationality, 
nor as a problem to be solved as soon as possible by the discovery of 
some deeper-laid necessity. That is ontic contingency, contingency 
within the bounds of the world. Ontological contingency, the contin- 
gency of the world itself, being radical, is, on the other hand, what 
forms the basis once and for all of our ideas of truth. The world is 
that reality of which the necessary and the possible are merely pro- 
vinces. 

To sum up, we are restoring to the cogito a temporal thickness. If 
there is not endless doubt, and if 'I think', it is because I plunge on 
into provisional thoughts and, by deeds, overcome time's discon- 
tinuity. Thus vision is brought to rest in a thing seen which both 

1 See Logische Untersuchungen, I, p. 117. What is somelimes termed Husserl's 
rationalism is in reality the recognition of subjectivity as an inalienable fact, and 
of the world to which it is directed as omnitudo realifatis. 

398 



THE COGITO 

precedes and outlasts it. Have we got out of our difficulty? We have 
admitted that the certainty of vision and that of the thing seen are of 
a piece. Must we conclude from this that,, since the thing seen is 
never absolutely certain, as illusions show, vision also is involved in 
this uncertainty, or, on the contrary, that, since vision on its own is 
absolutely certain, so is the thing seen, so that I am never really mis- 
taken? The second solution would amount to reinstating the im- 
manence which we have banished. But if we adopted the first, 
thought would be cut off from itself, there would no longer be any- 
thing but Tacts of consciousness' which might be called internal by 
nominal definition, but which, for me, would be as opaque as things; 
there would no longer be either inner experience or consciousness, 
and the experience of the cogito would be once more forgotten. 
When we describe consciousness as involved through its body in a 
space, through its language in a history, through its prejudices in 
a concrete form of thought, it is not a matter of setting it back in a 
series of objective events, even though they be 'psychic' events, and 
in the causal system of the world. He who doubts cannot, while 
doubting, doubt that he doubts. Doubt, even when generalized, is 
not the abolition of my thought, it is merely a pseudo-nothingness, 
for I cannot extricate myself from being; my act of doubting itself 
creates the possibility of certainty and is there for me, it occupies me, 
I am committed to it, and I cannot pretend to be nothing at the time 
I execute it. Reflection, which moves all things away to a distance, 
discovers itself as at least given to itself in the sense that it cannot 
think of itself as eliminated, or stand apart from itself. But this does 
not mean that reflection and thought are elementary facts there to 
be observed as such. As Montaigne clearly saw, one can call into 
question thought which is loaded with a sediment of history and 
weighed down with its own being, one can entertain doubts about 
doubt itself, considered as a definite modality of thought and as 
consciousness of a doubtful object, but the formula of radical re- 
flection is not: 'I know nothing' — a formula which it is all too easy to 
catch in flat contradiction with itself — but: 'What do I know?' 
Descartes was not unmindful of this. He has frequently been credited 
with having gone beyond sceptical doubt, which is a mere state, and 
with making doubt into a method, an act, and with having thus pro- 
vided consciousness with a fixed point and reinstated certainty. But, 
in fact, Descartes did not suspend doubt in the face of the certainty 
of doubt itself, as if the act of doubting were sufficient to sweep 
doubt away by entailing a certainty. He took it further. He does not 
say: 'I doubt, therefore I am', but k I think, therefore I am', which 
means that doubt itself is certain, not as actual doubt, but as pure 
thought about doubting and, since the same might be said in turn 

399 



BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE- WORLD 

about this thought, the only proposition which is absolutely certain 
and which halts doubt in its tracks because it is implied by that 
doubt, is: 'I think,' or again, 'something appears to me'. There is no 
act, no particular experience which exactly fills my consciousness and 
imprisons my freedom, 'there is no thought which abolishes the 
power to think and brings it to a conclusion — no definite position of 
the bolt that finally closes the lock. No, there is no thought which is a 
resolution born of its own very development and, as it were, the final 
chord of this permanent dissonance.' 1 No particular thought reaches 
through to the core of our thought in general, nor is any thought 
conceivable without another possible thought as a witness to it. And 
this is no imperfection from which we may imagine consciousness 
freed. If there must be consciousness, if something must appear to 
someone, it is necessary that behind all our particular thoughts there 
should lie a retreat of not-being, a Self. I must avoid equating myself 
with a series of 'consciousnesses', for each of these, with its load of 
sedimentary history and sensible implications, must present itself to 
a perpetual absentee. Our situation, then, is as follows: in order to 
know that we think, it is necessary in the first place that we actually 
should think. Yet this commitment does not dispel all doubts, for 
my thoughts do not deprive me of my power to question; a word or 
an idea, considered as events in my history, have meaning for me only 
if \ take up this meaning from within. I know that I think through 
such and such particular thoughts that I have, and I know that I have 
these thoughts because I carry them forward, that is, because I know 
that I think in general. The aim at a transcendent objective and the 
view of myself aiming at it, the awareness of the connected and of 
connecting are in a circular relationship. The problem is how I can be 
the constituting agent of my thought in general, failing which it 
would not be thought by anybody, would pass unnoticed and would 
therefore not be thought at all — without ever being that agent of my 
particular thoughts, since I never see them come into being in the 
full light of day, but merely know myself through them. The question 
is how subjectivity can be both dependent yet irremovable. 

Let us tackle this by taking language as our example. There is a 
consciousness of myself which makes use of language and is hum- 
ming with words. I read, let us say, the Second Meditation. It has 
indeed to do with me, but a me in idea, an idea which is, strictly speak- 
ing, neither mine nor, for that matter, Descartes', but that of any 
reflecting man. By following the meaning of the words and the argu- 
ment, I reach the conclusion that indeed because I think, I am ; but this 
is merely a verbal cogito, for I have grasped my thought and my exis- 
tence only through the medium of language, and the true formula of 
1 Valdry, Introduction a la mithode de Leonard de Vinci, Variete, p. 194. 

400 



THE COGITO 

this cogito should be: 'One thinks, therefore one is.' The wonderful 
thing about language is that it promotes its own oblivion: my eyes 
follow the lines on the paper, and from the moment I am caught up 
in their meaning, I lose sight of them. The paper, the letters on it, my 
eyes and body are there only as the minimum setting of some invis- 
ible operation. Expression fades out before what is expressed, and 
this is why its mediating role may pass unnoticed, and why Descartes 
nowhere mentions it. Descartes, and a fortiori his reader, begin their 
meditation in what is already a universe of discourse. This certainty 
which we enjoy of reaching, beyond expression, a truth separable 
from it and of which expression is merely the garment and contin- 
gent manifestation, has been implanted in us precisely by language. 
It appears as a mere sign only once it has provided itself with a 
meaning, and the coming to awareness, if it is to be complete, must 
rediscover the expressive unity in which both signs and meaning ap- 
pear in the first place. When a child cannot speak, or cannot yet 
speak the adult's language, the linguistic ritual which unfolds around 
him has no hold on him, he is near us in the same way as is a specta- 
tor with a poor seat at the theatre; he sees clearly enough that we are 
laughing and gesticulating, he hears the nasal tune being played, but 
there is nothing at the end of those gestures or behind those words, 
nothing happens for him. Language takes on a meaning for the child 
when it establishes a situation for him. A story is told in a children's 
book of the disappointment of a small boy who put on his grand- 
mother's spectacles and took up her book in the expectation of being 
able himself to find in it the stories which she used to tell him. The 
tale ends with these words: 'Well, what a fraud! Where's the story? 
I can see nothing but black and white.' For the child the 'story' and 
the thing expressed are not 'ideas' or 'meanings', nor are speaking or 
reading 'intellectual operations'. The story is a world which there 
must be some way of magically calling up by putting on spectacles 
and leaning over a book. The power possessed by language 
of bringing the thing expressed into existence, of opening up to 
thought new ways, new dimensions and new landscapes, is, in the 
last analysis, as obscure for the adult as for the child. In every suc- 
cessful work, the significance carried into the reader's mind exceeds 
language and thought as already constituted and is magically thrown 
into relief during the linguistic incantation, just as the story used to 
emerge from grandmother's book. In so far as we believe* that, 
through thought, we are in direct communication with a universe of 
truth in which we are at one with others, in so far as Descartes' text 
seems merely to arouse in us thoughts already formed, and we seem 
never to learn anything from outside, and finally in so far as a philo- 
sopher, in a meditation purporting to be thoroughgoing, never even 

401 



BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND BEING- 1N-THE- WORLD 

mentions language as the condition of the reading of the cogito, and 
does not more overtly invite us to pass from the idea to the practice of 
the cogito, it is because we take the process of expression for granted, 
because it figures among our acquisitions. The cogito at which 
we arrive by reading Descartes (and even the one which Descartes 
effects in relation to expression and when, looking back on his past 
life, he fastens it down, objectifies it and 'characterizes' it as indubit- 
able) is, then, a spoken cogito, put into words and understood in 
words, and for this very reason not attaining its objective, since that 
part of our existence which is engaged in fixing our life in conceptual 
forms, and thinking of it as indubitable, is escaping focus and 
thought. Shall we therefore conclude that language envelops us, and 
that we are led by it, much as the realist believes he is subject to the 
determinism of the external world, or as the theologian believes he is 
led on by Providence? This would be to forget half the truth. For 
after all, words, 'cogito' and 'sum' for example, may well have an 
empirical and statistical meaning, for it is the case that they are not 
directed specifically to my own experience, but form the basis of a 
general and anonymous thought. Nevertheless, I should find them 
not so much derivative and inauthentic as meaningless, and I should 
be unable even to read Descartes' book, were I not, before any 
speech can begin, in contact with my own life and thought, and if the 
spoken cogito did not encounter within me a tacit cogito. This silent 
cogito was the one Descartes sought when writing his Meditations. 
He gave life and direction to all those expressive operations which, 
by definition, always miss their target since, between Descartes' exis- 
tence and the knowledge of it which he Acquires, they interpose the 
full thickness of cultural acquisitions. And yet Descartes would not 
even have tried to put these expressive operations into operation had 
he not in the first place caught a glimpse of his existence. The whole 
question amounts to gaining a clear understanding of the unspoken 
cogito, to putting into it only what is really there, and not making 
language into a product of consciousness on the excuse that con- 
sciousness is not a product of language. 

Neither the word nor the meaning of the word is, in fact constituted 
by consciousness. Let us make this clear. The word is certainly never 
reducible to one of its embodiments. The word 'sleet*, for example, 
is not the set of characters which I have just written on the paper, 
nor that other set of signs that I once read in a book for the first 
time, nor again the sound that runs through the air when I pronounce 
it. Those are merely reproductions of the word, in which I recognize 
it but which do not exhaust it. Am I then to say that the word 'sleet' 
is the unified idea of these manifestations, and that it exists only for 
my consciousness and through a synthesis of identification? To do so 

402 



THE COGITO 

would be to forget what psychology has taught us about language. 
To speak, as wc have seen, is not to call up verbal images and arti- 
culate words in accordance with the imagined model. By undertaking 
a critical examination of the verbal image, and showing that the 
speaking subject plunges into speech without imagining the words he 
is about to utter, modern psychology eliminates the wopd as a repre- 
sentation, or as an object for consciousness, and reveals a motor 
presence of the word which ;s not the knowledge of the word. The 
word 'sleet', when it is known to me, is not an object which I recog- 
nize through any identificatory synthesis, but a certain use made of 
my phonatory equipment, a certain modulation of my body as a 
being in the world. Its generality is not that of the idea, but that of a 
behavioural style 'understood' by my body in so far as the latter is 
a behaviour-producing power, in this case a phoneme-producing one. 
One day I 'caught on' to the word 'sleet', much as one imitates a 
gesture, not, that is, by analysing it and performing an articulatory 
or phonetic action corresponding to each part of the word as heard, 
but by hearing it as a single modulation of the world of sound, and 
because this acoustic entity presents itself as 'something to pro- 
nounce' in virtue of the all-embracing correspondence existing be- 
tween my perceptual potentialities and my motor ones, which are 
elements of my indivisible and open existence. The word has never 
been inspected, analysed, known and constituted, but caught and 
taken up by a power of speech and, in the last analysis, by a motor 
power given to me along with the firsi experience I have of my body 
and its perceptual and practical fields. As for the meaning of the word, 
I learn it as I learn to use a tool, by seeing it used in the context of a 
certain situation. The word's meaning is not compounded of a cer- 
tain number of physical characteristics belonging to the object; it is 
first and foremost the aspect taken on by the object in human ex- 
perience, for example my wonder in the face of these hard, then 
friable, then melting pellets falling ready-made from the sky. Here 
we have a meeting of the human and the non-human and, as it were, 
a piece of the world's behaviour, a certain version of its style, and 
the generality of its meaning as well as that of the vocable is not the 
generality of the concept, but of the world as typical. Thus language 
presupposes nothing less than a consciousness of language, a silence 
of consciousness embracing the world of speech in which words first 
receive a form and meaning. This is why consciousness is never sub- 
ordinated to any empirical language, why languages can be trans- 
lated and learned, and finally, why language is not an attribute of 
external origin, in the sociologist's sense. Behind the spoken cogito, 
the one which is converted into discourse and into essential truth, 
there lies a tacit cogito, myself experienced by myself. But this 

403 



BEING -FOR-ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE-WORLD 

subjectivity, albeit imperious, has upon itself and upon the world only 
a precarious hold. It does not constitute the world, it divines the 
world's presence round about it as a field not provided by itself; nor 
does it constitute the word, but speaks as we sing when we are happy; 
nor again the meaning of the word, which instantaneously emerges 
for it in its dealing with the world and other men living in jt, being 
at the intersection of many lines of behaviour, and being, even once 
'acquired', as precise and yet as indefinable as the significance of a 
gesture. The tacit cogito, the presence of oneself to oneself, being no 
less than existence, is anterior to any philosophy, and knows itself 
only in those extreme situations in which it is under threat: for ex- 
ample, in the dread of death or of another's gaze upon me. What is 
believed to be thought about thought, as pure feeling of the self, can- 
not yet be thought and needs to be revealed. The consciousness 
which conditions language is merely a comprehensive and inarticul- 
ate grasp upon the world, like that of the infant at its first breath, or 
of the man about to drown and who is impelled towards life, and 
though it is true that all particular knowledge is founded on this 
primary view, it is true also that the latter waits to be won back, fixed 
and made explicit by perceptual exploration and by speech. Silent 
consciousness grasps itself only as a generalized 'I think' in face of a 
confused world 'to be thought about'. Any particular seizure, even 
the recovery of this generalized project by philosophy, demands that 
the subject bring into action powers which are a closed book to him 
and, in particular, that he should become a speaking subject. The 
tacit cogito is a cogito only when it has found expression for itself. 

Such formulations may appear puzzling: if ultimate subjectivity 
cannot think of itself the moment it exists, how can it ever do so? 
How can that which does not think take to doing so ? And is not sub- 
jectivity made to amount to a thing or a force which produces its 
effects without teing capable of knowing it? We do not mean that 
the primordial /-Gprnpletely overlooks itself. If it did, it would indeed 
be a thing, and nothing could cause it subsequently to become con- 
sciousness. We have merely withheld from it objective thought, a 
positing consciousness of the world and of itself. What do we mean by 
this? Either these words mean nothing at all, or else they mean that 
we refrain from assuming an explicit consciousness which duplicates 
and sustains the confused grasp of primary subjectivity upon itself 
and upon its world. My vision, for example, is certainly 'thinking 
that I see', if we mean thereby that it is not simply a bodily function 
like digestion or respiration, a collection of processes so grouped as 
to have a significance in a larger system, but that it is itself that 
system and that significance, that anteriority of the future to the 
present, of the whole to its parts. There is vision only through antici- 

404 



THE COGITO 

pation and intention, and since no intention could be a true inten- 
tion if the object towards which it tends were given to it ready made 
and with no motivation, it is true that all vision assumes in the last 
resort, at the core of subjectivity, a total project or a logic of the 
world which empirical perceptions endow with specific form, but to 
which they cannot give rise. But vision is not thinking that one sees, 
if we understand thereby that it itself links up with its object, and 
that it becomes aware of itself as absolutely transparent, and as the 
originator of its own presence in the visible world. The essential 
point is clearly to grasp the project towards the world that we are. 
What we have said above about the world's being inseparable from 
our views of the world should here help us to understand subjectivity 
conceived as inherence in the world. There is no hyle, no sensation 
which is not in communication with other sensations or the sensa- 
tions of other people, and for (his very reason there is no morphe, no 
apprehension or apperception, the office of which is to give signi- 
ficance to a matter that has none, and to ensure the a priori unity of 
my experience, and experience shared with others. Suppose that my 
friend Paul and I are looking at a landscape. What precisely hap- 
pens? Must it be said that we have both private sensations, that we 
know things but cannot communicate them to each other — that, 
as far as pure, lived-through experience goes, we are each incarcer- 
ated in our separate perspectives — that the landscape is not numeri- 
cally the same for both of us and that it is a question only of a 
specific identity? When I consider my perception itself, before any 
objectifying reflection, at no moment am I aware of being shut up 
within my own sensations. My friend Paul and I point out to each 
other certain details of the landscape; and Paul's finger, which is 
pointing out the church tower, is not a finger-for-me that I think of 
as orientated towards a church-tower-for-me, it is Paul's finger which 
itself shows me the tower that Paul sees, just as, conversely, when I 
make a movement towards some point in the landscape that I can 
see, I do not imagine that I am producing in Paul, in virtue of some 
pre-established harmony, inner visions merely analogous to mine: 
I believe, on the contrary, that my gestures invade Paul's world and 
guide his gaze. When I think of Paul, I do not think of a flow of 
private sensations indirectly related to mine through the medium of 
interposed signs, but of someone who has a living experience of 
the same world as mine, as well as the same history, and with 
whom I am in communication through that world and that history. 
Are we to say, then, that what we are concerned with is an ideal 
unity, that my world is the same as Paul's, just as the quadratic 
equation spoken of in Tokyo is the same as the one spoken of in 
Paris, and that in short the ideal nature of the world guarantees its 

405 



BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND BEING- 1 N-THE- WORLD 

intersubjective value? But ideal unity is not satisfactory either, for it 
exists no less between Mount Hymettus seen by the ancient Greeks 
and the same mountain seen by me. Now it is no use my telling my- 
self, as I contemplate those russet mountain sides, that the Greeks 
saw them too, for I cannot convince myself that they are the same 
ones. On the other hand, Paul and I 'together' see this landscape, 
we are jointly present in it, it is the same for both of us, not only as an 
intelligible significance, but as a certain accent of the world's style, 
down to its very thisness. The unity of the world crumbles and falls 
asunder under the influence of that temporal and spatial distance 
which the ideal unity traverses while remaining (in theory) unim- 
paired. It is precisely because the landscape makes its impact upon 
me and produces feelings in me, because it reaches me in my uni- 
quely individual being, because it is my own view of the landscape, 
that I enjoy possession of the landscape itself, and the landscape for 
Paul as well as for me. Both universality and the world lie at the 
core of individuality and the subject, and this will never be under- 
stood as long as the world is made into an ob-ject. It is understood 
immediately if the world is the field of our experience, and if we are 
nothing but a view of the world, for in that case it is seen that the 
most intimate vibration of our psycho-physical being already an- 
nounces the world, the quality being the outline of a thing, and the 
thing the outline of the world. A world which, as Malebranche puts 
it, never gets beyond being an 'unfinished work', or which, as Hus- 
serl says of the body, is. 'never completely constituted', does not 
require, and even rules out, ^-constituting subject. There must be, 
corresponding to this adumbration of being which appears through 
the concordam aspects of my own experience, or of the experience I 
share with others — experience which I presume capable of being 
consummated through indefinite horizons, from the sole fact that 
my phenomena congeal into a thing, and display, as they occur, a 
certain consistency of style — there must be, then, corresponding to 
this open unity of the world/ an open and indefinite unity of sub- 
jectivity. Like the world's unity, that of the / is invoked rather than 
experienced each time I perform an act of perception, each time I 
reach a self-evident truth, and the universal / is the background 
against which these effulgent forms stand out: it is through one 
present thought that I achieve the unity of all my thoughts. What 
remains, on the hither side of my particular thoughts, to constitute 
the tacit cogito and the original project towards the world, and what, 
ultimately, am I in so far as I can catch a glimpse of myself indepen- 
dently of any particular act? I am a field, an experience. One day, 
once and for all, something was set in motion which, even during 
sleep, can no longer cease to see or not to see, to feel or not to feel, 

406 



THE COGITO 



to suffer or be happy, to think or rest from thinking, in a word to 
'have it out' with the world. There then arose, not a new set of sensa- 
tions or states of consciousness, not even a new monad or a new 
perspective, since I am not tied to any one perspective but can change 
my point of view, being under compulsion only in that I must always 
have one, and can have only one at once — let us say, therefore, that 
there arose a fresh possibility of situations. The event of my birth has 
not passed completely away, it has not fallen into nothingness in the 
way that an event of the objective world does, for it committed a 
whole future, not as a cause determines its effect, but as a situation, 
once created, inevitablyleads on to some outcome. There was hence- 
forth a new 'setting', the world received a fresh layer of meaning. In 
the home into which a child is born, all objects change their signi- 
ficance; they begin to await some as yet indeterminate treatment at 
his hands; another and different person is tliere, a new personal his- 
tory, short or long, has just been initiated, another account has been 
opened. My first perception, along with the horizons which sur- 
rounded it, is an ever-present event, an unforgettable tradition ; even 
as a thinking subject, I still am that first perception, the continuation 
of that same life inaugurated by it. In one sense, there are no more 
acts of consciousness or distinct Erlebnisse in a life than there are 
separate things in the world. Just as, as we have seen, when I walk 
round an object, I am not presented with a succession of perspective 
views which I subsequently co-ordinate thanks to the idea of one 
single flat projection, there being merely a certain amount of 'shift' 
in the thing which, in itself, is journeying through time, so I am not 
myself a succession of 'psychic' acts, nor for that matter a nuclear / 
who bring them together into a synthetic unity, but one single ex- 
perience inseparable from itself, one single 'living cohesion', 1 one 
single temporality which is engaged, from birth, in making itself 
progressively explicit, and in confirming that cohesion in each suc- 
cessive present. It is this advent or again this event of transcendental 
kind that the cogito reveals. Thejprimary truth is indeed 'I think', but 
only provided that we understand thereby *I belong to myself' 2 
while belonging to the world. When we try to go deeper into subjec- 
tivity, calling all things into question and suspending all our beliefs, 
the only form in which a glimpse is vouchsafed to us of that non- 
human ground through which, in the words of Rimbaud, 'we are not 
of the world', is as the horizon of our particular commitments, and 
as the potentiality of something in the most general sense, which is 
the world's phantom. Inside and outside are inseparable. The world 
is wholly inside and I am wholly outside myself. When I perceive 

1 'Zusammenhang des Lebens,* Heidegger, Sein und Zeit, p. 388. 

2 Heidegger, Sein undZeit, pp. 124-5. 

407 



BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND BEING-IN-TH E-WORLD 

this table, the perception of the top must not qverlook that of the 
legs, otherwise the object would be thrown out of joint. When I hear 
a melody, each of its moments must be related to its successor, other- 
wise there would be no melody. Yet the table is there with its external 
parts, and succession is of the essence of melody. The act which 
draws together at the same time takes away and holds at a distance, 
so that I touch myself only by escaping from myself. In one of his 
celebrated pensees, Pascal shows that in one way I understand the 
world, and in another it understands me. We must add that it is in 
the same way: I understand the world because there are for me things 
near and far, foregrounds and horizons, and because in this way it 
forms a picture and acquires significance before me, and this finally 
is because I am situated in it and it understands me. We do not say 
that the notion of the world is inseparable from that of the subject, or 
that the subject thinks A/Vrwe/finseparable from the idea of his body 
and the idea of the world; for, if it were a matter of no more than a 
conceived relationship, it would ipso facto leave the absolute inde- 
pendence of the subject as thinker intact, and the subject would not be 
in a situation. If the subject is in a situation, even if he is no more 
than a possibility of situations, this is because he forces his ipseity 
into reality only by actually being a body, and entering the world 
through that body. In so far as, when I reflect on the essence of sub- 
jectivity, I find it bound up with that of the body and that of the 
world, this is because my existence as subjectivity is merely one with 
my existence as a body and with the existence of the world, and be- 
cause the subject that I am, when taken concretely, is inseparable 
from this body and this world. The ontological world and body 
which we find at the core of the subject are not the world or body as 
idea, but on the one hand the world itself contracted into a compre- 
hensive grasp, and on the other the body itself as a knowing-body. 

But, it will be asked, if the unity of the world is not based on that 
of consciousness, and if the world is not the outcome of a constitut- 
ing effort, how does it come about that appearances accord with 
each other and group themselves together into things, ideas and 
truths? And why do our random thoughts, the events of our life and 
those of collective history, at least at certain times assume common 
significance and direction, and allow themselves to be subsumed 
under one idea? Why does my life succeed in drawing itself together 
in order to project itself in words, intentions and acts? This is the 
problem of rationality. The reader is aware that, on the whole, 
classical thought tries to explain the concordances in question in 
terms of a world in itself, or in terms of an absolute mind. Such 
explanations borrow all the forces of conviction which they can 
carry from the phenomenon of rationality, and therefore fail to 

408 



THH COGITO 



explain that phenomenon, or ever to achieve greater clarity than it 
possesses. Absolute Thought is no clearer to me than my own finite 
mind, since it is through the latter that I conceive the former. We are 
in the world, which means that things take shape, an immense 
individual asserts itself, each existence is self-comprehens'ive and 
comprehensive of the rest. All that has to be done is to recognize these 
phenomena which are the ground of all our certainties. The belief in 
an absolute mind, or in a world in itself detached from us is no more 
than a rationalization of this primordial faith. 



409 



TEMPORALITY 



Le temps est le sens de la vie (sens: comme on dit le 
sens d'un cours d'eau, le sens d'une phrase, le sens d'une 
etoffe, le sens de l'odorat). 

Claudel, Art Poetique. 

Der Sinn des Daseins ist die Zeitlichkeit. 

Heidegger, Sein und Zeit, p. 331. 



IN so far as, in the preceding pages, we have already met time on our 
way to subjectivity, this is primarily because all our experiences, 
inasmuch as they are ours, arrange themselves in terms of before and 
after, because temporality, in Kantian language, is the form taken by 
our inner sense, and because it is the most general characteristic of 
'psychic facts'. But in reality, and without prejudging what the analy- 
sis of time will disclose, we have already discovered, between time 
and subjectivity, a much more intimate relationship. We have just 
seen that the subject, who cannot be a series of psychic events, never- 
theless cannot be eternal either. It remains for him to be temporal not 
by reason of some vagary of the human make-up, but by virtue of an 
inner necessity. We are called upon to conceive the subject and time 
as communicating from within. We can now say of temporality what 
we said earlier about sexuality and spatiality, for example: existence 
can have no external or contingent attribute. It cannot be anything — 
spatial, sexual, temporal — without being so in its entirety, without 
taking up and carrying forward its 'attributes' and making them into 
so many dimensions of its being, with the result that an analysis of 
any one of them that is at all searching really touches upon subjec- 
tivity itself. There arc no principal and subordinate problems: all 
problems are concentric. To analyse time is not to follow out the 
consequences of a pre-established conception of subjectivity, it is to 
gain access, through time, to its concrete structure. If we succeed in 
understanding the subject, it will not be in its pure form, but by 

410 



TEMPORALITY 

seeking it at the intersection of its dimensions. We need, therefore, to 
consider time in itself, and it is by following through its internal 
dialectic that we shall be led to revise our idea of the subject. 

We say that time passes or flows by. We speak of the course of time. 
The water that I see rolling by was made ready a few days ago in the 
mountains, with the melting of the glacier; it is now in front of mc 
and makes its way towards the sea into which it will finally discharge 
itself. If time is similar to a river, it flows from the past towards the 
present and the future. The present is the consequence of the past, 
and the future of the present. But this often repeated metaphor is in 
reality extremely confused. For, looking at the things themselves, the 
melting of the snows and what results from this are not successive 
events, or rather the very notion of event has no place in the objective 
•world. When I say that the day before yesterday the glacier produced 
the water which is passing at this moment, I am tacitly assuming the 
existence of a witness tied to a certain spot in the world, and I am 
comparing his successive views: he was there when the snows melted 
and followed the water down, or else, from the edge of the river and 
having waited two days, he sees the pieces of wood that he threw into 
the water at its source. The 'events' are shapes cut out by a finite 
observer from the spatio-temporal totality of the objective world. 
But on the other hand, if I consider the world itself, there is simply 
one indivisible and changeless being in it. Change presupposes a 
certain position which I take up and from which I see things in pro- 
^ cession before me: there are no events without someone to whom they 
happen and whose finite perspective is the basis of their individuality. 
Time presupposes a view of time. It is, therefore, not like a river, not 
a flowing substance. The fact that the metaphor based on this com- 
parison has persisted from the time of Heraclitus to our own day is 
explained by our surreptitiously putting into the river a witness of its 
course. We do this already when we say that the stream discharges 
itself, for this amounts to conceiving, where there is merely a thing 
entirely external to itself, an individuality or interior of the stream 
which manifests itself outside. Now, no sooner have I introduced an 
observer, whether he follows the river or whether he stands on the 
bank and observes its flow, than temporal relationships are reversed. 
In the latter case, the volume of water already carried by is not mov- 
ing towards the future, but sinking into the past; what is to come is 
on the side of the source, for time does not come from the past. It 
is not the past that pushes the present, nor the present that pushes 
the future, into being; the future is not prepared behind the observer, 
it is a brooding presence moving to meet him, like a storm on the 
horizon. If the observer sits in a boat and is carried by the current, we 
may say that he is moving downstream towards his future, but the 

411 



BF I NG-TOR -ITSELF AND BFING-IN-THC-WORLD 

future lies in the new landscapes which await him at the estuary, and 
the course of time is no longer the stream itself: it is the landscape as 
it rolls by for the moving observer. Time is, therefore, not a real pro- 
cess, not an actual succession that I am content to record. It arises 
from my relation to things. Within things themselves, the future and 
the past are in a kind of eternal state of pre-existence and survival; 
the water which will flow by tomorrow is at this moment at its source, 
the water which has just passed is now a little further downstream in 
the valley. What is past or future for me is present in the world. It is 
often said that, within things themselves, the future is not yet, the 
past is no longer, while the present, strictly speaking, is infinitesimal, 
so that time collapses. That is why Leibnitz was able to define the 
objective world as mens momentanea, and why Saint Augustine, in 
order to constitute time, required, besides the presence of the pre- 
sent, a presence of the past and of the future. But let us be clear about 
what they mean. If the objective world is incapable of sustaining 
time, it is not because it is in some way too narrow, and that we need 
to add to it a bit of past and a bit of future. Past and future exist only 
too unmistakably in the world, they exist in the present, and what 
being itself lacks in order to be of the temporal order, is the not- 
being of elsewhere, formerly and tomorrow. The objective world is 
too much of a plenum for there to be time. Past and future withdraw 
of their own accord from being and move over into subjectivity in 
search, not of some real support, but, on the contrary, of a possi- 
bility of not-being which accords with their nature. If we separate the 
objective world from the finite perspectives which open upon it, and 
posit it in itself, we find everywhere in it only so many instances of 
'now'. These instances of 'now*, moreover, not being present to any- 
body, have no temporal character and could not occur in sequence. 
The definition of time which is implicit in the comparisons under- 
taken by common sense, and which might be formulated as 'a suc- 
cession of instances of no w y 1 has not even the disadvantage of treating 
past and future as presents: it is inconsistent, since it destroys the 
very notion of 'now', and that of succession. 

We should, then, gain nothing by transferring into ourselves the 
time that belongs to things, if we repeated 'in consciousness* the 
mistake of defining it as a succession of instances of now. Yet this is 
what psychologists do when they try to 'explain' consciousness of the 
past in terms of memories, and consciousness of the future in terms 
of the projection of these memories ahead of us. The refutation of 
'physiological theories' of memory, in Bergson for example, is under- 
taken in the domain of causal explanation; it consists in showing 
that paths in the brain and other bodily expedients are not adequate 

1 'Nacheinandcr der Jetzlpunktc,' Heidegger, Sein undZeit, for example p. 422. 

412 



TEMPORALITY 

causes of the phenomena of memory; that, for example, nothing can 
be found in the body to account for the order of disappearance of 
memories in cases of progressive aphasia. The discussion conducted 
on these lines certainly discredits the idea of a bodily storage of the 
past: the body is no longer a receptacle of engrams, but an organ of 
mimicry with the function of ensuring the intuitive realization of the 
intentions' 1 of consciousness. But these intentions cling on to 
memories preserved 'in the unconscious', and the presence of the 
past in consciousness remains a simple factual presence; it has passed 
unnoticed that our best reason for rejecting the physiological pre- 
servation of the past is equally^ reason for rejecting its psychological 
preservation', and that reason is that no preservation, no physio- 
logical or psychic 'trace' of the past can make consciousness of the 
past understandable. This table bears traces of my past life, for I 
have carved my initials on it and spilt ink on it. But these traces in 
themselves do not refer to the past: they are present; and, in so far as 
I find in them signs of some 'previous* event, it is because I derive 
my sense of the past from elsewhere, because I carry this particular 
significance within myself. If my brain stores up traces of the bodily 
process which accompanied one of my perceptions, and if the appro- 
priate nervous influx passes once more through these already fretted 
channels, my perception will reappear, but it will be a fresh per- 
ception, weakened and unreal perhaps, but in no case will this per- 
ception, which is present, be capable of pointing to a past event, un- 
less I have some other viewpoint on my past enabling me to recognize 
it as memory, which runs counter to the hypothesis. If we now go on 
to substitute 'psychic traces' for physiological ones, and if our per- 
ceptions are preserved in an unconscious, the difficulty will be the 
same as before: a preserved perception is a perception, it continues to 
exist, it persists in the present, and it does not open behind us that 
dimension of escape and absence that we call the past. A preserved 
fragment of the lived-through past can be at the most no more than 
an occasion for thinking of the past, but it is not the past which is 
compelling recognition; recognition, when we try to derive it from 
any content whatever, always precedes itself. Reproduction pre- 
supposes re-cognition, and cannot be understood as such unless I 
have in the first place a sort of direct contact with the past in its own 
domain. Nor can one, a fortiori, construct the future out of contents 
of consciousness: no actual content can be taken, even equivocally, 
as evidence concerning the future, since the future has not even been 
in existence and cannot, like the past, set its mark upon us. The only 
conceivable way, therefore, of trying to explain the relation of future 
to present would be by putting it on the same footing as that between 
1 Bergson, Matiere et Memoire, p. 137, note 1, p. 139. 
413 



BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE-WORLD 

present and past. When I consider the long procession of my past 
states, I see that my present is always passing, and I can steal this pas- 
sage, treat my immediate past as a remote one, and my actual present 
as past: ahead of it is then a vacuum, and this is the future. Looking 
ahead would seem in reality to t>e retrospection, and the future a 
projection of the past. But even if, per impossible, I could construct 
consciousness of the past with transferred presents, they certainly 
could not open a future for me. Even if, in fact, we form an idea of the 
future with the help of what we have seen, the fact remains that, in 
order to pro-ject it ahead of us, we need in the first place a sense of 
the future. If prospection is retrospection, it is in any case an antici- 
patory retrospection, and how could one anticipate if one had no 
sense of the future? It is said that we guess 'by analogy' that this 
inimitable present will, like all the others, pass away. But for there 
to be an analogy between presents that have eiapsed and the actual 
present, the latter must be given not only as present, it must already 
announce itself as what will soon be past, we must feel the pressure 
upon it of a future intent on dispossessing it; in short the course of 
time must be primarily not only the passing of present to past, but 
also that of the future to the present. If it can be said that all pro- 
spection is anticipatory retrospection, it can equally well be said that 
all retrospection is prospection in reverse: I know that I was in 
Corsica before the war, because I know that the war was on the 
horizon of my trip there. The past and the future cannot be mere con- 
cepts abstracted by us from our perceptions and recollections, mere 
denominations for the actual series of 'psychic facts'. Time is thought 
of by us before its parts, and temporal relations make possible the 
events in time. Correspondingly, therefore, the subject must not 
be himself situated in it, in order to be able to be present in intention 
to the past as to the future. Let us no longer say that time is a 'datum 
of consciousness' ; let us be more precise and say that consciousness 
deploys or constitutes time. Through the ideal nature of time, it 
ceases to be imprisoned in the present. 

But does it enjoy an opening on to a past and a future? It is no 
longer beset by the present and by 'contents', it travels freely from a 
past and a future which are not far removed from it, since it consti- 
tutes them as past and future, and since they are its immanent 
objects, to a present which is not near to it, since it is present only in 
virtue of the relations which consciousness establishes between past, 
present and future. But then has not a consciousness thus freed lost 
all notion of what future, past and even present can possibly be? Is 
not the time that it constitutes similar in every detail to the real time 
the impossibility of which we have demonstrated; is it not a series of 
instances of 'now', which are presented to nobody, since nobody is 

414 



TEMPORALITY 

involved in them? Are we not always just as far away from under- 
standing what the future, the past and the present, and the passage 
between them, can possibly be? Time as the immanent object of a 
consciousness is time brought down to one uniform level, in other 
words it is no longer time at all. There can be time only if it is not 
completely deployed, only provided that past, present and future do 
not all three have their being in the same sense. It is of the essence of 
time to be in process of self-production, and not to be; never, that is, 
to be completely constituted. Constituted time, the series of possible 
relations in terms of before and after, is not time itself, but the ulti- 
mate recording of time, the result of its passage, which objective 
thinking always presupposes yet never manages to fasten on to. It is 
spatial, since its moments co-exist spread out before thought 1 ; it is a 
present, because consciousness is contemporary with all times. It is a 
setting distinct from me and unchanging, in which nothing either 
elapses or happens. There must be another true time, in which I 
learn the nature of flux and transience itself. It is indeed true that I 
should be incapable of perceiving any point in time without a before 
and an after, and that, in order to be aware of the relationship be- 
tween the three terms, I must not be absorbed into any one of them: 
that time, in short, needs a synthesis. But it is equally true that this 
synthesis must always be undertaken afresh, and that any supposition 
that it can be anywhere brought to completion involves the negation 
of time. It is indeed the dream of philosophers to be able to conceive 
an 'eternity of life', lying beyond permanence and change, in which 
time's productivity is pre-eminently contained, and yet a thetic con- 
sciousness of time which stands above it and embraces it merely de- 
stroys the phenomenon of time. If we are in fact destined to make 
contact with a sort of eternity, it will be at the core of our experience 
of time, and not in some non-temporal subject whose function it is to 
conceive and posit it. The problem is how to make time explicit as it 
comes into being and makes itself evident, having the notion of time 
at all times underlying it, and being, not an object of our knowledge, 
but a dimension of our being. 
It is in my' 'field of presence' in the widest sense — this moment that 

1 In order to arrive at authentic time, it is neither necessary nor sufficient to 
condemn the spatialization of time as does Bergson. It is not necessary, since 
time is exclusive of space only if we consider space as objectified in advance, and 
ignore that primordial spatiality which we have tried to describe, and which is 
the abstract form of our presence in the world. It is not sufficient since, even when 
the systematic translation of time into spatial terms has been duly stigmatized, 
we may still fall very far short of an authentic intuition of time. This is what 
happened to Bergson. When he says that duration 'snowballs upon itself, and 
when he postulates memories in themselves accumulating in the unconscious, he 
makes time out of a preserved present, and evolution out of what is evolved. 

415 



BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE- WORLD 

that I spend working, with, behind it, the horizon of the day 
that has elapsed, and, in front of it, the evening and night — that I 
make contact with time, and learn to know its course. The remote 
past has also its temporal order, and its position in time in relation 
to my present, but it has these in so far as it has been present itself, 
that it has been 'in its time' traversed by my life, and carried for- 
ward to this moment. When I call up a remote past, I reopen time, 
and carry myself back to a moment in which it still had before it a 
future horizon now closed, and a horizon of the immediate past 
which is today remote. Everything, therefore, causes me to revert to 
the field of presence as the primary experience in which time and its 
dimensions make their appearance unalloyed, with no intervening 
distance and with absolute self-evidence. It is here that we see a future 
sliding into the present and on into the past. Nor are these three 
dimensions given to us through discrete acts: I do not form a mental 
picture of my day, it weighs upon me with all its weight, it is still 
there, and though I may not recall any detail of it, I have the impend- 
ing power to do so, I still 'have it in hand'. 1 In the same way, I do 
not think of the evening to come and its consequences, and yet it 'is 
there', like the back of a house of which I can see only the facade, or 
like the background beneath a figure. Our future is not made up 
exclusively of guesswork and daydreams. Ahead of what I see and 
perceive, there is, it is true, nothing more actually visible, but my 
world is carried forward by lines of intentionality which trace out in 
advance at least the style of what is to come (although we are always 
on the watch, perhaps to the day of our death, for the appearance of 
something else). The present itself, in the narrow sense, is not posited. 
The paper, my fountain-pen, are indeed there for me, but I do not 
explicitly perceive them. I do not so much perceive objects as reckon 
with an environment; I seek support in my tools, and am at my task 
rather than confronting it. Husserl uses the terms pretentions and 
retentions for the intentionalities which anchor me to an environ- 
ment. They do not run from a central /, but from my perceptual field 
itself, so to speak, which draws along in its wake its own horizon of 
retentions, and bites into the future with its pretentions. I do not pass 
through a series of instances of now, the images of which I preserve 
and which, placed end to end, make a line. With the arrival of every 
moment, its predecessor undergoes a change: I still have it in hand 
and it is still there, but already it is sinking away below the level of 
presents; in order to retain it, I need to reach through a thin layer of 
time. It is still the preceding moment, and I have the power to rejoin 
it as it was just now; I am not cut off from it, but still it would not 

1 'Noch im Griff behalte\ Husserl, Vorlesungen zur Phtinomenologie des inneren 
Zeitbewusstseins, pp. 390 and ff. 

416 



TEMPORALITY 



belong to the past unless something had altered, unless it were begin- 
ning to outline itself against, or project itself upon, my present, 
whereas a moment ago it was my present. When a third moment 
arrives, the second undergoes a new modification; from being a 
retention it becomes the retention of a retention, and the layer of 
time between it and me thickens. One can, as Husserl does, represent 
this phenomenon diagrammatically. In order to make it complete, 
the symmetrical perspective of protentions would have to be added. 
Time is not a line, but a network of intentionalities. 




Future 



From Husserl (Zeitbewusstsein, p. 22). Horizontal line: series of 'present 
moments'. Oblique lines: Abschattungen of the same 'present moments' 
seen from an ulterior 'present moment'. Vertical lines: Successive Abschatt- 
ungen of one and the same 'present moment'. 

It will doubtless be maintained that this description and this dia- 
gram do not bring us one step nearer to a solution. When we pass 
from A to B, and then on to C, A is projected or outlined as A' and 
then as A". For A' to be recognized as a retention or Abschattung of 
A, and A" of A', and even for the transformation of A into A' to be 
experienced as such, is there not needed an identifying synthesis link- 
ing A, A', A" and all other possible Abschattungen, and does this not 
amount to making A into an ideal unity as Kant requires? And yet 
we know that with this intellectual synthesis there will cease to be any 
time at all. A and all previous moments of time will indeed be identi- 
fiable by me, and I shall be in a way rescued from time which runs 
them into one another and blurs their identity. But at the same time 
I shall have lost all sense of before and after which is provided by 
this flux, and nothing will any longer serve to distinguish the tem- 
poral sequence from spatial multiplicity. Husserl introduced the no- 
tion of retention, and held that I still have the immediate past in hand, 
precisely for the purpose of conveying that I do not posit the past, 
or construct it from an Abschattung really distinct from it and by 
means of an express act; but that I reach it in its recent, yet already 
elapsed, thisness. What is given to me is not in the first place A', A", 
or A'", nor do I go back from these Outlines' to their original A, as 

417 



BEING -FOB.- ITSELF AND BEING -I N-T HE -WORLD 

Qne goes back from the sign to its significance. What is given to me 
is A transparently visible through A', then the two through A", and 
so on, as I see a pebble through the mass of water which moves over 
it. There are certainly identifying syntheses, but only in the express 
memory and voluntary recollection of the remote past, that is, in 
those modes derived from consciousness of the past. For example, I 
may be uncertain about the date of a memory: I have before me a 
certain scene, let us suppose, and I do not know to what point of 
time to assign it, the memory has lost its anchorage, and I may then 
arrive at an intellectual identification based on the causal order of 
events, for example, I had this suit made before the armistice, since 
no more English cloth has been available since then. But in this case 
it is not the past itself that I reach. On the contrary, for when I re- 
discover the concrete origin of the memory, it is because it falls 
naturally into a certain current of fear and hope running from 
Munich to the outbreak of war; it is, therefore, because I recapture 
time that is lost; because, from the moment in question to my pre- 
sent, the chain of retentions and the overlapping horizons coming 
one after the other ensure an unbroken continuity. The objective 
landmarks in relation to which I assign a place to my recollection in 
the mediatory identification, and the intellectual synthesis generally, 
have themselves a temporal significance only because gradually, step 
by step, the synthesis of apprehension links me to my whole actual 
past. There can, therefore, be no question of assimilating the latter 
to the former. The fact that the Abschattungen A' and A* appear to 
me as Abschattungen of A, is not to be explained by the fact that they 
all participate in an ideal unity A, which is their common ground. 
It is because through them I obtain the point A itself, in its un- 
challengeable individuality, which is for ever established by its pas- 
sage into the present, and because I see springing from it the Abschat- 
tungen A', A" . . . In Husserl's language, beneath the 'intentionality 
of the act', which is the thetic consciousness of an object, and which, 
in intellectual memory for example, converts 'this' into an idea, we 
must recognize an 'operative' intentionality (fungierende Intentionali- 
tdt) 1 which makes the former possible, and which is what Heidegger 
terms transcendence. My present outruns itself in the direction of an 
immediate future and an immediate past and impinges upon them 
where they actually are, namely in the past and in the future them- 
selves. If the past were available to us only in the form of express 
recollections, we should be continually tempted to recall it in order 
to verify its existence, and thus resemble the patient mentioned by 
Scheler, who was constantly turning round in order to reassure 

1 Husserl, Zeitbewusstsein, p. 430. Formate und transzendentale Logik, p. 208. 
See Fink, Das Problem der Phanomenologie Edmund Husserls, p. 286. 

418 



TEMPORALITY 



himself that things were really there — whereas in fact we feel it behind 
us as an incontestable acquisition. In order to have a past or a future 
we do not have to bring together, by means of an intellectual act, a 
series of Abschatiungen, for they possess a natural and primordial 
unity, and what is announced through them is the past or the future 
itself. Such is the paradox of what might be termed, with Husserl, the 
'passive synthesis' of time 1 — and of a term which is clearly not a 
solution, but merely a pointer to the problem. 

Light begins to be shed on the problem if we remember that our 
diagram represents an instantaneous cross-section of time. What 
there really is, is not a past, present and future, not discrete instants 
A, B and C, nor really distinct Abschatiungen A', A", B', nor finally a 
host of retentions on the one hand and protentions on the other. The 
upsurge of a fresh present does not cause a heaping up of the past 
and a tremor of the future; the fresh present is the passage of future 
to present, and of former present to past, and when time begins to 
move, it moves throughout its whole length. The 'instants' A, B and 
C are not successively in being, but differentiate themselves from each 
other, and correspondingly A passes into A' and thence into A". In 
short, the system of retentions collects into itself at each instant 
what was, an instant earlier, the system of protentions. There is, 
then, not a multiplicity of linked phenomena, but one single pheno- 
menon of running-off. Time is the one single movement appropriate to 
itself in all its parts, as a gesture includes all the muscular contrac- 
tions necessary for its execution. When we pass from B to C, there is, 
as it were, a bursting, or a disintegration of B into B', of A' into A", 
and C itself which, while it was on the way, announced its coming by a 
continuous emission of Abschatiungen, has no sooner come into exis- 
ence than it already begins to Jose its substance. 'Time is the means 
offered to all that is destined to be, to come into existence in order 
that it may no longer be.' 2 It is nothing but a general flight out of the 
Itself, the one law governing these centrifugal movements, or again, 
as Heidegger says, an ek-stase. While B becomes C, it becomes also 
B'; and simultaneously A which, while becoming B, had also be- 
come A', lapses into A". A, A' and A" on the one hand, and B and B' 
on the other, are bound together, not by any identifying synthesis, 
which would fix them at a point in time, but by a transitional syn- 
thesis (Ubergangssynthesis), in so far as they issue one from the 
other, and each of these projections is merely one aspect of the total 
bursting forth or dehiscence. Hence time, in our primordial experi- 
ence of it, is not for us a system of objective positions, through which 
we pass, but a mobile setting which moves away from us, like the 

1 See, for example, Formate und Transzendentale Logik, pp. 256-7. 

2 Claude 1, Art poetique, p. 57. 

419 



BEING-F0R-1TSELF AND BEING-1N-THE- WORLD 

landscape seen through a railway carriage window. Yet we do no 
really believe that the landscape is moving; the gate-keeper at the 
level crossing is whisked by, but the hill over there scarcely moves at 
all, and in the same way, though the opening of my day is already 
receding, the beginning of my week is a fixed point; an objective time 
is taking shape on the horizon, and should therefore show up in my 
immediate past. How is this possible? How is it that the temporal 
ek-stase is not an absolute disintegration in which the individuality 
of the moments disappears? It is because the disintegration undoes 
what the passage from future to present had achieved: C is the cul- 
mination of a long concentration which has brought it to maturity; 
as it was being built up, it made its approach known by progressively 
fewer Abschattungen, for it was approaching bodily. When it came 
into the present it brought with it its genesis, of which it was merely 
the ultimate expression, and the impending presence of what was 
to come after it. So that, when D comes into being and pushes C 
into the past, C is not suddenly bereft of its being; its disintegration 
is forever the inverse or the consequence of its coming to maturity. 
In short, since in time being and passing are synonymous, by becom- 
ing past, the event does not cease to be. The origin of objective time, 
with its fixed positions lying beneath our gaze, is not to be sought in 
any eternal synthesis, but in the mutual harmonizing and overlapping 
of past and future through the present, and in the very passing of 
time. Time maintains what it has caused to be, at the very time it 
expels it from being, because the new being was announced by its 
predecessor as destined to be, and because, for the latter, to become 
present was the same thing as being destined to pass away. Tem- 
poralization is not a succession (Nacheinander) of ecstasies. The 
future is not posterior to the past, or the past anterior to the present. 
Temporality temporalizes itself as future-which-lapses-into-the-past- 
by-coming-into-the-present.' 1 Bergson was wrong in explaining the 
unity of time in terms of its continuity, since that amounts to con- 
fusing past, present and future on the excuse that we pass from one to 
the other by imperceptible transitions; in short, it amounts to deny- 
ing time altogether. But he was right to stick to the continuity of time 
as an essential phenomenon. It is simply a matter of elucidating this. 
Instant C and instant D, however near they are together, are not 
indistinguishable, for if they were there would be no tihie; what hap- 
pens is that they run into each other and C becomes D because C has 
never been anything but the anticipation of D as present, and of its 
own lapse into the past. This amounts to saying that each present 
reasserts the presence of the whole past which it supplants, and 
anticipates that of all that is to come, and that by definition the pre- 
1 Heidegger, Sein und Zeit, p. 350. 
420 



TEMPORALITY 



sent is not shut up within itself, but transcends itself towards a future 
and a past. What there is, is not a present, then another present which 
takes its place in being, and not even a present with its vistas of past 
and future followed by another present in which those vistas are dis- 
rupted, so that one and the same spectator is needed to effect the syn- 
thesis of successive perspectives: there is one single time which is 
self-confirmatory, which can bring nothing into existence unless it 
has already laid that thing's foundations as present and eventual 
past, and which establishes itself at a stroke. 

The past, therefore, is not past, nor the future future. It exists only 
when a subjectivity is there to disrupt the plenitude of being in itself, 
to adumbrate a perspective, and introduce non-being into it. A past 
and a future spring forth when I reach out towards them. I am not, 
for myself, at this very moment, I am also at this morning or at the 
night which will soon be here, and though my present is, if we wish 
so to consider it, this instant, it is equally this day, this year or my 
whole life. There is no need for a synthesis externally binding to- 
gether the tempora into one single time, because each one of the 
tempora was already inclusive, beyond itself, of the whole open series 
of other tempora y being in internal communication with them, and 
because the 'cohesion of a life' 1 is given with its ek-stase. The passage 
of one present to the next is not a thing which I conceive, nor do I see 
it as an onlooker, I effect it; I am already at the impending present 
as my gesture is already at its goal, I am myself time, a time which 
'abides* and does not 'flow' or 'change', which is what Kant says in 
various places. 2 This idea of a time which anticipates itself is per- 
ceived by common sense in its way. Everyone talks about Time, not 
as the zoologist talks about the dog or the horse, using these as col- 
lective nouns, but using it as a proper noun. Sometimes it is even per- 
sonified. Everyone thinks that there is here a single, concrete being, 
wholly present in each of its manifestations, as is a man in each of his 
spoken words. We say that there is time as we say that there is a 
fountain: the water changes while the fountain remains because its 
form is preserved ; the form is preserved because each successive wave 
takes over the functions of its predecessor: from being the thrusting 
wave in relation to the one in front of it, it becomes, in its turn and in 
relation to another, the wave that is pushed; and this is attributable 
to the fact that, from the source to the fountain jet, the waves are not 
separate; there is only one thrust, and a single air-lock in the flow 
would be enough to break up the jet. Hence the justification for the 
metaphor of the river, not in so far as the river flows, but in so far as 
it is one with itself. This intuition of time's permanence, however, is 

1 Heidegger, Sein und Zeit, p. 373. 

1 Quoted by Heidegger, Kant und das Problem der Metaphysik, pp. 183-4. 

421 



BEING -FOR- ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE- WORLD 

jeopardized by the action of common sense, which thematizes or 
objectifies it, which is the surest way of losing sight of it. There is 
more truth in mythical personifications of time than in the notion of 
time considered, in the scientific manner, as a variable of nature in 
itself, or, in the Kantian manner, as a form ideally separable from 
its matter. There is a temporal style of the world, and time remains 
the same because the past is a former future and a recent present, the 
present an impending past and a recent future, the future a present 
and even a past to come; because, that is, each dimension of time is 
treated or aimed at as something other than itself and because, 
finally, there is at the core of time a gaze, or, as Heidegger puts it, an 
Augen-blick, someone through whom the word as can have a meaning. 
We are not saying that time is for someone, which would once more 
be a case of arraying it out. and immobilizing it. We are saying that 
time is someone, or that temporal dimensions, in so far as they per- 
petually overlap, bear each other out and ever confine themselves to 
making explicit what was implied in each, being collectively expressive 
of that one single explosion or thrust which is subjectivity itself. We 
must understand time as the subject and the subject as time. What is 
perfectly clear, is that this primordial temporality is not a juxta- 
position of external events, since it is the power which holds them to- 
gether while keeping them apart. Ultimate subjectivity is not tem- 
poral in the empirical sense of the term : if consciousness of time were 
made up of successive states of consciousness, there would be needed 
a new consciousness to be conscious of that succession and so on to 
infinity. We are forced to recognize the existence of 'a consciousness 
having behind it no consciousness to be conscious of it' 1 which, 
consequently, is not arrayed out in time, ana in which 'being 
coincides with being for itself'. 2 We may say that ultimate con- 
sciousness is 'timeless' (zeitlose) in the sense that it is not intra- 
temporal. 3 'In* my present, if I grasp it while it is still living and with 
all that it implies, there is an ek-stase towards the future and towards 
the past which reveals the dimensions of time not as conflicting, but 
as inseparable: to be now is to be from always and for ever. Sub- 
jectivity is not in time because it takes up or lives through time, and 
merges with the cohesion of a life. 

Are we coming back in this way to a kind of eternity? I belong to 
my past and, through the constant interlocking of retentions, I pre- 
serve my oldest experiences, which means not some duplicate or 
image of them, but the experiences themselves, exactly as they were. 

1 Husscrl, Zeitbewusstsein, p. 442; 'primares Bcwusstsein . . . das hinter sich 
kein Bewusstsein mehr hat in dem cs bewusst ware . . .* 

3 Ibid., p. 471: 'fallt ja Sein und Inncrlich-bewusstsein zusammcn.' 
3 Ibid., p. 464. 

422 



TEMPORALITY 

But the unbroken chain of the fields of presence, by which I am 
guaranteed access to the past itself, has the essential characteristic of 
being formed only gradually and one step at a time; each present, in 
virtue of its very essence as a present, rules out the juxtaposition of 
other presents and, even in the context of a time long past, I can take 
in a certain period of my past life only by unfolding it anew according 
to its own tempo. The temporal perspective with its confusion of 
what is far removed in time, and that sort of Shrinkage' of the past 
with oblivion as its ultimate limit, are not accidents of memory, and 
do not express the debasement into empirical existence of a con- 
sciousness of time theoretically all-embracing, but its initial am- 
biguity: to retain is to hold, but at a distance. Once again, time's 
'synthesis' is a transitional synthesis, the action of a life which un- 
folds, and there is no way of bringing it about other than by living 
that life, there is no seat of time; time bears itself on and launches it- 
self afresh. Time as an indivisible thrust and transition can alone 
make possible time as successive multiplicity, and what we place at 
the origin of intratemporality is a constituting time. When we were 
engaged above in describing the overlapping of time by itself, we were 
able to treat the future as a past only by qualifying it as a past to 
come, and the past as a future only by calling it a future which has 
occurred; this means that when we came to put all time on the same 
footing, we had to reassert the originality of each perspective, and 
derive this quasi-eternity from the event. What does not pass in time 
is the passing of time itself. Time restarts itself: the rhythmic cycle 
and constant form of yesterday, today and tomorrow may well create 
the illusion that we possess it immediately, in its entirety, as the 
fountain creates in us a feeling of eternity. But the generality of time 
is no more than one of its secondary attributes and provides only an 
inauthentic view of it, since we cannot get as far as conceiving a cycle 
without drawing a distinction, in terms of time, between the point of 
arrival and the point of departure. The feeling for eternity is a hypo- 
critical one, for eternity feeds on time. The fountain retains its 
identity only because of the continuous pressure of water. Eternity is 
the time that belongs to dreaming, and the dream refers back to 
waking life, from which it borrows all its structures. Of what nature, 
then, is that waking time in which eternity takes root ? It is the field of 
presence in the wide sense, with its double horizon or primary past 
and future, and the infinite openness of those fields of presence that 
have slid by, or are still possible. Time exists for me only because I 
am situated in it, that is, because I become aware of myself as already 
committed to it, because the whole of being is not given to me in- 
carnate, and finally because one sector of being is so close to me that 
it does not even make up a picture before me — I cannot see it, just as 

423 



BEING -F0R-1TSELF AND BEING-IN-THE- WORLD 

I cannot see my face. Time exists for me because I have a present. It 
is by coming into the present that a moment of time acquires that » 
indestructible individuality, that 'once and for all* quality, which 
subsequently enables it to make its way through time and produce 
in us the illusion of eternity. No one of time's dimensions can be de- 
duced from the rest. But the present (in the wide sense, along with its * 
horizons of primary past and future), nevertheless enjoys a privilege 
because it is the zone in which being and consciousness coincide. 
When I recall an earlier perception, o r when I imagine a visit to my 
friend Paul who is in Brazil, my aim, it is true, is the past itself in its 
true place, or Paul himself in the world, and not some interposed 
mental object. Nevertheless my act of representation, unlike the 
experiences represented, is actually present to me; the former is per- 
ceived, the latter are merely represented. A former experience, a 
coming experience, in order that they may appear to me, need to be 
borne into being by a primary consciousness, which in this case is my 
inner perception of recollection or imagination. We said above that 
we need to arrive at a consciousness with no other behind it, which 
grasps its own being, and in which, in short, being and being co- 
scious are one and the same thing. This ultimate consciousness is 
not an eternal subject perceiving itself in absolute transparency, for 
any such subject would be utterly incapable of making its descent into 
time, and would, therefore have nothing in common with our experi- 
ence: it is the consciousness of the present. In the present and in per- 
ception, my being and my consciousness are at one, not that my 
being is reducible to the knowledge I have of it or that it is clearly set 
out before me — on the contrary perception is opaque, for it brings 
into play, beneath what I know, my sensory fields which are my 
primitive alliance with the world — but because 'to be conscious' is 
here nothing but 'to-be-at . . .' ('etre a . . .'), and because my con- 
ciousness of existing merges into the actual gesture of 'ex-sistence'. 1 
It is by communicating with the world that we communicate beyond 
all doubt with ourselves. We hold time in its entirety, and we are 
present to ourselves because we are present to the world. 

That being the case, and since consciousness takes root in being 
and time by taking up a situation, how are we then to describe it? It 
must be a comprehensive project, or a view of time and the world 
which, in order to be apparent to itself, and in order to become ex- 
plicitly what it is implicitly, that is, consciousness, needs to unfold 
itself into multiplicity. We must avoid conceiving as real and dis- 
tinct entities either the indivisible power, or its distinct manifestations ; 
consciousness is neither, it is both; it is the very action of tem- 

1 We borrow this expression from H. Corbin, Qu'est~ce que la Metaphysique ?, 
p. 14. 

424 



TEMPORALITY 



penalization * — of 'flux', as Husserl has it — a self-anticipatory move- 
ment, a flow which never leaves itself. Let us try to give a better 
description with the help of an example. The novelist or psychologist 
who fails to go back to ultimate origins and accepts teraporalization 
as someth/ng ready made, sees consciousness as a multiplicity of 
psychic facts among which he tries to establish causal relations. For 
example, 1 Proust shows how Swann's love for Odette causes the 
jealousy which, in turn, modifies his love, since Swann, always anxi- 
ous to win her from any possible rival, has no time really to look at 
Odette. In reality, Swann's consciousness is not a lifeless setting in 
which psychic facts are produced from outside. What we have is not 
jealousy aroused by love and exerting its own counter-influence, but 
a certain way of loving in which the whole destiny of that love can be 
discerned at a glance. Swann has a liking for Odette's person, for 
that 'spectacle* that she is, for her way of looking, of modulating her 
voice, and for the way a smile comes to her lips. But what is having a 
liking for someone? Proust tells u$ when speaking of another love: it 
is the feeling of being shut out of the life of the beloved, and of want- 
ing to force one's way in and take complete possession of it. Swann's 
love does not cause him to feel jealousy. It is jealousy already, and 
has been from the start. Jealousy does not produce a change in the 
quality of love: Swann's feeling of pleasure in looking at Odette bore 
its degeneration within itself, since it was the pleasure of being the 
only one to do so. The set of psychic facts and causal relationships is 
merely an outward manifestation of a certain view that Swann takes 
of Odette, a certain way of belonging to another. Swann's jealous love 
ought, moreover, to be related to the rest of his behaviour, in which 
case it might well appear as itself a manifestation of an even more 
general existential structure, which would be Swann's whole per- 
sonality. Conversely all consciousness as a comprehensive project is 
outlined or made manifest to itself in those acts, experiences and 
'psychic facts' in which it is recognized. Here is where temporality 
throws light on subjectivity. We shall never manage to understand 
how a thinking or constituting subject is able to posit or become 
aware of itself in time. If the / is indeed the transcendental Ego of 
Kant, we shall never understand how it can in any instance merge 
with its wake in the inner sense, or how the empirical self still remains 
a self. If, however, the subject is identified with temporality, then 
sclf-positing ceases to be a contradiction, because it exactly expresses 
the essence of living time. Time is 'the affecting of self by self': 2 what 

* Cf. *Zeitigung' (Translator's note). 

1 The example is J. P. Sartre's in VEtre et le Neant, p. 216. 

s The expression is applied by Kant to the Gemiit. Heidegger transfers it to 
time: 4 Die Zeit is ihrem Wesen nach reine Affektion ihrer selbst.' Kant und das 
Problem der Metaphysik, pp. 180-1. 

425 



BEING -FOR-ITSELF AND BEING -IN-THE- WORLD 

•exerts the effect is time as a thrust and a passing towards a future; 
what is affected is time as an unfolded series of presents ; the affecting 
agent and affected recipient are one, because the thrust of time is 
nothing but the transition from one present to another. This ek-stase, 
this projection of an indivisible power into an outcome which is 
already present to it, is subjectivity. The primary flow, says Husserl, 
does not confine itself to being: it must necessarily provide itself with 
a 'manifestation of itself {Selbsterscheinung), without our needing to 
place behind it a second flow which is conscious of it. It 'constitutes 
itself as a phenomenon within itself. 1 It is of the essence of time to be 
not only actual time, or time which flows, but also time which is aware 
of itself, for the explosion or dehiscence of the present towards a future 
is the archetype of the relationship of self to self and it traces out an 
interiority or ipseity. 2 Here a light bursts forth, 3 for here we are no 
longer concerned with a being which reposes within itself, but with a 
being the whole essence of which, like that of light, is to make visible. 
It is through temporality that there can be, without contradiction, 
ipseity, significance and reason. That is seen even in the commonly 
held notion of time. We mark out the phases or stages of our life; for 
example, we consider everything that bears a significant relationship 
to our concerns at the moment as part of our present, thus recogniz- 
ing implicitly that time and significance are but one thing. Sub- 
jectivity is not motionless identity with itself : as with time, it is of its 
essence, in order to be genuine subjectivity, to open itself to an Other 
and to go forth from itself. We must not envisage the subject as con- 
stituting, and the multiplicity of its experiences or Erlebnisse as con- 
stituted; we must not treat the transcendental Ego as the true subject 
and the empirical self as its shadow or its wake. If that were their 
relationship to each other, we could withdraw into the constituting 
agency, and such reflection would destroy time, which would be left 
without date or place. The fact that even our purest reflection appears 
to us as retrospective in time, and that our reflection on the flux is 
actually inserted into that flux, 4 shows that the most precise con- 
sciousness of which we are capable is always, as it were, affected by 
itself or given to itself, and that the word consciousness has no mean- 
ing independently of this duality. 

Nothing said of the subject is false: it is true that the subject as an 
absolute presence to itself is something we cannot circumvent, and 

1 Husserl, Zeitbewusstsein, p. 436. 

1 Heidegger, op. cit., p. 181 : 4 Als reine Selbstaflektion bildet (die Zeit) urspriing- 
lich die endliche Selbstheit dergestalt dass das Selbst so etwas wie Selbstbewusst- 
sein kann.' 

8 Heidegger refers somewhere to the 'Gelichtetheit' of the Dasein. 
4 What Husserl, in his unpublished writings, terms: Einstromen. 

426 



TEMPORALITY 

that nothing could happen to it of which it did not bear within itself 
the lineaments. It is also true that it provides itself with symbols of 
itself in both succession and multiplicity, and that these symbols are 
it, since without them it would, like an inarticulate cry, fail to achieve 
selfconsciousness. It is here that what we provisionally termed the 
passive synthesis becomes clarified. A passive synthesis is a contra- 
diction in terms if the synthesis is a process of composition, and if the 
passivity consists in being the recipient of multiplicity instead of its 
composer. What we meant by passive synthesis was that we make 
our way into multiplicity, but that we do not synthesize it. Now 
temporalization satisfies by its very nature these two conditions: 
it is indeed clear that I am not the creator of time any more than 
of my heart-beats. I am not the initiator of the process of tem- 
poralization; I did not choose to come into the world, yet once I 
am born, time flows through me, whatever I do. Nevertheless this 
ceaseless welling up of time is not a simple fact to which I am 
passively subjected, for I can find a remedy against it in itself, as 
happens in a decision which binds me or in the act of establishing a 
concept. It withholds me from what I was about to become, and at 
the same time provides me with the means of grasping myself at a 
distance and establishing my own reality as myself. What is called 
passivity is not the acceptance by us of an alien reality, or a causal 
action exerted upon us from outside: it is being encompassed, being 
in a situation — prior to which we do not exist — which we are per- 
petually resuming and which is constitutive of us. A spontaneity 
'acquired' once and for all, and one which 'perpetuates itself in being 
in virtue of its being acquired' 1 is precisely time ana subjectivity. It 
is time, since a time without its roots in a present and thence a past 
would no longer be time, but eternity. Heidegger's historical time, 
which flows from the future and which, thanks to its resolute 
decision, has its future in advance and rescues itself once and for all 
from disintegration, is impossible within the context of Heidegger's 
thought itself : for, if time is an ek-stase, if present and past are two 
results of this ek-stase, how could we ever cease completely to see time 
from the point of view of the present, and how could we completely 
escape from the mauthentic? It is always in the present that we are 
centred, and our decision starts from there; they can therefore always 
be brought into relationship with our past, and are never motiveless, 
and, though they may open up a cycle in our life which is entirely 
new, they still have to be subsequently carried forward, and afford 
only a temporary reprieve from dispersion. There can therefore be 
no question of deriving time from spontaneity. We are not temporal 

1 J. P. Sartre, V£tre et le Neant, p. 195. The author mentions this monster only 
to banish the very idea of it. 

427 



BEING -FOR-ITSELF AND BEING- IN -THE-WORLD 

beings because we are spontaneous and because, as consciousnesses, 
we tear ourselves away from ourselves. On the contrary, time is the 
foundation and measure of our spontaneity, and the power of out- 
running and of 'miniating' ^neantiser') which dwells within us and is 
ourselves, is itself given to us with temporality and life. Our birth, or, 
as Husserl has it in his unpublished writings, our 'generativity', is 
the basis both of our activity or individuality, and our passivity or 
generality — that inner weakness which prevents us from ever achiev- 
ing the density of an absolute individual. We are not in some incom- 
prehensible way an activity joined to a passivity, an automatism 
surmounted by a will, a perception surmounted by a judgement, but 
wholly active and wholly passive, because we are the upsurge of time. 

We have been concerned 1 with gaining an understanding of the 
relationships between consciousness and nature, between the inner 
and the outer. Or again, the problem was to link the idealist per- 
spective, according to which nothing exists except as an object for 
consciousness, and the realist perspective, according to which con- 
sciousnesses are introduced into the stuff of the objective world and 
of events in themselves. Or finally, we were concerned with finding 
out how the world and man are accessible to two kinds of investiga- 
tion, in the first case explanatory and in the second reflective. We 
have already, in another work, set out these traditional problems in 
another language which strips away all inessentials: the whole ques- 
tion is ultimately one of understanding what, in ourselves and in the 
world, is the relation between significance and absence of significance. 
Is the element of significance which is evident in the world produced 
and carried forward by the assemblage or convergence of independent 
facts or, on the other hand, is it merely the expression of an absolute 
reason? We say that events have a significance when they appear as 
the achievement or the expression of a single aim. There is significance 
for us when one of our intentions is fulfilled, or conversely when a 
number of facts or signs lend themselves to our taking them up 
and grasping them inclusively, or, at' all events, when one or 
more terms exist as . . . representative or expressive of something 
other than themselves. It is characteristic of idealism to grant 
that all significance is centrifugal, being an act of significance or 
Sinn-gebung* and that there are no natural signs. To understand 
is ultimately always to construct, to constitute, to bring about 
here and now the synthesis of the object. Our analysis of one's own 
body and of perception has revealed to us a relation to the object, 

1 Cf. La Structure du Comportement, Introd. 

* The expression is again often used by Husserl, for example Ideen, p. 107. 

428 



TEMPORALITY 



i.e. a significance deeper than this. The thing is nothing but a signifi- 
cance, the significance 'thing'. Very well. But when I understand a 
thing, a picture for example, I do not here and now effect its syn- 
thesis, I come to it bringing my sensory fields and my perceptual field 
with me, and in the last resort I bring a schema of all possible being, 
a universal setting in relation to the world. At the heart of the subject 
himself we discovered, then, the presence of the world, so that the 
subject was no longer to be understood as a synthetic activity, but as 
ek-stase, and that every active process of signification or Sinn-gebung 
appeared as derivative and secondary in relation to that pregnancy 
of meaning within signs which served to define the world. We 
found beneath the intentionality of acts, or thetic intentionality, 
another kind which is the condition of the former's possibility: 
namely an operative intentionality already at work before any 
positing or any judgement, a 'Logos of the aesthetic world', 1 an 
'art hidden in the depths of the human soul', one which, like any 
art, is known only in its results. From this point onwards the distinc- 
tion made by us elsewhere between structure and signification 2 
began to be clarified: what constitutes the difference between the 
Gestalt of the circle and the signification 'circle', is that the latter is 
recognized by an understanding which engenders it as the place of 
points equidistant from a centre, the former by a subject familiar with 
his world and able to seize it as a modulation of that world, as a 
circular physiognomy. We have no way of knowing what a picture or 
a thing is other than by looking at them, and their significance is re- 
vealed only if we look at them from a certain point of view, from a 
certain distance and in a certain direction,* in short only if we place, 
at the service of the spectacle, our collusion with the world. The 
phrase 'direction of a stream' is meaningless unless I suppose a sub- 
ject looking from one place towards another. In the world in itself, 
all directions and all movement are relative, which amounts to saying 
that there are none at all. There would in fact be no movement, and 
I should have no notion of it, if, in perception, I did not leave the 
earth, as my 'ground' 3 of all rest and motion, on the hither side of 
rest and motion, because I inhabit it, and similarly there would be no 
direction without a being who inhabits the world and who, through 
the medium of his gaze, marks out the first direction as a basis for 

1 Husserl, Formate und transzendentale Logik, p. 257. 'Aesthetic' is, naturally, 
taken in the wide sense of 'transcendental aesthetic'. 

2 La Structure du Comportement, p. 302. 

8 'Boden*, Husserl, Umsturz der kopernikanischen Lehre (unpublished). 

* The argument is here, and in the following sentences, conducted by exploiting 
different meanings of the French word sens (meaning, direction, sense, way, 
manner) which are not covered by one single word in English (Translator's note). 

429 



BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE- WORLD 

all others. In the same way; the face or back of a piece of material is 
intelligible only for a subject who can approach the object from one 
side or another, so that it is through my upsurge into the world that 
the material has a face or back. Similarly again, the meariing of a sen- 
tence is its import or intention, which once more presupposes a de- 
parture and arrival point, an aim and a point of view. And finally the 
sense of sight is a certain preparation for the logic, and for the world, 
of colours. In all uses of the word sens, we find the same fundamental 
notion of a being orientated or polarized in the direction of what he 
is not, and thus we are always brought back to a conception of the 
subject as ek-stase, and to a relationship of active transcendence be- 
tween the subject and the world. The world is inseparable from the 
subject, but from a subject which is nothing but a project of the world, 
and the subject is inseparable from the world, but from a world which 
the subject itself projects. The subject is a being-in-the-world and the 
world remains 'subjective' 1 since its texture and articulations are 
traced out by the subject's movement of transcendence. Hence we 
discovered, with the world as cradle of meanings, direction of all 
directions (sens de tous les sens), and ground of all thinking, how to 
leave behind the dilemma of realism and idealism, contingency and 
absolute reason, nonsense and sense. The world as we have tried to 
show it, as standing on the horizon of our life as the primordial unity of 
all our experiences, and one goal of all our projects, is no longer the 
visible unfolding of a constituting Thought, not a chance conglomera- 
tion of parts, nor, of course, the working of a controlling Thought on 
an indifferent matter, but the native abode of all rationality. 

Our analysis of time has confirmed, initially, this new notion of 
significance and understanding. Considering it in the same light as 
any other object, we shall be obliged to say of it what we have said of 
other objects: that it has meaning for us only because 'we are' 
it. We can designate something by this word only because we are 
at the past, present and future. It is literally the tenor* of our 
life, and, like the world, is accessible only to the person who has his 
place within it, and who follows its direction. But the analysis of 
time has not merely provided an opportunity of reiterating what had 
been said about the world. It throws light on the preceding analysis 
because it discloses subject and object as two abstract 'moments' of a 
unique structure which is presence. It is through time that being is 
conceived, because it is through the relations of time-subject and 

1 Heidegger, Sein unci Zeit y p. 366: 4 Wenn das "Subjekt" ontologisch als 
exislierendes Dasein begriften wird, deren Sein in der Zeitlichkeit griindet, dann 
muss gesagt werden: Welt ist "subjektiv". Diese "subjektive" Welt aber is dann 
als Zeittranszcndenie "objektiver" als jedes mogliche "Objekl'V 

* sens (Translator's nole). 

430 



TEMPORALITY 

time-object that we are able to understand those obtaining between 
subject and world. Let us apply to those problems we began with the 
idea of subjectivity as temporality. We wondered, for example, how 
to conceive the relations between the soul and the body, rejecting as 
hopeless any attempt to tie up the for-itself with a certain object in- 
itself, to which it is supposed to stand in a relationship of causal 
dependence. But if the for-itself the revelation of self to self, is merely 
the hollow in which time is formed, and if the world 7« itself is simply 
the horizon of my present, then the problem is reduced to the form: 
How is it that a being which is still to come and has passed by, also 
has a present — which means that the problem is eliminated, since the 
future, the past and the present are linked together in the movement 
of temporalization. It is as much of my essence to have a body as it is 
the future's to be the future of a certain present. So that neither 
scientific thematization nor objective thought can discover a single 
bodily function strictly independent of existential structures, 1 or 
conversely a single 'spiritual' act which does not rest on a bodily in- 
frastructure. Moreover, it is essential to me not only to have a body, 
but to have this body. It is not only the notion of the body which, 
through that of the present, is necessarily linked to that of the for- 
itself, the actual existence of my body is indispensable to that of my 
'consciousness': In the last analysis, in so far as I know that the for- 
itself 'is the culmination of a body, this can be only through the ex- 
perience of my one body and one for-itself or through the experience 
of my presence in the world. It will be objected that I might have 
nails, ears or lungs of some other kind which would involve no 
change in my existence. But then my nails, ears and lungs taken 
separately have no existence. It is science which has accustomed us to 
regard the body as a collection of parts, and also the experience of its 
disintegration at death. But the fact is that a decomposed body is no 
longer a body. When I restore my ears, nails and lungs to my living 
body, they no longer appear in- the light of contingent details. They 
are not indifferent to the idea that others form of me, contributing 
as they do to my physiognomy or my general bearing, and it is not 
impossible that science may tomorrow express in the form of objec- 
tive correlations precisely how necessary it was that I should have 
that kind of ears, nails and lungs, and whether, moreover, 1 was 
destined to be dexterous or clumsy, placid or highly strung, intelli- 
gent or stupid, in short whether I was destined to be myself. In other 
words, as we have shown elsewhere, the objective body is not the 
true version of the phenomenal body, that is, the true version of the 
body that we live by; it is indeed no more than the latter's im- 
poverished image, so that the problem of the relation of soul to body 
1 We demonstrated this at length in La Structure du Comportement. 

431 



BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE- WORLD 

has nothing to do with the objective body, which exists only con- 
ceptually, but with the phenomenal body. What is true, however, is 
that our open and personal existence rests on an initial foundation of 
acquired and stabilized existence. But it could not be otherwise, if 
we are temporality, since the dialectic of acquisition and future is 
what constitutes time. 

Our replies would be on the same lines to any questions that might 
be raised concerning the world before man's appearance on it. To 
our assertion above that there is no world without an Existence that 
sustains its structure, it might have been retorted that the world 
nevertheless preceded man, that the earth, to all appearances, is the 
only inhabited planet, and that philosophical views are thus shown 
to be incompatible with the most firmly established facts. But in fact, 
it is only intellectualist, abstract reflection which is incompatible with 
misconceived 'facts'. For what precisely is meant by saying that the 
world existed before any human consciousness? An example of what 
is meant is that the earth originally issued from a primitive nebula 
from which the combination of conditions necessary to life was 
absent. But every one of these words, like every equation in physics, 
presupposes our pre-scientific experience of the world, and this refer- 
ence to the world in which we live goes to make up the proposition's 
valid meaning. Nothing will ever bring home to my comprehension 
what a nebula that no one sees could possibly be. Laplace's nebula is 
not behind us, .at our remote beginnings, but in front of us in the 
cultural world. What, in fact, do we mean when we say that there is 
no world without a being in the world ? Not indeed that the world is 
constituted by consciousness, but on the contrary that consciousness 
always finds itself already at work in the world. What is true, taking 
one thing with another, is that there is a nature, which is not that of 
the sciences, but that which perception presents to me, and that even 
the light of consciousness is,, as Heidegger says, lumen naturale, given 
to itself. 

At all events, the critic may continue, the world will outlast me, 
and other men will perceive it when I am no longer here. Now is it 
not impossible for me to conceive, either after me, or even during my 
lifetime, other men in the world, if indeed my presence in the world 
is the condition of the world's possibility? In the perspective of tem- 
poralization, light is thrown on the remarks made above about the 
problem of other selves. We said that in the perception of other selves 
I cover in intention the infinite distance which always stands between 
my subjectivity and another, I overcome the impossibility of con- 
ceiving another for-himself for me, because I witness another be- 
haviour, another presence in the world. Now that we have more 
effectively analysed the notion of presence, linked together presence 

432 



TEMPORALITY 



to oneself and presence in the world, and identified the cogito with 
involvement in the world, we are in a better position to understand 
how we can find others at the intentional origin of their visible be- 
haviour. It is true that the other person will never exist for us as we 
exist ourselves; he is always a lesser figure, and we never feel in him 
as we do in ourselves the thrust of temporalization. But two tempor- 
alities are not mutually exclusive as are two consciousnesses, because 
each one knows itself only by projecting itself into the present where 
they can interweave. As my living present opens upon a past which 
I nevertheless am no longer living through, and on a future which 
I do not yet live, and perhaps never shall, it can also open on to 
temporalities outside my living experience and acquire a social 
horizon, with the result that my world is expanded to the dimensions 
of that collective history which my private existence takes up and 
carries forward. The solution of all problems of transcendence is to 
be sought in the thickness of the pre-objective present, in which 
we find our bodily being, our social being, and the pre-existence of 
the world, that is, the starting point of 'explanations', in so far as 
they are legitimate — and at the same time the basis of our freedom. 



433 



3 

FREEDOM 



AGAIN, it is clear that no causal relationship is conceivable be- 
tween the subject and his body, his world or his society. Only at the 
cost of losing the basis of all my certainties can I question what is 
conveyed to me by my presence to myself. Now the moment I turn to 
myself in order to describe myself, I have a glimpse of an anonymous 
flux, 1 a comprehensive project in which there are so far no 'states of 
consciousness', nor, a fortiori, qualifications of any sort. For myself 
I am neither 'jealous', nor 'inquisitive', nor 'hunchbacked', nor 'a 
civil servant'. It is often a matter of surprise that the cripple or the 
invalid can put up with himself. The reason is that such people are 
not for themselves deformed or at death's door. Until the final coma, 
the dying man is inhabited by a consciousness, he is all that he sees, 
and enjoys this much of an outlet. Consciousness can never objectify 
itself into invalid-consciousness or cripple-consciousness, and even 
if the old man complains of his age or the cripple of his deformity, 
they can do so only by comparing themselves with others, or seeing 
themselves through the eyes of others, that is, by taking a statistical 
and objective view of themselves, so that such complaints are never 
absolutely genuine: when he is back in the heart of his own con- 
sciousness, each one of us feels beyond his limitations and thereupon 
resigns himself to them. They are the price which we automatically 
pay for being in the world, a formality which we take for granted. 
Hence we may speak disparagingly of our looks and still not want to 
change our face for another. No idiosyncrasy can, seemingly, be 
attached to the insuperable generality of consciousness, nor can any 
limit be set to this immeasurable power of escape. In order to be 
determined (in the two senses of that word) by an external factor, it 
is necessary that I should be a thing. Neither my freedom nor my 
universality can admit of any eclipse. It is inconceivable that I should 
be free in certain of my actions and determined in others: how 
1 In the sense in which, with Husscrl, we have taken this word. 
434 



FREEDOM 

should we understand a dormant freedom that gave full scope to 
determinism? And if it is assumed that it is snuffed out when it is not 
in action, how could it be rekindled? If per impossible I had once 
succeeded in making myself into a thing, how should I subsequently 
reconvert myself to consciousness? Once I am free, I am not to be 
counted among things, and I must then be uninterruptedly free. Once 
my actions cease to be mine, I shall never recover them, and if I lose 
my hold on the world, it will never be restored to me. It is equally in- 
conceivable that my liberty should be attenuated; one cannot be to 
some extent free, and if, as is often said, motives incline me in a cer- 
tain direction, one of two things happens: either they are strong 
enough to force me to act, in which case there is no freedom, or else 
they are not strong enough, and then freedom is complete, and as 
great in the worst torments as in the peace of one's home. We ought, 
therefore, to reject not only the idea of causality, but also that of 
motivation. 1 The alleged motive does not burden my decision; on the 
contrary my decision lends the motive its force. Everything that I 
'am' in virtue of nature or history — hunchbacked, handsome or 
Jewish — I never am completely for myself, as we have just explained: 
and I may well be these things for other people, nevertheless I remain 
free to posit another person as a consciousness whose views strike 
through to my very being, or on the other hand merely as an object. 
It is also true that this option is itself a form of constraint: if I am 
ugly, I have the choice between being an object of disapproval or dis- 
approving of others. I am left free to be a masochist or a sadist, but 
not free to ignore others. But this dilemma, which is given as part of 
the human lot, is not one for me as pure consciousness: it is still 
I who makes another to be for me and makes each of us be as human 
beings. Moreover, even if existence as a human being were im- 
posed upon me, the manner alone being left to my choice, and con- 
sidering this choice itself and ignoring the small number of forms it 
might take, it would still be a free choice. If it is said that my tem- 
perament inclines me particularly to either sadism or masochism, it is 
still merely a manner of speaking, for my temperament exists only for 
the second order knowledge that I gain about myself when I see my- 
self as others see me, and in so far as I recognize it, confer value upon 
it, and in that sense, choose it. What misleads us on this, is that we 
often look for freedom in the voluntary deliberation which examines 
one motive after another and seems to opt for the weightiest or most 
convincing. In reality the deliberation follows the decision, and it is 
my secret decision which brings the motives to light, for it would be 
difficult to conceive what the force of a motive might be in the absence 
of a decision which it confirms or to which it runs counter. When I 
1 See J. P. Sartre, VEtre et le Neant, pp. 508 and ff. 
435 



BEING-F0R-1TSELF AND BEING-1N-THE- WORLD 

have abandoned a project, the motives which I thought held me to it 
suddenly lose their force and collapse. In order to resuscitate them, 
an effort is required on my part to reopen time and set me back to the 
moment preceding the making of the decision. Even while I am de- 
liberating, already I find it an effort to suspend time's flow, and to 
keep open a situation which I feel is closed by a decision which is 
already there and which I am holding off. That is why it so often 
happens that after giving up a plan I experience a feeling of relief: 
'After all, I wasn't all that involved'; the debate was purely a matter 
of form, and the deliberation a mere parody, for I had decided 
against from the start. 

We often see the weakness of the will brought forward as an argu- 
ment against freedom. And indeed, although I can will myself to 
adopt a course of conduct and act the part of a warrior or a seducer, 
it is not within my power to be a warrior or seducer with ease and in 
a way that 'comes naturally'; really to be one, that is. But neither 
should we seek freedom in the act of will, which is, in its very mean- 
ing, something short of an act. We have recourse to an act of will 
only in order to go against our true decision, and, as it were, for the 
purpose of proving our powerlessness. If we had really and truly 
made the conduct of the warrior or the seducer our own, then we 
should be one or the other. Even what are called obstacles to freedom 
are in reality deployed by it. An unclimbable rock face, a large or 
small, vertical or slanting rock, are things which have no meaning 
for anyone who is not intending to surmount them, for a subject 
whose projects do not carve out such determinate forms from the 
uniform mass of the in itself and cause an orientated world to arise — 
- a significance in things. There is, then, ultimately nothing that can 
set limits to freedom, except those limits that freedom itself has set in 
the form of its various initiatives, so that the subject has simply the 
external world that he gives himself. Since it is the latter who, on 
coming into being, brings to light significance and value in things, 
and since no thing can impinge upon it except through acquiring, 
thanks to it, significance and value, there is no action of things on 
the subject, but merely a signification (in the active sense), a centrifu- 
gal Sinngebung. The choice would seem to lie between scientism's 
conception of causality, which is incompatible with the consciousness 
which we have of ourselves, and the assertion of an absolute freedom 
divorced from the outside. It is impossible to decide beyond which 
point things cease to be €<£'?7/xir. Either they all lie within our power, 
or none docs. 

The result, however, of this first reflection on freedom would 
appear to be to rule it out altogether. If indeed it is the case that our 
freedom is the same in all our actions, and even in our passions, if it 

436 



FREEDOM 

is not to be measured in terms of our conduct, and if the slave dis- 
plays freedom as much by living in fear as by breaking his chains, 
then it cannot be held that there is such a thing as free action, freedom 
being anterior to all actions. In any case it will not be possible to de- 
clare: 'Here freedom makes its appearance', since free action, in 
order to be discernible, has to stand out against a background of life 
from which it is entirely, or almost entirely, absent. We may say in 
this case that it is everywhere, but equally nowhere. In the name of 
freedom we reject the idea of acquisition, since freedom has become 
a primordial acquisition and, as it were, our state of nature. Since we 
do not have to provide it, it is the gift granted to us of having no gift, 
it is the nature of consciousness v/hich consists in having no nature, 
and in no case can it find external expression or a place in our life. 
The idea of action, therefore, disappears: nothing can pass from us 
to the world, since we are nothing that can be specified, and since the 
non-being which constitutes us could not possibly find its way into 
the world's plenum. There are merely intentions immediately fol- 
lowed by their effects, and we are very near to the Kantian idea of an 
intention which is tantamount to the act, which Scheler countered 
with the argument that the cripple who would like to be able to save 
a drowning man and the good swimmer who actually saves him do 
not have the same experience of autonomy. The very idea of choice 
vanishes, for to choose is to choose something in which freedom sees, 
at least for a moment, a symbol of itself. There is free choice only if 
freedom comes into play in its decision, and posits the situation 
chosen as a situation of freedom. A freedom which has no need to 
be exercised because it is already acquired could not commit itself in 
this way: it knows that the following instant will find it, come what 
may, just as free and just as indeterminate. The very notion of free- 
dom demands that our decision should plunge into the future, that 
something should have been done by it, that the subsequent instant 
should benefit from its predecessor and, though not necessitated, 
should be at least required by it. If freedom is doing, it is necessary 
that what it does should not be immediately undone by a new free- 
dom. Each instant, therefore, must not be a closed world; one in- 
stant must be able to commit its successors and, a decision once taken 
and action once begun, I must have something acquired at my dis- 
posal, I must benefit from my impetus, I must be inclined to carry on, 
and there must be a bent or propensity of the mind. It was Descartes 
who held that conservation demands a power as great as does crea- 
tion; a view which implies a realistic notion of the instant. It is true 
that the instant is not a philosopher's fiction. It is the point at which 
one project is brought to fruition and another begun 1 — the point at 
1 J. ?. Sartre, Vttve et le Neant, p. 544. 
437 



BEING- FOR -ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE- WORLD 

which my gaze is transferred from one end to another, it is the Augen- 
BUck. But this break in time cannot occur unless each of the two 
spans is of a piece. Consciousness, it is said, is, though not atomized 
into instants, at least haunted by the spectre of the instant which it is 
obliged continually to exorcise by a free act. We shall soon see that 
we have indeed always the power to interrupt, but it implies in any 
case a power to begin, for there would be no severance unless freedom 
had taken up its abode somewhere and were preparing to move it. 
Unless there are cycles of behaviour, open situations requiring a cer- 
tain completion and capable of constituting a background to either 
a confirmatory or transformatory decision, we never experience 
freedom. The choice of intelligible character is excluded, not only 
because there is no time anterior to time, but because choice pre- 
supposes a prior commitment and because the idea of an initial 
choice involves a contradiction. If freedom is to have room * in 
which to move, if it is to be describable as freedom, there must be 
something to hold it away from its objectives, it must have a field, 
which means that there must be for it special possibilities, or realities 
which tend to cling to being. As J. P. Sartre himself observes, dream- 
ing is incompatible with freedom because, in the realm, of imagina- 
tion, we have no sooner taken a certain significance as our goal than 
we already believe that we have intuitively brought it into being, in 
short, because there is no obstacle and nothing to do, 1 It is estab- 
lished that freedom is not to be confused with those abstract de- 
cisions of will at grips with motives or passions, for the classical con- 
ception of deliberation is relevant only to a freedom 'in bad faith* 
which secretly harbours antagonistic motives without being prepared 
to act on them, and so itself manufactures the alleged proofs of its 
impotence. We can see, beneath these noisy debates and these fruit- 
less efforts to 'construct' ourselves, the tacit decisions whereby we 
have marked out round ourselves the field of possibility, and it is 
true that nothing is done as long as we cling to these fixed points, 
and everything is easy as soon as we have weighed anchor. This is 
why our freedom is not to be sought in spurious discussion on the 
conflict between a style of life which we have no wish to reappraise 
and circumstances suggestive of another; the real choice is that of 
whole character and our manner of being in the world. But either 
this total choice is never uttered, since it is the silent upsurge of 
our being in the world, in which case it is not clear in what sense it 
could be said to be ours, since this freedom glides over itself and is 
the equivalent of a fate — or else our choice of ourselves is truly a 

* 'avoir du champ'; in this sentence there is a play on the word 'champ' = 
field (Translator's note). 

1 J. P. Sartre, V£tre et ie Neant y p. 562. 

438 



FREEDOM 

choice, a conversion involving our whole existence. In this case, 
however, there is presupposed a previous acquisition which the 
choice sets out to modify and it founds a new tradition: this leads us 
to ask whether the perpetual severance in terms of which we initially 
defined freedom is not simply the negative aspect of our universal 
commitment to a world, and whether our indifference to each deter- 
minate thing does not express merely our involvement in all; whether 
the ready-made freedom from which we started is not reducible to a 
power of initiative, which cannot be transformed into doing without 
taking up some proposition of the world, and whether, in short, 
concrete and actual freedom is not indeed to be found in this ex- 
change. It is true that nothing has significance and value for anyone 
but me and through anyone but me, but this proposition remains in- 
determinate and is still indistinguishable from the Kantian idea of a 
consciousness which 'finds in things only what it has put into them\ 
and from the idealist refutation of realism, as long as we fail to make 
clear how we understand significance and the self. By defining our- 
selves as a universal power of Sinn-Gebung, we have reverted to the 
method of the 'thing without which' and to the analytical reflection 
of the traditional type, which seeks the conditions of possibility 
without concerning itself with the conditions of reality. We must 
therefore resume the analysis of the Sinngebung, and show how it can 
be both centrifugal and centripetal, since it has been established that 
there is no freedom without a field. 

When I say that this rock is unclimbable, it is certain that this 
attribute, like that of being big or little, straight and oblique, and 
indeed like all attributes in general, can be conferred upon it only by 
the project of.climbing it, and by a human presence. It is, therefore, 
freedom which brings into being the obstacles to freedom, so that the 
latter can be set over against it as its bounds. However, it is clear that, 
one ^nd the same project being given, one rock will appear as an 
obstacle, and another, being more negotiable, as a means. My free- 
dom, then, does not so contrive it that this way there is an obstacle, 
and that way a way through, it arranges for there to be obstacles and 
ways through in general ; it does not draw the particular outline of 
this world, but merely lays down its general structures. It may be 
objected that there is no difference; if my freedom conditions the 
structure of the 'there is', that of the 'here' and the 'there', it is present 
wherever these structures arise. We cannot distinguish the quality 
of 'obstacle* from the obstacle itself, and relate one to freedom and 
the other to the world in itself which, without freedom, would be 
merely an amorphous and unnameable mass. It is not, therefore, out- 
side myself that I am able to find a limit to myfreedom. But do I not 
find it in myself? We must indeed distinguish between my express 

439 



BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND BEING -IN-THE- WORLD 

intentions, for example the plan I now make to climb those moun- 
tains, and general intentions which evaluate the potentialities of my 
environment. Whether or not I have decided to climb them, these 
mountains appear high to me, because they exceed my body's power 
to take them in its stride, and, even if I have just read Micromegas, I 
cannot so contrive it that they are small for me. Underlying myself as 
a thinking subject, who am able to take my place at will on Sirius or 
on the earth's surface, there is, therefore, as it were a natural self 
which does not budge from its terrestrial situation and which con- 
stantly adumbrates absolute valuations. What is more, my projects as 
a thinking being are clearly modelled on the latter; if I elect to see 
things from the point of view of Sirius, it is still to my terrestrial 
experience that I must have recourse in order to do so; I may say, for 
example, that the Alps are molehills. In so far as I have hands, feet, 
a body, I sustain around me intentions which are not dependent upon 
my decisions and which affect my surroundings in a way which I do 
not choose. These intentions are general in a double sense: firstly in 
the sense that they constitute a system in which all possible objects 
are simultaneously included; if the mountain appears high and up- 
right, the tree appears small and sloping; and furthermore in the 
sense that they are not simply mine, they originate from other than 
myself, and I am not surprised to find them in all psycho-physical 
subjects organized as I am. Hence, as Gestalt psychology has shown, 
there are for me certain shapes which are particularly favoured, as 
they are for other men, and which are capable of giving rise to a 
psychological science and rigorous laws. The grouping of dots 

is always perceived as six pairs of dots with two millimetres between 
each pair, while one figure is always perceived as a cube, and another 
as a plane mosaic. 1 It is as if, on the hither side of our judgement and 
our freedom, someone were assigning such and such a significance to 
such and such a given grouping. It is indeed true that perceptual 
structures do not always force themselves upon the observer; there 
are some which are ambiguous. But these reveal even more effectively 
the presence within us of spontaneous evaluation: for they are elusive 
shapes which suggest constantly changing meanings to us. Now a 
pure consciousness is capable of anything except being ignorant of 
its intentions, and an absolute freedom cannot choose itself as hesi- 
tant, since that amounts to allowing itself to be drawn in several 
directions, and since, the possibilities being ex hypothesi indebted to 
freedom for all the strength they have, the weight that freedom gives 
to one is thereby withdrawn from the rest. We can break up a shape 

1 See above, p. 263. 
440 



FREEDOM 

by looking at it awry, but this too is because freedom uses the gaze - 
along with its spontaneous evaluations. Without the latter, we 
would not have a world, that is, a collection of things which emerge 
from a background of formlessness by presenting themselves to our 
body as 'to be touched', 'to be taken 1 , 'to be climbed over'. We 
should never be aware of adjusting ourselves to things and reaching 
them where they are, beyond us, but would be conscious only of re- 
stricting our thoughts to the immanent objects of our intentions, and 
we should not be in the world, ourselves implicated in the spectacle 
and, so to speak, intermingled with things, we should simply enjoy 
the spectacle of a universe. It is, therefore, true that there are no 
obstacles in themselves, but the self which qualifies them as such is 
not some acosmic subject; it runs ahead of itself in relation to things 
in order to confer upon them the form of things. There is an auto- 
chthonous significance of the world which is constituted in the deal- 
ings which our incarnate existence has with it, and which provides 
"the ground of every deliberate Sinngebung. , 

This is true not only of an impersonal and, all in all, abstract 
function such as 'external perception'. There is something com- 
parable present in all evaluations. It has been perceptively remarked 
that pain and fatigue can never be regarded as causes which 'act' 
upon my liberty, and that, in so far as I may experience either at 
any given moment, they do not have their origin outside me, but 
always have a significance and express my attitude towards the world. 
Pain makes me give way and say what I ought to have kept to myself, 
fatigue makes me break my journey. We all know the moment at 
which we decide no longer to endure pain or fatigue, and when, 
simultaneously, they become intolerable in fact. Tiredness does not 
halt my companion, because he likes the clamminess of his body, 
the heat of the road and the sun, in short, because he likes to feel 
himself in the midst of things, to feel their rays converging upon 
him, to be the cynosure of all this light, and an object of touch for the 
earth's crust. My own fatigue brings me to a halt because I dislike it, 
because I have chosen differently my manner of being in the world, 
because, for instance, I endeavour, not to be in nature, but rather to 
win the recognition of others. I am free in relation to fatigue to pre- 
cisely the extent that I am free in relation to my being in the world, 
free to make my way by transforming it. 1 But here once more we 
must recognize a sort of sedimentation of our life: an attitude to- 
wards the world, when it has received frequent confirmation, acquires 
a favoured status for us. Yet since freedom does not tolerate any 
motive in its path, my habitual being in the world is at each moment 
equally precarious, and the complexes which I have allowed to 
1 J. P. Sartre, CEtre et le Neant, pp. 531 and ff. 
441 



BEING -FOR- ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE-WORtb 

develop over the years always remain equally soothing, and the free 
act can with no difficulty blow them sky-high. However, having 
built our life upon an inferiority complex which has been operative 
for twenty years, it is not probable that we shall change. It is clear 
what a summary rationalism might say in reply to such a hybrid 
notion: there are no degrees of possibility; either the free act is no 
longer possible, or it is still possible, in which case freedom is com- 
plete. In short, 'probable' is meaningless. It is a notion belonging to 
statistical thought, which is not thought at all, since it does not con- 
cern any particular thing actually existing, any moment of time, any 
concrete event. 'It is improbable that Paul will give up writing bad 
books' means nothing, since Paul may well decide to write no more 
such books. The probable is everywhere and nowhere, a reified 
fiction, with only a psychological existence; it is not an ingredient of 
the world. And yet we have already met it a little while ago in the 
perceived world. The mountain is great or small to the extent that, 
as a perceived thing, it is to be found in the field of my possible 
actions, and in relation to a level which is not only that of my in- 
dividual life, but that of 'any man'. Generality and probability are 
not fictions, but phenomena; we must therefore find a phenomeno- 
logical basis for statistical thought. It belongs necessarily to a being 
which is fixed, situated and surrounded by things in the world. 'It is 
improbable' that I should at this moment destroy an inferiority 
complex in which I have been content to live for twenty years. That 
means that I have committed myself to inferiority, that I have made 
it my abode, that this past, though not a*fate, has at least a specific 
weight and is not a set of events over there, at a distance from me, 
but the atmosphere of my present. The rationalist's dilemma: either 
the free act is possible, or it is not — either the event originates in me 
or is imposed on mc from outside, does not apply to our relations 
with the world and with our past. Our freedom does not destroy our 
situation, but gears itself to it : as long as wc are alive, our situation is 
open, which implies both that it calls up specially favoured modes of 
resolution, and also that it is powerless to bring one into being by 
itself. 

We shall arrive at the same result by considering our relations with 
history. Taking myself in my absolute concreteness, as I am pre- 
sented to myself in reflection, I find that I am an anonymous and 
pre-human flux, as yet unqualified as, for instance, 'a working man' 
or 'middle class'. If 1 subsequently think of myself as a man among 
men, a bourgeois among bourgeois, this can be, it would seem, no 
more than a second order view of myself; I am never in my heart of 
hearts a worker or a bourgeois, but a consciousness which freely 
evaluates itself as a middle class or proletarian consciousness. And 

442 



FREEDOM 

indeed, it is never the case that my objective position in the production 
process is sufficient to awaken class consciousness. There was ex- 
ploitation long before there were revolutionaries. Nor is it always in 
periods of economic difficulty that the working class movement 
makes headway. Revolt is, then, not the outcome of objective condi 
tions, but it is rather the decision taken by the worker to will revolu- 
tion that makes a proletarian of him. The evaluation of the present 
operates through one's free project for the future. From which we 
might conclude that history by itself has no significance, but only 
that conferred upon it by our will. Yet here again we are slipping into 
the method of 'the indispensable condition failing which . . .': in 
opposition to objective thought, which includes the subject in its 
deterministic system, we set idealist reflection which makes deter- 
minism dependent upon the constituting activity of the subject. 
Now, we have already seen that objective thought and analytical' re- 
flection are two aspects of the same mistake, two ways of overlooking 
the phenomena. Objective thought derives class consciousness from 
the objective condition of the proletariat. Idealist reflection reduces 
the proletarian condition to the awareness of it, which the proletarian 
arrives at. The former traces class-consciousness to the class defined 
in terms of objective characteristics, the latter on the other hand re- 
duces *being a workman' to the consciousness of being one. In each 
case we are in the realm of abstraction, because we remain torn be- 
tween the in itself and the for itself If we approach the question 
afresh with the idea of discovering, not the causes of the act of be- 
coming aware, for there is no cause which can act from outside upon 
a consciousness — nor the conditions of its possibility, for we need to 
know the conditions which actually produce it — but class-conscious- 
ness itself, if, in short, we apply a genuinely existential method, what 
do we find? I am not conscious of being working class or middle 
class simply because, as a matter of fact, I sell my labour or, equally 
as a matter of fact, because my interests are bound up with capitalism, 
nor do I become one or the other on the day on which I elect to view 
history in the light of the class struggle: what happens is that 4 1 exist 
as working class 1 or 'I exist as middle class' in the first place, and it is 
this mode of dealing with the world and society which provides both 
the motives for my revolutionary or conservative projects and my 
explicit judgements of the type: 'I am working class' or 'I am middle 
class', without its being possible to deduce the former from the latter, 
or vice versa. What makes me a proletarian is not the economic sys- 
tem or society considered as systems of impersonal forces, but these 
institutions as I carry them within me and experience them ; nor is it 
an intellectual operation devoid of motive, but my way of being in 
the world within this institutional framework. 

443 



BEING -FOR- ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE- WORLD 

Let us suppose that I have a certain style of living, being at the 
mercy of booms and slumps, not being free to do as I like, receiving a 
weekly wage, having no control over either the conditions or the 
products of my work, and consequently feeling a stranger in my 
factory, my nation and my life. I have acquired the habit of reckoning 
with a fatum, or appointed order, which I do not respect, but which I 
have to humour. Or suppose that I work as a day-labourer, having 
no farm of my own, no tools, going from one farm to another hiring 
myself out at harvest time; in that case I have the feeling that there is 
some anonymous power hovering over me and making a nomad of 
me, even though I want to settle into a regular job. Or finally suppose 
I am the tenant of a farm to which the owner has had no electricity 
laid on, though the mains are less than two hundred yards away. I 
have, for my family and myself, only one habitable room, although it 
would be easy to make other rooms available in the house. My fellow 
workers in factory or field, or other farmers, do the same work as I do 
in comparable conditions; we co-exist in the same situation and feel 
alike, not in virtue of some comparison, as if each one of us lived 
primarily within himself, but on the basis of our tasks and gestures. 
These situations do, not imply any express evaluation, and if there is 
a tacit evaluation, it represents the thrust of a freedom devoid of any 
project against unknown obstacles ; one cannot in any case talk about 
a choice, for in all three cases it is enough that I should be born into 
the world and that I exist in order to experience my life as full of 
difficulties and constraints — I do not choose so to experience it. But 
this state of affairs can persist without my becoming class-conscious, 
understanding that I am of the proletariat and becoming a revolu- 
tionary. How then am I to make this change? The worker learns that 
other workers in a different trade have, after striking, obtained a 
wage-increase, and notices that subsequently wages have gone up in 
his own factory. The appointed order with which he was at grips is 
beginning to take on a clearer shape. The day-labourer who has not 
often seen workers in regular employment, who is not like them and 
has little love for them, sees the price of manufactured goods and the 
cost of living going up, and becomes aware that he can no longer earn 
a livelihood. He may at this point blame town workers, in which case 
class-consciousness will not make its appearance. If it does, it is not 
because the day-labourei has decided to become a revolutionary and 
consequently confers a value upon his actual condition; it is because 
he has perceived, in a concrete way, that his life is synchronized with 
the life of the town labourers and that all share a common lot. The 
small farmer who does not associate himself with the day-labourers, 
still less with the town labourers, being separated from them by a 
whole world of customs and value judgements, nevertheless feels that 

444 



FREEDOM 

he is on the same side as the journeyman when he pays them an 
inadequate wage, and he even feels that he has something in common 
with the town workers when he learns that the farm owner is chair- 
man of the board of directors of several industrial concerns. Social 
space begins to acquire a magnetic field, and a region of the ex- 
ploited is seen to appear. At every pressure felt from any quarter of 
the social horizon, the process of regrouping becomes clearly dis- 
cernible beyond ideologies and various occupations. Class is coming 
into being, and we say that a situation is revolutionary when the con- 
nection objectively existing between the sections of the proletariat 
(the connection, that is, which an absolute observer would recognize 
as so existing) is finally experienced in perception as a common 
obstacle to the existence of each and every one. It is not at all neces- 
sary that at any single moment a representation of revolution should 
arise. For example, it is doubtful whether the Russian peasants of 
1917 expressly envisaged revolution and the transfer of property. 
Revolution arises day by day from the concatenation of less remote 
and mere remote ends. It is not necessary that each member of the 
proletariat should think of himself as such, in the sense that a Marxist 
theoretician gives to the word. It is sufficient that the journeyman or 
the farmer should feel that he is on the march towards a certain cross- 
roads, to which the road trodden by the town labourers also leads. 
Both find their journey's end in revolution, which would perhaps 
have terrified them had it been described and represented to them in 
advance. One might say at the most that revolution is at the end of 
the road they have taken and in their projects in the form of 'things 
must change', which each one experiences concretely in his dis- 
tinctive difficulties and in the depths of his particular prejudices. 
Neither the appointed order, nor the free act which destroys it, is 
represented; they are lived through in ambiguity. This does not mean 
that workers and peasants bring about revolution without being 
aware of it, and that we have here blind, 'elementary forces' cleverly 
exploited by a few shrewd agitators. It is possibly in this light that the 
prefect of police will view history. But such ways of seeing things do 
not help him when faced with a genuine revolutionary situation, in 
which the slogans of the alleged agitators are immediately under- 
stood, as if by some pre-established harmony, and meet with con- 
currence on all sides, because they crystallize what is latent in the 
life of all productive workers. The revolutionary movement, like the 
work of the artist, is an intention which itself creates its instruments 
and its means of expression. The revolutionary project is not the re- 
sult of a deliberate judgement, or the explicit positing of an end. It is 
these things in the case of the propagandist, because the propagandist 
has been trained by the intellectual, or, in the case of the intellectual, 

445 



BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE- WORLD 

because he regulates his life on the basis of his thoughts. But it does 
not cease to be the abstract decision of a thinker and become a 
historical reality until it is worked out in the dealings men have with 
each other, and in the relations of the man to his job. It is, therefore, 
true that I recognize myself as a wprker or a bourgeois on the day I 
take my stand in relation to a possible revolution, and that this taking 
of a stand is not the outcome, through some mechanical causality, of 
my status as workman or bourgeois (which is why all classes have 
their traitors), but neither is it an unwarranted evaluation, instan- 
taneous and unmotivated ; it is prepared by some molecular process, 
it matures in co-existence before bursting forth into words and being 
related to objective ends. One is justified in drawing attention to the 
fact that it is not the greatest poverty which produces the most clear- 
sighted revolutionaries, but one forgets to ask why a return of 
prosperity frequently brings with it a more radical mood among the 
masses. It is because the easing of living conditions makes a fresh 
structure of social space possible: the horizon is not restricted to the 
most immediate concerns, there is economic play and room for a 
new project in relation to living. This phenomenon does not, then, go 
to prove that the worker makes himself into worker and revolution- 
ary ex nihilo, but on the contrary that he does so on a certain basis of 
co-existence. The mistake inherent in the conception under dis- 
cussion is, in general, that of disregarding all but intellectual projects, 
instead of considering the existential project, which is the polarization 
of a life towards a goal which is both determinate and indeterminate, 
which, to the person concerned, is entirely unrepresented, and which 
is recognized only on being attained. Intentionality is brought down 
to the particular cases of the objectifying acts, the proletarian condi- 
tion is made an object of thought, and no difficulty is experienced in 
showing, in accordance with idealism's permanent method, that, like 
every other object of thought, it subsists only before and through the 
consciousness which constitutes it as an object. Idealism (like objec- 
tive thought) bypasses true intentionality, which is at its' object 
rather than positing it. Idealism overlooks the interrogative, the 
subjunctive, the aspiration, the expectation, the positive indeter- 
minacy of these modes of consciousness, for it is acquainted 
only with consciousness in the present or future indicative, which 
is why it fails to account for class. For class is a matter neither 
for observation nor decree; like the appointed order of the capi- 
talistic system, like revolution, before being thought it is lived 
through as an obsessive presence, as possibility, enigma and myth. 
To make class-consciousness the outcome of a decision and a 
choice is to say that problems are solved on the day they are posed, 
that every question already contains the reply that it awaits; it is, in 

446 



FREEDOM 

short, to revert to immanence and abandon the attempt to under- 
stand history. In reality, the intellectual project and the positing of 
ends are merely the bringing to completion of an existential project. 
It is I who give a direction, significance and future to my life, but that 
does not mean that these are concepts; they spring from my present 
and past and in particular from my mode of present and past co- 
existence. Even in the case of the intellectual who turns revolutionary, 
his decision does not arise ex nihilo; it may follow upon a prolonged 
period of solitude: the intellectual is in search of a doctrine which 
shall make great demands on him and cure him of his subjectivity; 
or he may yield to the clear light thrown by a Marxist interpretation 
of history, in which case he has given knowledge pride of place in his 
life, and that in itself is understandable only in virtue of his past and 
his childhood. Even the decision to become a revolutionary without 
motive, and by an act of pure freedom would express a certain way of 
being in the natural and social world, which is typically that of the 
intellectual. He 'throws in his lot -with the working class' from the 
starting point of his situation as an intellectual and from nowhere 
else (and this is why even fideism, in his case, remains rightly suspect). 
Now with the worker it is a fortiori the case that his decision is 
elaborated in the course of his life. This time it is through no mis- 
understanding that the horizon of a particular life and revolutionary 
aims coincide: for the worker revolution is a more immediate possi- 
bility, and one closer to his own interests than for the intellectual, 
since he is at grips with the economic system in his very life. For this 
reason there are, statistically, more workers than middle class people 
in a revolutionary party. Motivation, of course, does not do away 
with freedom. Working class parties of the most unmistakable kind 
have had m?ny intellectuals among their leaders, and it is likely that 
a man such as Lenin identified himself with revolution and eventually 
transcended the distinction between intellectual and worker. But 
these are the virtues proper to action and commitment; at the outset, 
I am not an individual beyond class, I am situated in a social en- 
vironment, and my freedom, though it may have the power to com- 
mit me elsewhere, has not the power to transform me instantane- 
ously into what I decide to be. Thus to be a bourgeois or a worker is 
not only to be aware of being one or the other, it is to identify one- 
self as worker or bourgeois through an implicit or existential project 
which merges into our way of patterning the world and co-existing 
with other people. My decision draws together a spontaneous mean- 
ing of my life which it may confirm or repudiate, but not annul. Both 
idealism and objective thinking fail to pin down the coming into being 
of class consciousness, the former because it deduces actual existence 
from consciousness, the latter because it derives consciousness from 

447 



BEING -FOR- ITSELF AND BEING - I N-THE- WORLD 

de facto existence, and both because they overlook the relationship 
of motivation. 

It will perhaps be objected, from the idealist side, that I am not, 
for myself, a particular project, but a pure consciousness, and that 
the attributes of bourgeois or worker belong to me only to the extent 
that I place myself among others, and see myself through their eyes, 
from the outside, as 'another'. Here we should have categories of For 
Others and not For Oneself. But if there were two sorts of categories, 
how could I have the experience of another, that is, of an alter egol 
This experience presupposes that already my view of myself is half- 
way to having the quality of a possible 'other', and that in my view of 
another person is implied his quality as ego. It will be replied that the 
other person is given to me as a fact, and not as a possibility of my 
own being. What is meant by this? Is it that I should not have the 
experience of other men if there were none on the earth's surface? 
The proposition is self-evidently true, but does not solve our problem 
since, as Kant has already said, we cannot pass from 'All knowledge 
begins with experience' to 'All knowledge derives from experience*. 
If the other people who empirically exist are to be, for me, other 
people, I must have a means of recognizing them, and the structures 
of the For Another must, therefore, already be the dimensions of the 
For Oneself. Moreover, it is impossible to derive from the For 
Another all the specifications of which we are speaking. Another per- 
son is not necessarily, is not even ever quite an object for me. And, in 
sympathy for example, I can perceive another person as bare exist- 
ence and freedom as much or as little as myself. The-other-person-as- 
object is nothing but an insincere modality of others, just as absolute 
subjectivity is nothing but an abstract notion of myself. I must, 
therefore, in the most radical reflection, apprehend around my 
absolute individuality a kind of halo of generality or a kind of atmo- 
sphere of 'sociality'. This is necessary if subsequently the words 'a 
bourgeois' and 'a man' are to be able to assume meaning for me. I 
must apprehend myself immediately as centred in a way outside my- 
self, and my individual existence must diffuse round itself, so to 
speak, an existence in quality. The For-Themselves — me for myself 
and the other for himself— must stand out against a background of 
For Others — I for the other and the other for me. My life must have a 
significance which I do not constitute; there must strictly speaking 
be an intersubjectivity; each one of us must be both anonymous in 
the sense of absolutely individual, and anonymous in the sense of 
absolutely general. Our being in the world, is the concrete bearer of 
this double anonymity. 

Provided that this is so, there can be situations, a direction* of 
* 'sens' (Translator's note). 
448 



FREEDOM 



history, and a historical truth: three ways of saying the same thing. 
If indeed I made myself into a worker or a bourgeois by an absolute 
initiative, and if in general terms nothing ever courted our freedom, 
history would display no structure, no event wouid be seen to take 
shape in it, and anything might emerge from anything else. There 
would be no British Empire as a relatively stable historical form to 
which a name can be given, and in which certain probable properties 
are recognizable. There would not be, in the history of social progress, 
revolutionary situations or periods of set-back. A social revolution 
would bz equally possible at any moment, and one might reasonably 
expect a despot to undergo conversion to anarchism. History would 
never move in any direction, nor would it be possible to say that even 
over a short period of time events were conspiring to produce any 
definite outcome. The statesman would always be an adventurer, 
that is to say, he would turn events to his own advantage by confer- 
ring upon them a meaning which they did not have. Now if it is true 
that history is powerless to complete anything independently of 
consciousnesses which assume it and thereby decide its course, and if 
consequently it can never be detached from us to play the part of an 
alien force using us for its own ends, then precisely because it is always 
history lived through we cannot withhold from it at least a fragmentary 
meaning. Something is being prepared which will perhaps come to 
nothing but which may, for the moment, conform to the adumbrations 
of the present. Nothing can so order it that, in the France of 1799, a 
military power 'above classes' should not appear as a natural product 
of the ebb of revolution, and that the role of military dictator should 
not here be 'a part that has to be played'. It is Bonaparte's project, 
known to us through its realization, which causes us to pass such a 
judgement. But before Bonaparte, Dumouriez, Custine and others 
had envisaged it, and this common tendency has to be accounted for. 
What is known as the significance of events is not an idea which pro- 
duces them, or the fortuitous result of their occurring together. It 
is the concrete project of a future which is elaborated within social 
coexistence and in the One* before any personal decision is made. 
At the point of revolutionary history to which class dynamics had 
carried it by 1799, when neither the Revolution could be carried for- 
ward nor the clock put back, the situation was such that, all due 
reservations as to individual freedom having been made, each in- 
dividual, through the functional and generalized existence which 
makes a historical subject of him, tended to fall back upon what had 
been acquired. It would have been a historical mistake at that stage to 
suggest to them either a resumption of the methods of revolutionary 
government or a reversion to the social conditions of 1789, not 

* In the sense of das Man y the impersonal pronoun (Translator's note). 

449 



BEING-F0R-1TSELF AND BEING-1N-THE- WORLD 

because there is a truth of history independent of our projects and 
evaluations, which are always free, but because there h an average 
and statistical significance of these projects. Which means that we 
confer upon history its significance, but not without its putting that 
significance forward itself. TJie Sinqgebung is not merely centrifugal, 
which is why the subject of history is not the individual. There is an 
exchange between generalized and individuarexistence, each receiv- 
ing and giving something. There is a moment at which the significance 
which was foreshadowed in the One, and which was merely a pre- 
carious possibility threatened by the contingency of history, is taken 
up by an individual. It may well happen that now, having taken com- 
mand of history, he leads it, for a time at least, far beyond what 
seemed to comprise its significance, and involves it in a fresh dia- 
lectic, as when Bonaparte, from being Consul, made himself Emperor 
and conqueror. We are not asserting that history from end to end has 
only one meaning, any more than has an individual life. We mean 
simply that in any case freedom modifies it only by taking up the 
meaning which history was offering at the moment in question, and 
by a kind of unobtrusive assimilation. On the strength of this pro- 
posal made by the present, the adventurer can be distinguished from 
the statesman, historical imposture from the truth of an epoch, with 
the result that our assessment of the past, though never arriving at 
absolute objectivity, is at the same time never entitled to be arbitrary. 

We therefore recognize, around our initiatives and around that 
strictly individual project which is oneself, a zone of generalized 
existence and of projects already formed, significances which trail 
between ourselves and things and which confer upon us the quality of 
man, bourgeois or worker. Already generality intervenes, already our 
presence to ourselves is mediated by it and we cease to be pure con- 
sciousness, as soon as the natural or social constellation ceases to be 
an unformulated this and crystallizes into a situation, as soon as it 
has a meaning — in short, as soon as we exist. Every thing appears to 
us through a medium to which it lends its own fundamental quality; 
this piece of wood is neither a collection of colours and tactile data, 
not even their total Gestalt, but something from which there emanates 
a woody essence; these 'sensory givens' modulate a certain theme or 
illustrate a certain style which is the wood itself, and which creates, 
round this piece of wood and the perception I have of it, a horizon of 
significance. The natural world, as we have seen, is nothing other 
than the place of all possible themes and styles. It is indissolubly an 
unmatched individual and a significance. Correspondingly, the 
generality and the individuality of the subject, subjectivity qualified 
and pure, the anonymity of the One and the anonymity of conscious- 
ness are not two conceptions of the subject between which philosophy 

450 



FREEDOM 

has to choose, but two stages of a unique structure which is the con- 
crete subject. Let us consider, for example, sense experience. I lose 
myself in this red which is before me, without in any way qualifying 
it, and it seems that this experience brings me into contact with a 
pre-human subject. Who perceives this red? It is nobody who can be 
named and placed among other perceiving subjects. For, between 
this experience of red which I have, and that about which other 
people speak to me, no direct comparison will ever be possible. I am 
here in my own point of view, and since all experience, in so far as it 
derives from impression, is in the same way strictly my own, it seems 
that a unique and unduplicated subject enfolds them all. Suppose I 
formulate a thought, the God of Spinoza, for example; this thought 
as it is in my living experience is a certain landscape to which no one 
will ever have access, even if, moreover, I manage to enter into a dis- 
cussion with a friend on the subject of Spinoza's God. However, the 
very individuality of these experiences is not quite unadulterated. For 
the thickness of this red, its thisness, the power it has of reaching me 
and saturating me, are attributable to the fact that it requires and 
obtains from my gaze a certain vibration, and imply that I am 
familiar with a world of colours of which this one is a particular 
variation. The concrete colour red, therefore, stands out against a 
background of generality, and this is why, even without transferring 
myself to another's point of view, I grasp myself in perception as a 
perceiving subject, and not as unclassifiable consciousness. I feel, all 
round my perception of red, all the regions of my being unaffected by 
it, and that region set aside for colours, 'vision', through which the 
perception finds its way into me. Similarly my thought about the 
God of Spinoza is only apparently a strictly unique experience, for it 
is the concretion of a certain cultural world, the Spinozist philosophy, 
or of a certain philosophic style in which I immediately recognize a 
'Spinozist' idea. There is therefore no occasion to ask ourselves why 
the thinking subject or consciousness perceives itself as a man, or an 
incarnate or historical subject, nor must we treat this apperception as 
a second order operation which it somehow performs starting from 
its absolute existence: the absolute flow takes shape beneath its own 
gaze as 'a consciousness', or a man, or an incarnate subject, because 
it is a field of presence — to itself, to others and to the world — and 
because this presence throws it into the natural and cultural world 
from which it arrives at an understanding of itself. We must not en- 
visage this flux as absolute contact with oneself, as an absolute 
density with no internal fault, but on the contrary as a being which is 
in pursuit of itself outside. If the subject made a constant and at all 
times peculiar choice of himself, one might wonder why his experi- 
ence always ties up with itself and presents him with objects and 

451 



BE1NG-FOR- ITSELF AND BEING -I N-THE- WORLD 

definite liistorical phases, why we have a general notion of time valid 
through all times, and why finally the experience of each one of us 
links up with that of others. But it is the question itself which must be 
questioned: for what is given, is not one fragment of time followed by 
another, one individual flux, then another; it is the taking up of each 
subjectivity by itself, and of subjectivities by each other in the general- 
ity of a single nature, the cohesion of an intersubjective life and a 
world. The present mediates between the For Oneself and the For 
Others, between individuality and generality. True reflection presents 
me to myself not as idle and inaccessible subjectivity, but as identical 
with my presence in the world and to others, as I am now realizing it: 
I am all that I see, I am an intersubjective field, not despite my body 
and historical situation, but, on the contrary, by being this body and 
this situation, and through them, all the rest. 

What, then, becomes of the freedom we spoke about at the outset, 
if this point of view is taken? I can no longer pretend to be a cipher, 
and to choose myself continually from the starting point of nothing 
at all. If it is through subjectivity that nothingness appears in the 
world, it can equally be said that it is through the world that nothing- 
ness comes into being. I am a general refusal to be anything, accom- 
panied surreptitiously by a continual acceptance of such and such a 
qualified form of being. For even this general refusal is still one manner 
of being, and has its place in the world. It is true that I can at any mo- 
ment interrupt my projects. But what is this power? It is the power to 
begin something else, for we never remain suspended in nothingness. 
We are always in a plenum, in being, ju?t as a face, even in repose, 
even in death, is always doomed to express something (there are 
people whose faces, in death, bear expressions of surprise, or peace, 
or discretion), and just as silence is still a modality of the world of 
sound. I may defy all accepted form, and spurn everything, for there 
is no case in which I am utterly committed: but in this case I do not 
withdraw into my freedom, I commit myself elsewhere. Instead of 
thinking about my bereavement, I look at my nails, or have lunch, or 
engage in politics. Far from its being the case that my freedom is 
always unattended, it is never without an accomplice, and its power of 
perpetually tearing itself away finds its fulcrum in my universal com- 
mitment in the world. My actual freedom is not on the hither side of 
my being, but before me, in things. We must not say that I continu- 
ally choose myself, on the excuse that I might continually refuse what 
1 am. Not to refuse is not the same thing as to choose. We could 
identify drift and action only by depriving the implicit of all pheno- 
menal value, and at every instant arraying the world before us in per- 
fect transparency, that is, by destroying the world's 'worldliness'. 
Consciousness holds itself responsible for everything, and takes 

452 



FREEDOM 

everything upon itself, but it has nothing of its own and makes its 
life in the world. We are led to conceive freedom as a choice continu- 
ally remade as long as we do not bring in the notion of a generalized 
or natural time. We have seen that there is no natural time, if we 
understand thereby a time of things without subjectivity. There is, 
however, at least a generalized time, and this is what the common no- 
tion of time envisages. It is the perpetual reiteration of the sequence 
of past, f present and future. It is, as it were, a constant disappoint- 
ment and failure. This is what is expressed by saying that it is con- 
tinuous: the present which it brings to us is never a present for good, 
since it is already over when it appears, and the future has, in it, only 
the appearance of a goal towards which we make our way, since it 
quickly comes into the present, whereupon we turn towards a fresh 
future. This time is the time of our bodily functions, which like it, are 
cyclic, and it is also that of nature with which we co-exist. It offers us 
only the adumbration and the abstract form of a commitment, since 
it continually erodes itself and undoes that which it has just done. As 
long as we place in opposition, with no mediator, the For Itself and 
the In Itself, and fail to perceive, between ourselves and the world, 
this natural foreshadowing of a subjectivity, this prepersonal time 
which rests upon itself, acts are needed to sustain the upsurge of time, 
and everything becomes equally a matter of choice, the respiratory 
reflex no less than the moral decision, conservation no less than 
creation. As far as we are concerned, consciousness attributes this 
power of universal constitution to itself only if it ignores the event 
which upholds it and is the occasion of its birth. A consciousness for 
which the world 'can be taken for granted', which finds it 'already 
constituted* and present even in consciousness itself, does not 
absolutely choose either its being or its manner of being. 

What then is freedom? To be born is both to be born of the world 
and to be born into the world. The world is already constituted, but 
also never completely constituted; in the first case we are acted upon, 
in the second we are open to an infinite number of possibilities. But 
this analysis is still abstract, for we exist in both ways at once. There 
is, therefore, never determinism and never absolute choice, I am 
never a thing and never bare consciousness. In fact, even our own 
pieces of initiative, even the situations which we have chosen, bear 
us on, once they have been entered ypon by virtue of a state rather 
than an act. The generality of the 'role* and of the situation comes to 
the aid of decision, and in this exchange between the situation and 
the person who takes it up, it is impossible to determine precisely the 
'share contributed by the situation' and the 'share contributed by 
freedom*. Let us suppose that a man is tortured to make him talk. 
If he refuses to give the names and addresses which it is desired to 

453 



BEING-FOR-ITSELF AND BEING-IN-THE- WORLD 

extract from him, this does not arise from a solitary and unsupported 
decision: the man still feels himself to be with his comrades, and, 
being still involved in the common struggle, he is as it were incapable 
of talking. Or else, for months or years, he has, in his mind, faced this 
test and staked his whole life upon it. Or finally, he wants to prove, 
by coming through it, what he has always thought and said about 
freedom. These motives do not cancel out freedom, but at least en- 
sure that it does not go unbuttressed in being. What withstands pain 
is not, in short, a bare consciousness, but the prisoner with his com- 
rades or with those he loves and under whose gaze he lives ; or else the 
awareness of his proudly willed solitude, which again is a certain 
mode of the Mit-Sein. And probably the individual in his prison 
daily reawakens these phantoms, which give back to him the strength 
he gave to them. But conversely, in so far as he has committed him- 
self to this action, formed a bond with his comrades or adopted this 
morality, it is because the historical situation, the comrades, the 
world around him seemed to him to expect that conduct from him. 
The analysis could be pursued endlessly in this way. We choose our 
world and the world chooses us. What is certain, in any case, is that 
we can at no time set aside within ourselves a redoubt to which being 
does not find its way through, without seeing this freedom, immedi- 
ately and by the very fact of being a living experience, take on the 
appearance of being and become a motive and a buttress. Taken con- 
cretely, freedom is always a meeting of the inner and the outer — even 
the prehuman and prehistoric freedom with which we began — and it 
shrinks without ever disappearing altogether in direct proportion to 
the lessening of the tolerance allowed by the bodily and institutional 
data of our lives. There is, as Husserl says, on the one hand a 'field of 
freedom' and on the other a 'conditioned freedom'; 1 not that free- 
dom is absolute within the limits of this field and non-existent outside 
it (like the perceptual field, this one has no traceable boundaries), 
but because I enjoy immediate and remote possibilities. Our commit- 
ments sustain our power and there is no freedom without some 
power. Our freedom, it is said, is either total or non-existent. This 
dilemma belongs to objective thought and its stable-companion, 
analytical reflection. If indeed we place ourselves within being, it must 
necessarily be the case that our actions must have their origin outside 
us, and if we revert to constituting consciousness, they must originate 
within. But we have learnt precisely to recognize the order of phe- 
nomena. We arc involved in the world and with others in an in- 
extricable tangle. The idea of situation rules out absolute freedom at 
the source of our commitments, and equally, indeed, at their terminus. 
No commitment, not even commitment in the Hegelian State, can 
1 Fink, Vergegenwiirtigung und Bild, p. 285. 
454 



FREEDOM 



make me leave behind all differences and free me for anything. This 
universality itself, from the mere fact of its being experienced, would 
stand out as a particularity against the world's background, for exis- 
tence both generalizes and particularizes everything at which it aims, 
and cannot ever be finally complete. 

The synthesis of in itself and for itself which brings Hegelian free- 
dom into being has, however, its truth. In a sense, it is the very 
definition of existence, since it is effected at every moment before our 
eyes in the phenomenon of presence, only to be quickly re-enacted, 
since it does not conjure away our finitude. By taking up a present, I 
draw together and transform my past, altering its significance, freeing 
and detaching myself from it. But I do so only by committing myself 
somewhere else. Psychoanalytical treatment does not bring about its 
cure by producing direct awareness of the past, but in the first place 
by binding the subject to his doctor through new existential relation- 
ships. It is not a matter of giving scientific assent to the psychoanalyt- 
ical interpretation, and discovering a notional significance for the 
past; it is a matter of reliving this or that as significant, and this the 
patient succeeds in doing only by seeing his past in the perspective of 
his co-existence with the doctor. The complex is not dissolved by a 
non-instrumental freedom, but rather displaced by a new pulsation 
of time with its own supports and motives. The same applies in all 
cases of coming to awareness: they are real only if they are sustained 
by a new commitment. Now this commitment too is entered into in 
the sphere of the implicit, and is therefore valid only for a certain 
temporal cycle. The choice which we make of our life is always based 
on a certain givenness. My freedom can draw life away from its 
spontaneous course, but only by a series of unobtrusive deflections 
which necessitate first of all following its course — not by any abso- 
lute creation. All explanations of my conduct in terms of my past, my 
temperament and my environment are therefore true, provided that 
they be regarded not as separable contributions, but as moments of 
my total being, the significance of which I am entitled to make ex- 
plicit in various ways, without its ever being possible to say whether 
I confer their meaning upon them or receive it from them. I am a 
psychological arid historical structure, and have received, with 
existence, a manner of existing, a style. All my actions and thoughts 
stand in a relationship to this structure, and even a philosopher's 
thought is merely a way of making explicit his hold on the world, 
and what he is. The fact remains that I am free, not in spite of, or on 
the hither side of, these motivations, but by means of them. For this 
significant life, this certain significance of nature and history which 
I am, does not limit my access to the world, but on the contrary is 
my means of entering into communication with it. It is by being 

455 



BEING -FOR-ITSELF AND BEING -IN-THE- WORLD 

unrestrictedly and unreservedly what I am at present that I have a 
chance of moving forward; it is by living my time that I am able to 
understand other times, by plunging into the present and the world, 
by taking on deliberately what I am fortuitously, by willing what I 
will and doing what I do, that I can go further. I can miss being free 
only if I try to bypass my natural and social situation by refusing to 
take it up, in the first place, instead of assuming it in order to join up 
with the natural and human world. Nothing determines me from out- 
side, not because nothing acts upon me, but, on the contrary, because 
I am from the start outside myself and open to the world. We are true 
through and through, and have with us, by the mere fact of belonging 
to the world, and not merely being in the world in the way that 
things are, all that we need to transcend ourselves. We need have no 
fear that our choices or actions restrict our liberty, since choice and 
action alone cut us loose from our anchorage. Just as reflection bor- 
rows its wish for absolute sufficiency from the perception which 
causes a thing to appear, and as in this way idealism tacitly uses that 
primary opinion* which it would like to destroy as opinion, so free- 
dom flounders in the contradictions of commitment, and fails to 
realize that, without the roots which it thrusts into the world, it 
would not be freedom at all. Shall I make this promise? Shall I risk 
my life for so little ? Shall I give up my liberty in order to save liberty? 
There is no theoretical reply to these questions. But there are these 
things which stand, irrefutable, there is before you this person whom 
you love, there are these men whose existence around you is that of 
slaves, and your freedom cannot be willed without leaving behind its 
singular relevance, and without willing freedom for all. Whether it is 
a question of things or of historical situations, philosophy has no 
other function than to teach us to see them clearly once more, and 
it is true to say that it comes into being by destroying itself as separate 
philosophy. But what is here required is silence, for only the hero 
lives out his relation to men and the world. 'Your son is caught in 
the fire; you are the one who will save him. ... If there is an ob- 
stacle, you would be ready to give your shoulder provided only that 
you can charge down that obstacle. Your abode is your act itself. 
Your act is you. . . . You give yourself in exchange. . . . Your sig- 
nificance shows itself, effulgent. It is your duty, your hatred, your 
love, your steadfastness, your ingenuity. . . . Man is but a network of 
relationships, and these alone matter to him/ 1 

1 A. de Saint-Exup£ry, Pilote de Guerre, pp. 171, 174, 176. 



456 



BIBLIOGRAPHY 



ackermann, Farbschwelle und Feldstruktur, Psychologische Forschung, 
1924. 

alain, Quatre-vingt-un chapitres sur V esprit et les passions, Paris, Bloch, 
1917. Reprinted under the title Elements de Philosophic \ Paris, Galli- 
mard, 1941. 

Systdme des Beaux- Arts, new (3rd.) edition, Paris, Gallimard, 1926. 

BECKER, Beitrdge zur phanomenologischen Begriindung der Geometrie und 
ihre'r physikalischen Anwendungen, Jahrbuch fur Philosophic und 
phanomenologische Forschung, VI, Halle, Niemeyer. 

bergson, Matiere et Memoire, Paris, Alcan, 1896. 

UEnergie spirituelle, Paris, Alcan, 1919. 

Bernard, La Methode de Cezanne, Mercure de France, 1920. 

bins w anger, Traum und Exist enz, Neue Schweizer Rundschau, 1930. 

Uber Ideenflucht, Schweizer Archiv f. Neurologie u. Psychiatric 1931 

and 1932. 

Das Raumproblem in der Psychopathologie, Ztschr. f. d. ges. Neuro- 
logie und Psychiatrie, 1933. 
Uber Psychotherapie, Nervenartzt, 1935. 

van bogaert, Sur la Pathologie de V Image de Soi (etudes anatomo- 
cliniques). Annales medico-psychologiques, Nov. and Dec. 1934. 

brunschvtcg, V Experience hurnaine et la causalite physique, Paris, Alcan, 
1922. 

Le Prog r is de la conscience dans la philosophic Occident ale, Paris, 

Alcan, 1927. 

buytendijk and plessner, Die Deutung des mimischen Ausdrucks, Philoso- 

phischer Anzeiger, 1925. 
cassirer, Philosophic der symbolischen Formen, III, Phanomenologie der 

Erkenntnis, Berlin, Bruno Cassirer, 1929. 
chevalier, U Habitude, Paris, Boivin, 1929. 

conrad-martius, Zur Ontologie und Erscheinungslehre der realen Aussen- 
welt, Jahrbuch fur Philosophic und Phanomenologische Forschung, 
III. 

Realontologie, ibid., VI. 

corbin, translator of Heidegger, QWest-ce que la metaphysique? Paris, 
Gallimard, 1938. 

dejean, Etude psychologique de la ^distance' dans la vision, Paris, Presses 
Universitaires de France, 1926. 

457 



BIBLIOGRAPHY 



dejean, Les Conditions objectives de la perception visuelle, Paris, Presses 
Universitaires de France. 

duncker, Uber induzierte Bewegung, Psychologische Forschung, 1929. 

ebbinghaus, Abriss der Psychologies 9 Aufl. Berlin, Leipzig, 1932. 

fink (e.), Vergegenwartigung und Bild, Beitrdge zur Phdnomenologie der 
Unwirklichkeit, Jahrb. f. Philo. u. phan. Forschung, XI. 

Die phdnomenologische Philosophic Husserls in der gegenwdrtigen 

Kritik, Kantstudien, 1933. 

Das Problem der Phdnomenologie Edmund Husserls. Revue inter- 
national de Philosophic, No. 2, January 1939. 

fischel, Transformationserscheinungen bei Gewichfshebung, Ztschr. f. 
Psychologie, 1926. 

fischer (f.), Zeitstruktur und Schizophrenic, Ztschr. f. d. ges. Neuro- 

logieund Psychiatrie, 1929. 

Raum-Zeitstruktur und Denkstdrung in der Schizophrenie, ibid., 1930. 

Zur Klinik und Psychologie des Raumerlebens, Schweizer Archiv fiir 

Neurologie und Psychiatrie, 1932-33. 
freud, Introductory Lectures on Psycho- Analysis, London, Allen and 

Unwin, 1922. 

Cinq Psychanalyses, Paris, Denoel et Steele, 1935. 

gasquet, Cezanne, Paris, Bcrnheim Jeune, 1926. 

gelb and Goldstein, Psychologische Analysen hirnpathologischer Fdlle, 

Leipzig, Barth, 1920. 

Uber Farbennamenamnesie, Psychologische Forschung, 1925. 

(editors) : Benary, Studien zur Untersuchung der Intelligenz bei einem 

Fall von Seelenblindheit, Psychologische Forschung, 1922. 
(editors): Hochheimer, Analyse eines Seelenblinden von der Sprache 

aus, ibid., 1932. 

(editors): Steinfeld, Ein Beitrag zur Analyse der Sexualfunktion, Zeit- 

schr. f. d. ges. Neurologie u. Psychiatrie, 1927. 
gelb, Die psychologische Bedeutung pathologischer Storungen der Raum- 

wahrnehmung. Bericht iiber den IX. Kongress fur experimentelle* 

Psychologie in Munchen, Jena, Fischer, 1926. 
Die Farbenkonstanz der Sehdinge, in Handbuch der normalen und 

pathologischen Physiologie, Bethe, X1I/1, Berlin, Springer, 1927 and fT. 
Goldstein, Uber die Abhdngigkeit der Bcwegungen von optischen Vor~ 

gdngen, Monatschrift fiir Psychiatrie und Neurologie, Festschrift 

Liepmann, 1923. 
Zeigen und Greifen, Nervenartzt, 1931. 

V Analyse de Vaphasie et V essence du langage, Journal de Psycho- 
logie, 1933. 

Goldstein and Rosenthal, Zur Problem der Wirkung der Farben auf den 
Organismus, Schweizer Archiv fur Neurologie und Psychiatrie, 1930. 

gottschaldt, Uber den Einfluss der Erfahrung auf die Wahrnehmung von 
Figuren, Psychologische Forschung, 1926 and 1929. 

grunbaum, Aphasie und Motorik, Ztschr. f. d. ges. Neurologie und 
Psychiatrie, 1930. 

guillaume (p.), L Object ivite en Psychologic, Journal de Psychologie, 1932. 

458 



BIBLIOGRAPHY 



guillaume, Psychologic, Paris, Presses Universitaires de France, new 
edition, 1943. 

gurwitsch (a.), Review of Nachwort zu meinen Jdeen of Husserl, Deutsche 

Litteraturzeitung, 28th February, 1932. 
Quelques aspects et quelqucs developpements de la psychologie de la 

Forme, Journal de Psychologie, 1936. 
head, On disturbances of sensation with especial reference to the pain of 

visceral disease, Brain, 1893. 

Sensory disturbances from cerebral lesion, Brain, 1911-12. 

Heidegger, Sein und Zeit, Jahrb. f. Phil. u. phanomen. Forschung, VIII. 
Kant und das Problem der Metaphysik, Frankfurt a. M., Verlag G. 

Schulte Bulmke, 1934. 
von hornbostel, Das raumliche Horen, Hdbch der normalcn und patho- 

logischen Physiologie, Bethe, XI, Berlin, 1926. 
husserl, Logische Untersuchungen, 1, 11/1 and 1 1/2, 4th ed. Halle, Niemeyer, 

1928. 

Ideen zu einer reinen Phanomenologie und phanomenologischen Philo- 
sophic, I, Jahrb. f. Phil. u. Phanomenolog. Forschung, I, 1913. 

Vorlesungen zur Phanomenologie des inner en Zeitbewusstseins, ibid., 

IX, 1928. 

Nachwort zu meinen 'Ideen', ibid., XI, 1930. 

Meditations cartesiennes, Paris, Colin, 1931. 

Die Krisis der europdischen Wissenschaften und die transzendentale 

Phanomenologie, I, Belgrade, Philosophia, 1936. 

Erfahrung und Urteil, Untersuchungen zur Genealogie der Logik, L. 

Landgrebe, Prag. Academia Verlagsbuchhandlung, 1939. 

Die Frage nach der Ursprung der Geometrie als Intentional-historisches 

Problem, Revue Internationale de Philosophic January 1939. 

Ideen zu einer reinen Phanomenologie und phanomenologischen Philo- 
sophic, II (unpublished). 

Umsturz der kopernikanischen Lehre: die Erde als Ur-Arche bewegt 

sich nicht (unpublished). 

Die Krisis der europdischen Wissenschaften und die transzendentale 

Phanomenologie, II and III (unpublished). 

(The last three works were consulted with the kind permission of Mgr 
Noel and the Institut Superieur de Philosophic of Louvain.) 

janet, De VAngoisse a VExtase, II, Paris, Alcan, 1928. 

jaspers, Zur Analyse der Trugwahrnehmungen, Ztschr. f. d. gesamt. Neuro- 

logie und Psychiatrie, 1911. 
kant, Critique du Jugement, trans. Gibelin, Paris, Vrin, 1928. 
katz, Der Aufbau der Tastwelt, Ztschr. f. Psychologie, Ergbd. 11, Leipzig, 

1925. 

Der Aufbau der Farbwelt , Ztschr. f. Psychologie, Ergbd. 7, 2nded., 1930. 

koehler, Uber unbemerkte Empfindungen und Urteilstauschungen, Ztschr. 

f. Psychologie, 1913. 
Die physischen Gestalten im Ruhe und in stationaren Zustand, Erlangen, 

Brunswick, 1920. 

459 



BIBLIOGRAPHY 

koehler, Gestalt Psychology, London, G. Bell, 1930. 

koffka, The Growth of the Mind, London, Kegan Paul, Trench, Trubner 

& Co.; New York, Harcourt, Brace & Co., 1925. 
Mental Development, in Murchison, Psychologies of 1925, Worcester, 

Massachusetts, Clark University Press, 1928. 
Some Problems of Space .Perception, in Murchison, Psychologies of 

1930, ibid., 1930. 

Perception, an introduction to the Gestalt theory, Psychological Bul- 
letin, 1922. 

Psychologie, in Lehrbuch der Philosophic edited by M. Dessoir, Part 

II, Die Philosophic in ihren Einzelgebieten, Berlin, Ullstein, 1925. 

Principles of Gestalt Psychology, London, Kegan Paul, Trench, 

Trubner & Co.; New York, Harcourt Brace & Co., 1935. 

konrad, Das Korperschema, eine kritische Studie und der Versuch einer 
Revision, Ztschr. f. d. ges. Neurologie und Psychiatrie, 1933. 

lachieze-rey, Vldealisme kantien, Paris, Alcan, 1932. 

Reflexions sur Vactivite spirituelle const ituante », Recherches Philoso- 

phiques, 1933-34. 

Le Moi, le Monde et Dieu, Paris, Boivin, 1938. 

Utilisation possible du schematisme kantien pour une theorie de la per- 
ception, Marseilles, 1938. 

.laforgtue, LEchec de Baudelaire, Denoel et Steele, 1931. 

lagneau, Celibres Lecons, Nimes, 1926. 

lewin, Vorbemerkungen uber die psychische Krafte und Energien und uber 
die Struktur der Seek, Psychologische Forschung, 1926. 

lhermitte, l£vy and kyriako, Les Perturbations de la Pensee spatiale chez 
les apraxiques, a propos de deux cas cliniques d'apraxie, Revue Neuro- 
logique, 1925. 

lhermitte, de massary and kyriako, Le Role de la pensee spatiale dans 

Vapraxie, Revue neurologique, 1928. 
LHERMfrrE and trelles, Sur Vapraxie pure constructive, les troubles de la 

pensee spatiale et de la somatognosie dans Vapraxie, Encephale, 1933. 
lhermitte, V Image de notre corps, Nouvelle Revue critique, 1939. 
liepmann, Vber Storungen des Handelns bei Gehirnkranken, Berlin, 1905. 
linke, Phdnomenologie und Experiment in der Frage der Bewegungsauffas- 

sung, Jahrbuch fiir Philosophic und phanomenologische Forschung., 

II. 

marcel, £tre et Avoir, Paris, Aubier, 1925. 

mayer-gross and stein, Uber einige Abanderungen der Sinnestatigkeit im 
Meskalinrausch, Ztschr. f. d. ges. Neurologie und Psychiatrie, 1926. 

menntnger-lerchenthal, Das Truggebilde der eigenen Gestalt, Berlin, 
Karger, 1934. 

merleau-ponty, La Structure du Comportement, Paris, Presses Universi- 

taires de France, 1942. 
Minkowski, Les Notions de distance vecue et d'ampleur de la vie et leur 

application en psychopathologie, Journal de Psychologie, 1930. 
Le ProbUme des hallucinations et le problime de Vespace, Involution 

psychiatrique, 1932. 

460 



BIBLIOGRAPHY 



Minkowski, Le Temps vecu, Paris, cTArtrey, 1933. 

novotny, Das Problem des Menschen Cezanne im Verhaltnis zu seiner Kunst, 
Zeitschr. f. Aesthetik und allgemeine Kunstwissenschaft, No. 26, 1932. 

paliard, V Illusion de Sinnsteden et le problime de V implication perceptive, 
Revue philosophique, 1930. 

parain, Recherches sur la nature et les fonctions du langage, Paris, Galli- 
mard, 1942. 

peters, Zur Entwicklung der Farbenwahrnehmung, Fortschritte der Psycho- 
logie, 1915. 

piaget, La Representation du monde chez V enfant, Paris, Alcan, 1926. 

La Causalite physique chez V enfant, Paris, Alcan, 1927. 

pick, Storungen der Orientierung am eigenen Korper, Psychologische 
Forschung, 1922. 

politzer, Critique des fondements de la psychologie, Paris, Rieder, 1929. 
pradines, Philosophie de la sensation, I, Les Belles-Lettres, 1928. 
quercy, Etudes sur V hallucination, II, la Clinique, Paris, Alcan, 1930. 
rubin, Die Nichtexistenz der Aufmerkamsamkeit , Psychologische For- 
schung, 1925. 
sartre, V Imagination, Paris, Alcan, 1936. 

Esquisse d*une theorie de V emotion, Paris, Hermann, 1939. 

VImaginaire, Paris, Gallimard, 1940. 

VEtre et le Neant, Paris, Gallimard, 1943. 

schapp, Beitrage zur Phanomenologie der Wahrnehmung, Inaugural Dis- 
sertation, Gottingen, Kaestner, 1910, and Erlangen, 1925. 

scheler, Die Wissenformen und die Gesellschaft, Leipzig, der Neue Geist. 
1926. 

Der Formalismus in der Ethik und die materiale Werthethik, Jahrbuch 

f. Phil, und phan. Forschung, I— II, Halle, Niemeyer, 1927. 

Die Idole der Selbsterkenntnis, in Vom Umsturz der Werte, II, Leipzig, 

Der Neue Geist, 1919. 

IdealismuS'Realismus, Philosophischer Anzeiger, 1927. 

Nature et formes de la sympathie, Paris, Payot, 1928. 

schilder, Das Korperschema, Berlin, Springer, 1923. 

Schroder, Das Halluzinieren, Zeitschr. f. d. ges. Neurologie u. Psychiatrie, 
1926. 

von senden, Raitm- und Gestaltauffassung bei operierten Blindgeborenen, 

vor undnach der Operation, Leipzig, Barth, 1932. 
sittig, Uber Apraxie, eine klinische Studie, Berlin, Karger, 1931. 
specht, Zur Phanomenologie und Morphologiederpathologischen Wahrnehm- 

ungstauschungen, Ztschr. f. Pathopsychologie, 1912-13. 
stein (edith), Beitrage zur philosophischen Begrundung der Psychologie und 

der Geisteswissenschaften, I, Psychische Kausalitat, Jahrbuch f. Phil. 

u. phan. Forschung, V. 
stein (j.), Uber die Verdnderung der Sinnesleistungen und die Entstehung 

von Trugwahrnehmungen, in Pathologie der Wahrnehmung, Handbuch 

der Geisteskrankheiten, edited by O. Bumke, Bd. I, Allgemeiner Teil I, 

Berlin, Springer, 1928. 
stekel* La Femme frigide, Paris, Gallimard, 1937. 

461 



BIBLIOGRAPHY 

stratton, Some preliminary experiments on vision without inversion of the 

retinal image, Psychological Review, 1896. 

Vision without inversion of the retinal image, ibid., 1897. 

The spatial harmony of touch and sight, Mind, 1899. 

straus (e.), Vom Sinn der Sinne, Berlin, Springer, 1935. 

werner, Grundfragen der Intensistatspsychologie, Ztschr. f. Psychologie, 

Ergzbd, 10, 1922. 

Uber die Auspragung von Tongestalten, Ztschr. fur Psychologie, 1926. 

Untersuchungen uber Empfindung und Empfinden, I and II: Die Rolle 

der Sprachempfindung im Prozess der Gestaltung ausdriicksmdssig 

erlebter Worter, ibid., 1930. 
werner and zietz, Die dynamische Struktur der Bewegung, ibid., 1927. 
wertheimer, Experimented Studien uber das Sehen von Bewegung, Ztschr. 

f. Ps. 1912. 

Uber das Denken der Naturvolker and Die Schlussprozesse im produk- 

tiven Denken, in Drei Abhandlungen zurGestalttheorie, Erlangen, 1925. 
van woerkom, Sur la notion de Vespace (Je sens geometrique), Revue 

neurologique, 1910. 
wolff (w.), Selbstbeurteilung und Fremdbeurteilung in wissentlichen und 

unwissentlichen Versuch, Psychologische Forschung, 1932. 
young (p. T.), Auditory localization with acoustical transposition of the ears, 

Journal of Experimental Psychology, 1928. 
zucker, Experimentelles uber Sinnestauschungen, Archiv f. Psychiatrie 

und Nervenkrankheiten, 1928. 



462 



INDEX 



Ackermann, 306n 
Adam, 291 
affectivity, 154ff 
agnosia, 126 and n 

Alain, 27n, 3 In, 33n, 34n, 45n, 46n, 
56n, 167, 230n, 267, 335, 336n, 337n 
alexia, 195 
allocheiria, 98, 99 
amnesia, 193 
analogy, 128 
analysis, existential, 136 
anarthria, 175 
anorexia, 164 

anosognosia, 76, 80-1, 148f 
aphasia, 126, 175, 190ff 
appearance, and reality, 2941T 
apraxia, 126 and n, 138-9n, 139 
a priori, 220f 
arc, intentional, 136 
Aristotle, 205, 359 
association of ideas, 17ff 
attention, 6, 26ff 
Augustine, St., x-xi n, 412 

background of movement, 1 1 1 
Balzac, H. de, xxi, 190, 197-8 
Beauvoir, Simone de, 382n 
Becker, 101 n 

'being' and 'having', 174 and n 
Benary, 114n, 128n, 132n, 133n, 134n, 

135n, 196n 
Bergson, Henri, 19n, 57, 58, 59, 62, 78, 

78-9n, 142n, 180, 181, 236n, 263, 

276n, 380, 412, 413n, 415n, 420 
Berkeley, G., 254-6, 318, 320 
Bernard, E., 323 and n 
Binswanger, L., 160n, 161n, 163n, 

164n, 166n, 285n, 286n, 290n, 294n 
body, objective and phenomenal, 105ff 
body image, 98ff, 141 
Bogaert, van, 148n 
Bonaparte, Napoleon, 449-50 
Bouman, 121n, 141n, 190n 



Broca, 194, 195n 

Brunschvicg, 19n, 54n, 56n, 115n, 394 
BUrger-Prinz, lOOn 
Buytendijk and Plessner, 232n 

Casanova, 159 

Cassirer, E., 28n, 53, 124-5 and n, 
127n, 148n, 182n, 192n, 235n, 290n, 
291 n 

categorization, failure of, 176, 192 
Cezanne, Paul, xxi, 132n, 150, 197, 

198, 260, 262 and n, 318, 322, 323, 
330 

Chevalier, 145n 

class-consciousness, 442ff 

Claudel, Paul, 389n, 410, 419n 

Cogito, Descartes', ix, 369ff 

colours: and motor reactions, 209ff; 
naming, 175-6, 191 f; perception of, 
304fT; visual injury and perception 
of, 74; young child and, 29-30 

comprehension and intellection, xviii 

Comte, Auguste, 290, 292 

Conrad-Martius, H., 319n 

consciousness, ix, xv-xvii; and atten- 
tion, 26fF; and body, 124; teleology 
of, xvii 

constancy, 3 Off; hypothesis, 7-8, 26, 

46, 58, 228 
Corbin, H.,424n 
cube, 203ff; 'seeing' a, 262rT 
Custine, 449 
Czermak, 205n 

Darwin, Charles, 194 
Dejean, R., 8n, 231n, 232n 
depth, invisibility of, 254ff 
Descartes, R., ix, 27, 32n, 40, 42, 43-5, 
49-50, 71n, 88, 95, 121n, 148, 198, 

199, 257, 332, 351, 355, 369-72, 375, 
376, 396, 399, 400-2, 437 

Diderot, 104n 
diplopia, 206 



INDEX 



doubt, 382ff, 399f 
Dumouriez, 449 
Duncker, 278n 

Ebbinghaus, 19n 
economics, 171-3n 
ek-stase, 70, 419, 427 
empiricism, 23-4 
engram, 195n 

essences, phenomenology and, vii, xiv 
eternity, 372ff, 393, 422fT 
Euclid, 273, 391, 394, 396 
experience error, 5 

Fabrice (La Chartreuse de Panne), 362, 
363 and n 

field: of sensations, 216; transcen- 
dental, 61 : of vision, 5 

figure-background structure, 13, 101 

Fink, E., xiii, 31n, 51n, 295n, 418n, 
454n 

Fischel, 313n 

Fischer, 136n, 282n, 283n, 287n 
form and content, 127 
Freud, S., viii, 158 and n, 160, 162n, 
168, 172x1, 180 

Gasquet, J., 132n, 197n, 198n, 262n, 

318n,323n 
gaze, 67ff, 226-7, 310 
Gelb, lOn, 119n, 226n, 227n, 305n, 

307n, 308n, 311n, 312n 
Gelb and Goldstein, 103n, 113-14n, 

116n, 119n, 120n, 121n, 122n, 176n, 

191n, 192n, 193n, 266n, 307n 
Gestalten, 60f 

Gestalt psychology, 47fT, 50-1 n 
Gestaltung, 45n 
gestures, 184ff, 194 
gnosia, 125n 
Goethe, 210 and n 

Goldstein, 103n, 104n, 105n, I07n, 
108n, HOn, II In, *116n, 117-18, 
119n, 123n, 138n, 141n, 182n, 190n, 
194n, 195n, 196n 

Goldstein and Rosenthal, 209n, 210n 

Gottschaldt, 18n 

grasping and pointing, 103f, 122ff, 
see also Zcigcn and Greifen 

Griinbaum, lOIn, 121n, 140n, 141n, 
142n, 143n, 190n, 191n, 195n 

Guillaume, lln, 47n, 96n, 257n, 309n 

Gurwitsch, A. t 47n, 3S4n 

Gusdorf, G., xxi n 



habit, 142ff, 152 

hallucination, 334fT 

Head, 29, 98n, 99n, 121n, 140n, 141, 

143n, 190n, 195n 
heautoscopy, 205f 

Hegel, viii, xviii, 127n, 215, 240, 241, 
355, 454, 455 

Heidegger, vii, viii, xiv, 70n, 407n, 410, 
412n, 418, 419, 420 and n, 421n, 422, 
425n, 426n, 427, 430n, 432 

Helmholz, 33n 

Heraclitus, 411 

Herder, 52, 235, 238 

Hering, 12n, 20 and n, 304n, 306, 307n 

history, xix, 87f, 448fT 

Hobbes, T., 32n 

Hochheimer, 114n, 13 In, 132n, 134n, 

135n, 136n 
Holmes, 140n 

horizon, see point-horizon structure 

von Hornbostel, 313n 

Hume, David, 32n, 220 

Husserl, E., vii-viii, x-xvii, xix-xxi, 
13n, 15n, 31n, 32n, 40n, 49n, 50n, 
60n, 71n, 92n, 93n, 121n, 127n, 152n, 
179n, 219n, 220, 241, 243n, 265 and 
n, 274n, 276n, 294, 295, 343n, 363n, 
365n, 376n, 395n, 396 and n, 398n, 
406, 416 and n, 417, 418 and n, 419, 
422n, 425, 426 and n, 428 and n, 
429n, 434n, 454 

idea, 71 

illusion, Aristotle's, 205; and memory, 

20f; and perception, 294ff 
impression, sensation and, 4 
indeterminacy, principle of, 169 
induction, psychological, 115 
intellectualism, 26ff, 39, 46 
intentionality, xvii-xviii, 137, 243ff; of 

act and operative, xviii 
inversion, visual, 244tT 

Jaensch, 12n 
James, William, 79n 
Janet, P., 78, 79n 
Jaspers, K., 7n, 206n, 335n 
judgement, 32ff 

Kaila, lOOn 

Kandinsky, W. t 210 and n 

Kant, ix, x, xiii, xvii, 17, 3 In, 32n, 43, 
53,61,62, 105, 114, 121n, 127n, 129, 
148, 177, 192, 218, 219, 220, 243, 



INDEX 



244, 248, 265, 274n, 276n, 301, 303, 
304, 316, 327, 372n, 386, 387, 395, 
410, 417, 421, 422, 425 and n, 437, 
439, 448 

Katz, 226n, 227n, 305n, 306n, 308n, 
310n, 312n, 313n, 315n, 316n, 317n 
Keller, Helen, 230 
Kierkegaard, S., viii, 71 
kinaesthetic sensation, 93f 
Klages, 342n 

knowledge, as system of substitutions, 
15 

Koehler, 7n, 8n, 15n, 30n, 35n, 50n, 
215n 

Koffka, K., 6n, lOn, lln, 18n, 24n, 
30n, 35n, 50n, 52n, 153n, 231n, 257n, 
262n, 263n, 280n, 304n, 31 In 

Konrad, lOOn 

Kronfeld, 283n 

Kyriako, 139n 

Lachelier, 55, 221, 349 
Lachieze-Rey, P., 243n, 370n, 371n, 

372 and n, 373n, 374n, 386n, 387n 
Laforgue, 168n 

Lagneau, 33n, 34n, 35n, 37n, 45n, 267 
Language, 400fT; see also speech 
Laplace, 432 
Lawrence, T. E., 188n 
Leibnitz, 67, 150, 277,412 
Lenin, 447 

Leonardo da Vinci, 360n, 400n 
Le Savoureux, H., 112n 
lesions, effects of, 74 
Levy, G., 139n 
Lev/in, K., 17n 

Lhermitte, J., 76n, 77n, 99n, 139n, 

148n, 149n, 205n, 206n 
Liepmann, 138-9n 
lighting, and colour, 306fT 
limbs, phantom, 76ff, 80ff, 101 n 
Linke, 270n, 27 In, 274n 

Malebranche, 26, 44, 50, 87, 242, 257n, 

291, 360, 395, 406 
Malinowski, B., 189n 
Marcel, G., 174n 
Marie, P., 190, J 94 

Marx, K., viii, xix, 172n, 398, 445, 447 
de Massary, 139n 
materialism, historical, 171-2n 
Mayer-Gross and Stein, J., 228n, 28 In, 
282n 

meaning, and history, xix 



memories, projection of, 20f 
memory, and perception, 19fT 
Menninger-Lerchenthal, 77n, 88n, 

149n, 205n, 206n, 339n, 340n 
Merleau-Ponty, M. {La Structure du 
comportement\ 3n, 7n, lOn, lln, 
47n, 51n, 56n, 59n, 73n, 77n, 78n, 
87n, 98n, 119n, 125n, 136n, 142n, 
150n, 159n, 170n, 209n, 215n, 232n, 
249n, 31 In, 327n, 350n, 351n, 428n, 
429n, 43 In 
mescalin, 228 
Mill, J. S., 113-15 

Minkowski, 283n, 286 and n, 291 n, 

334n, 339n, 341n 
Montaigne, M. de, 34n, 295, 335, 399 
Mortsauf, Mme de, 321 
motility, as intentionality, 137 
motivation, 49f, 259, 435 
movement, 267ff; abstract, 109f 
Muller-Lyer, 6, 8, 11 

Nagel, 249n, 250 
nature, and empiricism, 24 
Newton, 286n 
Nietzsche, viii 
nominalism, 15 
novel, the, 151 
Novotny, F., 322n 
number blindness, 133f 

object, relation to perception, 67, 300ff 
objectivity, 300fT 

Palagyi, 234n, 339n 

Paliard, 255n, 257n 

Parain, B., 392n 

paraphrasia, 195n 

Pascal, B., 40, 170, 296, 391-2, 408 

Peguy, C, 362 

perception, method of, 13 Iff 

Peters, 29n, 79 

phenomenology: as manner of think- 
ing, viii; meaning, vii 
Piaget, J., 177n, 306n, 343n, 355n 
Pick, 99n 
pithiatism, 161 
Plato, 120, 371 
Plessner, see Buytendijk 
poem, the, 150f 

point-horizon structure, 68, 102 
Politzer, 166n 
Pradines, M., 13n 
present, certitude of the, 44 



INDEX 



probability, 442 

Proust, M., xxi, 81, 83, 85, 145n, 181n, 

183n, 390, 393, 425 
psychoanalysis, 158ff, 455 
psychologism, faculty, Kant's, x 
psychology: descriptive and explana- 
tory, 7n; phenomenological and 
introspective, 59 

quality, 5 

rationality, xixff, 408-9 
reduction, xi, xiv 

reflection, radical, 219ff; and self- 
awareness, 62; and the world, x 
repression, 83f, 162 
reproduction intention, 18 
resemblance, 18 
Rimbaud, A., 407 
Romains, J., 363n 
Rubin, E., 29n 

, 84n, 456n 



Saint-Exupery, A. de 
Sand, George, 339 

Sartre, J. P., 5n, 79n, 86n, 104n, 161 n, 
181n, 186n, 324n, 340n, 380n, 425n, 
427n 435n, 437n, 438 and n, 441n 
Schapp, 229n, 230n, 302n, 309n, 318n 
Scheler, M., lln, J2n, 20n, 25n, 32n, 
52n 58n, 184n, 286n, 305, 32In, 
324n,325n,352,379n,380n,4t8,437 

Schilder, 77n, 99n, 205n 
schizophrenia, 125 

science: and experience of the world, 

viii; and perception, 54ff 
Schorsch, 339n, 342n 
Schroder, 334n, 339n 
self-evidence, 395fT 
von Sendcn, 222n, 223n, 224n, 225n 
sensation, 3fT; double, 93 
sense experience, 52f 
sex, 154fT 

sight, destruction of, 9; and touch, re- 
lation, 217fF 
significance, 212fT, 428 
Sittig, O., 139n 
size, apparent, 256fT 
sleep, 163f 
Socrates, 371 
solipsism, 3571T 

spatiality, of position and situation, 
100, 101 f 

speech, 1741T, 389fT; loss of, 160ff; and 
thought, 178fT 

466 



Specht, 230n, 335n 

Spinoza, 38, 39, 40,179, 359, 372, 397, 

398,451 
Stein, E., 31n, 328n 
Stein, J., 7n, 9n, lOn, 29n, 74n, 75n, 

228n, 234n 
Steinfeld, 114n, 155n 
Stekel, W., 158n 
Stendhal, 190 . 
stimulus and perception, relation, 74tt 
Stratton, 206 and n, 244n, 245n, 246n, 

248, 250, 254n 
Straus, E., 255n, 265n, 287n, 340n, 

341n 

Stumpf, 7n, 8n, 305n 

symmetrical objects, paradox of, 46 

synaesthetic perception, 228-9 

tactile experience, 315-17 
Tastevin, 205n 

thought, primitive, 12; and speech, 
178rT 

time, 410ff; and perception, 69 
transcendence, 169, 193f, 369 
Trelles, 139n 



Valery, P., xxi, 3 In, 146n, 172n, 207o, 

2l4n, 360n, 400n 
Vandenesse, Felix de, 321 
van Gogh, V., 393 
Vienna Circle, the, xv, 23 

Wahl, J., xv 

weight, constancy of, 313 
Weizsacker, 9n, lOn 
Werner, 21 In, 214n, 227n, 228n, 229n, 

235n, 236n, 313n 
Werner and Zietz, 228n 
Werthcimer, 1 2n, 16 and n, 248n, 249n, 
250, 254n, 266n, 269n, 270n, 27 In, 
272 and n, 277n, 384n 
van Woerkom, 112n, 121n, 141n, 190n 
Wolff, 149n 

words, the body and, 235-7 
world, and universe, 71 

Young, P. T., 25 In 

Zcigen and Greifen, 1 13-14, 122fT 
Zcno, 268 
Zietz, sec Werner 
Zollner, 35 
Zuckcr, 334n 



International Library of Philosophy & 
Scientific Method 

Editor: Ted Honderich 

(Demy 8vo) 

Allen, R. E. (Ed.), Studies in Plato's Metaphysics 464 pp. 1965. 

Plato's 'Euthyphro' and the Earlier Theory of Forms 184 pp. 1970. 
Allen, R. E. and Furley, David J. (Eds.), Studies in Presocratic Philosophy 

Volume II 448 pp. 1975. 
Armstrong, D. M., Perception and the Physical World 208 pp. 1961. 

A Materialist Theory of the Mind 376 pp. 1967. 
Bambrough, Renford (Ed.), New Essays on Plato and Aristotle 

184 pp. 1965. 
Barry, Brian, Political Argument 382 pp. 1965. 
Bird, Graham, Kant's Theory of Knowledge 220 pp. 1962. 
Bogen, James, Wittgenstein's Philosophy of Language 256 pp. 1972. 
Broad, C. D., Lectures on Psychical Research 461 pp. 1962. 

(2nd Impression 1966.) 
Crombie, I. M., An Examination of Plato's Doctrine 

I. Plato on Man and Society 408 pp. 1962. 

II. Plato on Knowledge and Reality 583 pp. 1963. 
Day, John Patrick, Inductive Probability 352 pp. 1961. 
Dennett, D. C, Content and Consciousness 202 pp. 1969. 
Dretske, Fred I., Seeing and Knowing 270 pp. 1969. 
Ducasse, C. J., Truth, Knowledge and Causation 263 pp. 1969. 
Edel, Abraham, Method in Ethical Theory 379 pp. 1963. 

Farm, K. T. (Ed.), Symposium on J. L. Austin 512 pp. 1969. 

Findlay, J. N., Plato: The Written and Unwritten Doctrines 498 pp. 1974. 

Flew, Anthony, Hume's Philosophy of Belief 296 pp. 1961. 

Fogelin, Robert J., Evidence and Meaning 200 pp. 1967. 

Franklin, R., Freewill and Determinism 353 pp. 1968. 

Furley, David J. and Allen, R. E. (Eds.), Studies in Presocratic Philosophy 

Volume I 326 pp. 1970. 
Gale, Richard, The Language of Time 256 pp. 1967. 
Glover, Jonathan, Responsibility 212 pp. 1970. 
Goldman, Lucien, The Hidden God 424 pp. 1964. 
Hamlyn, D. W., Sensation and Perception 222 pp. 1961. 

(3rd Impression 1967.) 
Husserl, Edmund, Logical Investigations Vol. 1 : 456 pp. Vol. II: 464 pp. 
Kemp, J., Reason, Action and Morality 216 pp. 1964. 
Korner, Stephan, Experience and Theory 272 pp. 1966. 
Lazerowitz, Morris, Studies in Metaphilosophy 276 pp. 1964. 
Linsky, Leonard, Referring 152 pp. 1967. 

Macintosh, J. J. and Coval, S. C. (Eds.), Business of Reason 280 pp. 1969. 
Meiland, Jack W., Talking About Particulars 192 pp. 1970. 
Merleau-Ponty, M., Phenomenology of Perception 487 pp. 1962. 
Naess, Arne, Scepticism 176 pp. 1969. 

Perelman, Chaim, The Idea or Justice and the Problem of Argument 

224 pp. 1963. 
Rorty, A. (Ed.), Personal Identity 1975. 
Ross, Alt, Directives, Norms and their Logic 192 pp. 1967. 



IT\TTinnt» r 



el, Four Pragmatists 285 pp. 1974. 

Method in the Physical Scien 
Science and Metaphysics 248 pi 
erception and Reality 374 pp. 1963. 
S., The Stratification of Behaviour 428 pp. 1965. 
Skolimowski, Henryk, Polish Analytical Philosophy 288 pp. 1967. 
Smart, J. J. C, Philosophy and Scientific Realism 168 pp. 1963 
Smythies, J. 

Science < 
Sprigge, T 
Taylor, Ch 
Williams, I 
?52 pp. I 
Winch, Pe 
224 pp. 1\ 
Wittgenste 
Wright, Ge 
The Vai 
Zinkernage 

D: • i C 2005 




L 005 728 360 



University of California Library 
Los Angeles 

This book is DUE on the last date stamped below. 



DEC 2 2 2005 



SO 37 



UCLA COL LIB .... 
RECEIVED JAN 

UCU C< : lie . 
RECEIVED - JL 

NOV 1 0 2007 



M 1 0 ?008 
1 8 2006 

\ 3 2007 
2007 



UCLA CO' ' 
RECEl\. :.. J 



4 2008 



